It's up to you to decide whether you find that passage intriguing.
Then again, you can look at the alternative: what life is like if you don't.
If you are a webmaster, web designer, web developer, or software developer and you are interested in advancing the use of technology in studying the Dhamma, I offer you these parting thoughts about the future of Access to Insight.
Although I am no longer working actively on the website, I do intend for it to remain in place on the web in its current state at www.accesstoinsight.org for some years to come.
As always, you are invited to download the website for your own use, share it with others, or re-post it elsewhere on the web.
I encourage you to incorporate its texts into your own website , or to use its many articles and sutta translations as the seed for assembling your own online anthology of Buddhist texts.
You'll find in the FAQ some guidelines about how to reformat/repackage these pages for your own projects.
If you ever have doubts about the authenticity or accuracy of a file that claims to be from Access to Insight, you can compare the file against the “official” version that lives at www.accesstoinsight.org.
Although I think ATI currently stands on its own quite well, there is still plenty of room for improvement:
I invite you to use ATI’s collection of texts as the underlying content upon which to build the next generation of software tools for studying the Dhamma.
To jump-start this process, long-time ATI reader and technical adviser Alex Genaud has launched a github repository containing the latest version of ATI. If interested, please contact him via his website.
with all good wishes,jtb 
The daily schedule at Metta Forest Monastery includes a group interview in the late afternoon, and a chanting session followed by a group meditation period later in the evening.
The Dhamma talks included in this volume were given during the evening meditation sessions, and in many cases covered issues raised at the interviews — either in the questions asked or lurking behind the questions.
Often these issues touched on a variety of topics on a variety of different levels in the practice.
This explains the range of topics covered in individual talks.
I have edited the talks with an eye to making them readable while at the same time trying to preserve some of the flavor of the spoken word.
In a few instances I have added passages or rearranged the talks to make the treatment of specific topics more coherent and complete, but for the most part I have kept the editing to a minimum.
Don't expect polished essays.  
The people listening to these talks were familiar with the meditation instructions included in “Method “ in Keeping the Breath in Mind by Ajaan Lee Dhammadharo; and my own essay, “A Guided Meditation.” If you are not familiar with these instructions, you might want to read through them before reading the talks in this book.
Also, further Dhamma talks are available at dhammatalks.org.
I would like to thank Bok Lim Kim for making the recording of these talks possible.
She, more than anyone else, is responsible for overcoming my initial reluctance to have the talks recorded.
I would also like to thank the following people for transcribing the talks and/or helping to edit the transcriptions: Paul and Debra Breger, John Bullitt, Richard Heiman, Walter Schwidetzky, Craig Swogger, Jane Yudelman, Balaggo Bhikkhu, Gunaddho Bhikkhu, Khematto Bhikkhu, and Susuddho Bhikkhu.
May they all be happy.
Whatever merit there may be to these talks comes from the training I received from my teachers, Ajaan Fuang Jotiko and Ajaan Suwat Suvaco.
This book is dedicated to their memory, with utmost gratitude.
Okay, time to practice.
There are times when talk about practice is helpful and times when it gets in the way.
The best way to solve that problem is simply to do the practice.
When you talk about the practice, you can start getting lost in abstract space.
You forget that the whole purpose of the Dhamma is to point into our hearts.
The big issues that we carry around inside us — our fears, our sufferings, our whole sense of what life is all about: To the extent that talking about the practice helps to get perspective on these things, then it's useful.
But the talk has to be part of a larger doing — doing something about those problems.
Sometimes the doing may seem strange.
Here we are sitting, watching our breath.
What does that do?
It brings us close to the heart, very close to our minds.
Of all the things we can know outside of our minds, the breath is the closest.
As we're one-on-one with the breath, that changes our perspective on things.
We let go of the outside distractions, and ultimately turn our attention to the other part of the one-on-one, which is the mind aware of what's going on in here.
Back when I was first ordained, Ajaan Fuang had me memorize the Divine Mantra, which, I must admit, struck me as kind of strange, as it centered on the six elements, a way of looking at things that felt very foreign.
He had me chant it every evening.
I was living alone up on the hill in Rayong, and would chant the Divine Mantra every evening just after dusk.
After doing this for a while it became less of a weird aspect of Thai Buddhism and more of a friend as I sat there through the night, all by myself.
Finally, one evening it really hit me.
I was going through the six elements, and when I finally got to the chant on consciousness I realized that I wasn't chanting about some foreign, abstract idea of consciousness.
I was chanting about my own awareness, my own mind, my own heart, right here, right now.
I felt as if a huge block of ice inside me just shattered.
I was able to open up and realize that the meditation wasn't some strange foreign thing I was doing to myself.
I hadn't consciously thought that it was, but subconsciously, deep down inside, there was a feeling that it was alien, something from another culture.
That night it became mine: my awareness of my mind, my awareness of things really deep inside.
The Dhamma was no longer a foreign mold that I was trying to impose on the mind.
It became a message pointing to my deepest awareness.
And I became aware of a real tenderness deep down — a tenderness not in the sense of being nice or fuzzy, but in the sense of having been wounded, of needing some help.
There was a need for some healing there, and the meditation was what it needed.
I wouldn't say that I hadn't gained anything from the practice up to that point, but the quality of what I gained changed that night.
This is what we're working on as we're practicing.
The term patipat in Thai means to practice, as when we're practicing the Dhamma, but it also means to look after somebody.
Sometimes the Thai ajaans say, “We're not here to patipat the Buddha's teachings, we're here to patipat our own minds: to look after our own minds, our own hearts.
So although the words may seem foreign and the process of meditation mechanical — you're focusing on the breath, you're dealing with the mechanics of the breathing, how the breathing relates to the pains in the body — ultimately these things start getting closer and closer to your heart.
As you learn to treat your heart with more sensitivity using the breath, using the understanding you gain from the Dhamma, after a while the heart begins to open up.
It opens up and allows you to heal it.
Without that opening up, there's going to be a resistance.
Now, this opening may happen suddenly or gradually, but the important point is that as you get to know the breath, get close to the breath, you're also getting closer and closer to your own mind, closer to the more sensitive parts of your mind.
As you deal with the breath more precisely, with more sensitivity, you find that the mind is finally willing to open up to itself.
Prior to that point it was used to being abused and misused and so it shut itself in, shut itself up, even against you.
One part of the mind shut up against another part, and so the healing couldn't take place.
Your conscious awareness has to learn to be a healing awareness, so that the parts of the mind that need to be healed will be willing to open up.
So an important part of the practice is sensitivity.
Start out by getting very sensitive to the breath.
Get to know how it feels in the different parts of the body, how different rhythms of breathing feel.
It's not so much that you want to become a breath mechanic, although that's one of the side benefits.
It's more that you try to develop your sensitivity to the present moment, your sensitivity to the least little bit of stress, the least little bit of harshness you're adding unnecessarily to the present moment.
You gain more finesse with smoothing it out, evaporating it, dissolving it away.
You begin to see that even the simple process of breathing can be done well or poorly.
If you pay attention to it, it can be done well.
That way, the simple fact that you've got a breath becomes more than just a means for keeping the body alive.
It can actually be used to heal the body, to deal with different types of pain in the body.
At the same time, it gets more and more healing for the mind.
As you become more sensitive to precisely how you approach the present moment, how you deal with the present moment, all those parts of the mind that shut themselves off because they didn't want to be mistreated seem to realize instinctively that there's better treatment in the offing.
Your conscious awareness is more of a healing awareness than it was before.
This allows the rest of your awareness to begin opening up.
Those parts of the body that you often have trouble accessing even with the breath: There comes a time where your sensitivity reaches the point where they begin to open up, too.
You may have noticed, when you really look at your inner sense of the body, that certain parts seem to be missing.
There's a holding in, a tension that blocks things off.
But as your sensitivity to the breath begins to get more and more subtle, the blockages dissolve and you realize that what seemed to be a physical blockage had its mental side as well.
It's opening up now that you have the physical and mental tools to deal with it, along with the sensitivity to use those tools well.
So, your sensitivity to the present moment is a very important part of developing concentration, developing insight, and dealing with the whole problem of suffering, the burdens that the mind carries around.
It gives you the tools you need to deal with all the unskillful mental states that seem to get lodged in the mind and do their damage in both body and mind, and yet that we're often afraid to deal with.
When you're given the tools of not only the breath but also other perspectives of the Dhamma — and this is why talking about the Dhamma can be helpful at times, to gain a clear and precise sense of your tools — then you're ready to handle them.
When I was staying with Ajaan Fuang, the lessons didn't just come from the meditation technique.
They also came from being around him, getting his perspective on things.
I found myself learning a lot just by living with someone from a totally different background.
I'd come up with a problem and mention it to him, and he'd look at me as though I'd come from the other side of the world — which, of course, I had.
My way of looking at the problem seemed very natural to me, but to him it was extremely strange.
Learning to see the strangeness of some of my problems was a useful exercise in getting outside of the problems for a while — sometimes for good.
So, if our discussions help in that way, then they're useful discussions.
They can give us a new perspective on our problems.
The real work, though, is something that's done inside, and often it's hardly even verbal at all.
This is why the breath is such a good way of getting around a lot of our internal blockages.
Instead of attacking the problem verbally, you come at it from the nonverbal side — the energy in the body — becoming sensitive to the side that gets around the mind's automatic nonverbal defenses.
These patterns of blockage in the mind are what ignorance is all about.
Hiding behind that ignorance are all the causes of suffering.
This is one of the scary parts of being born into any realm, especially the human realm and the realms below that.
As you come into this life, you immediately meet with suffering — wham!
immediately — and there's nobody to explain it to you.
You're facing it head-on.
Other people can comfort you, but they can't show you how to deal with it.
So the mind comes up with all sorts of jerry-rigged approaches, improvised approaches, to keep the suffering at bay.
Then, even after we learn language, we carry those pre-verbal approaches toward suffering into our adult lives without realizing it.
Often those approaches involve blocking, denial, and it's not just a mental blocking.
It's a physical blocking as well.
So, as we're working with the breath and getting around some of these blockages, don't be surprised when the sleeping dogs — the things that seemed to be lying very peacefully in the mind — suddenly get stirred up.
That's because the barrier behind which they were hiding has suddenly dissolved away.
When that happens, you can use the sensitivity you've developed in the meditation — along with the understanding of the Dhamma you've developed by reading and listening, gaining a perspective on the whole issue of suffering and the end of suffering — and apply them directly to your own, immediate sufferings.
The Buddha wasn't talking about suffering in the abstract; he was talking about the sufferings lodged right here in each person's heart, right here in your heart, right now.
And the tools he offered are meant to come here into the heart, to the particular sufferings in the heart, where they can make all the difference.
The Buddha's teachings on skillful qualities of mind come in clusters: five this, seven that.
Even the one quality that's always appropriate — mindfulness — is always taught in the context of clusters.
To begin with, it's paired with alertness: Mindfulness means keeping something in mind, as when we keep reminding ourselves to stay with the breath as we meditate; alertness means noticing what's going on, being alert to what you do and to the results of what you're doing.
For mindfulness to be effective in training the mind, it always has to be paired with alertness.
And both of them have to play a role in larger clusters as well.
They're part of the five strengths, the seven factors of Awakening, and the noble eightfold path.
The reason the Buddha teaches skillful qualities in clusters is because unskillful qualities come in clusters, too.
The three roots of unskillfulness — greed, aversion, and delusion — can branch out into five hindrances, seven obsessions, ten fetters, forms of craving.
They grow exponentially.
No one skillful quality can take them all on.
Each skillful quality has to be strengthened by others to be effective, to play its part in the training of the whole mind.
At the same time, each has to be balanced by others to make sure it doesn't go overboard and end up as a tool for the opposing forces.
This is why the Buddha left teachings like the four bases of success, the seven factors for Awakening, and the four sublime attitudes: armies of skillful qualities to do battle with the armies of Mara.
When you see the various lists placed down — one, two, three, four, five, six, whatever — it gives the impression that you start with one skillful quality and then drop it to move on to the next.
Actually the process is more a question of gathering all the qualities together, and then leaning in the direction of one or another as is appropriate so that the mind can maintain its balance.
This is the principle that applies to the sublime attitudes: immeasurable goodwill, immeasurable compassion, immeasurable appreciation, and immeasurable equanimity.
We start out with goodwill not because it's the least advanced of the qualities but because it's the most essential, the most basic.
On top of that you build the others: compassion, appreciation or sympathetic joy, and finally equanimity.
A balanced mind is one that knows when to emphasize which of the four.
It's not that you abandon number one to move to number two or number four; you're trying to keep all four of them on hand so that you can use whichever one is appropriate for the occasion.
Goodwill lies at the basis of everything.
In fact you could say that it lies at the basis of the whole practice.
If we didn't have goodwill for ourselves and the people around us, the four noble truths wouldn't make any sense as an important teaching.
It's because we would like to see suffering end, not only for ourselves but for the people around us, that we want to follow the path to the end of suffering.
We're concerned to find out what suffering is, how we can abandon its causes and help to realize its cessation.
So goodwill is where everything starts.
Think about it: Why would you want anyone else to suffer?
You might think about the evil or cruel things they've done in the past, but even then why would you want them to suffer?
To learn a lesson?
Well, they're going to learn their lesson because the principle of karma is going to take care of that — that's why the teaching on equanimity is there — so you don't have to go out and be God's vengeful sword to make sure that everyone gets their just punishments.
Your only job is to make sure there are no limits on your goodwill.
When people have done horrible things, you don't have to like them; you don't have to condone their behavior.
That's not what goodwill means.
Goodwill means that you don't wish anyone harm.
If they're doing horrible things, you have every right to stop them if you can — after all, in doing horrible things, they're creating bad karma, more suffering for themselves.
Just make sure that you don't harm them in trying to stop them.
So try to make your goodwill limitless — or as the texts say, immeasurable.
Take this as a challenge.
When you spread thoughts of goodwill, test to see where the limits are.
Don't just pretend that your goodwill is immeasurable.
Everyone's goodwill starts out with limits.
What are the limits of yours?
After spreading goodwill to people you already feel it for — your friends, your family — start spreading it to people for whom you don't spontaneously feel it.
Does your heart object when you try spreading goodwill to people you dislike?
Stop and ask it: Why?
What would you gain from seeing them suffer?
Look at the little voice inside that resents their happiness.
Is that a voice you want to identify with?
Can you drop that attitude?
This is where the practice of developing goodwill really makes a difference in the mind: When it forces you to challenge any smallness or narrowness in your heart.
If you think of goodwill as a billowing pink cloud of cotton candy covering the world in all directions, what you're really doing is covering up your actual attitudes, which is of no help at all in gaining insight into the mind.
Goodwill is meant as a challenge, as a way of searching out and working through your small-hearted attitudes one by one so that you can examine them, uproot them, and really let them go.
Only when you work through the particulars like this can goodwill become more and more limitless.
That's when your compassion can become limitless as well.
If you feel goodwill for people, then when they're suffering the ill effects of their bad karma you can't help but have compassion for them.
You want them not only to stop experiencing whatever pain or suffering they're undergoing at the time, but also to stop doing whatever's going to cause them to continue to suffer.
This is an important part of compassion.
It's not simply a soft spot in your heart for people who are suffering.
It also means also trying to find some way to help them to stop doing the things that are causing them to suffer to begin with.
When you can help them, you appreciate their happiness.
You feel sympathy for the happiness they encounter.
Even in cases where people are experiencing happiness that has nothing to do with you at all, you appreciate the fact that they're experiencing the results of their past good actions or present good actions.
You don't resent their happiness.
Even if you're in a contest and they come in first and you come in second and you felt that you really deserved to come in first, this is where you have to practice sympathetic joy.
There's a larger framework for things than the one you're probably aware of.
Notice in all these cases that there comes a point where you have to leave things for what they are, cases where you want to help someone and you can't, or you would rather see yourself gain the happiness that somebody else has.
This is where you have to develop equanimity.
Notice that the teaching on equanimity is a reflection on the principle of karma.
Of the four chants we have for the sublime attitudes, it's the only one that's simply a statement of fact.
The others say:
The first three are wishes, attitudes, things you would like to see happen.
“May… May… May…” The fourth one is simply a reflection on the way things are.
This reflection actually turns up in lots of different contexts.
In the five reflections, the reflection on karma is the one that gives hope.
You realize that you're in charge of your actions.
You're not simply a victim of fate or of the stars or of some other being acting through you.
You're the one who's making the choices.
That's what gives you hope.
But it's hope coupled with heedfulness.
You've got the power to do good with your actions, but also the power to cause harm.
The principle of karma is a double-edged sword.
If you're not careful, you can use it to cut your own throat.
This is why the Buddha recommends reflecting on the principle of karma as a way of inspiring heedfulness.
Taken a little further, the universality of the principle of karma is a reflection for developing equanimity both toward yourself and toward other people.
In other words, you come across incidents in your life where you can't gain the happiness you'd like.
There's a karmic block there.
So you learn to accept it with equanimity.
That doesn't mean that you give up and become totally passive and indifferent.
You look for the areas where your actions can make a difference.
Don't waste your time and energy, butting your head against the wall in areas where you can't make any change.
Focus on the areas where you can.
So equanimity is not hopelessness, it's not passive indifference.
It's there to redirect your energies in the proper direction, to the areas where you can act for your own wellbeing and for the wellbeing of others.
The reflections on karma are also used as a basis for developing wisdom and insight.
They form the background for all the teachings on discernment.
The central insight of the Buddha's Awakening was that pain and pleasure come from your actions.
There are actions that bring pain, actions that bring pleasure, actions that bring both, and then special actions, that put an end to action, an end to suffering, and bring total happiness.
That's the essence of the Buddha's discernment.
So it's an interesting combination: equanimity, hope, heedfulness, discernment.
These things all go together.
They hover around that same reflection:
In other words, all beings are responsible for what they do.
Ajaan Suwat once gave a Dhamma talk on this reflection, focusing on the difference between the anatta teaching and this one statement.
Form, feeling, perceptions, thought-constructs, consciousness: These are not self.
But we are the owners of our actions.
“Think about that,” he said.
In other words, don't latch on to the results of your actions; latch on to the fact that you're making the decisions right now, all the time.
Once a decision has been made, it's been put into a larger circle of cause and effect beyond your control; but you do have a chance to make a decision again the next moment, and the next moment, and then the next.
Focus on that.
Don't get caught up in the results of past actions.
Focus on what you can do now to make the present actions skillful.
That's the focus of the teaching, “We're the owners of our actions.
We're going to be receiving the results of these actions.
So act in a way whose results you'd like to receive.
Be concerned about that: That's what's meant by the Pali word, ottappa.
It can be translated either as fear of the results of your actions or concern for the results of your actions.
However you translate it, it means that you're not apathetic; you know that whatever you do is going to bear results.
Here again the quality of discernment comes in.
There are lots of things we like to do that will give bad results and things we don't like to do that will give good results.
The Buddha said the measure of whether we're a fool or a wise person lies in how we handle situations like that.
In other words this is where the quality of discernment really shows its worth.
You can talk about discernment, you can describe the three characteristics, the five khandhas, the six sense-spheres, dependent co-arising, emptiness, all these wonderful concepts; you can talk about them, but if they can't help you make the right decision when you're faced with a hard decision, your discernment's useless.
Useful discernment is the type that enables you to talk yourself out of doing things you would like to do but that you know would give bad results, or to talk yourself into doing things you don't like to do but would give good results.
That's where discernment shows its stuff.
Our actions are the source of everything we experience.
If you want experiences to be good, focus on the source.
If you don't like the kind of experiences you're having, turn back and focus again on the source.
It's constantly right here, right here in the present moment.
The Buddha's teachings on time are interesting in that even though they do talk about time, they don't talk about a beginning point in time.
The beginning point for your experience is right here in the present moment.
It all comes springing out of right here; so instead of trying to trace things back to first causes someplace way back in the past, the Buddha has you look for first causes right here and right now.
Dig down deep inside into the area of the mind where intention and attention and perception play against each other, for that's the point from which all things are born.
The connections we have in life with different people are created by our actions: things that we've done together with other people or to other people or for other people.
These create the connections that we have with the people around us.
Interconnectedness is a very popular teaching in Buddhism, especially nowadays, but it's funny that people like to talk about interconnectedness without the teaching on karma.
They turn to dependent co-arising as a model for interconnectedness, this web of connections where one factor can't exist without a whole lot of other factors, but they neglect to realize that dependent co-arising is a teaching on how ignorance is connected with suffering, how craving is connected with suffering.
It's the kind of connectedness you want to cut, not the kind you want to celebrate.
Connectedness through karma can go either way — the connections can be good, or they can be bad.
So you want to foster the good ones.
And again, where do you look?
You look at what you're doing right here and right now.
How are you behaving with other people?
How are you treating them?
These create the relationships you're going to be able to enjoy or you're going to be stuck with, now and on into the future.
So choose your actions carefully.
Our actions decide our lives.
In other words there's no judge up there someplace in the sky sitting on a big throne passing judgment on us.
We're passing judgment on what kind of life we want to have by the way we act — which is both empowering and also a little scary.
Think of how many times you've acted on unskillful motives.
Think of the unskillful motives you still have lurking around in your mind that could form the basis for future unskillful actions.
Think hard about that.
It means there's work to be done — not just to escape unskillful actions but also to foster skillful ones.
This is where the hope comes in.
Even though we may be suffering in our lives, there's a way out through our own actions.
We don't have to sit around waiting for somebody else to come and save us.
We're not victims of fate.
We can make the choices, we can order our priorities so that we can reshape our lives in a positive direction through our thoughts, words, and deeds.
This is why we meditate, because meditation creates good qualities, skillful qualities in the mind: mindfulness, alertness, concentration, discernment, persistence, truthfulness, perseverance.
As we work at these qualities, as we put them into action, they get strengthened and become more and more the wise arbitrators of our lives, pointing our lives in the direction we really want to go.
Then the final reflection builds on that:
This is a reminder to be heedful, that we really want to act on our good impulses, our skillful intentions.
We want to develop the qualities in our minds that will foster these skillful intentions, because these are the things that really make a difference.
These teachings foster equanimity in reminding us to be equanimous toward our past actions, toward the results from past actions.
Certain things we can't change because they've already been done.
We can't turn back the clock.
But the teachings foster hope in that we can make a difference in what we're doing right here and right now.
There's that opening for us to design our lives, to point them in a better direction.
In that balance among equanimity, heedfulness, and hope, learning how to make proper use of this principle of karma: That's where the discernment comes in.
The teachings on karma have gotten a bad rap, largely because they've been mangled, turned into a simplistic caricature: either fatalistic or tit for tat.
But if you understand the complexity and also the purpose of the teaching, you begin to realize that it's not what we thought it was.
It's not an excuse to justify the suffering that people are going through or for our being indifferent to that suffering.
When you really understand the workings of karma, you see other people's suffering as an opportunity to help them.
You don't know how much longer their karma for suffering is going to last.
Wouldn't it be a good thing if you could be the agent to help bring their suffering to an end?
Put yourself in their place: Wouldn't you like to have somebody come and help?
And someday you may actually be in their place too.
After all, as the Buddha said, you've already been there before and if you don't get out of the cycle of rebirth, you'll probably be there again.
Karma is not a teaching meant to make us feel superior to other people.
You never know: Maybe the results of their past bad karma are simply coming faster than the results of your past bad karma, and you may someday be in a similar place to where they are — or even worse.
So you can't be complacent.
And the teaching on karma is not designed to make you complacent.
If anything, just the opposite: It's meant to make you uncomplacent.
I once read someone saying that September th burst his complacent Buddhist bubble.
Well, that's an oxymoron: “complacent Buddhist.” The whole purpose in following the Dhamma is that it teaches you not to be complacent.
As long as there's suffering in your heart, there's work to be done.
So, on the one hand, the principle of karma makes you heedful, reminding you that you've got work to do.
But it also means that there's a way to work with suffering so that you can go beyond it: That's where the hope lies.
If you understand how to use the teaching on karma, you see how really useful it is, how relevant it is to the meditation we're doing right now.
The prime factor you want to dig down and find in your meditation is just that: the karma, the factor of intention.
Watch to see how it moves.
See how you can make it more skillful.
See how you can perfect that factor so that it takes you not only into more pleasant places in space and time, but also — when you get really skillful — outside of space and time, to the end of karma, to the point where there's no more work to be done.
That's one of the descriptions of an arahant: katam karaniyam, someone who's done the task, done what had to be done.
The burden is laid down.
Understanding the principle of karma, and using it the right way, is what makes all that possible.
The first step when you meditate is to get your body into position: your right leg on top of your left, your hands in your lap, your right hand on top of your left.
Sit up straight, look straight ahead of you, and then close your eyes.
That's the body in position.
The next step is to get the mind in position.
Start with thoughts of goodwill, because that's why we're here.
Goodwill is the wish for happiness — both for your own happiness and for the happiness of everybody else.
This is what we're working on as we meditate: We're taking that wish and we're working on it, looking for a way to bring true happiness to ourselves and to the people around us.
Spread thoughts of goodwill first to yourself and then out in ever-widening circles to people who are close to your heart, people you know well and like, people you're more neutral about, and even people you don't like.
Don't let there be any limitation on your goodwill, because that's a limitation on your own mind, on your own happiness.
At the same time, think about it: If everyone in the world could find true happiness, the world would be a much better place.
No one would have any reason to harm anyone else.
With that thought, spread thoughts of goodwill to people you don't even know — and not just people: all living beings of all kinds, east, west, north, south, above, and below, out to infinity.
May we all find true happiness.
The next step is to bring your awareness back to the present moment.
What have you got here?
You've got the body sitting here breathing, and you've got the mind thinking and aware.
So bring all those things together.
Think about the breath and then be alert to the breath: What's the breath doing right now?
Is it coming in?
Is it going out?
Where do you sense it coming in?
Where do you sense it going out?
For the time being, put aside any preconceived notions you may have about where the breath comes in and where it goes out.
Just notice how it actually feels — because breathing is not just air coming in and out of the lungs; it's the whole process, the whole energy flow by which the body brings the air in and expels it.
And that's not just a matter of the nose and lungs.
The entire nervous system can be involved.
Different parts of the body expand and contract to bring in the air.
That's all counted as part of the breathing process.
So wherever you're most aware of the breathing process, focus your attention there.
Try to make that spot comfortable.
You can do this by adjusting the length of the breath, the width, the depth of the breath — whether it's fast or slow, heavy or light — whatever ways you have of adjusting the rhythm and texture of the breath so that your sensation of the breathing feels good.
That's getting the mind in position.
Now the problem with both the mind and the body in position is how to keep them there.
It's not that difficult to get them into position, but to keep them there: That takes effort.
And particularly the mind, because the mind is so used to running around.
The body can sit here perfectly still, yet in the course of five minutes the mind could have gone around the world many, many times.
So this is the point you have to focus on most.
In fact, all the real issues are in the mind.
Even when there's pain in the body, the body itself doesn't really object to the pain; it doesn't mind.
The mind is what gets upset by the pain.
So you have to work mainly with the mind here.
If it wanders off, just bring it right back.
If it wanders off again, bring it back again.
Try not to get frustrated with it, try not to get discouraged.
It's used to wandering, so you have to accept it as normal that the mind is going to wander.
Your duty right now is to catch it as quickly as you can and to bring it back without a lot of recrimination — just gently, but firmly, bring it back to the breath.
And let the breath be as comfortable as possible.
The more comfortable it is, the less likely the mind will be to wander off.
In fact, if you get the breath really comfortable, it becomes really absorbing.
Explore where in the body you feel the different parts of the breathing sensations, the breathing process.
Which parts of the body feel tense?
If you want, you can survey the whole body, starting from the top of the head on down, or starting at the navel and going up the front of the body then down the back and out the legs, and beginning again at the back of the neck to go out the arms.
Notice how the different parts of the body are or are not involved in the breathing process.
Notice where you feel tension related to the breath.
If you feel any tension anywhere, let it relax, let it dissolve away, so that no new tension builds up with the in-breath, and you don't hang on to any tension with the out.
This way you make the breathing a lot more interesting.
Then choose whichever part of the body you find congenial, and settle down there.
As for pains, at this stage of the game you don't have to focus on them.
If there's a pain in the leg, just let it be in the leg.
You don't have to be down there in the leg with it.
You can stay in any other part of the body where the breathing feels comfortable — that's your choice.
And be careful not to tense up around the pain.
Remember that the breath is a whole-body process.
When the breathing is comfortable, the breath energy can go through all the nerves and right through any pain there may be, so that you don't compound the pain by tensing up around it.
Try to develop a sense of wanting to be here, of liking to be here.
Try to make the breath your friend.
Often, when you're meditating and things don't seem to be going well, the object of your meditation seems to become your adversary.
It's the hardest thing to focus on and it seems to keep wanting to slip away.
But that's not the case at all.
That's your own misperception.
If you make friends with the breath, it's a lot easier to stay here.
Being friends means, first, trying to sense as precisely as possible what it really feels like, as opposed to your preconceived notions of what it should feel like or where you should feel it.
In other words, listen to the breath.
And then, second, allow the breath to get more comfortable.
These are basic principles in establishing any kind of friendship: Listen to the other person, allow the other person to feel at ease and at home, and soon the other person will start opening up.
The same with the breath: The breath energy in the body has lots to offer.
On the physical side, it can relieve a lot of stress, a lot of diseases associated with stress.
On the mental side, it can create a sense of ease and belonging here in the present moment so that you enjoy being right here just breathing in and breathing out.
When you get on more friendly terms with the breath, and the breath becomes your friend, then you're more inclined to want to stay, to see what you can learn from the breath.
That's the first step in having the meditation go well.
There are actually four steps altogether — although maybe it's better not to think of them as steps.
There are four component factors in the mental attitude you should bring to the meditation to make it go well.
They're called bases of success.
The first one is simply the desire to do the meditation, wanting to do it, being inclined to do it.
If you find that your mind isn't inclined, step back and reason with it.
Think of the importance of training the mind.
Here it is, the major factor in your life, and if it's untrained it's like giving your car over to a wild, crazy person to drive.
You have no idea where the crazy person is going to take that car, whether he's going to run off the road and into somebody, because you have no control over him.
It's the same with your mind — the mind that shapes your life.
If you have no control over it, you don't know where it's going to take you.
So as we're meditating we're trying to develop a measure of control.
Not the sort of control of control freaks, but the control of someone who's intelligent in knowing how to administer and manage things so that the mind feels happy to do what really should be done.
That requires mindfulness; it requires alertness.
And those are precisely the qualities we're developing as we meditate.
The mind is the chief producer of all the happiness and suffering we experience in the world.
That's why, when the Buddha gave his first sermon, started out with the issue of suffering.
That, he said, is the big problem in life.
And it's to be solved right here, in the mind in the present moment, because the suffering isn't something coming from outside.
The real problem in life is the suffering that comes from craving.
And you can't work on craving until you're really mindful and alert, and have the steady concentration that allows you to look at it calmly to see it in action.
So those are the qualities we're developing as we meditate: mindfulness, alertness, concentration, the ability to see things clearly as the mind grows more still.
So even though we haven't quite gotten there yet in our meditation, at least we're working in that direction.
And the more you sense the importance of these qualities, the more you strengthen your desire to meditate.
Once that desire is in place, the next step is just to stick with it.
Persistence is the second base of success.
Just keep at your task.
If the mind slips off, bring it back.
If it slips off again, just bring it back again.
If it slips off ten times, a hundred times, bring it back ten times, a hundred times.
Don't give up.
Don't get discouraged.
Remember that this is a task that nobody else can do for you.
We suffer in life because of our own lack of skill in dealing with sights and sounds and smells and tastes and ideas that come our way.
And because it's our own lack of skill, we're the ones who have to overcome that lack by developing more skillfulness in how we manage our minds.
If we don't do it, nobody can do it for us.
And if we don't do it now, when is it going to get done?
Are you going to wait until you're older?
That doesn't help.
On the one hand, even if you do live to a ripe old age, the mind gets more and more difficult to train the older you get.
And then of course there's the question of whether or not you're going to live that long.
You've got the opportunity to meditate now, so go ahead and do it.
Make the most of it each moment you have the chance.
That's persistence.
The third base of success is intentness: You really focus on what you're doing; you give it your full attention.
In the case of the breath, this means noticing when it's too long, when it's too short, when it's too heavy, when it's too light.
The more careful your attention, the more sensitive you are — and the more you start to see here.
You also try to be attentive to the mind.
Pay attention to what kind of breathing really helps the mind to settle down, what kind of breathing doesn't.
Once you notice that, you can make changes.
In other words, be observant.
Watch carefully what's happening, and make adjustments.
The more sensitive you are to what's going on, the more you're going to see, and at the same time, the more the mind will be willing to settle down.
The fourth base of success is vimamsa, the one that's most difficult to translate.
It covers the mind's ability to discern, its ability to be ingenious — in other words, all the qualities of active intelligence.
If you see that something is not working in your meditation, use your imagination to figure out another approach that'll get better results.
You can make the breath deeper, you can make it more shallow, you can make it come in and out different spots in the body.
There's a lot to play around with here.
Sometimes you have to use auxiliary meditation topics to help you.
If you're having a problem with anger, work on goodwill and equanimity.
There are meditation topics that help foster those qualities.
If you're having a problem with lust and desire, contemplate the body in terms of its parts.
Notice that when you're attracted to a body, it's not the whole body you're attracted to.
It's only certain parts.
If you took the whole body into your mind, inside and out, you'd find it really difficult to get attracted to it.
If you're feeling lazy, you can start thinking about death.
As I said earlier, you have no idea how much longer you're going to live.
The only thing that's for sure is that you've got this opportunity right now, so take advantage of it.
These are ways of thinking that get the mind directed back to its work.
They're ways of using your powers of intelligence, your powers of ingenuity, to see what works to bring the mind to the present moment.
Once you've got it there, you can focus on the breath again.
Treat the breath as home base, and other topics simply as means of bringing you home when you've wandered off course.
When you've got all these qualities together — your desire to meditate, your persistence, intentness, and your powers of ingenuity and intelligence — you find that the meditation grows; it develops.
It starts showing results.
Notice that desire does have a role in this.
Sometimes people say that when you meditate you shouldn't have any desires — you should just be in the present moment, allowing whatever comes up to come, without any idea of “progress” at all.
The Buddha never taught meditation that way.
At all.
The whole point of the practice is that it is a path; it goes someplace.
That someplace is right here into the present moment, but there is progress in terms of what you see, develop, and abandon here in the present moment.
And desire does play a role in that seeing, developing, and abandoning — as do all the other qualities: intentness, persistence, ingenuity, the mind's ability to see what works and what doesn't work.
It's simply a matter of learning how to use these mental qualities in a way that's helpful.
Like desire: We've all had the experience of focusing on the goals we want in our meditation and then discovering that our desire gets in the way.
Well, the solution is not to drop the desire; it's to learn how to focus the desire in a way that's more useful.
Focus on the causes that are going to get you there.
Think of yourself as driving to a mountain on the horizon.
If you spend all your time focusing on the mountain, you're going to drive off the road.
So what do you do?
You don't give up your desire to go to the mountain.
You stay focused on the road.
Every now and then you glance up to make sure that you're headed in the direction of the mountain, and that the mountain hasn't appeared in your rear-view mirror.
But your main focus should be on what you're doing right now.
Once you focus your desire here, make your desire more mindful, more alert — not in a general sense, but more precisely mindful right now, more precisely alert right now.
And then the next moment, and then the next.
Try to focus your desire on making the practice continuous.
As I said, the problem is not getting in position; it's staying in position.
That's what you've got to work with here.
And you do that by being mindful of the breath, alert to the breath, more continually.
Once you focus your desire properly, it becomes an aid to the meditation and not an obstacle.
The same goes for the other qualities.
Sometimes your effort can push, push, push so hard that it gets in the way of any kind of progress.
So step back.
Then it doesn't become a matter of not pushing; you just learn where to push — what things to push, what things to let be.
In other words, you take these four bases for success and refine them.
You learn through experience how to master them as aids to the meditation.
Sometimes ingenuity, or thinking processes, can get carried away as you get too abstract in analyzing things.
When that happens, step back and be ingenious about what you're doing right now.
Analyze what you're doing right now, what the results are.
Don't go beyond what's happening right now, what you're doing right now.
That way these qualities become focused, they become a part of the meditation.
They help your meditation succeed.
Ordinarily we don't like to think in terms of success in meditation.
There's so much pressure to succeed in the material area that we don't want to hear about standards for success in the area of the Dhamma.
But if you're serious about putting an end to suffering, the issue of success is something you can't avoid.
When you approach the meditation skillfully, you get results.
Your efforts have succeeded.
They're actually accomplished something.
That's the whole point.
So if you find that things aren't working in the meditation, it's because one of these qualities isn't properly focused.
Either your desire to be with the breath is flagging; or you're not being as consistently persistent, breath after breath after breath; or you're not really paying attention — you're just going through the motions; or you're not using your analytical powers to see what's wrong, what could be changed if something has to be changed, or see where you're trying to push change too much.
Use your powers of analysis to watch over all four of these qualities — to see what's unbalanced, what's unfocused — and then figure out how to put things into shape.
Once you've got these qualities working together on the meditation, there will have to be progress.
There are no two ways about it.
In Thailand they like to take these qualities as a guide to how you progress in anything, how you succeed in anything.
To succeed in school, to succeed in business, you need the desire to succeed, you need to be persistent, to be intent, to use your powers of analysis and ingenuity.
If you apply those qualities to any task, you're sure to succeed.
And what do you succeed in here?
You succeed in putting an end to the suffering you've been causing yourself unnecessarily.
You succeed in realizing the Deathless.
And you do it by developing more alertness, developing more mindfulness.
You do it with this simple process of focusing on the breath, being sensitive to the breath, exploring the way the breath is moving in the present moment.
All the good things in the mind build on this.
Focus on your breath.
And as for what's going to happen when you focus on the breath, put that thought aside.
And where the meditation is going to take you and how it's going to take you there: Put those thoughts aside as well.
Be careful not to anticipate too much, because when you know too much in advance, it's not really knowing.
A lot of it is guesswork.
A lot of our preconceived notions come from ignorance.
That's precisely what we're trying to get rid of, and yet our ignorance shapes the way we practice.
So when you meditate, it's important to clear away as many of those expectations as possible.
Just be with the breath: When the breath comes in, know it's going in; when it's going out, know it's going out.
That's all you really have to know right now.
As for what's going to happen with the next breath or the one after that, wait until those breaths come.
Ajaan Fuang once noted that we now have lots of books on meditation, lots of explanations, and in some ways it's a help, but in other ways it's a hindrance — a hindrance in that many of our perceptions and memories picked up from books and Dhamma talks clutter up the present moment.
They actually get in the way of seeing what's going on.
And this gets compounded with our general impatience: We want to see results fast, and in order to make them happen fast we squeeze them too much in the direction we think they're supposed to go.
But a lot of the genuine results of the meditation have to come from simply allowing the causes to do their work, to develop on their own, without your having to push them too much in any particular direction.
So if you see your thoughts leaning into the next moment or what's going to happen further on in the future, just pull back to stay balanced right here, right now.
Look after the causes, and the results will take care of themselves.
As Ajaan Lee often advises in his talks, start out small.
Notice where you feel the breath, and then watch it.
If it doesn't seem comfortable, you can nudge it into what seems to be a more comfortable direction.
Don't be in too great of a hurry to go on to the next step, because we want to come from a position of strength, of real knowledge, as we meditate.
There's a passage in the Canon where the Buddha says that a person who doesn't have a basic level of happiness and inner goodness simply cannot do goodness.
Sounds like a Catch-, but that's not the point.
The point is we all have a certain amount of goodness in our minds, and so we should tap into that first.
The goodness here not only means good intentions but also a good-natured attitude toward what you're doing, a good-natured attitude toward the people around you.
That's why we recite that chant on goodwill every night.
You have to bring a certain level of humor to the practice: the humor that allows you to laugh at your mistakes without getting bitter.
When you get bitter, you start lashing out at people around you.
You start criticizing the techniques — there are all kinds of things you can criticize.
But if you can sit back for a minute and tap into your own basic good-natured attitude — and it's there inside all of us — try to bring that to the fore, and then work from that.
It may be a small thing, but you've got to start small.
Start with what you know.
The breath is coming in.
You know that?
Yes, you know that.
It's going out.
You know that?
Yes, you do.
Okay, know just that much.
Don't forget that.
Is it comfortable or not?
Well, you may not be sure.
Could it be more comfortable?
Experiment and see.
Try to sensitize yourself to how the breathing feels.
Without this level of sensitivity, the meditation becomes mechanical.
When it's mechanical, it becomes a chore.
And when it's a chore, the mind will rebel.
So ask yourself: What really feels good when you're breathing right now?
If you can't figure out what really feels good, hold your breath for a while until the mind comes to the point where it's screaming at you: “Breathe!
You've got to breathe!” Then, when you breathe, notice what feels really good as you breathe in.
Take that as a guide.
We in the West seem to be especially cut off from our own bodies.
We're so much in our heads that the area of the body becomes unexplored territory, like those old maps from the fifteenth and sixteenth centuries that would show distorted coastlines of continents with big blank spaces in the middle.
“Here be tygers,” they would say.
Who knew what was in there?
It's the same with the body: We know a little bit about it, but there are huge unexplored areas inside.
So take as your beachhead this one point where you know the breath is coming in.
You know the breath is coming out.
You know whether it's comfortable or not, and you begin to get a sense of what adjustments can be made to make it more comfortable — so that it feels really good just breathing in and out right there.
As for the other steps in the meditation, put them aside for the time being.
Make sure you've got this step well under control.
The people who try to take on too much at once are the ones who end up not mastering anything at all.
Even if your progress is incremental, at least it's progress.
You're building solidly on a solid foundation.
That's what matters.
Otherwise the meditation is like a ladder that you lean up against an unstable wall: You may be able to climb very high, but when the wall falls down, you're going to be in really bad straits.
Try to build step by step on a solid staircase.
Build on what you really know.
As for what you've heard about how the meditation is supposed to develop — even if you've had experiences in the past when it's developed in interesting ways — put all that aside for the time being.
Don't let it clutter up your mind, because any progress in the meditation has to come from being very solidly focused on the present moment, fully intent on what you've got right here.
If a lot of expectations are cluttering up your view, you're not going to see what you've got right here.
Whatever progress you make won't be genuine.
So, as Ajaan Lee says, be willing to be dumb about the meditation.
Sometimes this is called “beginner's mind,” but for me it's always been more effective to think, “Be dumb about it.” The “dumb” person is the one who sees when the emperor isn't wearing any clothes.
You may have heard a lot about meditation, but how much do you really know?
You do know right now that the breath is coming in, you know it's going out.
You know if your mind is with the breath or if it's wandered off.
Focus on being really clear about what you know, what you're directly experiencing, as continuously as possible.
The continual clarity is what actually creates the state of concentration you're looking for, the developed mindfulness you're hoping for.
It starts with these incremental steps.
So, whether the results come fast or slow, be sure that at least you're getting the causes right.
And they're simple: Be with the breath, all the way in, all the way out.
Just this breath.
And if the breath is uncomfortable, you can adjust it.
You're not required to breathe in a particular way, and you're not required to refrain from influencing the breath.
The mind is always going to have some influence on the breath, whether it's conscious or not, so it might as well be conscious.
If you pretend that you're not influencing the breath, the influence goes underground.
It's better to learn how to be open about the fact, to be sensitive to what's going on.
And this simple exercise, if you allow it to do its work, will bring the results you want.
In fact, it will bring results better than you might expect.
If you clutter up your meditation with your expectations, that's all you'll get: things that seem to fit in with your expectations.
But if you allow it to be a little bit more open-ended, you create possibilities for other things to happen as well — often better things, more genuine.
So have faith in the process.
If you've got the causes right, the results have to come.
Even though what you're doing right here may seem a small thing, remember: All the great things in the world had to start out small.
Coastal redwoods, the tallest trees in the world, come from the tiniest imaginable seeds.
So even though the seed may be small, don't underestimate its potential.
This spot where you're with the breath may seem to be a small thing, but as you get down into it, you find that there's a lot there.
In fact, the Buddha's whole teachings on causality have one big consistent point: that whatever's happening in the universe, the basic pattern is something you can discern right here in the present moment.
In chaos theory they call this “scale invariance”: the patterns on the large scale, on the macro scale, are the same things happening on the micro scale.
And you've got the micro scale right here.
On the macro scale you see that even scientific theories keep changing — sometimes very fast.
They're not anything you can directly observe, for they're based on so many assumptions.
But on the micro scale, right here in the present moment, with your mind on the breath, all the basic processes you're going to have to know for Awakening are occurring right here.
It's simply a matter of getting more and more sensitive right here.
So, even though it may seem like a small spot, it's got a lot of potential.
It's like those seeds they have in Thailand — I've forgotten the name of the plant, but it has a seed with the diameter of a quarter.
If you break the shell and stick it into about three or four gallons of water and come back a few hours later, it turns out that these little noodle-like strands inside the seed, which were sitting there waiting to soak up water, now fill your entire three- or four-gallon container.
This small spot in the present moment is like that: There's a lot to tease out in here.
So don't be disdainful of its potential.
Learn to start out small, and those small things are going to reward you.
Like the old fable of the mouse and the lion: The lion saved the mouse's life, and later on the mouse was able to save the lion's life, even though the lion originally was pretty disdainful of what the mouse claimed it would be able to do.
But it could; it could eat right through the net in which the lion was trapped.
And so this little present moment you've got here: Don't step up on it, hoping that you're going to get someplace higher.
Focus right here.
Really give it a chance to open up.
Whether it opens up fast or slow — that's not the issue.
The issue is that you give it the space, you give it the time, you're patient enough and watchful enough to allow it to open.
And someday it will eat through the net in which you keep catching yourself.
When we say that big things grow from small things, it's not that they have to grow in such a way that other people might notice.
It's just that what's there in the present moment becomes a lot clearer.
The intricacies of what are going on right here play out in a much larger perspective — if you give them the time to develop.
So, start out small.
If you have to be small for a long time, that doesn't matter.
What matters is that the progress, when it comes, is solid.
The breath is where the mind and the body meet.
We often have a sense that the solid part of our bodies is the part we know best, the part we inhabit, and the breath is something that just comes in and goes out through the solid part we're inhabiting.
But when you close your eyes, what do you actually sense of the body?
There's a shape defined by the area where there's energy flowing back and forth.
And that energy is actually our most direct perception of the body.
We tend to overlook it and focus on other things, but our primary sensation is right here.
It's breath.
As we meditate, we're learning to get back in touch with that primary sensation so that eventually we can use it as a mirror for the mind.
Because, as I said, it's where the mind and the body meet.
It's the part of the body the mind is most sensitive to, the part most immediately responsive to the mind.
The way you breathe is very much affected by the states of your mind.
When you're worried, you breathe in a certain way.
When you're happy, you breathe in another way.
When there's anger, there's still another way of breathing.
If you keep at certain ways of breathing, it's going to have an effect on other aspects of the body as well.
Certain ways you hold your body are really shaped by the breath.
And it's through the breath that so many mental states can cause physical disease, particularly diseases related to stress.
So one of the first things you have to do as you meditate is to work through the breath energy in the body.
Find a spot where the breathing feels comfortable.
It might be at the tip of the nose, the middle of the chest, around the abdomen, the base of the throat.
Actually it can be anywhere in the body where you feel that the sensation of in-breathing feels good and the sensation of out-breathing feels good.
Then you train yourself to stay with that sensation.
In the beginning the sensation may not be all that impressive — just a simple, comfortable feeling, sometimes a neutral feeling — but you find that if you stick with it, it gets more and more relaxing, more and more comfortable.
Like a fire.
In the beginning a fire starts as just a tiny little spark that you have to shelter against the wind.
It takes a long time for the fuel to catch fire, but once it does, the fire begins to spread to the different parts of the fuel.
It's the same with the body and the breath.
You find one spot that seems small and not all that impressive, but it feels okay.
Then you stay with it, and the consistency of your attention — as you keep that spot relaxed, without pushing it or pulling it or putting any pressure on it — is what allows it to develop a sense of fullness.
The longer you stick with it, the more the fullness gains strength.
Once it's more solidly established, you can start allowing it to spread to different parts of the body.
The word jhana, or concentrated mental absorption, is related to a verb, jhayati, that means “to burn.” Pali has lots of different words for the word “burning,” and jhayati is used to describe a steady flame, like the flame of an oil lamp.
The words for “burning” used for other types of fire — like a raging bonfire, a wood fire, or a forest fire — are something else entirely.
The word for a steady, constant flame: That's jhayati, which relates to jhana.
And as we practice concentration, that's the kind of consistency and steadiness we're trying to develop.
Our focus starts as a small, steady flame, and then you try to allow the steadiness to flow through the body.
But first you have to establish that comfortable spot.
If you go around the body adjusting the breath here, adjusting the breath there, without a real sense of comfort, then you can make things worse.
You're just messing things up.
So, it's important that you get this sense of ease first, and then allow things to spread from there so that your awareness fills the whole body, and your sense of comfortable breath energy fills the whole body as well.
Think of it as a healing process.
Many times, as soon as the mind gets a little bit still and the breath gets comfortable, you think, “Well, what's next?” But before you can move to what's next, a lot of healing has to be done in the body — all the areas of tension and tightness and discomfort that you've allowed to take hold in the body.
The breath has to very gently massage them, very gently heal them, and sometimes this takes time.
Just like a wound.
You can't just say, “Poof,” and it's gone.
You have to put the medicine on and let it stay there for hours.
In the same way, the process of healing your inner energy field takes time, so be patient with the breath.
When things get still, stay with it.
And even though things may not seem to be happening, there's a slow, steady process of healing going on in the body.
This is why patience is such an important part of this skill.
When they talk about putting an effort into the meditation, the word for “effort” really means persistence.
It's this stick-to-it-tived-ness that's going to make all the difference.
The continuity of your focus, the steadiness of your persistence: Those are the qualities that make the breath a solid foundation for the mind.
One of the problems in teaching meditation to people in America is that very few of us have learned any skills requiring that kind of steadiness, that kind of patience.
Here, when you sharpen a knife, you just run it through the knife sharpener — zip, zip — and it's done.
Over in Thailand, though, when I had to sharpen a knife I was given a big stone and a knife and told, “Okay, be very careful not to be in too great of a hurry, because if you get impatient you may ruin the blade.” So, you have to be very consistent, very steady, and very patient as you work the blade over the whetstone.
As you do this, you learn all the mental skills that go along with being patient: how not to get bored, how not to give up, the kind of conversation in the mind that helps keep it going.
If you have any skills like that, think back on how you've talked yourself into being patient, consistent, persistent, and then apply those skills to the breath.
So, work with a sense of comfortable breath.
Allow the breath to get comfortable, allow it to be easeful, and then allow it to spread through the body.
When it begins to spread through the body and it starts working through patterns of tension, you come to a more intense sense of absorption.
Stay with that.
Learn the skills required to stay right at that point of balance where you're not pushing it too hard and not being too lazy or lax — just the right amount of interest, the right amount of attention and intention to keep things going — so that the breath can have a chance to heal the wounds in the body, soothe the mind, and bring both the body and the mind to the stages of practice where the concentration gets stronger and the insights sharper, more subtle.
This all depends on the groundwork.
As for the question of how soon you can move on to the next step: Don't ask.
Just keep on doing the work.
Things will develop.
It's like waiting for a plant to grow: You can't sit there and pull it up, up, up to make it grow faster.
If you do that, you uproot it, and that's the end of the plant.
What you have to do is just keep watering it, applying fertilizer, removing the weeds as they come, and your patient effort will pay off as long as you focus that effort in the right spot, which is the persistence, the attention, and the intention you're bringing to the breath.
As long as these are consistent, you can expect results.
Whether those results are fast or slow doesn't matter.
What matters is that they're solid.
So, stick with it.
We've got a whole hour right now to be with the breath — and don't stop with the end of the hour.
Try to maintain that sense of ease and comfort, that sense of being centered inside as you bow down, get up and leave, go back to your meditation spot, and continue meditating until it's time to go to bed.
When you wake up tomorrow morning, try to be right here again, right here at the breath.
This consistency is what makes all the difference.
Getting into position to meditate isn't all that hard.
First you get your body into position: your back straight, your head facing straight forward, your eyes closed, your hands in your lap.
Then you get your mind into position: Just focus it on the breath.
The breath is right here.
You don't have to search around too much to find it.
The difficult part lies in keeping the mind in position, trying to maintain a steady awareness.
That takes some doing because the mind is used to not being steady.
It's used to jumping around.
It has a sense of there being some entertainment value in jumping around.
You get bored with one thing, so you jump to something new.
And for a lot of people, that's where their freedom lies: in their ability to think about anything they want to.
But when you come right down to it, how much happiness comes from jumping around like that?
Once you jump from one thing, you know you're going to have to jump to another thing and then to another.
So no matter where you land, you start finding yourself immediately tensing up, ready to jump again, which leaves the mind constantly in a state of tension.
So when we meditate, we give it a good, solid place to stay, and then we remind it: You can stay there.
You don't have to jump.
That way the mind can begin to relax a lot of its tension and can actually dissolve into the object of the meditation.
When you focus on the breath, you want to become one with the breath.
When you focus on the body, let your awareness become one with the body — not an awareness ready to jump someplace else, but an awareness that seeps into the body, saturating everything down to your fingers and toes.
The steadiness of your gaze is what's going to help things seep into one another, to come together here in the present moment.
So as you stay with the breath, try to keep your gaze — your focus on the breath — as steady as you can, as continuous as you can.
The more continual your focus, the more you see how things are actually connected, actually related to one another.
If your gaze isn't steady, you end up connecting things in your imagination.
It's like playing connect-the-dots with your mind.
There's a little bit of awareness here, and another little bit of awareness there, and then someplace else, and as for what was happening in between, you're not really sure.
But you can guess, so you draw your own lines to turn the dots into a duck or an airplane.
And whether those lines actually correspond to reality or not, whether the dots were parts of a duck or an airplane or something else entirely, you don't really know because you weren't there.
You were off someplace else.
This is the way most people's knowledge of the world gets built up: It's a game of connect-the-dots, with very few dots and a lot of lines.
So when we meditate we try to erase all the imaginary lines and make the awareness itself the line that connects things.
The Buddha gained Awakening because he saw cause and effect and how they are connected.
When this is, that is.
From the arising of this comes the arising of that.
That's how he described one of the central insights in his Awakening.
He directly saw these things as they were connected, and that was because his awareness was connected.
So we stay with the breath as a way of developing this continuous, connected, steady awareness.
If you find yourself letting up in your focus, just come right back.
In the beginning, our awareness is like the phrases in music: There's a phrase and then a pause, another phrase and then a pause.
But what you want to do as you meditate is to develop an awareness that doesn't come in phrases and pauses, that just keeps going, going, going, just as the breath keeps going.
There may be a rhythm to the breathing, but underneath the in-and-out breath is another level of breath energy that's continually there.
It's like a background noise in the body.
And to make your awareness continuous, that's what you want to focus on: this background energy.
Sometimes you notice it as the energy in the body during the pauses between the in-breath and the out-breath and between the out-breath and the in-breath.
There's a slight pause in the breathing, and yet there's still energy in the body that lets you know that the body's sitting here.
It doesn't totally dissolve away.
The more you tune in to this more subtle level of energy, the less you need the in-and-out breath as your focus.
The in-and-out breath becomes just one aspect of a larger field of breath energy that begins to grow more and more calm, more and more calm, because you're down on another level.
You've tuned in to another level that's more continuous, that can be used as a basis for insight.
When your awareness is continuous and the breath is continuous, you just stay there together.
That's what we're working toward.
So try to be sensitive to even the slightest lapse in your awareness.
Don't wait until the mind has already left the breath before you register what's happened.
Sometimes you feel a stirring in your awareness.
Something wants to move.
Things aren't as interesting as they were, or for some reason or another the mind begins to let up a little bit before it actually moves on to something else.
Learn how to detect that.
Then work with the breath, work with your focus in a way that can get around that tendency to stir a little bit and move on.
This is why it's so important that the breath be comfortable.
The more comfortable it is, the easier it is to stay with it.
Once it's comfortable, then you have to watch out for the mind's tendency to lose its focus, lose its sharpness.
That's why we work with spreading the breath energy through the body, being aware of the different parts of the body as a way of keeping ourselves awake and alert even though things are getting comfortable — because when we meditate we're here to do work, not just to zone out or have a little stress reduction.
The reason we've reduced the stress and made the mind more comfortable in the present moment is because it's got work to do in the present moment.
There are things it's got to figure out.
It's got to figure out why it's causing suffering, exactly where it's causing suffering.
The Buddha emphasized the issue of karma and intention, so we look to see: What intentions are there in the mind that make us suffer?
Why don't we see them?
Why do we feel that those choices are so necessary that we even forget they're choices?
These are some of the big questions we've got to figure out.
And the only way to figure them out is to stay right here continually, because those choices are usually made in the gaps, in the seams in our awareness when we're off someplace else.
In fact, when there's a seam or a gap in your awareness, it's usually a sign that a choice is going to be made in the mind.
It's the mind's way of fooling itself, of hiding all of its choices behind the curtains.
So when you sense that tendency to want to leave, remember: Something important's coming up.
If you're not here to see it, you're going to miss it.
Don't follow the same old pattern that you've followed who knows how many times, letting the mind hide important things from itself.
Why is it hiding?
Well, look into it.
What is it embarrassed about?
What is it ashamed to show itself?
What is it trying to deny?
When you're operating from a sense of steady comfort then it's easier to look into those issues and not run away.
So this issue of steadiness is very important.
It allows you to see things that you otherwise wouldn't see.
It plows right through the gaps in your awareness in which the mind hides things from itself, and it zeros in on the big issues in the mind: Why is the mind causing itself suffering?
Why is it causing itself stress in ways that don't have to be there?
In the context of the Three Characteristics, the Buddha does point out that anything fabricated is stressful, but in the Four Noble Truths he focuses more on the issue of the stress of clinging and craving.
The craving causes the clinging, and the clinging to the five aggregates is his basic definition of stress and suffering.
That's what we've go to work on, because that's the part of stress and suffering that's not necessary.
Once it's taken care of, then the other stresses in the world are not an issue at all.
So what is this clinging?
What is this craving?
How and why do we hide it from ourselves?
How can we learn to see through it?
Ignorance is what allows these things to happen in the mind, and the only way to combat ignorance is to be as steady and consistent as possible in maintaining your awareness.
What this means is that being steady in your awareness is not just a matter of concentration practice.
It's the basis for allowing discernment to arise — because you're right here, and when you're right here watching what's happening, you can't help but see.
The problem is we're all too often not here.
Our gaze has been diverted.
Our attention has slipped off someplace else.
So keep zeroing in on the breath, zeroing in on the breath.
Don't let anything else pull your attention away.
Try to stay with each breath.
If it's too much to think about staying here for the full hour, stay with this breath, and then this breath.
In fact, if you start thinking too far ahead, you're going to miss this breath, and you're going to miss the point where the mind slips off.
But if you keep things small, keep things manageable, you do a lot better job.
So: this breath, this breath, this breath.
And as for your past breaths — well, for one thing, they're not here anymore, and whether you were able to stay with them or not doesn't matter any more.
What matters right now is this breath.
Similarly, breaths in the future are not here for you to look at, either.
You can't be responsible now for whether you're going to stay with them then.
You will be responsible then if you learn how to be responsible now.
So take it one step at a time.
Even when the meditation is not especially easy or pleasant, taking it one step at a time makes it a lot more manageable.
In other words, if the breath doesn't seem all that enthralling or absorbing, and there's a pain here or a pain there, it's a lot easier to take it one step at a time.
Back when I was in Thailand, I had a fairly long alms round, and there were days when the rain was just pouring down in buckets.
There was no way I was not going to get wet even though I had a big umbrella.
The wind would blow, the rain would come from all sides.
And when I thought about the whole hour and a half I was going to be out there, slogging through mud, it was difficult to get up the energy just to take the first step.
But then I realized, of course, that if I didn't go on my alms round I wouldn't get to eat that day.
So I took it one step at a time: this step, this step, this step.
You'd be surprised how quickly — when you take it one step at a time — that hour and a half goes, how manageable it is, even when it's raining hard.
You're not weighing yourself down with the past or future, with how many steps you've taken, or how many minutes you've been out on the road, and how much longer it's going to be before you get back to a place that's dry.
You're right here, right here, right here.
And you find that right here is okay, it's manageable.
It may not be the most wonderful moment, but at least it's manageable.
This principle can help carry you through a lot.
When you're dealing with pain, often the pain gets really bad — not so much because the actual physical sensation is bad, but because you're weighing yourself down with thoughts about how long the pain has been going on, and how much longer it's going to go on in the future.
And so all that past and all that future weigh down this one little moment here in the present: No wonder the present buckles under the weight.
But if all the present has to support is just this one moment, you find that it's capable.
It can stand up to whatever weight there is in the moment.
So the ability to focus exclusively on what's happening right here, right now is a very useful skill.
But it's not the only skill we have to develop while meditating.
Some people want to make the whole meditation just that: being in the present moment.
But that's only one of the skills we need to develop.
There's also the skill of how to make the present moment a pleasant place to be.
And that requires some memory of the past: what's worked in the past, what hasn't worked in the past.
That's called the skillful use of the past.
Just as there's a skillful use of the future — having a sense that this practice is going someplace, there's a direction to it, it's going to take you to total freedom.
And as you work on your skills, it's not always going to be a story of stumbling along and falling down, having to pick yourself up, dust yourself off, walk a few more steps, and stumble again.
It's not always going to be that way.
There comes a time when you really get into the breath and you begin to notice patterns.
If you had no memory of the past and no sense of the future, you wouldn't be able to see patterns — the patterns in what you've done, the results that come when you do it.
That requires using the past skillfully.
Some of your actions will have results in the immediate present, but some of them will take time to show their results.
If you don't have that sense of mindfulness — which is what this memory of the past is: mindfulness — if you don't have that mindfulness, you can't learn any lessons.
And although each present moment may be a wonderful new beginner's moment, still you don't learn anything from it.
Your progress gets short-circuited right there.
So an important skill in the meditation is how to make skillful use of the past, skillful use of the future.
The Buddha outlined this in his teachings to the Kalamas, and also in his teachings to his son, Rahula.
Notice the intention behind what you do, watch what you're doing while you're doing it, and then watch for the results.
See the connections between the type of intention and the type of results you get, either immediately or over time.
That's the skillful use of the past.
Unskillful use of the past is when you run back to either getting happy or sad about how things were in the past.
Unskillful use of the future is when you start anticipating either with desire or aversion or fear what's going to happen in the future.
The one fear that is useful is the fear of the consequences of unskillful actions.
That's what keeps you on the path in the present.
Another skillful use of the future is your anticipation of how good it's going to be when you finally master this.
But still, there's no way you're going to get there unless you follow the steps.
So learn to recognize when your mind is referring you to the past or the future: What are skillful ways of bringing in the past or the future, and what are unskillful ways?
Sometimes a skillful recollection, say, of the future could be, “Death could come at any time.
Are you ready to go?
If you're not — well, what are you doing right now to prepare yourself?” That's using the future as a spur.
So when you realize that the past and the future do have their uses, you give more dimension to the practice.
If this were just a practice of staying in the present moment, we could all go out and have frontal lobotomies and that would take care of it.
But it doesn't work that way.
You need some sense of the past.
You have to be observant and remember what worked and didn't work in the past, and then see how those lessons apply to the present moment.
Sometimes you have to re-learn a lesson or adjust a past lesson, because what seemed to work in the past may not be working this time.
That simply means you have to be even more observant of what's going on.
It doesn't mean you totally throw out the past.
It means you take your knowledge and adjust it, you make it more refined.
And this is how the practice develops, as you build on your past mistakes — and on your past successes as well.
So remember that there's more dimension to the practice than just simply the present moment.
But the skill of staying in the present moment is one of the more difficult ones to learn, which is why we emphasize it so much.
After all, where are you going to observe things if you're not really observant of the present moment?
If the lessons you learned in the past aren't working, maybe you weren't really observant then.
This is a chance to get more observant, more precise, with each and every breath.
Learn at which part of the breath cycle you tend to lose your focus.
For some people it's between the in-breath and the out-breath, or between the out-breath and the in-.
Sometimes it's when a particular breath is uncomfortable: You don't like it, you move off.
So learn to watch for any tightness or tension that may appear in the breath.
Watch out for the tendency to lose focus in between the breaths.
See what you can do to counteract those tendencies.
Ask yourself how you recognize the point where the out-breath turns into an in-breath.
In some cases it's very subtle.
And we have a tendency, when we're trying to create a boundary line like that, to make it more clearly drawn than it really has to be.
So watch for that tendency as well, because it creates a lot of unnecessary blockage and tension.
Try to be with the whole cycle of each breath, all the way through, as precisely as you can.
Then at the end of the meditation you can stop and reflect on what you did, what lessons you learned.
Some lessons are immediately obvious.
You do something, you immediately get good or bad results.
With those lessons you don't have to reflect too much on the past; they're right there.
Other lessons you learn by reflecting on, say, a bad session: What are you doing?
Why isn't it going well?
When you have good sessions, reflect on those after you're done: What did you do?
How did you focus the mind?
Take that lesson and file it away for future reference.
You may, when you pull it out from your mental filing cabinet, discover that it wasn't quite as precisely observed as you might want.
But you have lots of breaths to watch, lots of opportunities to relearn your lessons.
So this is an incremental path, a gradual one, but there's nothing wrong with that.
Fortunately, Theravada never had a Shen-hui, the Rush Limbaugh of the Chan tradition with his sudden Awakening buzz saw, who viciously ridiculed every hint of a gradual path, every hint of a developing skill, as being an obstacle to Awakening.
It got so that nobody in the Chan tradition after that dared talk about methods or progress.
Fortunately, Theravada doesn't have that problem.
In fact, its problem goes the other way.
There's a passage in the Udana where the Buddha compares the practice to the continental shelf off of India: a gradual slope and then a sudden drop.
The commentaries reinterpreted that to mean totally gradual, without any sudden drop.
But the Pali obviously says there is a sudden drop.
So the gradual slope does take you in the right direction.
Without the gradual slope, you wouldn't get to the sudden drop.
Without the sudden drop, the gradual slope wouldn't have any real meaning in terms of opening up to something really new.
But the way causality works, there is the opportunity for making gradual, very precise observations about your breath, getting more and more skillful as you learn over time.
Then you finally hit the point where it all breaks open in unexpected ways.
In this way the path is both gradual and sudden.
So as you're working on each breath, each breath, each breath, remember that you're on a path that can take a long time, but every journey requires individual steps.
This is why the Buddha called it a path.
If it weren't a path, it wouldn't have any direction.
But it does have a direction, and the gradual steps are good steps to take.
Not all the good things are saved to the end.
But ultimately — as you get more and more precisely in the present moment with more skill, the skill that you've learned from the past — those gradual steps suddenly open up to something totally Other.
And it's all found by looking right here; you don't have to look anywhere else.
This is one of the amazing things about the Buddha's teachings: All the great lessons we have to learn are right here.
We don't have to speculate about some event way back at the beginning of the universe — that's not relevant.
We don't have to pin our hopes on a judgment day at the end of the universe — that's not relevant, either.
The relevant things are what we can see for ourselves, right here, right now.
Things change: Well, how do they change?
Is there a pattern to their change?
Watch right here and you'll find out.
Watch in a way that grows more precise over time by learning how to make skillful use not only of the present, but also of your memories, and your anticipation of where you want this to lead you in future.
Learn to use these things properly and they all become part of the path.
Concentration practice involves work.
We often think of it as a place for the mind to rest, and it is, but it's even more a place for the mind to recharge its batteries.
That requires energy, requires effort, requires work.
In Thailand the idiom for meditation is “to make an effort.” And in meditating there very definitely are things we have to do.
It's not just a letting go of the tension, a letting go of the stresses of daily life.
There's also work to be done to keep mindfulness continuous, to keep your alertness continuous and all-around, to keep both mindfulness and alertness spinning around inside here like a generator.
A generator sits in one place but it has to spin around to create electric power.
If the generator simply sits still, it can't create anything.
There has to be some activity for the electrons to run in a current.
The same is true with concentration.
The two causes for gaining a sense of ease and wellbeing are directed thought and evaluation.
Directed thought grows out of mindfulness; evaluation, out of alertness.
You have to keep directing your thoughts to the breath, keep evaluating it, noticing when it's comfortable, noticing when it's not.
And then there's singleness of preoccupation: You try to keep the mind at one with its object, make it become one with its object.
All of this takes effort, and sometimes people will sit in meditation, put a lot of effort into it, and at the end of the period say, “Well, the meditation didn't get any results.
It was just constant effort.” However, it's a normal principle in practicing concentration that it requires effort before it can start giving results.
The effort is never wasted.
Over time you begin to get a sense of how much effort is too much, how much is too little.
When you get a sense of “just right,” the results you want start appearing.
At that point, the payoff comes as you're doing the work.
You don't have to wait until the end of the year before your paycheck arrives.
You receive installments all along the way.
So as you're doing the meditation work, keep this point in mind: It is work, but as you get more precise at it, more subtle at it, the results you're looking for will start to appear.
Ajaan Lee talks about concentration work being basically three activities — directed thought, evaluation, and singleness of preoccupation — with all three spinning around in one place.
When you start being very precise in doing them, they start showing their results.
In other words, you keep reminding yourself to stay with the breath.
If you notice that the mind is wandering off, you immediately get it back on track.
Try to sense when the mind is preparing to go even before it actually goes.
That way you can nip the distractions in the bud.
And try to be as alert as possible to how the breathing feels.
Try to make it feel refreshing.
This way the work becomes something you can easily keep on doing, because you feel refreshed in doing your work.
Sitting here, it feels good breathing in, feels good breathing out.
Ordinarily large areas of the body are starved for breathing energy, so give them a chance to drink it in, to bathe in it.
Think of the energy going to the different parts of the body — “Who wants this breath?
Who wants the next one?” — until you've got the whole body nourished.
If it feels good, do it again.
Next time around try to be even more perceptive as to what's going on, what's needed where.
As for singleness of preoccupation, make sure the mind doesn't lose itself, doesn't start wandering off in other directions, getting distracted.
And watch out for the hindrances, because they drain your energy.
Even though you may be generating a lot of power here, if the hindrances get in the way everything gets drained away.
Like the solar electric system here at Wat Metta: When we were first setting up the batteries, we were careless and put them on a couple of boards on the ground.
Well, sure enough, a rain storm came.
One of the wires shorted, and by the next day the batteries were totally dead.
Even though the solar panels were pumping out energy, the batteries were so dead you couldn't revive them.
The same holds true in the meditation: If you keep coming back to the breath but then allow the mind to go wandering off in other directions, then all the power, all the recharging in your batteries, just gets drained away.
So you've got to be careful not to go thinking about anything else while you're here with the breathing.
When thoughts about other things do come passing through, you don't want to get involved in them.
Just let them go, let them go.
Part of the problem is that you get curious: “What's this thought about?
What's that thought about?
Maybe it's something important, maybe it's something entertaining.” Watch out for those attitudes, because that's like opening the door for thieves to come into your house, or like scraping away the insulation on your wires before the rats do.
So as soon as a thought that's not related to the breath comes into the mind, just let it go.
And there are certain ways of thinking about the breath or the meditation that actually get in the way of the meditation, too, so you've got to watch out for them as well.
The big troublemakers are restlessness and anxiety.
Restlessness is wanting to push for results before the mind is really ready to give them, trying to figure out things beforehand, before you've actually done the concentration work.
You've got to do the work first and let the results develop on their own.
Ajaan Lee gives the example of getting gold out of a rock.
You can't just go to the mountain and use a pick to extract the gold.
You've got to take the rock and subject it to heat.
The fire will take time, getting hot enough so that it can melt the gold, but when it reaches the melting point, the gold will all come out on its own.
In other words, when your powers of concentration are strong enough, when they reach the point where they're ready, then the work of discernment gets a lot easier.
Things separate out right before your very eyes without your having to do an awful lot of analysis.
When the mind has been concentrated long enough and solidly enough, you just pose a question and things will appear very clearly, for you've created the environment in which they can appear clearly, in that the mind is solid and still.
As for anxiety, one of the standard definitions is concern about what other people think.
“What's this person going to think?
What's that person going to think?
If what I know is right offends people, what am I going to do?
Do I dare do it?” That kind of anxiety really gets in the way of your goodness.
If you let yourself get led astray by those thoughts in your daily life, it's very hard not to get led astray while you're meditating.
One of the things I really appreciated about Ajaan Fuang was that he really didn't care what other people thought.
If he knew that what he was doing was right, then even if it was unpopular he went ahead with it, because he realized that there's no way you can control other peoples' attitudes toward you.
If they want to think ill of you, well, that's their right.
And, ultimately, where does popularity get you?
Not very far.
It certainly doesn't get you very far on the path.
I also noticed that Ajaan Fuang didn't trust people who were concerned about being popular.
There was an interesting exchange once when he was going to appoint one of the merchants in town to be the monastery treasurer.
The first question he asked the man was, “In your future life would you rather be popular or wealthy?” And the man said, “Wealthy.
If you're wealthy you can buy popularity.” So Ajaan Fuang appointed him treasurer.
He liked the idea that the man was not all that concerned about being popular.
If the treasurer was concerned about being popular you couldn't trust him.
He might be afraid to do the right thing when push came to shove, and certain people wanted to get their hands on the monastery funds.
So it's important to keep this attitude in mind when you know that something is right: Don't worry about whether it's popular, don't let yourself be swayed by public opinion.
Of course this means that you have to be very careful about what you see as right.
In other words, you let yourself be swayed by advice from wise people, from people you respect.
But as for people in general whose opinions don't have any real principles, you don't have to worry about what they think.
No matter what they can do to you, they can't touch the most important part of you, which is your own inner integrity.
This is how the practice requires courage.
Conviction in the principle of karma requires that you make a commitment not to hedge your bets.
You're going to depend totally on the skillfulness of your own intentions to whatever extent you can develop that skillfulness.
That's the principle to which you have to devote yourself.
As for other principles or lack of principles, let them go.
Sometimes this feels a little scary.
You're so used to hedging your bets so that at least you're popular, at least you've got connections, so that if the principle of karma doesn't work out you've got something else to fall back on.
But to be really committed to the principle of karma, to get the best results from it, you have to be committed.
And to be really committed requires repeated acts of commitment.
This is why in the Forest tradition so much emphasis is placed on the virtue of courage.
Not foolhardiness, but courage.
It takes a certain amount of courage to keep the mind centered and still, because otherwise we're always trying to plan ahead, second guess things, anticipate things.
But for the mind to have really strong powers of concentration you basically have to tell yourself, “I don't care.
I'm going to focus on doing what needs to be done right now and I'm not going to try to provide for alternative things to fall back on.” In other words, when the time comes to be focused and concentrated, that's all you do.
Give yourself to it totally.
Have a sense of conviction, a sense of confidence in the practice, and don't try to second guess things.
When the concentration has developed to a proper level, it'll start showing its results on its own.
In terms of that simile I often use about the unripe mango: You don't keep yellow paint on hand just in case, to make the mango nice and yellow if watering the tree doesn't work out.
If you're convinced that your mango is going to become yellow by pouring water and fertilizer on the roots of the tree, that's all you focus on.
You don't worry about when it's going to get yellow.
You realize that if you stick with the watering long enough, the mango will have to ripen.
That's all you have to do.
When you have this kind of single-mindedness, then concentration gets more and more powerful.
It really recharges you.
It's not just a relaxation technique.
It contains an element of commitment, an element of applied energy.
At the same time, you're making sure that nothing is draining your battery away.
That way you gain more and more strength from the concentration, so that when the time comes to leave the concentration — even though it involved some work — you feel refreshed, energized, charged.
That's not simply because you've been able to let go of patterns of tension in the body.
The different channels of breath energy in the body have also been able to reinforce one another.
At the same time, the good qualities of the mind get reinforced and strengthened.
They've been allowed to nourish one another, too.
This is how the work of concentration starts showing its results, with a sense of wellbeing, a sense of inner strength, a sense of being energized.
After all, concentration is one of the five strengths.
And if our discernment is going to have the strength it needs to penetrate all the veils of delusion we've put up in the mind, it's going to require good strong concentration, good committed concentration to do the work that leads to release.
Try to be alert to the breath: what it's doing right now and what you're doing with it right now.
Sometimes you may notice that you're putting too little or too much pressure on it.
“Too little” means that the mind keeps slipping off.
“Too much” means that the breath feels confined.
It's constricted, placed in a box, and can't get out.
Ajaan Lee once compared alertness to a rope over a pulley that you can pull in two directions.
You pull it toward the breath to see what the breath is doing, then you pull it back to the mind to see how the mind is relating to the breath, to see that things are going well, that things are working.
If they're not, you can make adjustments: Pull back a little on the pressure you're placing on the breath, change the breath, change your focal point.
Or you can think of the breath in other ways.
If you find that the way you breathe is building up tension in the neck, think of the breath coming in from the back of the neck to reverse that process.
See what that does.
Tell yourself that everything you experience in the body right now is an aspect of breath energy.
When you look at the body in that way, you can gauge whether the sensations you feel are breath energy flowing smoothly or breath energy that's constricted or blocked.
Then make adjustments so that everything can open up and flow.
This simple exercise of being very clear about what you're doing and checking the results of what you're doing is basic to the whole practice.
It's how you develop sensitivity.
It's how you break down barriers in the mind.
Often we're sensitive to what we're doing but not to the results, or we notice the results but not what we're doing to cause them.
This applies to all areas of our lives.
Sometimes our ignorance is simply a matter of not pointing our attention in the right direction.
Other times it's more willful.
There are certain things we don't want to see, and so we erect firewalls in our minds.
We put up stage sets to hide from ourselves.
Part of us knows that we're doing this, and yet part of the mind's agreement is to pretend that we don't.
This way we block off unpleasant things, most of which are things we've done in the past that caused harm.
Especially when they were things we knew would cause harm but we went ahead and did them anyway: That's where we try to block things thoroughly.
If this is a habit with us, those firewalls get thicker and thicker, and our willful ignorance becomes a bigger and bigger problem in our minds.
We tend to think of ignorance, or avijja, in very abstract terms — not knowing the four noble truths, not knowing dependent co-arising, not knowing the Deathless — but you can't chip away at those forms of ignorance until you've chipped away at the more blatant, immediate ones: the mind's habit of disassociating, of leaving gaps in its inner conversation.
Say you decide to do something unskillful.
If you had a sense of the Buddha watching over your shoulder all the time, it would be harder to do it, so you erect a barrier in the mind as if there were no Buddha in the world, never had been a Buddha, no arahant disciples.
Then all kinds of unskillful actions are possible in the world remaining in your mind.
But those walls can't stay forever.
They have to come down.
And then you expend a lot of energy into putting them back up again.
We develop alertness in the meditation for the purpose of drilling through those walls, tearing them down, letting them collapse.
Then, when they're down and we can really see, we use equanimity to gauge for ourselves where we actually have been skillful and where we haven't.
That way we can learn from our mistakes.
As the Buddha once said, “One of the signs of wisdom is in seeing your own foolishness.” At least that's the beginning of your quest for knowledge, your quest to overcome ignorance.
And the foolishness here is not that you don't know a particular Buddhist teaching; it's simply that you aren't sensitive to what you're doing or to the results of what you're doing.
We have the power to shape our experience and yet for the most part we use it in ways that cause unnecessary suffering.
This, according to the Buddha, is the biggest danger in our lives: not what other people may do to us, but what we can do through our actions to ourselves.
This is why he focuses the Four Noble Truths on the suffering that comes from craving and ignorance.
There's a natural stress in the fact that things change, but our real problem is that we create extra suffering through our craving and ignorance.
As long as we have the habit of putting up walls in the mind, we're in a position where we can't even trust ourselves to do the right thing, not even for our own good.
That's scary.
Decades ago an Alaskan shaman was interviewed by an anthropologist about his tribe's religious beliefs.
The shaman went along with the anthropologist's questions for a while, but then finally noted, “It's not what we believe that matters,” he said.
“It's what we fear.
That's what matters.” And a lot of the Buddha's teachings come right down to this: What is there to fear?
What should we fear?
Our own misuse of our power to shape our lives, that's what.
His teachings are designed to help us learn and use that power more wisely.
And that means breaking down those firewalls, those closed-off compartments in our mind that allow us to do unskillful things.
So we work with mindfulness and alertness, trying to be as continuously aware of the breath as possible without any gaps — because the gaps are what give ignorance the space to create walls, to create little dark corners where it might seem right to act on anger, on lust, on fear, passion, and greed.
These things seem right because we block off our sense of shame and conscience, block off our knowledge of what's really right.
And if this becomes a habit, we can't trust ourselves.
We end up doing things that will harm ourselves, will harm other people, because we create these false little worlds where karma doesn't seem to have a role, where we think we can get away with things.
“It won't matter,” we tell ourselves.
But inevitably those walls will come crashing down, those worlds will come crashing down.
The principle of cause and effect will assert itself, and what we've done will matter.
A lot.
So this world of make-believe, in which we build these walls, in which we lie to ourselves and agree to be deceived by our own lies: That's where we have to start our work.
And we do that through developing mindfulness and alertness by working on the meditation, working on being sensitive to the breath all the time, as continuously as possible.
When we learn to be true to ourselves, then the truth holds no dangers, no fear.
But when we create make-believe worlds for ourselves and work hard to keep them shored up, we know deep down inside that eventually they're going to come tumbling down.
Our work will be in vain.
So in the back of the mind we fear the truth because we haven't been true to ourselves.
But when you learn to be true to yourself, the truth holds no danger, the truth holds no fear, because you're right there with the truth all the time.
It's like a person who holds to the precept of not lying: You don't lie at all, so you don't have to remember what lie you said to this person, or what lie you said to that person, because you've been saying the truth all the time.
The same principle works on the inner level as well.
If you've been with the truth all the time, nothing that the truth will serve up will cause you any fear, any danger, because over time you've become more and more skillful in how you relate to the truth.
Even the suffering that comes from past actions, the pain that comes from past actions: You learn how to relate to that skillfully without trying to pretend it's not there, without trying to make too big or too little an issue out of it.
You simply look for exactly what it is and learn to understand it.
When you understand it, you can get past it.
You can transcend it.
This kind of understanding requires seeing cause and effect, seeing your actions, the results of what you've done, and learning to fine-tune your sensitivity so you become more and more skillful in relating to the truth.
This, in turn, allows you to stay with the truth more and more steadily so that you don't go running off into make-believe worlds.
So the causes of suffering — craving and ignorance — are not abstract things; they're habits of the mind, often willful habits of the mind.
Craving comes from ignorance, but ignorance can also come from craving.
We set up walls in our minds to get away with the things we want to do, but we can't really get away, which is why craving and ignorance cause suffering.
So staying with the breath is not a technical exercise that allows us to bypass a lot of the necessary work in our lives.
It actually gives us the tools we need in order to do the real work.
But the tools need to be supplemented with the knowledge of what the Buddha taught.
You can't simply do a technique and hope that the technique will reveal everything to you.
You have to reflect on what the Buddha taught about the principle of action, the principle of its results.
Generosity, virtue: All the teachings form a coherent whole.
Even the teachings that we tend to regard more as the religious trappings around Buddhism are really integral to the practice.
For instance, the act of taking refuge: What does it mean to take the Buddha as your guide in life?
For one thing it means that you keep remembering him.
The word “sarana,” or refuge, is actually the same word for “something to remember.” You try to remember the Buddha all the time.
It's as if he's looking over your shoulder.
His example is always there for you to reflect on: This is how true happiness is found, through the way he did it.
And the qualities he developed — truthfulness, compassion, wisdom, and purity — were the way to the end of suffering.
He left us the Dhamma as his guide in how to develop those qualities.
And he always based his approach in developing compassion, wisdom, and purity on the idea that we want happiness.
He never assumed that we're basically good or basically bad.
He builds all his teachings on the assumption that we basically want happiness.
Now, our desire for happiness often seems to run counter to compassion, but the Buddha uses that desire in such a way as to foster compassion.
Think about the fact that you truly want happiness.
Are you different from anyone else in that?
Not really.
Everybody thinks the same way, everybody feels the same way.
Everyone wants happiness, everyone strives for it.
When that's the case, how can you create a lasting happiness for yourself that would be based on the suffering of other people when they're going to be constantly working to subvert that happiness as they work toward their own?
Your search for happiness has to include a desire for other people to be happy, too.
Otherwise, it won't last.
When you learn to think in that way, then your desire for happiness doesn't require that you be uncompassionate or unsympathetic.
Just the opposite.
It becomes the basis for compassion.
The same with wisdom.
The Buddha once said, “Wisdom starts with asking the question, 'What when I do it will lead to my long-term welfare and happiness?'” Here the emphasis is on the “long-term,” and it builds on the realization that you are responsible for the actions that will lead to that happiness, that you have to be careful not to go running off after short-term happiness that leads to long-term pain.
This is something we all sincerely desire.
The Buddha's simply asking us to reflect on it in a way that leads to wisdom, leads to discernment.
And it's embodied in his teachings to Rahula, his son: reflecting on what you're going to do, your intention before you do something, “Will it lead to harm?
Will it lead to happiness?” If it leads to harm, don't do it.
If it looks like it's going to be harmless, then go ahead and do it.
While you're doing it, however, check to see if any unexpected results are showing up.
If the action leads to any unexpected harm, stop, change, do something else.
If it seems to cause no harm, continue with it to the end.
Even when it's done, you're not really done, for you have to reflect on the long-term results.
If the action caused unexpected harm, talk it over with someone else on the path and resolve not to make that same mistake again.
If it didn't cause harm, take joy in the fact that you're on the path and keep on practicing.
In other words, you don't focus on whether or not you're a good or bad person, which could tie you all up in knots.
You focus simply on the actions and their results, and on learning from them, which is a lot more manageable.
These principles apply not only to your physical actions, but also to your words and thoughts.
They also apply to your meditation.
You intend to stay with the breath, to breathe and to focus on the breath in a certain way.
Check to see the results: “Is it going to cause harm?
Is it causing harm, is it causing pain or stress right now?” If it is, change.
If it's not, keep going.
When you come out of meditation, keep noticing the results of your actions.
That's your meditation in daily life.
One interesting thing about these instructions to Rahula is how they begin and how they conclude.
The Buddha started with the principle of truthfulness: If you can't be truthful about your actions and their results, you can't do this training at all.
After giving these instructions, he concluded with the observation, “This is the way to purity.” This is how you purify your thoughts, words, and deeds, through looking at your actions in terms of their intentions and the quality of the results.
If you see that you've made a mistake, then resolve not to make it again.
This is where the purity comes in.
Purity requires not having firewalls in your mind.
It means seeing the connections between what you intend to do and the results you get, realizing that you can change your ways if you've made a mistake.
So this is how compassion, wisdom, and purity — the virtues of the Buddha — are fostered: by taking our desire for happiness and learning to work with it truthfully, in a skillful way.
And this is the Dhamma.
This is how we take refuge in the Dhamma: remembering these principles and actually putting them into practice, so that the qualities of the Buddha appear within us, become embodied within us.
By following the examples of the Noble Disciples, the third member of the Triple Refuge, we become Noble Disciples as well.
That's when the Buddha, Dhamma, and Sangha become a totally internalized refuge.
And that's where the refuge is really secure, where they all become one with no dividing lines among them, because at that point the mind becomes one with no dividing lines inside.
Wisdom, compassion, and purity all come together and become one at that point.
So when we talk about divisions, or a lack of oneness in the mind, it's not an abstract, conceptual thing.
We can't overcome those divisions simply by dissolving them in a feeling of oneness.
They don't dissolve that way, because they were created with a purpose.
We've created them through our willful ignorance.
We've put up firewalls in our minds to deny that we've done certain things or that certain results have come from what we've done.
So we need to learn how to take down these walls and divisions through our relentless honesty, relentless mindfulness, relentless alertness.
The compartments of the mind that would allow us to do unskillful things — which would mean that we can't trust ourselves — get torn down.
The mind that's truly one is the mind that can trust itself totally.
There are no hidden corners.
Everything is wide open in a mind like that.
We gain release from the barriers we create for ourselves, release from the suffering we create for ourselves.
When those barriers and that suffering are gone, there's nothing to confine the mind, nothing to weigh it down.
And when you've made your mind trustworthy like that, you become a member of the Noble Sangha, a refuge for others, for they find that they can trust your example.
This is how oneness inside leads to oneness outside: not a sentimental, oceanic feeling of oneness, but the oneness that comes when the barriers that lead to mistrust are torn down.
It's through tearing down those barriers that the Dhamma of compassion, wisdom, and purity can spread throughout the world.
When you gain your internal refuge of trust, you become an external refuge of trust for others.
But the work has to start here.
So when we're looking for the freedom and release that the Buddha talks about, this is where we look: learning to see through the barriers we create for ourselves.
The release is right here to be seen, simply that we need to learn how to stop creating the barriers that get in the way.
It's a demanding path, but at least it's a path of possibility.
You don't have to depend on anyone else.
You don't have to be afraid that other people are not going to do the work for you, because all the work is for you to do.
And the more you tear those barriers down, the more you can trust yourself to do the work properly.
Many ancient tribes marked the line between childhood and adulthood by sending the person off into the wilds to be alone.
Some of the tribes called it a vision quest.
The person could be alone for days to see what kind of vision would come up from within the mind, from within the heart, independent of the training he or she had received as a child.
That was supposed to mark the person's entry into adulthood, to give a sense of what the adulthood would be all about.
From that point on, the person would drop whatever childish things didn't fit in with the vision, and embark on adult life with a clear sense of direction.
Even in modern cultures, that's what the line between childhood and adulthood is: the point where we step back from the training we've received, step back from all the influences received as children, and find a place within where we can decide what our own ideas are, what our own sense of our direction in life is.
It's a shame, though, that in modern culture the line is a fuzzy line.
A fractured line.
We don't have a formally recognized time of quietude to make the break in a clear and socially recognized way.
But that's what we do when we meditate: We step back from all the influences inside our mind — ideas that this is good, that's bad, you should do this, you shouldn't do that.
You have to stop and really take stock of these things, find a place within where you can be really, really quiet, and then look clearly at these voices to see what they are.
Instead of identifying with them, you watch them.
You watch to see what they're coming from, where they're going, seeing them as part of a causal process.
What kind of mind state do they come from, what kind of mind state do they encourage?
Are those the kind of mind states you want to identify with?
This is essentially how the Buddha's teaching on not-self works: seeing the things that have control over our lives, that have power over our minds, and in the course of the meditation stepping back a bit from them, gaining enough independence from them that we can look at them simply as events and see if we really want to identify with them.
As the Buddha pointed out in one of his discourses, you can't really look at these things as long as you're identifying with them.
You've got to step back.
This applies not only to ideas in the mind, but also to the body, this form we're sitting with here.
The same principle also applies to feelings of pleasure and pain as they come and go, to perceptions, to thought-constructs, even to our consciousness of things.
Meditation gives us a place where we can step back from these things and watch them to see the influence they have over the mind, to decide whether that's an influence we'd like them to continue having.
So as we practice it's important to create this space where you can step back.
The quietude and seclusion are important.
There are actually three kinds of seclusion.
The first is physical seclusion, getting away from people.
It's hard to get the random voices out of your mind when people are constantly feeding them into your ears.
It's hard to focus on your own mind when you're running up against the contents of other people's minds all the time.
You've got to get away.
You've got to get out — which is what we're doing as we come here: finding a place of seclusion.
We're not totally cut off from other people here, but at least we're in a place where the values of the practice are honored, where the bottom line is not the profit margin, where the bottom line is how you're training your mind — a place where we try to give space to one another, to show respect for on another's need for quietude, for concentration.
But there's still the problem that when we come out to a place like this, we don't leave our thoughts behind.
Even though we may be surrounded by physical seclusion, there's still a lot of companionship in our minds as we go and sit out under the trees.
Thoughts of the past come along; thoughts of the future come along.
As long as we're tied up in these thoughts we're not really alone.
This is why we take the body in and of itself sitting here as our frame of reference.
That's a way of developing mental seclusion, dropping unskillful mental states.
We drop thoughts of past and future, and try to be right here with the body in the present moment.
We drop thoughts of how much we'd like to see this thing or hear that thing or taste or touch the things we like.
We're willing to let the mind be here secluded from all that.
Our culture is a funny one: It tends to distrust people who try to get away from sensual attachments — partly because the economy would collapse and partly because of the old Judaic-Protestant prejudice that people who try to abandon sensual attachments must be weird.
The truth of the matter, though, is that there's a part of the mind that flourishes when it's not burdened with sensual attachments.
When it's really secluded from sensual attachments, it blossoms.
And part of the practice is learning to appreciate that very still center of the mind, the sense of wellbeing that comes from dropping all those attachments.
Even though we're not yet letting go of them for good, we at least drop them for the time being.
Simply be with the sense of the breath coming in, going out, allowing it to fill the body.
Allow it to find its own right rhythm.
You nudge it a little bit here, nudge it a little bit there to make it feel good, and this makes it easier to get pulled into the present moment rather than into the future or the past.
You develop a greater and greater sense of mental seclusion by just dropping those distractions, dropping all those voices and attitudes that pull you back or pull you forward.
You allow yourself simply to be right here, absorbed in working with the breath, settled down with a sense of wellbeing, settled down with a sense of familiarity.
It takes time, of course, to get familiar with the present moment, because for the most part we're just running through.
We're like a little kid who runs home — “Hi, Mom!” — grabs a sandwich and runs out again: That's “dinner.” We have a fragmentary sense of the present moment as we rush through from the past to the future and from the future to the past.
The only time we really take notice of the present is when pain transfixes us here.
Well, during the meditation, get a sense of pleasure and allow that to transfix you in here instead.
This is what creates true mental seclusion.
The past and the future drop away and all you've got left is the body sitting here breathing — right here, right now.
You've got mindfulness reminding you to stay right here, alertness keeping watch over what's going on, and discernment absorbed in trying to understand it.
That's a much deeper and more satisfying sense of seclusion.
Ultimately, it forms the basis for the third one, seclusion from craving.
As the Buddha said, craving is our constant companion even when the mind is in the present.
To cut through this craving, we have to call into question the things we've been identifying with.
In his second sermon, the Buddha pointed out to the monks that if you let go of your attachment to form, feeling, perception, thought-constructs, and consciousness, what happens?
In their case they attained Awakening.
In other words, they became secluded even from their sense of who they were in the present moment — because our sense of who we are is composed of those five kinds of things, coupled with craving and clinging.
Form: the form of the body.
Feelings: You may identify with a pain, saying “This is my pain,” or you may identify with a more metaphysical feeling, a larger sense of light or wellbeing, a sense of bliss.
You may think that that's who your true self is.
Then there's the label that says, “This is my self.” That's a perception.
Thought-constructs: You identify with your thinking, or the Thinker.
Or you identify with the moment-to-moment consciousness of things.
As long as you identify with these things, you crave them.
You're still not secluded from them.
You still have companions.
But when you create that still center inside and allow yourself simply to watch these things, you step back and realize that you don't have to identify with them.
Self-identification is an act.
Our sense of who we are is something we create.
As you step back from these things and allow that activity of repeatedly creating your sense of who you are to fall away, see what happens.
Then learn to drop your sense of identification even with the still center inside.
See what happens then.
The Buddha says that an even greater sense of freedom comes.
See if he's right.
When you taste that freedom, you're no longer a slave to these things.
Instead, they become your tools.
You can use them for good purposes.
So this process of gaining seclusion is a process not only of growing up but also of gaining freedom.
We look at all the influences rushing around in our minds and we come to realize that we have the ability to choose which ideas are useful and which ones are not, which of the phenomena we're aware of are useful and which ones are not.
We don't have to be driven around by them all the time.
For most of us, life is a story of just that: being driven around.
And this involves a lot of conflict because there are so many conflicting voices in our minds.
This or that person gets under our skin and all of a sudden we start identifying with their particular way of thinking; another way of thinking gets under our skin and that gets incorporated too.
We never really have a chance to sit back and sort things through, to see where they're harmonious and where they're not.
A group of people called the Kalamas once asked the Buddha, “How do we know which of the many different teachings coming our way are true?
One teacher comes and says x is true.
Another person comes and says, 'Any person who says x is true is crazy.
Y is true.' How do we know who's telling the truth?
“Well,” the Buddha said,” You can't go by outside teachers, you can't go by old texts, you can't go by received wisdom.” That's the part of the teaching everybody remembers.
But at the same time he also said that you can't go by your own sense of what you like, what seems logical, or what fits in with your preconceived notions.
That doesn't give you any proof of truth, either.
You have to look and see: When you do something, what are the results?
If you act on particular mental qualities, which ones give happy results, harmless results, and which ones give harmful results?
In other words you have to look at cause and effect.
This principle applies not only to outside teachers but also to the voices we tend to identify with in our minds.
You have to step back and see what happens if you follow a particular way of perceiving things.
Say you've got a pain in your leg and you perceive or label the pain in a certain way: What happens?
Is that a skillful way of labeling the pain?
Could you label it some other way?
Can you label it simply as “sensation” instead?
Can you step back and simply watch the pain and the perception as a series of events, part of a causal chain?
What kind of freedom comes when you do that?
This is how the teaching that the Buddha gave to the Kalamas applies not only outside but inside as well.
Even if we don't have the seclusion of vision quests any more in our culture, we do have a chance to find an even more thorough seclusion when we meditate.
Meditation trains us in the ability to look and see what's in our minds, to decide what we really want to identify with and what we don't.
So, it's through the meditation that we learn to grow up, we learn to gain independence, we learn to stand on our own two feet.
Ajaan Lee once made the comment that people who are still attached — still a slave to their thoughts, their bodies, and their feelings — are still children even if they're years old.
On the other hand, if you're the wise person who's no longer a slave to these things, then even if you're only seven years old, you're already an adult.
So think of the meditation as giving you a chance to step back and draw the line between childhood and adulthood.
Draw the line, make it sharp, and then step over into adulthood by giving yourself that space, that sense of seclusion inside where you have time to sit down and watch things for what they really do.
When you realize that you have the freedom to choose — and you take advantage of that freedom — that's when you've grown into an adult.
The Dhamma strips things down to their essentials, with the realization that if you try to take on too many things all at once, you end up not doing anything very well.
This is what the principle of renunciation is all about: realizing that some problems are more important than others, and some solutions more important than others as well.
Some forms of happiness last longer than others do.
So we have to look at ourselves with the realization that we have only so much energy.
If our energy gets scattered around or spread too thin, we end up not succeeding at anything at all.
Given the fact that we have limitations in our time and energy, we want to make the best use of them.
Focus them on the issues that really do make a difference, and be willing to give up other issues that are not so important.
It'd be nice if we could cover all of our bases, to have our cake and eat it too, but it just doesn't work that way.
We don't have the time; we don't have the energy.
We can think of renunciation as a process of simplification.
That's a word with a nicer ring to it nowadays: You want to simplify your life, to cut away the unnecessary clutter.
But either way, whether you call it simplification or renunciation, there are hard choices you have to make.
And so it's best to look at it as a tradeoff.
You can spend your time on activities that give immediate results that don't last very long, or on activities that give more long-lasting results but take more effort, more time, more patience, require more precision.
Ultimately you realize that the best trade is the one where you give up lesser forms of happiness for more long-lasting ones, ones that speak to the really deep issues in life.
What are those issues?
Well, there's the fact that we're active creatures.
We're constantly acting, constantly putting forth an effort of some kind or another.
So the question is: What's the best use of that effort?
As long as we're putting forth an effort in some direction, we want to get results that last even though the effort itself might not last.
With all the energy that goes into the effort — and sometimes the suffering and stress that go into the effort — we want good results to show for what we've done, so we can look back at our lives and say, yes, that was a life well spent.
A life well worth the effort involved.
At the very end of life, it's all going to seem so short — just that little bit of time we have here as human beings.
We want to make sure that we don't fritter it away.
Look at your life in the same way you'd look through an attic, deciding what you're going to keep, what you're going to throw out.
You're moving from a house with a large attic but you've got only a small trailer to make the move.
Some things need to be thrown out so that you have space in the trailer for the things that really mean a lot to you.
In other words, there are things you've got to give up in order to have the time for the things that really matter, really make a difference, really do give substantial results.
That's the underlying insight that informs the teachings on renunciation.
When you think about it, you realize that the time best spent is the time spent developing good qualities in the mind, because those are things that can help you in any situation.
You have to devote a certain amount of time to keeping the body strong, but with the body you reach a point of diminishing returns.
Ultimately there comes a point where no matter how much you've looked after the body, it's going to leave you.
And sometimes it doesn't leave you nicely.
Sometimes there's a messy parting.
And in cases like that, you'll be glad for the time you spent working on the mind, because you realize that that's much closer to home.
At the same time, the strength of the mind when really developed doesn't have to depend on the strength of the body.
It doesn't end when the body dies.
This is one of the things you discover as you meditate.
Ordinarily, when people are tired they get in a bad mood.
They feel overwhelmed, really put upon.
But when you learn how to develop a greater sense of spaciousness in the mind, a greater sense of wellbeing in the mind, after a while you begin to realize it doesn't depend on the level of energy in the body at all.
The mind begins to have its own internal nourishment, its own internal place to recharge.
This is why we spend so much time sitting here with our eyes closed, working on mindfulness, concentration, and discernment, because these are the qualities that will see the mind through any situation.
When you see people really “losing it,” this is what they've lost.
They've lost their mindfulness, they've lost their concentration, they've lost their discernment.
So you want to work on strengthening these qualities.
Whatever time is spent making them stronger is time well spent.
This is what's meant by taking refuge in the Dhamma: realizing that if you focus on these few things, you don't have to worry about other things.
You can really trust the practice to see you through.
Often our desire to cover all the bases is a fear that if one thing doesn't work out, something else will.
And we hesitate to commit ourselves to a particular path of action for fear that it may not see us all the way through.
We hedge our bets.
Yet instead of providing us real protection, this attitude ends up giving us a life of nothing but bits and pieces: a little bit of this, fragments of that, a little bit of peace, a little bit of wealth, a little bit of health, nothing in any really solid measure.
But by taking refuge in the Dhamma we're taking refuge in the conviction that developing the mind will cover all contingencies.
And because the practice of virtue, concentration, and discernment — all the seeds for happiness — lie right here, that simplifies matters.
It also allows us to give our full energy to the things that matter most.
So even if from the outside it may look as if the life of practicing the Dhamma has a lot of hardships, a lot of renunciation, a lot of doing without, it's not an impoverished life.
You find that real wealth develops inside.
One of the first things that attracted me to the Dhamma was seeing my teacher, Ajaan Fuang, living a very simple life — a little tiny monastery out in the hills of Rayong, just a couple of huts, not that many people — but he was happy.
You could feel a very strong sense of wellbeing just emanating from him.
And you realized that it didn't depend on his being wealthy, it didn't depend on his being famous or having a lot of students or friends or anything.
It was simply because he had worked on his mind.
As he said, he wasn't born that way.
Whatever sense of wellbeing he had developed in the mind came through the practice.
And as you come to know the practice, come to know the Dhamma, you realize exactly how all-encompassing it is.
Once these qualities are developed in the mind, they take care of all kinds of situations.
Qualities of mindfulness, discernment, and concentration are basic to any skill, basic to our ability to deal with any situation.
So by focusing on these few things we really do cover all of our bases.
They encompass everything.
One of the good things about the Dhamma is that it's so big.
You can give your whole life to it.
It's something worth giving your life to, because it teaches you what you need to know, teaches you the skills you need to handle whatever life throws at you — and more.
So even though a life of renunciation may seem like a life of getting pared down and narrowed down, it's not really that way at all.
It broadens out because you're not confining the mind with narrow, petty issues.
You're dealing with the few really big essential issues in life that cover everything.
Years back when I was a young monk I had to take the Dhamma exams — the exams they give to the monks in Thailand once a year — and part of each exam involved writing a short Dhamma talk.
They'd give you a phrase from the Pali Canon or a couple of verses from the Dhammapada or Sutta Nipata, and you'd have to develop that particular theme, bringing in another related Dhamma quote before you finished.
The first year you had to bring in one quote; the second year, two; and for the final year, three.
To prepare you for this part of the exam they gave you a book with Dhamma quotes to memorize.
And being your typical American I hadn't had that much memorization practice in school.
The little novices would memorize pages and pages of these Dhamma quotes, but I realized that in my own case it would be wise just to pick a couple of quotes that would be useful in all circumstances.
The one I found useful every year was a passage from the Dhammapada: If when you see that there's a greater happiness that comes from abandoning a lesser happiness, be willing to abandon that lesser happiness for the sake of the greater one.
That's a principle that covers all situations and it's the one underlying the teachings on renunciation.
In fact, it underlies the whole practice: realizing that as long as we're putting forth effort into our lives, we might as well put forth effort that will leave us something to show for it.
Think of the number of people you know who have lived very active lives but then toward the end look back and say they have nothing to show for all that activity, for all that effort, for all that suffering.
But you won't find in that group of people anyone who's been practicing the Dhamma.
The effort that goes into the Dhamma gives long-term benefits in terms of developing the qualities of the mind, opening us up to new dimensions that we wouldn't have even imagined otherwise.
So when the Dhamma requires that you give things up, remember that it's a tradeoff in giving up a lesser happiness for a greater one.
You're giving up the habit of scattering your energy around in exchange for a better habit, one of focusing on the qualities of the mind that will see you through every situation and take you beyond situations.
This is why it's so important to strip things down to the essentials and stay with the essentials.
The essentials cover everything.
They take care of everything.
They can provide you with all of the refuge you need.
So even though it may seem simple-minded, we're sitting here focusing on what?
The breath coming in and out.
It may not seem all that profound or intellectually stimulating, but it's one of the essentials.
Not only the breath in and of itself, but the habits we develop as we keep the mind focused on the breath: mindfulness, alertness, persistence, clarity of mind.
These skills are basic to all skills in life, so make sure that you really have them mastered.
Whatever you have to give up in terms of time devoted to other things in order to master these skills, it's a wise trade, a trade that leaves you with something far more valuable than whatever has been abandoned.
That's something you can depend on, because these are qualities that teach you how to depend on yourself.
There's that passage, “The self is its own refuge.” It means that ultimately you have to be your own refuge, and that you can be your own refuge only if you develop these qualities that make you dependable.
If you depend on them, ultimately you find that they allow you to depend on yourself.
That's a promise that comes with a, year old guarantee.
When you come to practice the Dhamma, there are a lot of times when you experience culture shock.
It's not a question of going from a Western culture to an Asian culture.
It's going from a culture of ordinary people with defilements — Asian or Western — to the culture of the Noble Ones.
Their culture involves a radically different set of values, a different etiquette, a different purpose.
The culture of ordinary people — no matter where in the world — is just to keep families going, to keep the human race surviving, to keep people clothed and fed, to try to sort out a balance among different peoples' greed, anger, and delusion in such a way that things are relatively peaceful.
But this always takes place within the context of what's possible in a world where when you have gain, loss; status, loss of status; praise, criticism; pleasure, pain.
These things all come in pairs, so you don't get anything that's totally whole.
The purpose of the customs of the Noble Ones, however, is to lead to something that, as Luang Pu Dune once said, is one single thing all the way through.
There's no concern about keeping the human race going or keeping your appetites going, but there is a focused concern on finding a true happiness.
That one point, that one focus, trumps everything else.
And it affects everything within the culture — from the way we walk, the way we talk, what we wear, what we eat, the kind of shelter we look for, the medicine we use, everything from the very basics all the way up to how we comprehend our own minds.
So as you shift from one culture to the next, there are bound to be periods of culture shock.
But you have to keep reminding yourself that the purpose of all this is to take seriously the deep desire that everyone has for true happiness.
If you think about it, you'll see that the Buddha was a very demanding person: He wanted nothing less than absolute happiness, a happiness that was one single thing all the way through, that didn't have other things nibbling away at the edges.
So even though he had wealth, status, all of what they call the good things of the world, they weren't good enough for him.
His totally overwhelming motivation was a desire for true happiness, a happiness with no drawbacks — in other words, a happiness that wasn't going to cause suffering for other people either.
It would have to be a happiness built on developing his inner resources, one that wouldn't have to take anything away from anyone else.
Instead of taking things, he lived off of what people offered him, as a way of making that happiness more pure.
He also realized that that happiness was not going to come from owning or having things.
He was going to have to teach his mind to be more self-reliant, and by developing that self-reliance he found that there's a lot more to the mind than he originally expected.
So as you come to the Dhamma, try to keep that same purpose in mind: a true happiness that doesn't have to depend on anything, a happiness that's one thing all the way through.
And of course there will be culture shock when your ordinary old desires, your old habits are thwarted, screaming for attention.
But you have to look: Exactly where are they going to take you?
They take you back to that world of opposites, the world where there's nothing in a really pure form.
If you're nurturing your desires in that context, you're simply learning to put up with second best.
There was an article recently in Tricycle where a psychologist was arguing that the true Buddhist attitude toward craving is that craving or desire is really a problem only if you want the objects of your craving to be total, to be with you forever.
As long as you're realistic and realize that nothing lasts forever, he said, then desire is no problem.
Just learn not to cling to the object of your desire.
Just be content with being with the desire itself.
That's his idea of being realistic, and of course that has nothing to do with what the Buddha taught.
As the Buddha taught, it's not so much that we cling to the objects of our desire, we cling to the desire itself, we crave desire itself.
It's something we enjoy.
And if desire without latching on to the expectation of permanent objects for the desire were okay, then why is there so much trouble from sexual predators or war mongers who don't really care to hold on to their conquests but want to keep going on for more and more and more?
They like the process.
They like the thrill of the chase.
And this is the real problem with human desire.
In its quest for “enough” in terms of the things of the world, it never can find satisfaction, so it always keeps wanting more and more.
In this way it wrecks the world, and also wrecks the mind.
    
So we have to find something that will put the mind in a state where it doesn't need to desire anything anymore.
Part of this quest means learning to temper your desires, but it also means refocusing them.
Instead of having scattered desires for all things in all different directions, you focus it on one big desire: the desire for total freedom.
Now, what's radical about the Buddha's teachings is that that desire is realistic, too — that desire for total freedom, ultimate happiness.
After all, isn't that why we desire things?
We hope that they'll give us happiness, and they end up not giving it.
Psychologists have done studies showing that people are very unrealistic about the amount of happiness they're going to get out of things.
Relationships, advancement at work, a new car: These things are painted in all kinds of beautiful colors in the mind, and yet when we actually get them, the colors fade.
This sets you up for wanting something else.
You keep going in that direction, and there's no end to it.
But even though we've been disappointed before, even though we've seen the colors fade right before our eyes, we start imagining, “Well, the next one, the next person, the next thing, the next position in life — that'll have colors that are colorfast.” But it doesn't work out that way.
It's like the old story of the person eating peppers and crying because the peppers were hot.
And the people said to him, “Why do you keep on eating peppers?” And he said, “Well, I hope to find the sweet one in here someplace.” That's the way most people are about their happiness.
According to the Buddha, though, there is one thing that doesn't disappoint.
When you pursue Awakening, when you pursue nibbana, it's not going to lead to disappointment.
Quite the contrary, it goes wildly beyond your expectations, wildly beyond your hopes.
Even just the first taste of the Deathless, stream entry, is enough to produce a seismic shift in your whole awareness, your whole understanding in what you think you are, and what's possible in life, and in the importance of your own actions.
Once you reach that state, your conviction in the Buddha, the Dhamma, and the Sangha is unshakeable.
Your standards for what counts as true happiness get ratcheted up immeasurably.
But in the meantime, until you reach that state, you're going to have shakable conviction.
It's part of the game.
It's only to be expected because you haven't seen the results really turn into something earthshaking yet.
This is why you have to work at your sense of conviction.
Your drive for true happiness, your belief that such a thing is possible, is what's going to see you over the hurdles placed in your way.
Your conviction that there is a way out is what's going to help find that way out.
Like someone lost in the forest: If you're not really convinced that there's a way out, you give up very easily.
You run into a thicket here, a steep cliff there, and it just seems way too much.
It stops you.
But if you're convinced there's got to be a way out, you've heard of other people who've made their way out, you think, “It's got to be in here someplace.” You keep looking, looking, looking.
And finally you see how the other people made their way out: “Oh.
That was the path they took.
So conviction plays an important role in the path.
The Buddha cites it as the first strength of mind that leads to Awakening: conviction in the Buddha's Awakening, conviction in the principle of kamma.
The Buddha was a human being; he did it through his own actions.
You're a human being; you can do it through yours.
This also requires having a single-minded focus, a single-minded respect for your desire for a really single, totally unadulterated happiness — a happiness that doesn't keep corroding at the edges, doesn't have other stains mixed in.
It's something total.
Deep down inside, that's what we all want, but part of us doesn't believe it's real.
We've been taught so much — this culture that we're trying to outgrow has been teaching us all along — that total happiness isn't possible.
“Content yourself with what we have to offer.
We have nice jobs, we have nice cars, nice families.
If you don't like a family you can have an affair.” All the legal and illegal pleasures that worldly cultures promise: They teach you to settle for these things.
And people have been settling for them for how many lifetimes?
But the Buddha tells you, “Don't settle for that.
Aim higher.
Aim at the heart's true desire: unmitigated happiness, total freedom.” Because it's here that effort is well spent.
The Buddha saw that our experience of the world — these four dimensions of space and time — depends on our own karmic input.
A constant effort is required to keep it going, keep it going, keep it going.
And the question is, “Is it worth it?” If you look at the world of conditioned things, if those are your goals, they're not worth it at all because they come only to fade, fade, fade away.
But the Buddha realized that conditioned things are also conditioning things.
In other words, these fabricated things, if you learn how to use them skillfully lead someplace.
Even if you don't learn how to use them skillfully, they still lead places: random places, miserable places.
The question is, “Do you really want to go where they're taking you?” If you make the effort to get skillful at fashioning conditioned things, they can lead you to a happiness that's worthwhile, that can be taken as a goal in and of itself.
So we're living in the same world of conditioned things as everyone else, but we're approaching them in a different way.
This is what makes the culture of the Noble Ones so special.
The cultures of the world teach us to delight in gaining conditioned things — thrills, people, power, possessions — thinking that we can stop there.
The culture of the Noble Ones, though, teaches us to delight in developing skillful mental states, to delight in abandoning unskillful mental states, for the purpose of a happiness that's unconditioned.
You do this by developing the conviction that there is a release.
As the Buddha saw, the laws of causality are such that there are points of resonance, as in chaos theory, where the laws of your causal experience lead you to an opening that takes you out of this system entirely.
That's possible.
That effort, he says, is worth it.
And it's up to us.
As the Buddha said, this opportunity is here.
We have this human life.
What are we going to do with it?
Are we going to explore that possibility?
Are we going to test it to see if what he's saying is true?
Are we going to stick with the limited possibilities offered by our old culture, or are we going to try the possibilities promised in the culture of the Noble Ones?
The nature of what the Buddha promises is really inviting, even though it's challenging.
And it seems a shame that people don't take him up on that challenge — but we can't make the choice for other people.
It's a choice that each of us has to make for himself or herself alone.
But you find that if you stick with that desire for a dependable happiness, if you stick with the conviction that it's possible, the results really are greater than anything you can imagine.
The mind has a habit of loading itself down with all sorts of unnecessary garbage.
It's like a phrase they have in Thai, “the old woman loading herself down with straw.” The story goes that she thought that someday she might find herself in need of some straw, so everywhere she went she carried a huge load of straw on her back.
Of course she was always bent over and at the same time could never pick up anything that was any better.
When she got home that's all she had: this big load of straw.
She had been all over the place, carrying her big load of straw, and yet had nothing to show for it.
It's like a person on a camping trip who tries to prepare for all the possible contingencies and as a result loads his pack so heavily that he can hardly walk.
He won't get very far.
If he wants to get anywhere, he's got to learn how to minimize his load.
In the same way, we have to learn how to get rid of all the unnecessary things we carry around.
Even though we're out here in an extremely peaceful place, we keep finding things to weigh the mind down.
So it's important to have techniques for letting go, for putting down those burdens.
The four sublime attitudes that we chant every night are good tools for putting down your load.
Start out with thoughts of goodwill: “May I be happy, may all living beings be happy.” Think about it for a while: Why would you want anyone to suffer?
Do you want anyone to suffer?
Look down, be very honest with yourself, because with all the conflicts in life, you may have a residual grudge against some people.
You'd really like to see them get theirs.
And yet who's being weighed down by that desire?
You are, all for no purpose.
You don't have to make sure that just punishments are meted out.
The law of karma is going to take care of everything, sooner or later.
Of course, often we'd like to see it sooner, but the desire for “sooner” is right there an unnecessary load on the mind.
So think about goodwill for a while until you can really see why you'd genuinely want to see everybody happy.
After all, if everybody had true happiness welling up from within, nobody would harm anyone else, no one would cheat anyone else, no one would take advantage of anyone else.
If everybody had true happiness, there would be no reason for all the wars and cruelties in the world.
The possibility for peace and wellbeing in the world has to come from everyone's being happy from within.
So you wish that happiness for everyone, whether they're people you like or people you don't like.
Don't make your likes and dislikes a big issue.
Dig into each person a little deeper than that, to see the part where you can sympathize with his or her desire for happiness.
The next two sublime attitudes follow immediately on goodwill.
If you see people who are suffering, you feel compassion for them, you'd like to see them gain release from that suffering.
As for those who are already happy, you wish them to continue in that happiness.
It's funny that this last attitude, appreciation or sympathetic joy, is the harder of the two.
Sometimes compassion is easy because we can view ourselves in a position of being over somebody, looking down on that poor suffering person, whereas with sympathetic joy, sometimes the people who are happier than we are, are in a higher position than we are.
They have a happiness we don't yet have.
In situations like this, thoughts of envy or resentment can easily come up, so if they do, look at them.
Do you really want to think those thoughts?
Do you really want to identify with those thoughts?
These sublime attitudes are measuring sticks against which you can measure what's actually going on in your mind.
In other words, you're not just smothering all the unskillful thoughts in your mind with these nice warm fuzzy clouds of goodwill.
You're using these skillful thoughts as measuring sticks.
These are the attitudes that put people into jhana.
These are the attitudes that brahmas, who live in jhana, actually dwell in.
This is why they're able to stay in jhana.
So how do your attitudes measure up against theirs?
If you find that your attitudes don't measure up, try to reason with yourself until they do.
You can't force yourself without reasoning.
The same with compassion: Can you feel compassion for someone without a sense of your superiority getting involved?
Just simply seeing someone suffer hurts your heart.
Don't make an issue of whether you like that person or not.
If someone is happy, again it doesn't matter whether you like or don't like that person.
Try to make your heart as fair as possible with regard to all beings.
Once you've developed these attitudes, then when thoughts that go against these principles come into the mind, you'll catch them more quickly, see them more easily, and in this way these attitudes become a basis for good concentration, a basis for developing stillness within the mind.
Of course there are cases where people are suffering and you can't do anything to put an end to their suffering, or when happy people are going to have to lose their happiness.
This applies to you as well as to other people.
This is why equanimity has to be the safety net for all these sublime attitudes.
Realizing that there are some cases you just can't help, you have to reflect on the principle of karma.
This again is a very useful principle for preparing yourself to meditate.
Realize that you don't have to straighten out the world before you're going to be able to gain Awakening or before you're going to be able to sit down and meditate.
The principle of karma is at work here.
Often, when people have made up their minds to straighten out the world, the things they do to straighten out the world tend to get very unskillful and they end up making things worse.
They don't like other people's greed, anger, and delusion, yet in the course of trying to straighten them out, they inflict them with their own greed, anger, and delusion.
They simply compound the problem.
So your only responsibility to the world is to focus on doing what's skillful.
That's all you have to take care of.
As for the working out of everybody else's karma, that will work out on its own without your having to get involved.
Just make sure that your own present karma is skillful.
One thing you can do that's skillful right now is to allow the mind to settle down with the breath.
There's no unfinished business with other people that you've got to take care of right now.
Your unfinished business is to see how skillful you can be in the way you direct your mind, for if you want true happiness this is what you've got to do.
You're not going to find true happiness by straightening out the world, but you can find true happiness by straightening out the mind.
Doing skillful things, saying skillful things, thinking skillful things: This is how your world is going to become a better world.
And this is not a small or narrow minded idea.
You may have read that these poor Hinayanists, all they can think about is their own individual liberation, while other Buddhists have nobler, broader aspirations: They want to save all sentient beings from suffering.
Now if suffering were a thing — like a house — that you could clean up, then it would be possible to go around cleaning up other people's houses for them.
But it's not a thing.
It's a pattern of unskillful behavior.
Each person is suffering because of his or her own lack of skill.
So each person has to clean up his or her own act.
You can't make other people more skillful.
You can't force them to choose to be more skillful.
You can't clean up their act for them.
You can show them by example, by cleaning up your own act.
You can recommend that they clean up theirs, but your recommendations carry weight only if you can speak from experience in how you cleaned up your act, and you can show the actual example of your own behavior.
But the actual cleaning is something that each person has to do for him or herself.
Nobody can save anyone else.
There's no other way that the world will get clean.
And regardless of whether the world will actually ever get clean — which is pretty open to doubt — there's no doubt that you've got issues coming up in your mind right now.
Those are the ones you have to deal with; that's your field for skillful work right now.
When you have this perspective, it helps you focus on your meditation and do the work that has to be done.
There's a passage in the Anguttara describing two kinds of fools in the world: those who take on work that's not their own work and those who neglect the work that is their own.
So look at the work your mind has to do.
It's right here in front of you in terms of your thoughts, your words, your deeds.
When you focus on this, you're doing what has to be done, what should be done, the best thing you can do.
So these four Sublime Attitudes are not there just to give a warm, fuzzy feeling to the mind.
They help you gain perspective on what you're doing.
When you have the right perspective, it's a lot easier to keep focused on the path.
Tonight I'd like us to dedicate our meditation for the people who've died in the events of the past week.
This is a traditional practice in Thailand and in all Buddhist countries.
It's based on the realization that when people have passed over, the only way you can get in touch with them is through the power of the mind, what Ajaan Lee calls the current of the mind.
And the best thing you can do for them is to send them a current of peace, a current of goodwill, hoping that they find a good rebirth.
A lot of people have been asking recently about how karma has played out in recent events.
The Buddha generally discourages trying to trace back exactly what people did that caused them to die in this or that way.
He said that if you tried to trace that back you'd go crazy, for the issues of karma are so complex.
The basic principle is simple: Whatever was done with a skillful intention gets a pleasant result, whatever was done with an unskillful intention gives an unpleasant result.
And there's a correspondence between a particular type of unskillful action and a particular type of unskillful result.
But the precise details — “What exactly did these people do?
Did they do it all together?
Did they do it separately?” — no one can trace those back.
What the Buddha did teach, though, is to focus on what's the most skillful thing we can do now, given the situation.
That's where the emphasis should lie.
And one thing we can do is to help the world through our meditation.
Many people think that to sit with your eyes closed like this is irresponsible, that we're running away from the world.
But when you think about the unhealthy energies people are putting out in the world all day, everyday, through their thoughts, words, and deeds, the world really needs people who are putting out peaceful energy.
That's where meditation has a lot to offer.
The mind is like a broadcast station.
It sends out currents.
If we create a peaceful, steady, calming current, that has an effect on the world in ways that are hard to trace, but they're there.
So reflect on the fact that all who are born into the human race have unskillful karma.
There's no need to wish ill on anyone, no matter what.
The best you can do in difficult circumstances is to figure out the most skillful thing to do right now.
You try not to give in to your emotions, not to give in to your fears, but to create within your mind as skillful a state as possible, as calm and steady and mindful a state as you can, and then offer that to other people.
That's one way of helping.
And when the people are far away, it's probably the best thing to do right now.
So as you're meditating, realize that you're not doing this just for yourself.
You're doing it for the good of the world.
And you want to do it well, do it truly, so that it can truly be helpful to others as well.
Sometimes that thought can give you an extra incentive to be more careful with your meditation, to put in more effort than you might feel inclined to.
We can all get sloppy, thinking, “Well, it's just me and I'm perfectly content with a sloppy meditation tonight so I can get over with it and get on to something else.” But what does that kind of meditation do for those who are what the Thais call our companions in aging, illness, and death?
Nothing much at all.
The general current of energy in the world requires as much calm, steady input as possible.
So, if this is what you're broadcasting right now, make sure you're broadcasting it well.
Ajaan Mun once said that the only true goodness in the world is goodness without any drawbacks, without any harm.
There are so many things that are good in one way but harmful in another.
Yet the practice of meditation, the practice of training the mind, is good all around, good for ourselves and for the people around us.
I was talking on the phone this evening to a woman in lower Manhattan who was saying it's been very heartwarming to see how New Yorkers — and we know the reputation of New Yorkers — have come out of their usual shells, showing kindness in all sorts of ways she would never have imagined.
That's the proper response to a disaster: to realize, one, that disasters keep happening all over the world; and, two, when a disaster strikes near home, it gives you an opportunity to do your best.
The shame is that when opportunities like this pass, we usually get back to our normal ways and tend not to think about doing our best, doing the most skillful things.
But actually that's what's really demanded of us all the time.
This is one of the reasons we develop mindfulness: not to be non-reactive, but to be mindful of what we're doing, of what situation we're in, and of the most skillful thing to be doing right now.
Keep that in mind, because the principles of karma, the laws of karma, are not traffic laws that apply only in certain places, only at certain times, on the south side of the street from: to p.m.
on Tuesdays and Thursdays, that kind of thing.
Karma is a law that applies to all of our actions, /.
So be skillful at all times.
No matter what the situation, no matter how minor or major it may seem, we've got the opportunity to do good, to act on skillful intentions — not just good intentions, but intentions that are skillful as well.
That requires work.
It requires training.
This is what we're doing right here.
It's important always to keep that in mind, no matter how ordinary or extraordinary the situation.
It's a teaching that applies everywhere: What you're doing right now is important, so be careful to do your best.
Often we like to think that simply by adding meditation to our daily schedule, the effects of the meditation will permeate everything without our having to do much of anything else.
Simply add the meditation to the mix of your life and it will transform all the other ingredients: That's what we'd like to think, but it doesn't really work that way.
You have to remake your life to make it a good place for the meditation to seep through, because some activities, some states of mind, aren't like fertile soil.
They're like rocks.
They're really resistant to receiving any influence from the meditation.
This is why, when you're a meditator you also have to look at the way you live your life, your day-to-day activities.
See if you're creating a conducive environment for the meditation to thrive and spread.
Otherwise the meditation just gets squeezed into the cracks between the rocks here and there, and never gets to permeate much of anything at all.
There's a teaching in the Canon on five principles that a new monk should keep in mind.
These principles apply not only to new monks, but to anyone who wants to live a life where the meditation can seep through and permeate everything.
The first principle is virtue.
Make sure you stick to your precepts.
In the case of monks, of course, this refers to the Patimokkha.
In the case of lay people, it refers to the five precepts and, on occasion, the eight.
When you're holding to the precepts, you're holding to firm principles in your life.
The Buddha described observing the precepts as a gift, both to yourself and to the people around you.
You give protection to other people's lives, their property, their knowledge of the truth.
You protect them from your being drunk; you protect them from your engaging in illicit sex.
And when these principles become precepts — in other words, promises to yourself that you keep in all circumstances — the Buddha says that you're giving unlimited protection, unlimited safety to other beings, and you have a share in that safety, a share in that protection yourself.
So the precepts create an environment where there's more protection.
When there's more protection, it's easier to meditate.
At the same time, the precepts foster an attitude of giving.
You realize that for the sake of your own happiness, you have to give.
When you hold to that attitude, you find it easier to meditate, because all too often people come to the meditation with a question of “What can I get out of this'?” But if you're used to giving and seeing the good results that come from giving, you're more likely to ask, “What can I give to the meditation?
What needs to be given for the good results to come?” With that attitude you're more willing to give of your time and energy in ways that you might not have been willing to before.
The second principle for creating a good environment for meditation is restraint of the senses.
In other words, you're not only careful about what comes out of your mind, you're also careful about what comes in, in terms of the things you look at, the things you listen to, smell, taste, touch, and think about.
Be careful not to focus on things that will give rise to greed, anger, or delusion.
If you're careless in your looking, careless in your listening, it's very difficult to be careful about your thoughts, because thoughts are so much more subtle.
This doesn't mean that you go around with blinders on your eyes or plugs in your ears; it simply means that you're skillful in how you look at things, skillful in how you listen.
If you know that something tends to arouse lust or anger, learn to look at it in a way that counteracts the lust, counteracts the anger.
In other words, if something seems attractive, you look for its unattractive side.
If something seems unattractive, you look for its attractive side.
As Ajaan Lee says, be a person with two eyes, not just one.
This is why we chant that passage for the contemplation of the body.
It doesn't tell us not to look at the body; it says to look more carefully at the body.
Look at the parts that aren't attractive, to balance out the one-sided view that simply focuses on a few attractive details here and there and tends to blot out everything else in order to give rise to lust.
After all, the body is not what produces lust.
The mind produces lust.
The mind starts hankering to feel lust and so it goes out looking for something to incite the lust, and grabs hold of whatever little details it can find, even when those details are surrounded by all sorts of unclean things.
So keep watch on what comes out of the mind and what comes in.
For lay people, this means being careful about the friends you associate with, the magazines you read, the TV you watch, the music you listen to.
Be very careful about how you look at these things, how you listen to these things.
After a while you find that this is not a case of restricting yourself so much as it is learning to see things more carefully, more fully, because you're seeing both sides of what used to seem solely attractive or solely repulsive.
This takes some effort.
You have to be more energetic in watching out for how you look and listen.
But the reward is that the mind is put in much better shape to meditate because you're not filling it up with all sorts of garbage, poison, or junk food that's going to harm it, weaken it, or get in the way.
So when you sit down to meditate, if you've been careless about what's been coming in and out of your mind, you find that it's like cleaning out a shed after a year of neglect.
There's just so much garbage in there that you spend almost the whole hour cleaning it out and then realize that you have only five minutes for any real stillness at the end.
So keep the mind clean from the beginning, all the time.
Don't let any garbage in the door or in the windows.
If garbage does come in, let it go right out.
Don't collect it.
That way you find that you have a much nicer place to sit down and settle in quickly when you create your meditation home.
The third principle for creating a good environment for meditation is restraint in your conversation.
When I first went to stay with Ajaan Fuang, he said that lesson number one in meditation is keeping control of your mouth.
In other words, before you say anything, ask yourself: “Is this necessary?
Is this beneficial?
Is there a good reason to say this?” If there is, then go ahead and say it.
If not, then keep quiet.
As he said, if you can't control your mouth there's no way you're going to control your mind.
And when you make a habit of asking yourself these questions, you find that very little conversation is really necessary.
If you're at work and you need to talk to your fellow workers to create a good atmosphere in the workplace, that counts as necessary speech.
But often social-grease speech goes beyond that.
You start getting careless, running off with your mouth, and that turns into idle chatter, which is not only a waste of energy but also a source of danger.
There's so much grease that it gums up the works.
Often the things people say that cause the most harm are when they're just allowing whatever comes in their mind to go right out their mouth without any restraint at all.
Now if observing this principle means that you gain a reputation for being a quiet person, well, that's fine.
You find that your words, if you're more careful about doling them out, start taking on more worth.
At the same time you're creating a better atmosphere for your mind.
After all, if you're constantly chattering all day long, how are you going to stop the mental chatter when you sit down to meditate?
But if you develop this habit of watching over your mouth, the same habit then comes to apply to the meditation.
All those mouths in your mind start going still.
The fourth principle is, for the monks, to frequent wilderness spots, to get out of society, to find a quiet place to be by yourself, so that you can gain perspective on your life, perspective on your mind, so that what's going on in your mind can stand out in bolder relief.
This principle applies to lay people, too.
Try to find as much solitude as you can.
It's good for you.
When people have trouble living in solitude it shows that there's lots of unfinished business inside.
So make a little wilderness place in your home.
Turn off the TV, turn out the lights, allow yourself to be alone without a lot of distractions.
Tell everyone in the house that you need a little time alone on a regular basis.
When you do this, you find that things submerged in the depths of your mind come up to the surface.
Only when they come up to the surface can you deal with them.
When you're alone in this way without a lot of outside input, it's natural that the mind will tend to stay with the breath more easily.
There may be a lot of mental chatter at first, but after a while you get fed up with it.
You prefer just to be quiet.
At the same time, you get away from the influence of everybody else's thoughts and opinions.
You have to ask yourself, “What do you really believe?
What are your opinions?
What's important to you when you're not swayed by the opinions of others?
Which leads to the fifth principle: to develop Right View.
Right View has two levels.
First, there's belief in the principle of karma, that what you do really does have results — and you really are the one doing it.
It's not some outside force acting through you, not the stars or some god or some force of fate.
You're making the decisions and you have the ability to make them skillfully or not, depending on your intention.
It's important to believe in this principle because this is what gives more power to your life.
It's an empowering belief — but it also involves responsibilities.
This is why you have to be careful in what you do, why you can't be heedless.
When you're careful about your actions, it's easier to be careful about your mind when the time comes to meditate.
As for the second level of Right View, the transcendent level, that means seeing things in terms of the four noble truths: stress and suffering, the cause of stress and suffering, the cessation of stress and suffering, and the path of practice to that cessation.
Just look at the whole range of your experience: Instead of dividing it up into its usual patterns of me and not me, simply look to see, “Where is there suffering?
Where is there stress?
What goes along with it?
What are you doing that gives rise to that stress?
Can you let go of that activity?
And what qualities do you need to develop, what things do you need to let go of in order to let go of the craving, the ignorance underlying the stress?
When you drop craving can you be aware of what's happening?” All too often when we drop one craving we simply pick up another one.
“Can you make yourself more and more aware of that space in between the cravings and expand that space?
What's it like to have a mind without craving?
According to the Buddha it's important to see things in this way because if you identify everything in terms of your self, how can you possibly understand anything for what it actually is?
If you hold on to suffering as your self, how can you understand suffering?
If you look at it simply as suffering without putting this label of “me” or “mine” on it, you can start seeing it for what it is and learn how to let it go.
If it's your self, if you hold to that belief that it's your self, you can't let go of it.
But looking at things in terms of the four noble truths allows you to solve the problem of suffering once and for all.
So start looking at your whole life in this light.
Instead of blaming your sufferings on people outside, look at what you're doing to contribute to that suffering and focus on dealing with that first.
When you develop this attitude in everyday life, it's a lot easier to apply it to the meditation.
You create an environment where sticking to the noble path makes more and more sense.
So these are the factors that create the environment for the meditation whether you're a new monk living here in the monastery or a lay person living outside the monastery: You want to stick to the precepts, exercise restraint over the senses, practice restraint over your conversation, create quiet, secluded places for yourself, and develop Right View.
When you follow these principles, they create a more conducive environment for allowing concentration to develop, to thrive.
At the same time, they create a more receptive environment for allowing the results of concentration to permeate out in every direction.
This way your practice, instead of being forced into the cracks of a hostile, alien environment, has room to put down roots, to grow, and to transform everything around it.
One of the first things you notice as you try to quiet the mind is the lack of quiet — all the chattering going on, all the discussions, the dialogs, the committee discussions going on up in your head, and sometimes all over your body.
There seems to be never-ending chatter.
Often our first thought as we start to meditate is, “How can I stop the chatter?
How can I just quiet all those voices so things can be perfectly quiet inside?” But as you practice, you begin to realize that you just can't put a stop to things that way.
It requires a more gradual process, learning to bring that conversation under control.
When you start out there are lots unskillful voices in there, and frequently the discussion is not being run according to Robert's Rules of Order.
This voice comes barging in, that voice yells at you, this voice whispers in your ear.
And all the subterfuge and techniques of a political meeting are nothing compared with what goes on in the mind — all the tricks the mind plays on itself, how the different voices try to get their way — because many of them are not just aimless voices saying random things.
They have a purpose in saying their thing.
There's an urging on to action in one direction or another, so they try all kinds of tricks to get their way.
The mind has countless ways of getting a particular idea or a particular motion through the committee.
So to begin with, when we work with the mind, we want to make that discussion more skillful.
As you start meditating, try to gain some detachment from the voices, so that you're watching them from outside, instead of joining in with the conversation, taking on the voices as your own.
This is one of the lessons of the teaching on not-self: It's not you talking in there.
There are voices in there, and you've tended to identify with them, but you can begin to dis-identify with them as well.
Tell yourself, “I'm not necessarily responsible for things that come bursting into the mind.
I don't have to act on the firing of every nerve end.
I don't have to get involved.” If a voice comes and urges action, just let it urge, urge, urge, and then it'll stop after a while.
You can just keep on watching.
Just the act of wanting to make that conversation more skillful: That in and of itself begins to distance you from it.
Practice concentrating on the breath as a way of giving you a good firm basis on which to stand so that you can stay outside of the discussion.
But simply watching the discussion isn't going to make it go away on its own.
You've also got to learn how to make it more skillful.
Sometimes that means introducing new voices — like the meditating voice that says, “Hey, stay with the breath, stay with the breath, make the breath comfortable, allow the breath to be comfortable.
Give us some room here.
This is why the Buddha didn't encourage his monks to take a vow of silence.
There's a story in the Vinaya of a group of monks who began the Rains retreat with a vow: “Okay, we're not going to talk to each other.
Each person just maintain silence throughout the Rains.” At the end of the retreat they went to see the Buddha, very proud of the fact that they had succeeded in not talking to each other for the entire three months.
But he didn't praise them.
Instead he said, “You've been living like sheep, like dumb animals.” This inner conversation doesn't become more skillful just by stopping your talking.
To improve your inner conversation, you get a lot of help by learning good examples of outer conversation.
The first thing to learn as you live together is how to talk to each other in skillful ways — which may mean talking less than you might normally do.
But it also means that when something has to be said, you figure out the best way to say it: the best time, the best place, the best words to couch your comments.
As you get more skillful with the use of your mouth, it forces the mind to get more skillful in the way it thinks, and you begin to notice the effects of your words.
If there's something negative you have to talk about, when's the best time to bring it up?
What's the most effective way of saying it?
What way of saying it does the least damage to the group?
As you get more skilled in using your mouth this way, you find the conversation in your mind will begin to mature as well.
On top of that, there are Dhamma tapes you can listen to, Dhamma books you can read, to introduce new and better voices into the conversation.
This is also why we have the chanting.
Some of the phrases of the chant keep coming back into your head at odd hours of the day, and they're designed to be skillful additions to that conversation.
You'll notice, as you try pulling out of your inner conversations, that some conversations are easier to pull out of than others.
The ones filled with recriminations and negative thoughts, harmful thoughts: Those are the hardest to extract yourself from.
But the conversations in your mind dealing with issues of true happiness, issues of being skillful, issues of reflecting on what's really important in life: Those are a lot easier to pull out of because they tend toward quietude, they tend toward concentration.
So as we're training the mind, it's not just an issue of immediately stopping the thinking.
It's learning how to think more skillfully, and that starts with learning how to use your mouth more skillfully.
As Ajaan Lee once said, “You should bow down to your mouth every day.” You have a human mouth, and the human mouth has a lot of power.
It's not like the mouths of dogs and cats with very limited vocabularies, just barks and meows.
We can say all kinds of things, and these things can have an enormous effect on our lives.
If you start paying attention to what you say in the course of the day and try to make it more skillful, you begin to see that it does have an effect on how you relate to other people, how other people relate to you.
The whole context of your life is strongly affected by your speech.
As you work on that fact, the act of working on your external speech connects with the issue of working on your own mind.
The care you use in framing what you say, the thought and circumspection you use as you notice the right time to say it, deciding what's worth saying, what's not worth saying: These things develop mindfulness; they develop alertness — all the good qualities you need in the meditation.
You learn how to gauge what's worth thinking, what's the right time to think, what's the wrong time to think.
Your inner speech turns into Right Speech, another factor of the path.
At the same time, as you've got these better voices in your head, it's a lot easier to pull out of them and watch them so that you can see: When a thought forms, how does it form?
Beneficial thoughts are a lot easier to take apart in this way.
Thoughts filled with self-recrimination and regret are very hard to take apart because it's so easy to get caught up in their stories.
The more skillful the thinking, the easier it is to take apart.
You can simply watch the thought calmly as it comes and goes because it doesn't hold any poison for the mind.
As you work with the meditation, you get quicker and quicker in seeing how the thought forms, how it disbands, how it can deceive you, and how you don't have to be deceived.
When we talk about making progress in the meditation, many of us think that it means very strong experiences of, say, rapture, oneness, or light.
And these things are not to be sneered at.
They're important.
They give a sense of lubrication, a sense of refreshment to the practice.
But the real progress is measured in how quickly you notice what's going on in the mind.
For example, when the mind begins to slip off, the faster you catch it and can bring it back: That's a sign of progress.
As you get quicker and quicker this way, you begin to see the process of thought formation in and of itself — exactly what's happening in there.
When do you start participating in a thought?
All too often we're aware of a thought only when it's fully formed, but how did it get formed that way?
Did it just happen on its own or was there some subliminal participation on your part?
As you watch more and more carefully, you begin to find answers to these questions, for you can catch the process in action.
Each thought starts out as just a little stirring, and it's hard to say whether it's a stirring in the body or a stirring in the mind.
It's on the borderline between the two.
Then there's the act of getting interested, paying attention to it, followed by the question, “What's this thought about?” Then the mind labels, “Oh, this is a thought about x, this is a thought about y.” And that turns it into a full fledged thought.
So the question is: Can you watch the stirring that would normally lead to a thought and then not participate in labeling it, not participate in trying to figure it out?
When you can do this, you see that these stirrings come and — if you don't participate in them — they go.
They come again and, if you still don't participate, they go.
This way you begin to realize the extent to which thought formation is really an intentional process on your part.
The desire to figure out a thought, the desire to get into the thought: What's the basis of that desire?
Is it boredom?
Are you tired of just being very still?
Do you want some entertainment?
It's dangerous, you know.
Some of those thoughts, once they get formed, take over the mind and turn into nightmares.
So you try to get quicker and quicker in seeing these voices as they form — where they're coming from, exactly how much you're putting into them right now, how much of this activity is just the result of past karma bubbling up in the mind.
You gain more and more control over the conversations so that when you need to talk about things to yourself, you can.
When you don't need to, you can keep things quiet, and the only conversation that goes on at that time is the part of the mind in control of the concentration saying, “Stay here, stay here, spread the awareness here.” That's the skillful conversation you want to place in charge.
Once the concentration gets really solid, then you can start turning your spotlight on those voices, the control center for your concentration.
But don't be in too great a hurry to do that.
You want the concentration really solid before you take those voices apart.
So the training of the mind is not a process of stamping out all the mental chatter in the mind.
It's learning first how to make the chatter more skillful — starting from the outside, being more skillful in what you say.
This is why Right Speech is such an important part of the practice.
Because where does speech come from?
The Buddha says it comes from directed thought and evaluation, which — when well trained — will turn into factors in your concentration.
You direct your thoughts to the breath, you evaluate the breath.
That helps get you into the first jhana.
But to get to the point where you can really be effective in using directed thought and evaluation with the breath, you have to be more skillful in the way you direct your thoughts and evaluate what you want to say to other people, the way you use those powers of directed thought and evaluation to create words: both the words you address to other people and the conversation in your own mind.
Then, when that inner conversation gets more skillful, you can start taking it apart in even more refined ways.
Finally, when all other conversation is stilled, you can turn to question the more subtle voice of the perception in charge of your concentration: “Who's talking here?
Who's it labeling for?” That's when things really open up in the mind.
Of course we all want to jump to that spot, where you find the transcendent, but to get there it takes skill, it takes time, it takes perseverance.
That's the way it is with any good thing in life.
Things of lasting value take time to master.
So right now we've got an hour.
Do what you can within the hour.
At the very least bring some control into the on-going committee conversation to make it easier and easier for the chatter to settle down.
Once it can settle down, you can see it more clearly.
That's why the Buddha said that concentration and discernment go together.
You can't do just insight practice or just concentration practice.
The two of them go hand in hand.
And it's right here at this issue — these mental voices and how skillful you are in relating to them — that's where the real meat of the practice lies.
The mind is always working.
If it were doing just one or two jobs at a time, that would be no big problem.
But it's usually juggling several jobs at once.
No wonder it's tired.
Relationships, responsibilities, jobs, issues: Lots of things are going on in the mind all at once.
Often when we start meditating it seems like the meditation is just one more ball to keep in the air, one more thing you've got to juggle.
So there's no wonder that when people leave the monastery and start trying to juggle the meditation along with everything else, they drop some of the balls.
And usually it's the meditation ball that gets dropped.
The alternative is to think of the meditation as a way of cutting down on the jobs of the mind.
The practice as a whole is a way of cutting down on the jobs, and the meditation gives you a place to stand and do your more focused work.
So instead of making the breath a job, you make it the place where the mind stands.
It's good to get practice in this.
This is why you need to have time away from your daily life so that you can get used to taking the breath as your foundation, lowering your center of gravity so that you stay with the breath at all times.
In Pali, the word for the object of the meditation, arammana, literally means “support.” It's the support for the mind.
It's what the mind sits on, where the mind stands.
So at first you have to put some work into getting that foundation solid.
Once it's solid, though, you can stand on it; it gives you support.
Then you can take on the other issues in life.
One of the purposes of meditation is to put you in a position where you can see which issues are really worth taking on and which ones are not.
Being with the breath helps here in that it makes you more and more sensitive to the movements of the mind, more sensitive to what you're doing, to where there's wasted energy.
At the same time, the breath gives you a place where you stand apart a bit from the activities of the world, so that you see them in a new light.
Again, this is one of the reasons why you have to come out and take some time away from those activities, to get used to looking at things in that light, from the point of view of an outsider, someone who's not totally involved, not totally taken in.
The Buddha recommended that his monks go off into the wilderness, places where they could get away from people, so they could have a chance to evaluate what's really worthwhile in life.
You try to develop what might be called a deathbed perspective: Suppose you're lying on your deathbed, looking back on your life.
What things are you going to wish you had done?
What things are you going to wish you hadn't?
Learn to look at your life as a whole in that way, choosing your priorities, instead of just taking on whatever little bits and pieces are thrown up at you in day-to-day-to-day activities.
Otherwise, your life gets frittered away in meaningless things, trivial pursuits, and the important issues get pushed to the side.
But when you step out for a while, you begin to get a sense of your life as a whole.
What do you want to do with it?
What's a worthwhile use of your time?
Often you hear of people who are told by the doctor that they have, say, two or three months left to live, and suddenly they start dropping a lot of unimportant activities to focus on the things they find really important in life.
It's good that they're getting focused in this way; the shame is that they had to wait until the last three months of their lives.
One of the purposes of meditation is to let you step back from your life while you still have time, so it's not just three months that are lived wisely with a sense of their importance.
You can live your whole life with a sense of its importance, with a sense of direction.
Even if you decide that you want to stay involved in your ordinary activities, still you're doing it from a different perspective — you've got that foundation from the time you spent separately.
You carry that perspective with you as a foundation developed with the breath as your support.
As a result, you don't have to juggle so much, and you have a more solid place to stand when you do have to juggle the affairs of daily life.
You can see which balls are worth dropping, which are not really worth trying to keep in the air, so that you can focus on what's really important.
So even though the meditation is work — and that's what the word kammatthana means, it's our work as meditators, the object we're focusing on — don't think of it as one more burden to add to the mind.
It's a new, more secure place for the mind to stand, a place where it can get a better sense of its priorities.
That way, when you leave the monastery and go back into everyday activities, you've got a foundation to take with you.
So get to know the breath.
Learn to be on good terms with it.
If you're not on good terms with the breath, if you seem to be fighting it all the time, it's not going to become a good foundation.
This means giving it some time to show itself for what it is.
You can nudge it a little bit here or there.
If it seems too long, you can make it a little bit shorter.
If it seems too short, make it a little bit longer.
If it needs to be deeper, more shallow, heavier, lighter — whatever — you can nudge it in those directions.
But then give it some time to show its results once it's been nudged.
If you want it to be your friend, you have to be friends with it.
You have to give it a chance to speak for itself.
You have to listen.
Listen carefully to what the breath energy in the body is telling you right now.
What kind of energy feels good for the body?
Sometimes when you're tired you want good long in-breaths to energize the body.
When you're feeling tense, you might try long out-breaths, to let the tension dissolve away.
You may find that certain parts of the body that haven't been involved in the breathing process really would like to get involved, or it would feel good for them to get involved.
But if you learn to read the sensations from your body, you can tell which parts of the body are lacking breath energy.
Think of the breath going to them for the next breath, and then the next, until that part of the body feels full.
Then search for any other parts of the body that could use some good breath energy.
Let them get involved in the breathing, too.
So even though this is work, it's work in establishing a foundation.
And while you're here, it's the only thing you have to worry about.
You have no other responsibilities; just be in touch with the breath, the way the breath feels.
How far does the sensation of the breath go down into the body?
Examine it: Is there any line in the body where you say, “This part is breath and this part is not breath”?
Or do you have a sense that the whole body could be involved in the breathing process?
Explore this so as to get to know the breath, to listen to the breath.
The more carefully you listen to it, the more you learn about it.
And the more you learn about it, the more it can be your friend to help you with all the various jobs the mind has to undertake.
So while you're here, you don't have to listen to the Dhamma talk — just listen to your breath.
What kind of breathing feels good right now?
Use your imagination.
Say, “Well, how about breathing like that?
How about breathing like this?” and then see what happens.
This way you get to know the breath in ways you might not have otherwise.
If you don't experiment, there's no knowledge gained.
You don't know why things happen.
But if you know that if you change the breath in this way you got those results, you change the breath in that way you got these results: That's knowledge.
It comes from participating.
It comes from acting.
It comes from doing.
At the same time, there has to be a part of the mind that just watches, just evaluates, observes.
So you're learning from a combination of two factors: your improvisation, using your ingenuity in adjusting the breath to make it feel better; and then your powers of observation to see what works and what doesn't.
When I was staying with Ajaan Fuang, these were the two words he used more than any others when giving meditation instructions: to improvise and to be observant — to see what works, what doesn't.
This way you develop a friendship with the breath.
When you're friends with the breath, you feel at home with it; it's a good place to stay.
When you get used to staying here, then it really can become your foundation.
When you leave the monastery and go back out to your daily life, you've got a solid place to stand.
You're not constantly buffeted around by what other people are saying or doing.
You've got your inner foundation, your inner refuge.
As long as you're on good terms with the breath, that's the best relationship you can have.
Other relationships come and go.
Even our family comes and goes.
As long as you're alive, the mind has to be on good terms with the body, the body should be on good terms with the mind.
All our relationships in life are based on how well the body and mind relate to each other.
When you're on good terms with your breath, it's easier to be on good terms with other people.
When you have goodwill for the breath, it teaches you how to have goodwill for others.
At the same time, when the body and mind are working together, they get their work done.
They aren't fighting at cross-purposes.
In this way they validate each other.
You don't have to go looking for outside validation; you've got your inner validation as to what feels right, what feels good, because you're really observant.
As you develop your powers of observation, they get more and more reliable.
So try to be sensitive to what's going on here in the body, going on in here in the breath.
It may require work, it may be a job that you're not used to, but as you get more and more used to it, it becomes more and more second-nature.
Then you find that it really is a helper, it really is an assistant in whatever other work you've got to do.
In other words, when you're driving the car, you're standing in the breath driving the car.
When talking to other people, you're staying in the breath talking to other people.
All your activities get brought into the breath in this way.
The breath becomes the foundation that underlies them all — the solid floor on which you stand so can you can juggle your activities with skill.
And with a continuous foundation like this, your life isn't chopped up into little bits: a little time for this, a little for that.
It all becomes time to be with the breath, and then to work from the breath on whatever else you need to do in the course of the day.
The word sati in Pali has lots of meanings.
The basic one is to keep something in mind.
We're often told it means alertness or awareness, but that's not the case.
Alertness and awareness come under the Pali word, sampajañña.
Sati means keeping something in mind, like remembering to stay with the breath, remembering the various things that help in the training of the mind.
It functions a lot of ways in the practice.
First off, there are the recollections: a series of themes to remember, to think about, to keep in mind when you find your meditation wandering off course in the direction of doubt, laziness, discouragement, or just general hopelessness.
That chant we had just now about aging, illness, separation, and death: Those are important things to keep in mind so that you don't get complacent.
But notice that the Buddha didn't stop at aging, illness, separation, and death.
He went on to the principle of karma, because if all you think about is aging, illness, and death it gets pretty discouraging.
The potential for happiness lies in our actions.
In other words the Buddha didn't teach fatalism.
He didn't teach that our actions are insignificant.
They're important.
Our happiness, our lack of happiness, depends on our actions.
So that's where we focus our attention.
That's what we should keep in mind.
This is called dhammanussati, keeping the Dhamma in mind.
This is why the Buddha has us listen to the Dhamma, read the Dhamma, because the Dhamma contains all sorts of useful and encouraging ideas.
For instance, there's the passage where the Buddha is talking to his son and says that when you make a mistake, resolve not to make it again.
If you see that your actions have gone off course, resolve not to do them again.
When they've been on course, develop a sense of happiness and joy.
Often we mistrust that joy.
We think somehow that the critical thoughts in our mind are more real, and that the more self-congratulatory thoughts are deluded.
Well, that's not the case.
When you do something right, you should congratulate yourself on it as a means of encouragement, to give some juice to the path.
Otherwise it's very easy for things to get dry.
If you criticize yourself about your actions all the time, you find yourself totally hemmed in.
Remember that you do do some things right.
Focus on those to put the mind in a good mood.
In Thai they use the word arom to mean both mood and object.
When we're meditating, we're looking for a good arom, both a good mood and good object.
So that's an important thing to keep in mind as well.
That's another function of sati, mindfulness.
If you're feeling discouraged about yourself, focus on two of the recollections, silanussati, caganussati, thinking about the times when you did hold to your principles, when you were generous.
Call those to mind as a way of giving yourself energy on the path.
This doesn't mean that you have to reflect on examples of perfect virtue or perfect generosity.
Reflect on what you've been able to do as a means of encouragement.
So there are topics of recollection to deal with just about every direction the mind can go when it falls off the path, topics of recollection to bring it back onto the path.
Once you're on the path, it's important to reflect again on what sati or mindfulness means: You're keeping something in mind.
Say for instance that you're keeping the breath in mind.
You're tuning in to that part of your experience.
Our experience has many layers.
You might think of it as many frequencies, like the radio waves going through the air right now: lots of different frequencies coming right through this building from Los Angeles, San Diego, Tuscon, Tijuana.
If you bring a shortwave radio in here, you can tune in to lots of different stations from all over the world.
It's simply a matter of choosing which frequency to tune in to, which layer to tune in to
The same holds true when you're keeping the breath in mind.
When you create a frame of reference here in the present moment, there are lots of things you can tune in to.
You can choose the body in and of itself.
You can choose feelings, mental states, mental qualities in and of themselves.
Those frequencies are on the path.
Other frequencies are off the path — there is such a thing as Wrong Mindfulness, you know.
Our meditation consists of choosing the frequencies most beneficial for the mind.
So try tuning in to the breath in and of itself.
Be aware of the breath, making it your point of reference in relationship to everything you do while you're sitting here quietly with your eyes closed.
Even when you get up and walk away, try to stay tuned in to the breath.
When you do work, stay with the breath; when you rest, stay with the breath.
If you're going to change your frame of reference, try to be deliberate about it.
In the sutta on the frames of reference, the Buddha talks about being aware of the body in and of itself, either internally or externally.
“Externally” means how the body relates to the world outside.
In other words, you don't have to be only inside the body for it to count as Right Mindfulness.
When you're dealing with other people, you need to have a frame of reference that includes the outside world but doesn't grab hold of it.
You can stay tuned in to the body even as you're involved in dealing with other people, being sensitive to how those dealings register with the body.
Then when you're sitting again with your eyes closed, you can make your frame of reference totally internal if you like.
Or you can tune in to the sense of space that permeates the body and extends out in all directions.
So there are a lot of different things to tune in to that would qualify as the body in and of itself.
It's important to realize this because sometimes we fall into an ironclad notion that only certain kinds of awareness count as mindfulness.
We feel that we're strapped there and can't function.
There are reports of people who go for long retreats where they've been working on only one kind of mindfulness for three months and when they come out they can't function.
It takes them a couple of days to readjust to being in the outside world.
Well, the Buddha didn't have us practice so that we couldn't function, couldn't adjust, couldn't adapt.
He simply wants you to be conscious and deliberate about the way you adapt: the different levels, the different layers, the different frequencies you're tuning in to.
If you can shift levels mindfully, you're okay.
There's an old science fiction story about a spaceship that didn't have to use fuel.
It moved by changing its frame of reference.
If its frame of reference was here on earth, it would stay still on earth.
If it switched its frame of reference to the sun, it would suddenly zip out into space, away from the direction the earth is revolving around the sun.
If it switched its frame of reference to the center of the galaxy, it would shoot way out there, to other arms of the Milky Way.
And the plot of the story revolved around the fact that when the ship changed its frame of reference, everybody in the ship would go unconscious for a while.
Well, this is exactly how our minds work.
Normally we change our frame of reference who knows how many times in the course of a day, and we blank out for a moment in between.
Ajaan Lee even said that we pass out for just a brief moment and then find ourselves in another frame of reference.
The purpose of the practice we're doing right now is to be able to change our frames of references without blanking out, so that we're clear about what we're doing.
That's what alertness is all about.
In this way we can function appropriately.
When you're dealing with people, you choose the proper frame of reference that includes them, that includes that level of reality, that level of experience.
When you're sitting here with your eyes closed, you can drop that frame of reference.
You don't have to think about there being anyone else here in the room at all.
Instead, you can focus totally on the breath in and of itself.
In this way, you see how much your frames of reference really do depend on memory, another meaning of sati.
What are you going to remember in order to deal skillfully with the reality before you?
You can be selective.
In fact, you have to be.
Years back when I was a young monk in Thailand, the monastery where I was ordained had a rotating roster of monks to give the evening Dhamma talks.
Out of the fourteen monks on the roster, maybe two could give good talks.
The rest I found really irritating.
After a while I realized that, rather than giving in to my irritation, I could use the talk as a meditation exercise: how to be aware of the sound of the Dhamma talk without registering the meaning — in other words, deliberately forgetting the meaning of each word and remembering only to be with the level of the sound.
That's a function of sati, or mindfulness, too: deciding what you're going to remember and what you're not going to remember, what you're going to apply to your experience and what you're not.
I found that after a while I could just listen to the sound, word by word by word, consciously forgetting the last word to be present only with the sound of the current word.
It worked fairly easily because Thai wasn't my native language, but you might want to try the skill out yourself.
If you don't like the Dhamma talks you hear around here, you can just be with the sound.
You don't have to listen to the meaning.
Be selectively forgetful.
To be consciously forgetful in that way requires an act of mindfulness — in other words, deciding which level you're going to tune in to while you let everything else go for the time being.
If you're going to work on concentration, you'll want to stay on one level as consistently as possible.
This is why concentration practice is best done alone or in areas where you don't have to interact much with other people.
But you also need to learn how to balance it with interactions with other people in a peaceful way, so you can get skilled at consciously changing your frame of reference as appropriate.
This is why we live in a community.
Our ability to live together is an important skill in the meditation, for it's in the changing of our frame of reference that a lot of the machinations of the mind become clear.
We tend not to see them if we let our awareness blank out during the switch, but if we can learn to be conscious as we switch from one frame to the next, we begin to see the way the mind creates a reality for itself out of all the whole buzzing confusion of our senses, to use William James' term.
Of all the sensory input that comes in at any one particular moment, you make a choice of what you're going to pay attention to, what memories, what frame of reference you're going to bring to that particular moment.
And it's an important mental skill to be able to shift your frame of reference as necessary.
So remember that that's all part of the practice.
It's not the case that we're really being mindful only when we're on the level of pure sensation.
We're also mindful as we shift our frame of reference to be appropriate to whatever is needed.
If you go into the kitchen and you're totally on the level of pure sensation, you're going to forget how to fix the food.
You have to remember enough to fix the food.
When you're dealing with other people, you have to remember enough about common courtesy, remember enough about the English language in order to deal with them.
But you can be selectively forgetful while you're sitting here with your eyes closed, so that you can give your full attention to the task at hand.
You can take this skill and apply it to all sorts of situations.
Mindfulness is not just one level of awareness, one level of experience.
It means being very deliberate and clear about what you bring to whatever you're doing: what you're going to remember, what you're not going to remember, what you're going to recollect, what you're going to let go, which things are useful to recollect right now.
If you wanted to, you could sit here and spend the whole hour thinking about facts that would make you totally miserable, but what does that accomplish?
We're sitting here to think about things that are useful for the mind, so remember the things that are useful for the mind, that will help it develop.
As for the other voices coming in and out of the mind, listen to the ones that are helpful and ignore the ones that are not.
You can be selective.
This way, mindfulness becomes a quality we can apply to everything we do.
And instead of making us unable to function, it actually heightens our ability to function, because we understand the process that the mind goes through as it shifts its frame of reference from pure sensation to remembering language, remembering customs, whatever needs to be applied to your current situation, to your current task.
So try to keep these points in mind whenever you find them useful.
One of Ajaan Mun's favorite topics for a Dhamma talk was the theme of practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma — in other words, in accordance with what the Dhamma demands, not in accordance with what our likes and dislikes demand.
As the Dhamma comes to the West this is probably one of the hardest things for Westerners to appreciate.
Everywhere you look, the Dhamma is being remade, recast, so that people will like it.
Things that people don't like are quietly cut away; and if things that people like are missing, they're added on.
And so the creature that comes out is like the old cartoon of a committee designing a bird: The bird looks pretty good to begin with, but then after the committee's done with it, it looks like an ostrich with no legs.
It can't walk and it can't fly, but it sells.
In this country of ours, where democracy and the marketplace are all-powerful, the question of what sells determines what's Dhamma, even if it can't walk or fly.
And who loses out?
We lose out.
The Dhamma doesn't lose out; it's always what it is.
But we like to add a little here, take away a little there, and as a result we end up with nothing but things we already like and already dislike.
The Buddha pointed out the four ways that people get led off course.
Two of them are following your likes and dislikes; the other two are giving in to delusion and fear.
These things pull people off the path.
We go wandering into the underbrush and then off to who-knows-where simply because we like to follow what we like and to avoid what we dislike — even though the things we dislike are often the things we've got to really look at carefully.
Why do we have such a dislike for them?
And as for the things that we like, why do we like them?
Exactly what do they do for us?
It's easy to doubt other people.
It's easy to doubt the teachings.
But for some reason we find it very hard to doubt our defilements — all these convictions and preconceived notions we're unwilling to give up.
Only when we're willing to put them aside and open ourselves to the possibility, “Okay, maybe they're wrong,” can we open ourselves to the Dhamma.
What this comes down to is respect.
The Buddha says that the reason we're suffering is because of the craving in our minds, and yet we like to hold on to our craving.
We're attached to it.
Of all the things we're attached to in life, that's probably the hardest thing to let go: our attachment to our cravings.
And it's precisely here that the Buddha says, “That's the problem.
So it's a question of how much we're willing to suffer before we say, “Maybe he's right,” and give some respect to his teachings — to take our respect for our likes and our dislikes, our preconceived notions of what's right and wrong, what's good and bad, to put them aside for the time being and give some respect to what the Buddha has to say.
For all of us this is very hard.
It's not hard just for Americans.
It's hard for everybody.
But given our culture these days, it seems especially hard for us, so we have to be especially careful about this issue — of taking only what we like and avoiding what we dislike in the practice.
What do we miss out on when we do that, given that so much of the practice goes against the grain?
We like to create little worlds for ourselves — this is called the effluent of becoming that comes fermenting up in the mind — and we're really good at it.
We can create all kinds of worlds: beautiful worlds, ugly worlds, delightful worlds, horrible worlds.
The movies that play in the theatres are nothing compared to the productions we can create in our minds over and over and over again.
We're really good at it.
We get our entertainment that way.
It's a game we like to play.
There are two parts of the mind: the part that likes to fool itself and the part that likes to be fooled.
It's like little kids playing together.
“Okay, I'll be the doctor, you be the patient,” or, “I'll be the doctor, you be the nurse,” or whatever.
The two parts of the mind say, “Okay, let's play along,” and then they dive into the make-believe.
This is something we do so well, day after day after day.
When we come to the practice, we want it to be another fun thing to do, we want to be entertained, so when we're told to deconstruct these things it's very difficult.
We're very good at putting together, at creating these worlds, but deliberately stepping out of them is hard.
It's only when we begin to realize that the more we keep creating these trains of thought that we love to follow backwards and forwards, the more we create suffering for ourselves.
That's when we begin to wonder: Maybe there's a way out; maybe there's something better.
The Buddha has a teaching on what's called transcendent dependent co-arising.
It starts with the regular chain of dependent co-arising up to suffering and then adds, “But based on suffering comes conviction.” At some point you have to suffer enough to say, “There must be a way out.” And you're going to look for that way out.
You're serious about it this time.
You're willing to make whatever sacrifices are needed, even if it means sacrificing your pride, sacrificing your attachment to your craving, sacrificing all these little worlds you create for yourself to fill up the day.
You want to see through that process.
It's not easy, but the results are more than you can imagine, better than you can imagine.
Up to now you've been living in imaginary worlds, and look at where they've gotten you: not all that far.
But if you learn to step outside them, you find that things are much wider open than you could have imagined.
Even after just the first stages, when the mind settles down into states of concentration, you find that whatever presents itself as an object of discussion or elaboration of the mind, you can just say, “No, no, no, not interested.” You can shoot it down, shoot it down, zap it out of your range of awareness.
This yields a great sense of spaciousness.
Even on just this level you begin to realize about this process we've been following for so long: “Maybe the Buddha's right; maybe there is a way out.
Every now and then we chant about having respect for concentration.
Learn how to have respect for that quiet spot in the mind, the spot that's not creating any interesting ideas, not creating any interesting conversation.
It's just a very quiet, still spot in the mind that hasn't yet settled down anywhere.
Allow it to settle down on the breath, and just stay right there.
Catch it if it seems to be moving off in any other direction.
Bring it back.
Learn how to freeze the mind at that spot.
In other words, as soon as it seems to move to pick up something, just stop it, stop it, stop it, and then allow it to relax in that stopped position, and stay there.
The mind may complain, “Well, there's nothing interesting going on here; this is pretty dumb.” Okay, just let it complain, but don't listen to it.
After a while, as you train yourself to grow comfortable with this quiet spot, you won't need to freeze yourself there.
You find it natural simply to plug into it, for it's a good place to be.
Learn how to develop this skill — and it really is an important skill — this willingness to give up on your normal inner conversations and try something really new.
It requires some imagination to try it.
And it requires a lot of mindfulness and a lot of alertness to stay there because we're so good at creating little worlds right away, letting these things bubble up and flow out.
The problem is they keep bubbling up and flowing out until they overwhelm you in a flood.
The word asava, or outflows, effluents, fermentations: The list for these — sensuality, becoming, views, and ignorance — is the same as the list for the ogha, or floods, when the things that bubble out are allowed to drown the mind.
Learn how to keep your head above water.
Learn how to keep these fermentations in check.
If you're going to create something in the mind, then create this sense of stillness, this sense of centeredness, this sense of expansive awareness.
Work at this, because what you're doing is taking those raw materials, taking your tendencies to create things, and turning them in the right direction.
You're bringing those tendencies in line with the Dhamma, with the Dhamma that points outward.
It says, “Look!
Freedom lies in this direction.
You've tried lots of other things; why don't you really give this a serious try?
Ajaan Suwat often mentioned that one of Ajaan Mun's two favorite Dhamma talk topics was the “customs of the noble ones”: the ariyavamsa in Pali.
One of his reasons for focusing on this teaching was something that we tend to miss when we look at the forest tradition from an American perspective.
From our perspective it's a very Thai tradition.
But Ajaan Mun got a lot of flack in his day for going against Thai customs, Laotian customs — following the dhutanga practices, eating only one meal a day, eating out of his bowl, living out in the forest.
People criticized him for this, saying that he was breaking with Thai custom.
His response was that he wasn't interested in Thai customs or Lao customs or anybody's customs aside from the customs of the Noble Ones.
He said, “If they're not the customs of the Noble Ones then they're the customs of people with defilement.
That applies to American customs, European customs, customs all over the world.
“Only the customs of the Noble Ones,” he said, “can keep you on track to the Noble Attainments.” So it's good to keep those customs in mind as we're practicing.
There are four all together, but the one immediately relevant to what we're doing right here as we're meditating is the fourth.
The first three have to do with the use of the requisites: You make do with whatever food, clothing, or shelter you have.
If you don't get good food, clothing, or shelter, you're not upset.
You're content with what you've got.
If you do get good things, you don't get carried away, you don't get careless.
At the same time, you don't pride yourself over the fact that you're more content with these things than other people are.
You use the requisites without doing harm to yourself or to anyone else.
Those are the first three.
You'd think, listening to the first three, that the fourth would deal with medicines, but it doesn't.
The fourth has to do with “delighting in developing, delighting in letting go” — in other words, delighting in developing good qualities in the mind, delighting in letting bad qualities go.
In fact, the word bhavana, “developing,” here, is the same word for meditation, but it means specifically developing whatever good qualities are needed in the mind.
No matter how much effort needs to be invested in developing mindfulness and alertness, you're happy to put in the effort.
You see the benefits that come from training the mind.
The same with delighting in letting go: Many things that we really should let go of are things we hold onto dearly.
In terms of the customs of the Noble Ones, though, you have to learn to delight in letting go, to delight in renunciation, to delight in giving those things up, for you see the benefits that come when you give them up.
As long as you have these two attitudes, you're on the path.
In other words, you realize that there's always room for improvement, either in terms of developing good qualities or letting go of bad ones.
The question often comes, “Is my practice good enough?” Well, are you an arahant yet?
If not, it's not yet good enough.
There's more to be done.
That's setting a very high standard.
Many people don't like living with high standards, but remember what happens when you set a target for archery: You never hit higher than you aim.
If you wish for true happiness, aim high, and then try to live with high standards.
This means, on the one hand, not being complacent.
On the other hand, it means not brow-beating yourself over the fact that you haven't reached the goal, not getting discouraged in ways that will actually get in the way of your reaching the goal.
You need to have the right attitude toward making progress along the path, focusing on what needs to be done rather than on your image of what or where you are.
What this means is that you don't get down on yourself but you realize that there's always a better way to do things.
You learn how to focus cheerfully on where to improve.
This is why so much of the practice lies in focusing on the present moment, because this is where the improvements can be made.
It also involves learning where to focus in the present moment — realizing that a lot of the big, abstract issues in the mind come down to events, very specific patterns of events.
This is a lot of what discernment is: seeing the processes of the mind as they give rise to greed, anger, and delusion, or to mindfulness, concentration, and discernment.
Even though these things have abstract names, they're specific events.
Choices are made each time you breathe in, each time you breathe out.
Look for the specific choice, look for the specific movement of intention that heads either in a skillful or an unskillful direction.
Try to notice the trigger points that set off anger, set off delusion, set off greed or fear.
Also look for the trigger points that help develop mindfulness, that remind you of what you should be doing.
In other words, learn to break down the big job facing you into specific events in the mind, specific choices in the mind.
See where you can make a difference with the specifics right here, right now.
This is a constant learning process.
If you want to gain a sense of confidence in the practice, gain it from the fact that you're always willing to learn, instead of talking about how good you already are — which is a very hollow sense of confidence because it always has to be shored up as it's crumbling away.
If you're willing to learn all the time, it can give you a solid basis for confidence on the path.
I noticed that Ajaan Suwat, even though he'd gone very far on the path, was always working on a little something here and there.
Sometimes he'd take a volume of the Canon down to his hut, read about things, see if he could expand his knowledge of some of the details of the Dhamma.
A year or two before he left America, he asked me to come up with the English translations that we chant here in the evening.
Up to that point we'd been chanting in Pali and Thai during the morning and evening chants.
One day he said, “It's time we had some English translations around here.” So I worked them up, and he memorized them.
It took him quite a while, because English was of course not his native language, and he had never formally studied it, but he memorized the chant in English.
He was always working at something.
What this attitude requires is humility: realizing that there's room for improvement, and that there are lessons to be learned all around.
I've been reading a book on tracking animals, the physical and mental skills needed to go out into the wilderness and notice things that you wouldn't ordinarily notice.
The author says that one of the qualities needed in tracking is empathy: empathy for the animals you're trying to follow, realizing that you have something to learn from them.
Even though they're common animals, they've got something to teach.
You empathize with them, and you have humility.
As he says, those are two qualities sorely lacking in our society.
We reward people who come on with a really strong sense of self-confidence, a sense of self-esteem, a strong sense of pride.
And yet those attitudes get in the way of learning a lot of subtle, important things.
So remember, we're here to learn — not only from the obvious places, such as Dhamma books and Dhamma talks, but also from all the specific things around us.
They're teaching us lessons in terms of cause and effect.
Last week someone came with the question of how to welcome difficult events in life.
Well, look on them with humility.
There's a lesson to be learned.
When you're open to learning that lesson, you gain in knowledge.
That way there's hope.
When you close off your willingness to learn, there's no hope for you on the path.
So even with little things like sitting here with the breath: You watch one breath and you can ask yourself, “How can this breath be more comfortable than the one before it?” Look and see what your sense of the body has to tell you that way.
It might be a part of the body you've been ignoring all along.
Give it some good breath energy.
Then, when the next breath comes in, here's another chance to learn from the breath.
And the lesson might be, “Don't mess with me.
Just sit and watch.” But whatever the lesson, try to watch carefully.
Try to empathize with each breath.
And try not to be mechanical in the way you breathe, thinking that if you can somehow get through a thousand breaths you're going to gain Awakening.
It's best to take each breath one at a time, because that's all you've got: one breath at a time.
We're not just trying to get through the breathing to the end of the hour.
We want to open up and appreciate each breath for what it has to teach us.
It teaches us about the processes of breathing, it teaches us about where our blind spots have been.
So, approach the breath with an attitude of humility and empathy.
Delight in the opportunity it gives you — each time you breathe in, each time you breathe out — to abandon unskillful mental qualities and develop skillful ones: more mindfulness, more alertness, more consistency in the way you make an effort in the meditation.
Several skills are involved here.
In addition to the attitude of empathy with the breath and humility in learning the Dhamma, there's also an ability to break down the larger issues in this recalcitrant mind of ours into smaller ones.
We have to learn how to break down all of its unskillful qualities into manageable bits so that we can really observe how they take control.
That way we can see how specific skillful qualities can be strengthened to fend them off.
You can read the books and learn all about the names for these skillful and unskillful qualities, but to get results you really have to be alert and sensitive to each individual movement of the mind.
This is where the humility lies, because a lot of time the lessons we're going to learn are the lessons that come from little things.
A few days ago I was in a Dhamma discussion in Laguna Beach and we got into the first precept, dealing with ants and termites.
After a while, someone made a sarcastic comment: “Gee, what a profound Dhamma discussion we're having here, talking about ants and termites.” Well, that comment misses the whole point.
The way we treat ants and termites is very important in our practice.
It's in how we deal with the little things that spreads out and influences how we deal with the larger issues.
If you learn to show respect for ants and termites, it means you can learn how to show respect for other things as well, little things that you wouldn't anticipate.
There's that classic story about the Buddha during his quest for Awakening.
He had attained all the states the teachers of his time recommended but he still wasn't satisfied.
He had tried years of self-torture, but hadn't gotten anywhere.
He was at an impasse.
Then he came across the simile of the lute that was strung too tight, the lute that was strung too loose.
One version of the story says that a woman happened to pass by in the forest singing a song on this topic.
He learned something from her that he hadn't learned from all the highly respected teachers of those times.
That's what's meant by an attitude of humility: a willingness to learn from the little things, no matter where they show themselves.
Humility requires being attentive, watchful, not assuming that you already know, that you're already good, realizing that there's always room for improvement.
You have to delight in that fact, to delight in actually making the improvements, letting go of the unskillful qualities in the mind, developing the skillful ones.
This is how we follow the customs of the Noble Ones.
And that way we open ourselves to the opportunity of experiencing the attainments that the Noble Ones have attained.
An important part of learning how to meditate lies in learning how to play with your meditation.
For example, when you're focusing on your breath, you want to learn how to play with your breath.
To understand why, look at what you do when you're playing.
You're trying out new things, you're enjoying the fact that the mind can create something and can think of new ways of doing things.
Look also at the different approaches to playing.
Some games are played without rules, but a lot of games have rules.
In fact, the more rules, the more fun the game is, the more of a challenge.
When you're playing with the breath there are certain rules.
The satisfaction comes in learning how to master the rules, play within the rules, and yet still play well.
When you win at this game, you're winning out over your defilements.
You're winning out over greed, anger and delusion.
But in the meantime the important thing about playing is that what you're doing isn't drudgery.
It's fun.
Researchers have found that people whose work doesn't challenge them, doesn't inspire them, are the ones most likely to get Alzheimer's, because the brain isn't engaged.
Playing requires intelligence.
It develops a certain kind of intelligence, precisely the kind of intelligence that we want to develop in the practice.
It's not the intelligence that simply memorizes things and, as one of my professors used to say, vomits them back out on an exam.
It's the intelligence that sees problems and can work with them.
It sees problems that other people didn't see, and can also see connections that other people didn't see — how a lesson you learned in this part of the practice can be applied to that part of the practice — and it can test to see if the connection has any practical value.
That's the kind of intelligence, the kind of playing we're talking about.
After all, what is the Dhamma?
It's a set of strategies — strategies for gaining happiness given the fact that there are certain laws governing the way action gives results.
The laws are a little complex, like the laws governing turbulence in water.
They're complex but not mechanical.
That's what makes them challenging, like taking a boat through rapids.
And the purpose of the practice is what makes you want to rise to the challenge.
After all, it is your happiness at stake here.
When you come to the practice, you already have certain strategies for becoming happy.
Our whole sense of self is just that: a strategy.
You learn to identify which things are worth looking after, to see that the wellbeing of certain things is more productive of happiness than the wellbeing of other things.
Having a sense of self also teaches you to deny yourself certain things now so that you get better results in the future.
It inspires you to practice.
It inspires you to get skillful.
That's a positive side of the sense of self.
It also reminds you that you're responsible for your happiness, that you can't sit around and simply expect it to come to you.
That's another positive side to the sense of self.
And in the practice we're encouraged to think in that way.
This is why we chant the passage on being subject to aging, illness, death, and separation, for that's the predicament in which we find ourselves.
If you didn't have a sense of self, you wouldn't see it as a problem; if you have an immature sense of self, you wouldn't have any idea of how to go about solving the problem.
So your sense of self is an important strategy, but remember: It's just that, a strategy.
If you dig around to find anything of lasting value that's worth identifying as, “Yes, this is my self” — if you look at it carefully it starts dissolving away.
You can use that sense of self as a strategy when it's useful, but after a certain point you have to start taking that strategy apart because there's a more subtle strategy, the not-self strategy, that leads to a more subtle happiness.
But in both cases, if you can learn to play with these concepts to see exactly how far they're useful and where they're no longer useful, that's when the practice really seeps into you, because the things you play with are really close to your heart.
What is your heart?
On the one hand, it's the ability to fabricate, and on the other hand it's the ability to experience the pleasure or lack of pleasure that comes from the fabrication.
And right there is where you're going to look for Awakening.
Right there is where you're going to look for the Deathless: right in this ability to fabricate and in your sensitivity to how much your fabrication is leading to happiness.
The path is something you fabricate, so learn how to play well with the path, within the strictures, the rules, formed by the laws of causality.
As with any game, you've got to stay within the rules, but within the rules you find that there's a lot of latitude.
What kind of meditation object works best for you?
That's something you've got to find out by playing with the different objects of meditation and learning to see which object you enjoy playing with most — the one you keep coming back to, coming back to, because it sparks your imagination.
Ajaan Fuang once told the story of Ajaan Kongmaa complaining to Ajaan Lee, “How can you meditate on the breath?
It's just in and out, in and out.
That's all there is to it.” And Ajaan Lee said to him “If that's all you see in it, then that's all you'll get from it.” Ajaan Lee saw a lot of other things there.
If you read his Dhamma talks, you'll see that he continued exploring the breath all the way up to the end of his life.
He was always finding new ways of looking at the breath, new ways of playing with the breath energy, new strategies of conceiving the breath energy, to help the mind settle down quickly and comfortably and have it stay there for long periods of time.
To play this game, you have to see the wandering mind, the curious mind that wanders around getting itself in trouble, as a problem, but you've also got to see the curiosity as a potential for helping you with the path.
You can use it to explore the breath, to work with the breath in different ways to get the mind to settle down, to get it engrossed in the present moment.
And what's more engrossing than playing?
With some things, you can play with them for a while and you lose interest, for you've taken them as far as they can provide entertainment.
But with the breath you can keep exploring here, exploring there, and then as you get more intimate with the breath you finally get more intimate with the processes of the mind.
The thinking — the directed thought and evaluation: Play with those, see how subtle they can get, see what level of wellbeing they can give, what level of gratification they can give in the present moment.
To begin with, try different ways of adjusting the breath.
Sometimes all you need to do is think and the breath will change.
Think, “Comfortable breath.” Think, “Full breath.” You don't have to do anything else — just think that thought, maintain that thought, and see what happens to the process of breathing in the body.
Or, if you want, you can play with your focus.
Instead of focusing on just one spot, try to focus on two spots at once.
I personally always find that riveting.
One spot can be in the middle of the head, the other spot can be down in the body — say, at the base of the spine — and think of a line connecting the two.
Try to be aware of both spots, all at once, all the time.
When you can maintain that double focus, the mind doesn't have any other hands to latch onto things.
One hand is holding on to one spot, the other hand is holding on to the other: Your hands are full.
So there's a lot to play with, a lot to work with here in the present moment.
Ajaan Fuang would often say, “Try this approach.
If it doesn't work, try something else,” in the same way a coach would say, “Well, if that way doesn't work, try this,” to encourage you to experiment, to judge the results, to start thinking on your own.
If you try one approach and it doesn't work, there may be other approaches you can think of that will work.
It's important that you engage the inventive side of your mind as you meditate, learning how to use it so that it's not just wandering off in abstract imagination, but so that it's actually applied to what's going on right here, right now.
Put it into play as part of your practice.
What we're doing is learning where true happiness comes from.
True happiness is not going to be dull, so keep your interest up, keep your expectations up.
And this requires a sense of play.
There are certain challenges that you're bound to run up against, and the element of play provides the side of you that's up for the challenge: “How about this?
How do you get around this problem?
How do you get around that problem?” Play wouldn't be fun if there weren't rules you run up against, certain facts of life you run up against, and you find them challenging.
So you've got this mind that's creating suffering for itself.
It's busy concocting things all day long.
See that as a challenge.
How can you take that process of concoction, the way the mind randomly fabricates this, that, and the other thing, and turn it to better uses, so that it can concoct the path that leads to true happiness?
That's the challenge we've got here.
We use the breath — the in-and-out breath, the breath in the nerves, the breath in the blood vessels, the breath energy that goes up as we breathe in, the energy that goes down as we breathe in, the energy that's always coming up the spine — as tools in responding to that challenge.
We use the things we learn about the mind as we stay with the breath, as ways of responding to that challenge.
We get directions from the books, we get directions from teachers, but a lot of the insight that's actually going to liberate us comes from experimenting with this approach, playing with this idea, experimenting with that strategy on our own, seeing what works, what doesn't work.
If it's not working, what can you do to adjust it so it does?
The curious, inquisitive side of your mind is what's going to lead to discernment.
The people who aren't inquisitive are the ones who get stuck in concentration and don't want to move.
Or they blindly want to follow a method where everything is spelled out for them, but all they get is pre-packaged meditation product — like the packaged foods that contain so little actual food that they have to be labeled as “food product.” But if you're naturally inquisitive, if you can make a game out of learning how to bring the mind to settle down, then once the mind is settled down it'll naturally want to understand this, understand that, understand the processes of what you're doing.
That's insight.
So these are qualities you want to bring to your meditation: the ability to play, to respond to challenges, to be inquisitive, to find something here in the present moment that engages your imagination.
And then you apply your imagination to a genuine problem: the fact that you're causing yourself suffering right here and now.
This means, one, being able to imagine yourself not causing suffering and, two, imagining approaches that might get you to that goal.
Experimenting with different ways of breathing, different ways of conceiving the breathing, different ways of focusing the mind, different ways of asking questions: There's a lot to play with here.
And as long as you're fully engaged, you're bound to make discoveries.
This is called the quality of citta, or intentness: the intentness that comes when you're really absorbed in something, when you're really engrossed in something, when you find that what you're doing gives you satisfaction, the satisfaction of learning how to master a problem.
You've got this very creative mind, so how can you use it so that it doesn't create problems?
How can you use it to find those areas of experience where there's no creating going on?
Not out of dullness.
I mean even dull people create things all the time — this is what the mind does, it fabricates things — but they don't get engaged in trying to do it well.
What we're looking for instead is to see if there's a dimension where there's no creation and yet there is total happiness.
How do you find that?
To some extent you follow instructions, but you've also got to have the attitude of “Give this a try, give that a try.” If you don't learn how to try things you've never tried before, never imagined before, you're never going to find anything new that you haven't experienced before.
That's why the element of play is so important.
If you don't think the idea of rebirth is scary, think of having to go through adolescence all over again — all the awkwardness, the embarrassment, all the problems of adolescence, high school, dating, asserting your independence.
We're always glad that we've gotten past those things.
But when you come to meditate, it's like going through adolescence all over again.
When you start out, you're given a set of rules to follow.
That's like being a child: Don't do this, don't do that, do this, do that.
And for a while the rules work.
But then there comes a time when, if you're going to make the meditation your own, you've got to test the rules.
That's adolescence, which is why it's difficult, because sometimes the rules are good rules that can carry you all the way through adulthood, while other rules are best put away now that you're no longer a child.
Sometimes the problem is that you had a childish understanding of the rules and, as you grow up, you've got to change that understanding.
So you've got to sort that all out.
No wonder it's an awkward time.
The same goes with meditation.
You're told, “Focus on the breath.” And in the beginning you're often told, “Don't meddle with the breath.
Just let it come in and go out at its own rate.” You may get the basic idea that the less you interfere in the present moment, the better; the more passive you become, the better.
But that makes it difficult to integrate meditation with your life.
Are you going to go through life totally passive in every situation?
That doesn't work.
It's like a walking death.
So you've got to test the rule to see whether it's the kind of rule that says, “Before you cross the road, hold onto somebody's hand,” or the type that says, “Before you cross the road, look both ways.
Check the oncoming traffic first.” Holding somebody's hand is a rule specifically for children; when you grow up, you don't need to follow it anymore.
But the rule about looking both ways is a good rule to follow whether you're a child or an adult.
So, the rule about not meddling with your breath: Which kind of rule is that?
It's a holding-the-hand kind of rule.
Meditation teachers often feel that people brand new to meditation will probably mess up their breath if they try to control it too much.
In order to avoid that, they tell you not to get involved, to be as passive as possible.
But as you gain more experience with the breath, you don't need to hold onto the teacher's hand anymore.
You have to look for yourself.
You have to experiment with the breath.
Otherwise you'll never get a sense of how much subconscious molding of the breath is still going on, down under the surface of your consciousness.
You'll never get a sense of what input you're putting into the present moment.
That's crucial to the meditation, for only when you see it are you in a position where you can try to refine it.
So you have to go through that awkward stage of messing with the breath too much, making it too long, making it too short, using too much pressure to change the breath to fit it into what you think might be a good mold.
Or when you find something good, you tend to hold onto it well past the time when it's really worth holding onto.
Or you force the breath into different parts of the body where it's best not to force it.
These are issues you have to learn through experience, through making mistakes.
You have to go through the adolescence of your meditation to get a sense of what's just right.
That's where you begin to reach maturity, to develop finesse in your meditation.
But to gain that finesse, that sense of “just right,” you have to go through the awkward stages — doing it wrong, learning how to recognize it for wrong — and because of the awkwardness, we tend to avoid them.
But there's no way you're going to get out of your childhood and into your adulthood as a meditator unless you go through these stages.
So, when you work with the breath, keep two things in mind.
One is that you're going to experiment with the breath to see what feels good right now.
The other is that you also have to look at the way you're experimenting.
You watch both the breath and the mind as it's dealing with the breath.
And there are no hard and fast rules here.
You have to feel your way.
This is why the path is a gradual path.
The Buddha once compared the path of practice to the continental shelf off of India.
There's a gradual slope and then a sudden drop, like the continental shelf off the east coast of the United States.
We all look forward to that sudden drop but, as the Buddha says, you first have to go through the gradual slope before you get there.
Sometimes our approach to meditation is simply hoping for the sudden drop to come, thinking that if we can make ourselves as still and passive as we can in the present moment, that will open a space for grace to drop on us.
In other words, we're waiting for the accident of Awakening to happen, but it doesn't happen that way.
You reach the drop by taking the gradual slope.
In other words, as you get more and more sensitive to what you're doing in the present moment, your input into the present gets more refined until you finally get to the point where you really can let it stop.
But you have to go through many, many layers of intention first, for it's only through gradually developing skill in this area that you can really sense the most subtle forms of intention.
This is why the activity of developing skill in the way you deal with the breath is not a distraction from vast openness of Awakening.
That's not the case at all.
True Awakening comes through the process of getting more and more sensitive to what you're doing, doing it with more and more refinement, until the ultimate layers of refinement can be seen and abandoned.
So this focus on being skillful is a preparation.
It's what gets us to the sudden drop of Awakening.
Otherwise, how are you going to develop your sensitivity?
If you don't develop your sensitivity, where are you going to get the discernment that leads to Awakening?
It has to come through this process of being willing to make mistakes, of being patient with the gradual process.
We're an impatient nation.
We want things to happen right away.
We look at the past and say, “Oh, those people didn't know anything.
They had to go through this long, involved process because they didn't understand the quick and easy way to get things done.” And yet so often the quick way to get things done may yield quick results but not lasting results — results that might not be good over the long term, that might actually go bad.
And meditation is one of those areas where time is required.
Patience is required.
You've got to invest the time and attention needed to develop a skill.
You're getting to know the breath.
It's like getting to know a person.
As the Buddha said with regard to that kind of knowledge, you have to be observant and willing to put in a fair amount of time.
Only then can you gain a sense of familiarity.
Think of yourself as becoming friends with the breath.
In any friendship there's got to be give and take.
There are going to be awkward moments.
Ups and downs.
But if you stick with it, with the good-heartedness needed to weather the downs, and the powers of observation to know when you've made a mistake, to admit your mistakes, then the friendship can grow.
That's when your friend can start revealing all of his or her secrets.
And the breath has lots of fascinating secrets.
There are lots of interesting things to find out in the energy flow of the breathing.
You can start seeing how the breath affects your feelings, exactly which experience is a breath experience, and which experience is a feeling experience — feeling pleasure or pain.
As you really look into these things, you begin to see that you've often drawn the lines in your body and mind in the wrong places.
For instance, the aggregates of form and feeling: the actual movement of the energy is form, the sense of pleasure or pain that goes along with it is the feeling, and it can be extremely fleeting.
When you see how fleeting feelings are — much more fleeting than even subtle sensations of breath — that rearranges your notion about how you've been living your life.
You realize how much of your life you've spent chasing after pleasant feelings and only to see more and more clearly how fleeting they are.
So as you really look into this process of breathing, there's an awful lot to see.
If you're willing to stick with the ups and downs of that gradual slope, you find that there's always something to do, something to learn.
If you're sitting around waiting for Awakening to happen, it gets pretty desensitizing after a while — putting yourself into a dead, dull mood, saying, “We'll just wait here long enough and maybe it'll come.” You get so that you no longer look at what you're doing.
So the end result is that you're actually desensitizing yourself to a lot of the stuff going on in the mind.
You try to hide it from yourself hoping that, “If I hide it well enough, then the enlightenment will be fooled and it'll come” — like a child trying to fool Santa Claus.
But if you work with the breath — each breath coming in, noticing what kinds of feelings it gives rise to, what you can do to make it a more pleasurable breath — you're engaged in a process that makes you more sensitive.
And what is discernment but heightened sensitivity?
We often think of discernment as trying to clone our minds into seeing things the way the Buddha tells us to see them.
But that ends up just adding one more layer of conjecture to our ignorance.
When he tells us to look for the inconstancy and the stress in things, he's not telling us to come to the conclusion that they're inconstant and stressful.
He's telling us how to develop sensitivity: Can you sense really refined levels of inconstancy?
Can you sense really refined levels of stress?
What happens when you do?
This is what the meditation is designed to do.
As you discover those more and more refined levels and take them apart to create a greater sense of stability, a greater sense of wellbeing in the mind, you finally get to the point of equilibrium where everything opens up.
You fall into what they call the stream — the point where there's no input into the present moment.
You know this for sure because you've thoroughly sensitized yourself to every kind of input the mind has had, every little discussion, every little agreement it's made with itself, even the sublinguistic communication going on in the mind.
You've become more and more sensitive to that, to the point where it stops and you're no longer doing anything.
This is where the path takes over.
The path actually does the work from that point on.
It opens you to the Deathless.
This is why it's called the stream, because there's a sense of current pulling you along without your having to do anything at all.
But to get to that point, you've got to do a lot of doing and be very sensitive to what you're doing, so you can know for sure when there's really and truly no intention in the mind, and when it only seems that way.
So this little exercise here, of adjusting the breath, evaluating the breath: That's the beginning of discernment, the beginning of insight into the three characteristic of inconstancy, stress, and not self.
It's crucial to the practice.
It's the stage where you're not just obeying the rules for children.
You're actually getting a sense of how the rules really work, and of which ones apply to you as a mature meditator.
And even though it may be awkward going through this adolescence of testing things and tripping over your mistakes, nobody else has to know about the mistakes you've made.
The important point is that you actually learn from them.
Even though it may be awkward, that's how you grow up.
Our minds are pretty chaotic systems, which is why following the middle way is so difficult.
It's so easy for a chaotic system to get knocked out of equilibrium, to veer off to the left, to veer off to the right.
Staying in the middle is difficult; it requires a lot of balance.
So it's no wonder that when psychologists describe the workings of the mind, they tend to use fluid mechanics as their main analogy.
In other words, the mind acts like water: the way water swirls around and forms eddies, the way it gets pushed down here, goes underground, and comes out over there.
Sometimes it builds up into huge waves.
I was reading the other day about enormous waves, called rogue waves, that suddenly form out in the ocean.
Things come together just right — this little wave adds on to that little wave — and all of a sudden they build into enormous rogue waves that flow through the ocean and then after a while, mysteriously dissipate.
It's the same with the mind.
Sometimes rogue waves come crashing through the mind and you wonder where they came from.
It's easy for tiny little things to set them off.
This is why we have to be careful in our practice.
Don't regard the little details or little distractions as totally unimportant.
Ajaan Mun used to say that it's very rare that a whole tree gets into your eye, but sometimes just a little sawdust can get into your eye and blind you.
Sometimes the little things are the ones that set you off, so you have to be careful.
On the other hand, though, you have to be confident that even if the mind does get knocked off balance you can bring it back.
Otherwise the practice would be full of fear all the time — afraid of tipping off too far to the left, too far to the right, toppling upside down.
There's only one way of learning what the balance point is, and that's through experimenting.
And you can experiment only when you're not afraid.
So you have to develop the confidence that even when you do go far off the path to one side or the other, you can pull yourself back.
There's always that new opportunity in the mind to give yourself a fresh start.
In this way you can experiment and gain a sense of where the balance is because you know that no mistakes are fatal.
You come back and you put yourself on the path again.
You fall off… well, you put yourself back on the path again.
Ajaan Mun once said at another point, “It's normal for people to go off on the side.” You get stuck on the right side of the path looking at the flowers, sniffing the breeze, or on the left side on the path where you're stuck in the mud.
But you can extract yourself from both sides.
This is why we have techniques in meditation.
This is what they're for.
They assume that you're going to go off on either side, and so they give you paths for bringing yourself back.
When the level of energy in your mind is too strong — your mind starts bouncing around like a ping-pong ball — there are calming practices.
When your energy level goes weak — you start getting bored, nothing seems to interest you, nothing seems to be worth doing — there are practices for energizing you.
Think about your motivation — why you're practicing — and that can help get you going again.
And then there's the factor the Buddha calls “analysis of qualities,” which means really looking carefully at what's going on.
Often we get bored with the meditation because we've grown sloppy, we're not really paying careful attention, and nothing new seems to be coming along.
Look very carefully at what you're doing.
Look very carefully at each breath, and you'll begin to see things you didn't notice before.
This is why mindfulness and alertness are qualities appropriate at all times.
Remind yourself why of you're on the path and then be very careful to look at what you're doing, be very precise in watching, watching, watching what's going on.
You begin to see that there's a lot going on here in the present moment.
After all, you're creating a world here in the present moment, and that's not a simple activity.
There's lots to observe, lots to notice, starting with the simple building blocks: the breath, and the mental qualities that are called “directed thought” and “evaluation,” the ones that do all that chattering in your mind.
You direct your thoughts to a particular topic and then you think about it, you evaluate it.
You say, “This is this, and that's that, and this is good, and that's bad.
So you take those very basic building blocks and you put them together in a new way.
Instead of chattering about things outside, you direct your thoughts to the breath, you evaluate the breath.
Then there are the final set of building blocks, feelings and perceptions: feelings of pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain, and the labels you put on all these things.
You apply all those to the breath as well.
So you've got all the building blocks for your experience right here, and instead of building them into elaborate worlds, you very consciously don't.
You build them into something very simple: a focused state of mind.
Now, “simple” doesn't mean “easy.” As I said, there are all these other currents going on in the mind.
But as you keep coming back, coming back, you're coming back to these building blocks on a simple level.
Keep it basic, but be very observant.
One of the reasons things don't stay basic in the mind is that we're so good at whipping things up out of these building blocks.
It's like a meringue, or whipped cream: You take a little tiny bit of cream and you whip it up into this big blob of whipped cream.
There's a lot of air in there, a lot of fabrication going on.
So what you want to do is keep things basic but be very observant, because you've got a lot of tricks up your sleeve for creating something out of nothing, making mountains out of the tiniest molehills.
So, keep it on the level of molehills, very simple, very basic, and keep your eye out for those other tricks.
That's where things get fascinating, realizing how you deceive yourself all the time.
Sometimes it comes down to a basic level of dishonesty in the mind.
One part of the mind is very good at lying to another part of the mind.
So you can start asking yourself, “Who's actually fooling whom here?” “Where's the curtain, the window shade, the wall that allows one part of the mind to fool another part of the mind?” Or, “Does it depend on the other part of the mind's willingness to be fooled?” There are lots of interesting political maneuvers going on in the mind, so watch out for those.
Fortunately, the best way of dealing with them is to keep things basic.
Just refuse to play along.
When things do come up in the mind as you're trying to get it to settle down, try to cut them off as quickly as possible.
When a thought comes into the mind — you remember this person, you actually see this or that person's face — just say, “Goodwill for that person,” and that's enough.
You don't have to get involved in the stories associated with those faces.
And in the beginning you don't have to trace those faces back: “How did that image come?” Just let it go.
This principle of keeping things simple is what enables balance to come more and more easily to the mind, for you can see the little movements that otherwise might set things off.
It's what they call the butterfly effect.
A butterfly flaps its wings in Hong Kong and a jetliner, as a result of the change in the currents of air, later crashes in Texas.
So keep things simple so that you're aware of those little butterfly flutterings in the mind.
But fortunately when the mind crashes it's not like a Texas airplane; it doesn't die unless you let it die.
You can always pick yourself up, dust yourself off, and move on.
This is a good thing to remember in the practice.
There's the story of King Ajatasattu.
He killed his father and later felt a lot of regret, but there's a tradition that he's going to become a Private Buddha someday, even though he's got some really bad karma to pay off first.
Even Mara, who's the figure of temptation in the early Buddhist texts: There's a tradition that he, too, will someday become a Private Buddha.
So no matter how much your mind may seem ready to crash, or if it has already crashed, you can always take heart, pick yourself up, because there's always new karma, always new things you can do, with every moment.
No mistakes are fatal.
When you have that confidence, you can experiment in the mind.
Find out how much effort is too much, how much effort is too little, how too much activity in the mind gets you all stirred up, how too low a level of energy starts you falling asleep.
These are all questions of balance and they can be answered only by experimenting, testing for yourself, finding out for yourself — What's too much?
What's too little?
What's too far to the right?
What's too far to the left?
— with the confidence that no matter what your mistakes, you can always correct them, you can always learn from them.
That's the important thing.
Don't view a mistake as a really bad thing that you have to make up for afterwards.
Use it as a learning experience.
When you approach everything as a learning experience then no meditation is wasted.
Every meditation becomes an opportunity to learn.
It's just a question of whether you take that opportunity or not.
The Buddha talks about the bases of success in meditation: concentration based on desire and Right Effort; concentration based on persistence, or energy and Right Effort; concentration based on intentness and Right Effort; and concentration based on the mind's powers of analysis and Right Effort.
And he talks about how important it is to reach a balance in all these factors, because your desire can be too strong, too weak.
Your persistence can be way overboard or way too lax.
The same with intentness and your powers of analysis: Sometimes they go way overboard and sometimes they dribble away into nothing.
There's only one way to learn balance in all these things, and that's through trial and error.
Yeah, I know.
We here in America are all busy people.
We want things to be packaged easily so we can get the most out of them and move on to our next… whatever.
But the practice isn't like that.
There isn't a “next whatever” to move on to.
This is the most important issue facing the mind right now: the fact that it's creating suffering for itself.
Its every action is aimed at happiness, but it's creating suffering for itself.
That's the big problem in life.
Only the practice can solve it.
And the practice is an activity that gives results only when you're willing to be patient and experiment and learn from your mistakes.
So that's what you've got to do.
But take heart.
Even the Buddha made mistakes.
Big mistakes.
Six years of self-torture.
All the noble disciples have made mistakes.
It's just that they were willing to learn from them, and they didn't let the mistakes get them down.
Let the mind settle down in the present.
Sometimes you can use the word, “let.” Other times you have to force it because the mind sometimes has its moods where it's not willing to settle down.
It's got all kinds of other issues to think about, all kinds of other agendas, and now it's got a whole hour when it can think of those things, things that were suppressed in the course of the day because other things captured your attention.
Now they can start popping up to the surface, so you need tools to keep them from getting in the way.
One effective tool is simply the desire to be still.
For example, when the mind is tired, it really wants to rest.
In cases like that, all you have to do is give it a good resting spot.
Your main concern then is to make sure it doesn't fall asleep or drift off into a zone where it's not really aware of what's going on.
If the body's tired, do some good deep in-and-out breathing to make sure there's enough oxygen in the brain.
Then gradually allow the breathing to settle down to a more comfortable rate.
Once it's comfortable, spread that sense of comfort to fill the whole body and then try to stay very consciously aware of the whole body.
Don't let your awareness shrink.
There are other times when the mind has more energy to think, and in that case you've got to cut it off in other ways, partly by explaining things to it, partly by having values that will cut off the thoughts.
All too often our values go in the other direction — encouraging thought — especially with the idea we have that if we figure out things beforehand, we don't have to do the work.
So many of us come to the meditation with that attitude: If you read enough books, if you think things through, reason things through ahead of time, then you won't have to do all the work.
You just settle down, insights will pop into the mind, and the job will be done.
But it doesn't work that way, because a lot of the insights we're trying to gain deal with the way the mind functions, and you can't really see the functioning of the mind until you wrestle with it to know its ins-and-outs, to know where the tricks it plays on itself are coming from.
And you also have to develop some good retorts.
Sometimes there's a conversation, an argument going on in the mind.
Part of the mind wants to think about this, think about that.
Well, you've got to argue with it, give it good reasons for not going there.
And keep the reasons short and sharp, for otherwise you'll get drawn into endless conversations.
Remind yourself that knowledge, at least the knowledge that we're looking for in the meditation, isn't something that comes from thinking things through.
Ajaan Suwat had a good line on this.
He said, “It's like darkness.
You don't like the darkness, but you can't attack the darkness.
You can't scratch a hole in it, you can't rip it, you can't tear it.
You have to light a light.
The light will then take care of the darkness.” All of the other things we might do to try to grab hold of the darkness or rip it away just don't work.
It's the same with the mind.
We can't think our way out of ignorance.
We have to watch so that we can give rise to discernment.
The discernment here is precisely that: the awareness that comes when you really watch things carefully, when you observe what's going on in the mind.
So you have to set up the right circumstances.
Again, it's not a matter of thinking things through.
The proper preparation for the meditation, the part that explains it beforehand, simply tells you how to set up the right situation, and then you just have to watch.
A good analogy is with a hunter: The hunter does what he can to prepare to go out hunting, to get all his weapons in the right order.
Then he goes out and has to sit very still.
He can't decide beforehand that the rabbit's going to come along at two p.m.
so that he can come back at three and have dinner before dark.
The hunter goes out and all he can do is sit there very quietly and yet at the same time be very watchful.
Whether the rabbit comes at noon or two or four or if it doesn't come that day, the hunter still has to be very watchful all the time.
He can't let his attention slip, can't make a noise, and can't schedule events beforehand.
He can't, through the force of his will, make the rabbit come at a particular time or at a particular place.
The hunter just does the best he can to set up the right circumstances, along the path where rabbits ordinarily come, and then he sits still and watches.
The same with the meditation: You get the mind as still as you can and then you have to watch.
That's the only way you're going to get any really new insights into what's going on.
Actually, as meditators, we're better off than hunters because the mind is constantly sending out little signals.
It's always giving us something to catch as it deals with this, deals with that, makes this choice and that.
The problem is that we're not still enough to notice these things.
We're not attentive enough.
We don't focus our attention in the right places.
We don't ask the right questions.
As a result, we don't see, even though everything's happening right here before our eyes.
So you have to be very, very careful, very, very still, and then ask the right questions.
The Buddha gives instructions on this: the questions that surround the four noble truths.
Where is there stress?
Where is there craving?
When is mindfulness present?
When is it absent?
Can you see these things?
When mindfulness is present, how can you keep it going?
When it's absent, how can you give rise to it?
These are the questions he has us ask about the present moment.
Aside from that, he tells us to put everything else aside — all your other concerns, all the other distractions that come along — and focus on the real issue at hand, which is how to deal with suffering, how to deal with stress.
Once that issue is dealt with, everything else is taken care of.
I recently received a letter from a doctor who was claiming that modern psychology has made an advance over Buddhism in that Buddhism deals only with the problem of suffering, while modern psychology deals with suffering and also gives meaning to life.
I don't think he understands the depth of the problem of suffering.
Once you really eradicate suffering, what remains to your life, the meaning of what you want to do with it, is very clear.
And it will vary from person to person.
But the big issue facing everybody is digging out the roots of suffering.
Once those roots are dug out, then the question of meaning is no longer a problem.
Why does the question of meaning bother us?
There must be some suffering, there must be some stress surrounding it.
We look into it.
Why does there have to be a meaning to things?
What's the suffering that comes from there not being a meaning?
Dig into it.
Look into it.
And if that's too abstract or too subtle, focus on where you do see the suffering, where you do see the craving, because developing your powers of observation is a process just like anything else: You work from the crude to the subtle, from the gross to the refined.
You don't sit there and say, “This issue is too crude for me.
I'm going to wait until the subtle ones come.” You have to handle the crude ones first, the blatant ones first.
Get practice with them and then your sensitivity, you awareness, will grow more and more subtle.
You have to start where you are and accept where you are as your starting place.
You can't say, “I wish my concentration were better.
I wish it was the way it was years ago.” You have to put those thoughts aside and say, “Where is it right now?
What are my abilities right now?
What issues are presenting themselves right now?” If you get used to handling what's here right now, you're focused on the right spot.
You're developing the habits you need.
After all, this is a skill we're working on.
It's not an intellectual puzzle where you can just think things through.
Skills require dedication.
They require time.
They require commitment.
There's an interesting story they tell about choosing candidates for the brain surgery program at a famous university.
As you can imagine, everybody who applies to be a brain surgeon has to be smart, but not everybody who's book-smart is going to succeed in the program.
So the question is how to weed out the people who are not going to succeed.
They found that one of the most useful questions to ask the applicants is, “Could you tell me about a recent mistake you made?” The candidates who say, “I can't think of any mistakes I made recently,” are immediately crossed out.
The ones who say, “Oh, yeah, just the other day I made this mistake,” are the ones who pass the first question.
Then the follow-up question is, “What would you do differently if you had another chance?” The ones who showed that they had already thought of this question and had come up with a few alternatives were the ones who were accepted into the school.
The people who are going to succeed are not the ones who have everything figured out beforehand; they're the ones who keep learning all along the way.
The same principle applies to meditation.
You have to learn to put your mind in a learning mood all the time, because only then will you see the things that you didn't see before, that will light the lamp that will drive away the darkness of ignorance.
So, keep on watching.
The mind feeds on its moods and its objects, so you've got to find something good for it to feed on.
We have the choice.
There are all kinds of things you could focus on right now.
It's up to you to choose the right place to focus, the right place to feed.
So look around in the body.
Where is a comfortable place?
At what spot can you watch the breath clearly and comfortably?
Try to stay in touch with that place — and stay in touch with that sense of comfort as well.
After watching it for a while, you'll find that certain ways of breathing give rise to a feeling tone that feels good, feels healing.
Try to maintain that feeling tone.
This may require adjusting the breath now and then, because the needs of the body, as the mind begins to settle down, begin to change.
The breath can grow more and more still, more and more refined.
The less your mind jumps around thinking about this, that, and the other thing, the less oxygen you need.
So, allow the rhythm of the breath to change as is necessary.
The important thing is learning to ride that feeling tone, the way you'd ride a wave with a surfboard: getting a sense of when to lean a little to the left, a little to the right, steer here, steer there, to maintain your sense of balance.
As for whatever other issues may come up, remember that you're choosing to feed right here.
You don't have to feed on anything else.
There may be a little voice in your mind saying, “Look at that!
Watch this!
You've got to worry about that, worry about this.” Just keep reminding yourself, “No, not right now.” Your current priority is to develop a good, strong foundation so that you can feel secure in the present moment — so that no matter what happens, you've got a place where you're safe.
As you feed here more and more often, you find that the mind gets stronger.
When it gains a sense of nourishment and inner comfort, you can spread that sense of comfort around the body so that it gets more encompassing.
If there are parts of the body you can't spread it to, that's okay: You don't have to focus there yet.
Focus on the areas where you can spread that sense of comfort, where it can seep through easily.
Allow yourself to be bathed by it, surrounded by it, so that the mind has more and more good food to feed on.
As it gets stronger, it can begin to look at the other areas that are more problematic, because now it doesn't have to feed on them.
This is why pain, for example, has been such a big problem.
We keep trying to feed on it.
It's as if you have a good kitchen with lots of good food stocked up, but you go rooting around in the garbage pail.
So get the mind well fed with this sense of ease, this sense of wellbeing, and then when you turn to look at pain you can see it in a different way.
When you look at something as food, as something to gain sustenance from, you're going to see it in one way.
When you look at pain as food, it's disappointing.
It's lousy food, and yet when the mind is hungry it feeds on whatever it can find.
But when the mind isn't hungry, you can look at the pain with pure curiosity: “Let's look into this.
What is this?
Let's try to understand it.” Your whole attitude toward it changes.
Remember: The Buddha said, “Try to comprehend pain.” He doesn't say, “Snuff it out.
One way of comprehending it is to see how much you can use the breath to deal with the pain.
Another is to see how much your different attitudes toward the pain will change the way you experience it.
Experiment around the pain to see what happens, and particularly to get a sense of the difference between the physical pain and the mental pain.
The Buddha compares pain with being shot by arrows.
Physical pain is like being shot with one arrow, but then on top of that you shoot yourself with another arrow, the anguish you build up around the pain, is totally optional.
When you've got a body, there are going to be pains.
Even the Buddha had physical pains after his Awakening, but the difference is that he knew how not to shoot himself with those unnecessary second, third, fourth, and fifth arrows.
And as it turns out, those are the ones that really hurt.
Those are the ones causing the problems.
But you can't just go marching in and say to yourself, “Okay, you!
Out!
Stop!
Stop shooting arrows!” You've got to learn to see where the dividing line is between the physical pain and the mental pain.
You do that by experimenting with the breath, experimenting with the labels you put on the pain, asking yourself questions about the pain — and sometimes the strange questions are the ones that ferret out the strange attitudes you've built up around the pain.
For instance, you can you ask, “What shape does the pain have?” It sounds like a strange question, but when you pursue it you find that your imagination has actually given the pain a shape.
What happens when you don't give it a shape?
How does the pain move around?
Is it moving around on its own or is it moving around because you're pushing it around?
These are things you have to learn through experiment.
It's only through experimentation that things begin to divide out on their own.
In other words if you go in with preconceived notions, “The dividing line has to be here, or there,” it turns out that that's not the case at all.
You're forcing your ignorance onto the pain which, of course, just makes it worse.
So you've got to learn how to experiment.
How do changes in the breathing change the pain?
How do changes in your concept of the pain change the pain?
How about changes in your concept of how the mind relates to the body: Is the mind in the body?
Is the body in the mind?
Where in the body is the mind?
These may seem like strange questions, but you begin to realize that the mind on an unarticulated level actually does think in those terms.
And a lot of our basic assumptions of where the center of our awareness is, where the pain is in relation to that center, and how it affects that center: These play an important role in how we experience the pain and how we make ourselves suffer unnecessarily from it.
So you have to experiment and test things.
But first you've got to get the mind settled down with a sense of wellbeing, for otherwise it's going to be sneaking little bites of the pain, feeding on the pain, and then not liking what it eats.
That just complicates the issue, makes it impossible to analyze things and separate them out.
To gain this foundation of wellbeing takes time.
You've got to be patient.
Keep working at it again and again and again.
You can't say, “I've done this x number of days, or x number of weeks, or x number of years, I should be beyond that.
You just keep working at it as long as necessary.
The concentration is the part of the meditation you can do, the asking of the questions is something you can do, but the insights that actually give you that “Aha!” — those you can't do.
Those come as a result of the other actions, but they're not something you can intend.
You can intend to get the mind to settle down, you can intend to learn how to ask those questions, but when the results come, that's something you can't determine in advance.
Just make sure that you've got the causes right in terms of the stability of your gaze, the sense of wellbeing you can fall back on whenever you need it, and the quality of appropriate attention — learning how to ask the right questions.
That's what you do in the meditation, that's what you intend in the meditation, and when these things fall together just right, the results will come.
To ferret out the difference between the physical pain — the pains of the khandhas, the pains of the aggregates — as opposed to the pain of attachment, craving, and clinging: That's a distinction you see in the doing.
You catch yourself in the doing; you see how the doing affects things.
This is something you can't figure out in advance.
But when the distinction becomes clear in the doing, then you've cut the mind away from those attachments and cravings.
When the Buddha said that his job was done, this is what he meant.
There were still pains in the body, there were still issues in life, but the mind no longer had to suffer because of them.
That's where Awakening makes a permanent difference, once and for all.
We hear over and over again that, because of the principle of impermanence, even Awakening must be impermanent, but that's not true.
The Buddha didn't say that everything is impermanent, only that conditioned things are impermanent.
And even on the conditioned level, it's possible to make irrevocable changes.
This is why training the mind is so worthwhile.
With practice, we can cut through the fetters that keep us bound to suffering so that they'll never bind us ever again.
One of the images they give in the texts is of a palm tree with its crown cut off.
It'll never grow any further.
Another image is of a carcass of a cow.
The butchers take off the skin — cutting all the little tendons and all the connective tissue — but then, no matter how they try to put the skin back on the cow, it's never connected in the same way.
It's right next to the cow, but there are no connections because the knife of discernment has cut them — once and for all.
When you meditate, try to think of it as a process of exploration.
Don't have a lot of preconceived notions about what you're going to find.
If you go into it thinking that you're going to reprogram your mind, well, you could reprogram your mind into seeing almost anything.
If you believe firmly enough that if you saw iridescent clouds all around you that would be a good sign, you could make yourself see iridescent clouds.
If you believe firmly enough that if you saw the whole world as blue you'd find true happiness, then you would make yourself see the whole world as blue.
But that's no indication that the world really is blue.
So instead, you're asked to explore.
The Buddha doesn't give a lot of descriptions of the goal — although he does give a few hints — but he gives a lot of detail on how to find it.
It's like a treasure hunt.
He says that if you go into the next room and you look in this particular way, you're going to uncover something of value.
And he gives you a couple of tests for determining whether the object you find is the valuable object or not: Is it subject to change?
Is there any stress?
Is there any sense of possession?
If there is, it's not what you're looking for.
But as to what precisely it is that you're looking for, he gives only a few hints.
So what we should focus on is the process of what we're doing.
Think back on his Awakening.
There were three knowledges that preceded his attainment of nibbana: knowledge of previous lives, knowledge of beings passing away and being reborn in line with their karma, and then knowledge of the four noble truths.
Those first two knowledges were not all that certain; there was still an element of possible doubt.
Visions of previous lifetimes don't necessarily mean you actually had previous lifetimes.
You can see people passing away and being reborn in line with their karma, but does that mean that it really happens?
You can see all kinds of things, but it doesn't mean they're true.
The Buddha realized that the way to test those visions lay in testing that issue of karma, what people do, in the present moment.
This is one thing you can know directly.
You can know directly what you're doing.
When you focus the mind, you know you're focusing the mind.
When the mind settles down, you know it's settling down.
When the mind wanders off, you know it's wandering off.
These are things you really know here and now.
When you experience suffering, you know.
When you experience a lack of suffering, you know.
So those are the two issues the Buddha focused on: the feelings of suffering and the knowledge of actions.
The second knowledge suggested that there was a connection between the two, so the Buddha decided to see if this was true.
These two are very certain things.
When you're suffering, no one can convincingly tell you, “That's not really suffering; you're not suffering.” Other things you might know can be shaped by the rules of the languages you've learned, but your experience of suffering is pre-linguistic.
You know it more directly than anything else.
At the same time, when you do something, you know you're doing it.
So the Buddha wanted to see if people's experiences of pleasure and pain are related to their actions.
For his answer, he looked in the immediate present.
“What are you doing right now?” he asked himself.
“Is there any relation between what you're doing right now and an experience of pain or lack of pain?” The next question, when he saw that there was a connection, was, “Is it possible not to do anything?
What happens then?
So he worked to let go of the craving and ignorance that lead to action, that are involved in action, to see what happens then.
In this way he was dealing with realities that are immediately apparent, immediately present.
He was running an experiment to see: What happens when you do it this way?
What happens when you do it that way?
He wasn't dealing in visions; he wasn't dealing in mystical abstractions.
He was looking at very ordinary things — the actions of the mind — and seeing what they resulted in.
We're trying to do the same thing as we meditate here.
That's where the focus should be.
We're not just sitting here waiting for enlightenment to plop on us out of the sky.
We're looking for an enlightenment into what we're actually doing right now.
It's amazing how much the mind can disguise that from itself.
This is a tendency we've had ever since we were little children: to hide our intentions from ourselves, because sometimes our intentions are not all that sociable, not all that admirable.
We can find ways of justifying almost anything to ourselves, and in the process we learn how to be a little bit dishonest — sometimes not just a little bit, sometimes outrageously dishonest — with ourselves.
So when we're meditating we want to muster up some honesty and focus it on this issue here.
Let's really get truthful about what's going on right now.
We apply our honesty — this is not to say we're by nature either honest or dishonest, it's just that we've developed both patterns — and we try to take advantage of our skillful habits to uproot the unskillful ones.
How do we get honest and clear about our intentions?
You have to make the mind really still.
That's why we're focused on the breath.
We give the mind an intention: “Stay with the breath.
Don't move.
Don't go wandering off to other things.” And we give it a further intention: “Try to breathe as comfortably as possible.” That right there is an immediate exercise in the relationship between your actions and feelings of pleasure and pain.
You want to develop that particular sensitivity as much as you can.
What's important is the particular combination of the stillness of your focus and the point where you're focused, right at this issue of intention and its relationship to pleasure and pain.
This is why breath meditation opens things up in the mind, for it's focused on the real issues.
The Buddha once said that insight is knowledge of sankhara, fabrication, and fabrication comes in three forms: physical fabrication — that's the breath; verbal fabrication — the directed thought and evaluation that give rise to words; and then mental fabrication — your feelings and perceptions.
When you're focused on the breath properly, all these things are brought together.
There's the physical fabrication of the breath, there's directed thought and evaluation directed to the breath, and there are the perceptions of the breath and the feelings that arise from how you deal with the breath.
Everything you really need to know for Awakening is right here.
And what is the process of fabrication?
There's a lot of intention involved in it, and that's what you want to focus on, because intention lies at the essence of action.
The Buddha's genius was to realize that the things we need for Awakening, the things we need to understand the problem of suffering in our lives, all lie right here.
It's simply a question of bringing them together and giving them a really steady look so you can clearly see what's going on.
What happens when you really focus your attention right here and don't let yourself get distracted?
What happens when you develop your sensitivities in this area?
What do you find?
Ajaan Maha Boowa talks about his time with Ajaan Mun, saying that Ajaan Mun would give long Dhamma talks, sketching out the whole path of the practice, because at any one time there would often be lots of different people coming to study with him, all at different stages of the practice.
In order to cover everybody, he would start from the most basic levels of practice on up to the highest.
And Ajaan Maha Boowa noticed that as Ajaan Mun was giving his Dhamma talks he'd get to some really crucial parts of the practice, really important discoveries that would move you from one level to the next, and he wouldn't describe them in detail.
He'd just move on to the next level.
He'd set up the problem and then bypass around it.
This had Ajaan Maha Boowa mystified — for a while.
Then he began to realize that if you explain everything in a lot of detail beforehand, people would come to those points bringing a lot of preconceived notions.
Those notions would get in the way.
So the important thing about listening to the Dhamma is that the Dhamma points you.
In fact the word, desana — the word they use for a Dhamma explanation — literally means “pointing to.” It points you to the places where you should look, gives you instructions on how to look, and then it's up to you to see.
When the Buddha would give instructions for meditators, he wouldn't say “Go do insight,” he'd say “Go do jhana.” In the course of doing jhana you'd have to develop tranquility and insight as well.
The insight would become your own because it's something you discovered.
You noticed things that you didn't notice before.
What else do you think Awakening would be?
It's not that the skies open and some god comes down bearing a message, or some light beam comes down, from the outside.
And it's not something you can clone from what you've heard about other people's Awakening.
It's simply a matter of looking very carefully at what's already here; looking to see what happens when you get your focus really well tuned, when you get it steady.
You develop all the skills you need to see clearly — learning how to look, learning where to look — but the actual seeing, when it becomes clear seeing: That's something you can't will.
The looking will point you there.
If you keep looking, you'll see.
So, look carefully.
There's a lot to awaken to here — a lot to understand, to explore, to discover.
It's simply up to us to want to discover it enough, and to apply ourselves to what needs to be done.
When you meditate, you're exploring.
You're not trying to program the mind in line with somebody else's notions of what it has to do.
You're exploring possibilities.
Can you stay with the breath?
How long can you stay with the breath?
Can you make yourself stay with the breath longer than you might have thought possible?
Where are the little gaps where mindfulness lapses?
Can you bridge those gaps?
Can you relate to the breath in a friendly way?
These are the questions you set up, and then you explore.
This is important to remember: that even though the Buddha has explored this territory himself and all the noble disciples have explored it — they've sent back reports on what can be found here — still for each of us it's a process of exploration.
We're testing the Buddha's teachings.
Is it possible, as he said, to find true happiness, a happiness that doesn't change?
As we explore, all the answers we arrive at then become questions we use to keep the mind pointed in the right direction.
As you sit and meditate, you often come up with interesting insights, uncover things about the mind that you never noticed before, possibilities that you had never realized were possible.
Often a weight is lifted off the mind.
But sometimes your tendency is to focus on the world outside.
You suddenly see the world in a new way: “The world is perfect as it is.” Or, “The world is illusory.” Those aren't the insights the Buddha focused on.
He focused more on what it's possible for the mind to do.
Can it operate in a way that it doesn't create suffering for itself?
As you meditate you begin to catch sight of little moments in the mind where things seem a lot less weighty than they did before.
You feel less burdened by different concerns, long-term or short-term.
But it's important in each case to turn around and look: What did you just learn about how the mind can function?
How was it functioning in the past?
How about the new way of functioning you've suddenly discovered?
How is it better?
Sometimes it may be a general psychological issue.
People who have problems with guilt and blame suddenly find a moment without that guilt and blame.
It's possible to look at the world without the guilt and blame.
That's an important insight, just to remind yourself that it's possible.
You don't have to carry these things around.
But as to what the insight says about the world — Is the world perfect as it is?
Are you perfect as you are?
— that's a more controversial issue.
And it's not what the Buddha said to focus on.
Focus on the fact that it's possible for you not to be carrying this weight around continually.
The next time you detect it coming up, remember that you have the choice of putting it down.
Just the realization that you've been able to do it once: That's liberating.
It expands the range of your imagination.
Remind yourself that there is that possibility.
Sometimes the insights are related more directly to the meditation itself.
It's possible to relate to the breath in a particular way.
It's possible to relate to your feelings in a particular way.
In other words, you don't have to identify with them.
You begin to see them.
Awareness really is separate from these things.
It doesn't have to take on — lay claim — to these things as being yours.
That opens up a possibility in the mind.
You see that, for a moment, the mind was totally without any sense of identification with these things.
It's possible.
Many of the possibilities we uncover in the mind are skills we've already mastered in other areas, just that we haven't applied them consistently.
There have been many times when feelings have come up in the mind and we don't identify with them, but we don't notice the fact.
What meditation does is to help us notice that we can apply that skill in areas where we hadn't applied it before.
So when a particular state of mindful alertness or concentration arises in the mind, it's important that you try to maintain it in all sorts of different situations, for this helps you gain just that sort of insight: realizing that the habits you've found useful in one area of your life can be used in other areas as well.
After all, you don't go around holding on to all your cravings all of the time; you have to let go of one craving in order to pick up another one.
The habit of letting go of craving is something we all have developed unconsciously.
The problem is that when we let go of one craving it's usually because another, more compelling, one has come along.
We let go of one craving only to pick up another.
But we do have the ability to let go of a craving.
The drawback is that we do it unconsciously and as part of another process, the process of picking up something else.
What the Buddha teaches is a new process: that you can let go, let go, let go, let go, without picking up anything else.
If something is causing you suffering, if something is causing you pain, you can let it go.
It might still be hanging around, but you're not holding onto it.
That makes all the difference in the world.
It's like living near fire.
As long as you're not grasping the fire, you're okay.
You don't have to drive fire out of the world.
If you tried to, of course, it would be impossible.
And even if you could, you'd create all sorts of hardships for yourself when you want to cook food.
All you have to do is let go of it and you're okay.
You don't have to grab hold.
Our problem is that we learn how to let go of one fire but we find other kinds of fire and hold on to those.
And we think that somehow it's different.
“These are the fires you have to hold on to.
That other fire you could let go of because it's unimportant.
But these ones are more important.” Or, “It's there in the mind, so you have to grab on, because you have to hold on to everything that comes into the mind.
An important part of insight is realizing that you don't have to hold on.
Things can be there in the mind and you don't have to lay claim to them, you don't have to let yourself be influenced by them.
It's possible.
And you try to apply that possibility to other areas of your life that you wouldn't have thought of before.
But as you try to develop these good habits, expand their range, you still run into old bad habits that you've carried around for who know how long.
Just focusing on the breath, if you try it continually, you run into all the issues that you're used to creating around any activity, any job any responsibility.
They're going to come in to mess up your focus, to push and pull and mess up the breath.
Which is why this is such a good place to take the mind.
After all, the breath is going to come in, it's going to go out, all on its own.
You don't have to do the pushing in, the pulling out.
When you realize that, you begin to see the pushing and pulling habits you picked up from other jobs, other responsibilities, that are totally irrelevant here and actually get in the way.
When you see clearly how they get in the way, remember that, because they often get in the way in other activities in life as well.
In this way the breath is a good testing ground for learning about the habits of your mind.
Years back, when I first went to stay with Ajaan Fuang, he said, “Your only responsibility in all your activities is to stay with the breath.” He meant it in a way to unload my mind, to clear away thoughts of other responsibilities.
What it did of course was to make the breath seem suddenly onerous.
It was a weight.
It was a responsibility, something I had to worry about all the time.
But then as I worked with it, one of the big lessons came in learning how to be with that responsibility and not make it a weight, not make it a burden.
After all, why should the breath be a burden?
It's what you do to stay alive.
It's the basic process, the basic force that keeps you alive.
That was a good lesson in seeing how the mind can create problems out of even the simplest things, things that are in its own interest.
Learning how to be with the breath comfortably, learning how to breathe comfortably: You can make that a big issue, a big weight.
But if you step back a little bit, you realize how ridiculous that is.
And that ability — to step back and look at things and say, “Wait a minute, this isn't right.
You're creating unnecessary problems for yourself” — is what opens you to new possibilities.
Seeing that your old, unskillful habits are unnecessary is what allows you to let them go.
And noticing how you let them go is important as well, because then you can take that insight and you apply it to other areas where you're making yourself miserable for no good reason at all.
You realize that it's possible to let go.
Even though there are problems in the world, there are issues in the world, things you've got to be responsible for, still you don't have to weigh yourself down with them all the time.
It's possible.
This is what the insights are all about.
You see possibilities in the mind, possibilities for letting go of old habits that create suffering.
So when anything new comes up in the mind, keep reflecting back on that question: What does this new mind state show about the mind's possibilities?
What does it show about how the mind can relate to things in a way that involves less suffering?
Keep your questions directed in this area and you'll learn useful things.
We were talking today about the insight of seeing the world as perfect just as it is.
That's directing your attention in the wrong direction.
You're not supposed to think about the world as being perfect or imperfect.
Instead, turn around and ask, “What did that just teach you about the mind?” It may have shown you how you've made the imperfection of the world into a burden.
Do you feel personably responsible for it?
Do you carry guilt around about it?
Is it possible not to carry that guilt and still function skillfully, helpfully, in the world?
That's the important question of the insight, because it then becomes a skill you can apply to other things.
If your attention gets directed out to the world, as to whether the world is perfect or not, you can argue for days and days and days and get nowhere at all.
People in a comfortable position might say that it's perfect; people starving in Africa would say that it's not.
But if you look at the insight as an opportunity to see that you've developed a new skill in the mind, you can drop the way of thinking that wants to pass judgment on the world.
Then you can remember the new skill and apply it to how you function in other areas as well.
This is why Ajaan Fuang was not interested in hearing about your meditation experiences unless you could keep them going for a while.
If you asked him about a meditative state, he'd ask, “Are you in there right now?” And you'd say, “Well, no.” Then he'd say, “Go back and work on it.” In other words, when you've gained a state of concentration, gained an insight into the workings of the mind, see if you can maintain it as a skill.
Whatever you've learned, look at it as a skill that has shown you a new possibility in the mind.
Then see how much you can apply that skill to other areas.
That's the test of your insight.
Some skills are universally applicable.
Others are useful only for specific problems.
You learn about your new skill by trying to apply it to everything and then seeing, “Well, it doesn't work here, it doesn't work here, but it does work here.” As I said, many of the skills you learn in the process of meditation are things that you've already been able to do in other areas.
It's simply a question of learning how to apply them right here, in the context of the mind's quest for true happiness, in this area where you can really watch things carefully as they happen in the present moment.
So we're here to explore possibilities in the mind.
Remember the Buddha's own quest began with a desire that all of his friends told him was an impossibility: the desire for a true happiness that doesn't change.
His friends all said, “Don't even bother.
It's impossible.
Nobody has ever attempted anything like this.
All the great people of the past have satisfied themselves with the ordinary everyday pleasures.” And Prince Siddhartha's response was, “In that case, they're not so great.
They're not worthy of respect.” He was determined to find if this was possible: a true happiness where there was no suffering at all, the total end of suffering.
And he explored and explored and explored and found that it was possible.
We're now in a world where we've heard that that possibility is there.
It's been attempted, and reliable people claim that it works, that they've found a true happiness.
So we can follow their teachings.
But it's interesting: In following their teachings, they never ask us to follow them simply by rote or accept them without proof.
They ask us to explore as well, because it's only through exploration that you're going to learn these things for yourself.
They teach us how to explore our own minds.
That's what the Buddha's instructions are all about.
He says, “Try this, try that.
Here's a range of useful tools.
See what insights you gain into your own minds.
Look for the workings of the mind that cause unnecessary suffering.
So as we practice, it's not an issue of being obedient or not.
It's a question of looking into our own minds, using the tools the Buddha gave us to explore the possibilities that are here.
That way we'll be able to prove for ourselves if it's really possible.
Can you live without suffering?
Can the mind function without causing suffering?
Can you be more skillful in how you fashion your experience in the present moment?
Can you get to the point where you don't fashion anything?
Is that a possibility?
The only way you can answer that question is to keep exploring on your own.
It requires work and dedication, but the payoff is great even if you don't get all the way to full Awakening.
You find that you do learn ways of causing less and less and less suffering for yourself all the time.
That, in and of itself, is worth it.
The insights you gain, if they're genuine, carry their own reward.
I've mentioned several times that Ajaan Fuang never certified whether you had attained a particular level of concentration or a particular level of insight.
He had lots of reasons for doing this, but one is that if the insight really is genuine, it's its own reward.
You don't need to be patted on the back.
You know for yourself that there's less suffering.
You see something in the mind that you didn't see before and as a result you've learned a new skill.
You've unburdened the mind.
It doesn't suffer in the way it used to.
That's of great worth in and of itself.
So keep looking into the possibilities.
Always be open to the idea that things you thought were impossible, burdens you thought could never be laid down — in fact they seemed such a permanent part of the mind that you didn't even realize that you've been carrying them around — can be laid down.
Explore that possibility.
That's what the meditation is all about.
There's a constant dialogue going on in the mind: “This is this.” “No, it's that.” “This should be this.” “That should be that; you like this and you don't like that.” All kinds of voices — and in many cases the voices are totally untrained.
They're just things we've picked up from here or there, and we carry them around.
This is the baggage in our mind.
The Buddha said that the mind can be at peace only when it's one, but for most of us there are two, three, four, five, six voices going at it, with all their preconceptions, saying, “You've got to do this, you've got to do that.” And unless you examine them, they can force you to suffer in a lot of ways.
We hold onto so many things, not so much because we like them but because we're afraid that if we don't hold onto them something even worse is going to happen.
We're afraid that if we don't do things this way or that, we're going to get all screwed up.
So we hold on and create suffering for ourselves.
This is why, as the mind begins to settle down, one of the big issues you've got to deal with is the range of different voices in the mind that get in the way.
Some of them are random, others are more persistent, more pervasive, more persuasive, more in control.
You've got to learn how to put a question mark next to them.
If anything gets in the way of concentration, put a question mark next to it.
“Do you really believe that?
Is that kind of thinking really right?
Is it really useful?
That's the main issue: How useful is that kind of thinking?
When you start asking this question, you begin to see how much you've been holding onto things you've never really examined in the past.
You just accepted them because other people said they were true, or they sounded right, or maybe they worked once, and then you held onto them as a habit.
So you have to make it a rule within yourself: An unexamined voice isn't worth listening to.
That's why the Buddha said that there's no jhana without discernment; no discernment without jhana; no solid concentration without understanding; no understanding without solid concentration.
The two have to go together.
In other words you've got to have at least some understanding of the workings of the mind before you can really settle down.
Otherwise you'll fall for all the old tricks the mind's been playing on itself, saying, “You've got to think about this, you've got to get involved in that, you can't neglect this, you've got to look out for that.” You need to learn how to see through those voices.
That's what they are: just disembodied voices floating around there in the mind.
Learn how to put a question mark next to them, saying, “I wonder if that's really true?
Maybe I can look into it some other time.” Then put the issue aside and go back to work, focusing on the breath.
As the mind gets more and more quiet and still, you begin to see these voices more clearly, and other voices that have been hiding out of sight begin to come up to the surface.
This is how these two processes — the stilling and the understanding — help each other.
The quieter you are, the more you can see; the more you can see, the more you're able to cut through the subtle disturbances that keep the mind from being quiet.
This is why there's no such thing as a separate tranquility technique or a separate vipassana technique.
Any technique you follow, anything you will the mind into focusing on or doing: That's a concentration technique.
You can “do” concentration; you can't “do” insight.
Insight is something that arises as the mind gets still, and often it's unexpected.
You can't map it out saying, “First you're going to gain insight into dependent co-arising and then into not-self.” These things vary from person to person — what you happen to notice and question as you're doing your work.
It's like the difference between an artisan and an artist.
An artisan has a particular technique, a particular craft that he uses, and he may get very good at it, but unless he develops the curiosity that advances his art, he just stays as a craftsman.
But if you begin to exercise your ingenuity — “Well, how about trying this?
How about trying that?”; questioning this, questioning that; trying this, trying that: That's when you become an artist.
That's when the art becomes your own.
And the same principle applies in the practice.
Curiosity and ingenuity make all the difference — when you learn to question your old patterns and test new possibilities.
This is why it's so important to be able to come out to a quiet, secluded place like this where you can get out of your ordinary ruts, begin to air out the mind, and start questioning the attitudes that seem to work in your daily life.
You begin to take them apart and realize that they don't actually work so well, that they create a lot of unnecessary suffering.
As the Buddha said, simply living as a human being involves pain.
There's the pain of the body, the pain of having to be dependent on things.
We have this body that needs sustenance, and in order to gain sustenance we have to work.
We have to depend on the work of other people.
It's a real burden for a wide range of people and other living beings — a burden that's part and parcel with birth, aging, illness, and death.
As long as you're alive, this burden is unavoidable.
But there's also a lot of suffering that's totally unnecessary: the things we inflict on ourselves through our own lack of skill in managing our minds.
That's something we can work on in the meditation, learning how to deal more skillfully with issues as they arise, recognizing which patterns of thought are skillful and don't lead to suffering, which ones are unskillful and do lead to suffering, learning how to stop acting, thinking, and speaking in unskillful ways.
That's what our practice is all about.
When we stop doing unskillful things, the unnecessary suffering we inflict on ourselves will stop.
There may be feelings of pain in the body, but there's no suffering in the mind.
So the practice is a matter of developing skill.
Ancient cultures made a distinction between two types of knowledge: scribe knowledge and warrior knowledge.
Scribe knowledge is the knowledge that can be defined in words.
Warrior knowledge is the knowledge that comes from acting, from developing a skill.
And even though we need to depend to some extent on scribe knowledge as we meditate, the meditation itself develops warrior knowledge.
We learn the words in the texts so that we can get a basic idea of what the problem is and what needs to be done, but the actual knowledge we're working on comes from developing the mind.
In Pali it's called bhavanamaya-pañña, the discernment that comes from developing.
In other words, as you try to develop concentration in the mind, you begin to realize things about the mind you didn't know before.
As you develop mindfulness, as you develop persistence — all these qualities that you work on cultivating — you begin to learn things about the mind that were previously hidden.
Obscure.
That's the kind of insight, the kind of discernment that's really going to make a difference.
So as you're meditating, think of yourself as a warrior doing battle with ignorance.
You're working on a warrior's skill: the survival of the mind with as little suffering as possible.
That's what you're working toward.
But you have to understand what it means to be an intelligent warrior.
People who aren't warriors have picked up a lot of strange ideas about what warriors do, thinking that you have to attack everything as soon as it arises, that you can't give an inch to anyone at all.
That's a dumb warrior, a warrior who's going to die young.
An intelligent warrior takes on battles only when he realizes he can win them and that they're worth winning.
At the same time a good warrior uses whatever's at hand.
We talked today about having to fall back on buddho as a “primary-school” meditation technique.
Well, if that's what you need, don't be ashamed to use it.
A good warrior isn't ashamed to use any weapon that works.
Whatever weapons are needed for the battle at hand, those are the ones you've got to use.
This is why a good meditator keeps lots of tools, lots of weapons on hand — because when the defilements come, they don't all come in one shape or form.
They don't always attack from the same side.
Sometimes the mind feels lazy and is very ingenious in thinking of reasons for letting up in the practice.
Sometimes it turns on itself and starts browbeating itself for not working harder and harder.
Well, that strictness, that sternness, can also be a defilement if it's not helpful for the meditation.
This is when it gets really tricky, for often the voices of defilement can disguise themselves as the voice of the Dhamma.
You've got to watch out for that.
When you're not quite sure whether what the mind is saying is true or false, skillful or unskillful, just go back to being an observer.
Look at the thinking in the mind simply as a process of arising and passing away in which you don't have to get involved.
At the very least you'll survive whatever's coming through the mind; oftentimes you'll have a chance to understand it.
You'll begin to see that this goes with that, that goes with this, when you think in this way then this is going to happen, when you think in that way then that's going to happen.
When you've seen these connections, then the next time that kind of thinking comes around, you're better armed, better prepared for it.
So as you meditate, you've got lots of techniques.
You've got buddho, you've got the breath, you've got your ability to analyze things when analysis works, you've got your ability to stay still when it doesn't.
In other words, as a meditator you've got to be skilled in lots of approaches, just as a warrior has to be skilled in lots of strategies.
What this comes down to is that whatever works in clearing up the suffering of the mind, whatever keeps the mind from creating burdens for itself, whatever technique works: That qualifies as the Dhamma, whether or not it's in the texts, whether or not you heard it from the teacher.
After a while, as you look back on the things that work, you'll find that they fall into patterns, but don't be surprised if the patterns aren't the ones you would have expected beforehand.
After all, where do your expectations come from?
They come from your past ignorance combined with your past knowledge, all mixed up together.
So when all the things you've read in the books don't work, just sit down and look at the problem.
Step out of it.
Flip it over.
Use your ingenuity to find some way around it.
If your approach works in alleviating the unnecessary suffering the mind creates for itself, you've found a new side to the Dhamma.
As you stop creating suffering for yourself, you'll find it easier to be skillful and helpful with other people as well.
This is why this is not a selfish practice.
The principle of goodwill is not just an idle wish, saying, “May all living beings be happy,” and then leaving it at that.
It also means actually being kind to yourself, not creating the unnecessary suffering that you've been piling on yourself all the time.
When you find that your mind is less piled-on like this, it's easier to feel sympathy for other people who are piling burdens on their minds, too.
When you're unburdened, it's easier to help them in a genuine way.
That's why the benefits of the practice go not only inward but outward as well.
Still, the real work has to be done right here inside, finding where those unnecessary burdens are — the burdensome ideas, the burdensome notions the mind piles on itself, saying that it has to react like this, has to think like that.
Once you find them, figure out how to let them go.
That's the kind of battle you want to take on, the kind that's really worth winning.
And when you can win it, your victory is a gift not only to yourself, but also to everyone around you.
There are many passages in the Canon where the Buddha — after explaining the path of practice, or talking about the urgency of following the path — sends the monks back to meditate.
“Look,” he says.
“Over there are roots of trees, over there are empty dwellings.
Meditate.
Don't regret later that you didn't meditate, that you didn't practice.” The word he uses for going to meditate is “to go do jhana” — jhayati is the verb in Pali.
It's a homonym with a verb for burning, as when a flame burns steadily.
They have lots of different words for burning in Pali — words for raging fires, words for smoldering fires — but the verb for a steady burn, as in the flame of an oil lamp, is jhayati.
And the same verb is used for doing jhana.
As you practice concentration, you try to make the mind burn steadily, with a clean, clear flame.
Flames that flicker up and down are hard to read by, but a steady flame is one you can read by clearly.
That's the quality you're trying to develop so that you can read the mind.
How do you create that steady flame?
Two qualities of mind are basic.
One is directed thought; the other is evaluation.
You direct your thoughts to a particular topic like the breath.
Keep reminding yourself to stay with the breath.
Then you evaluate it.
How is the breath going?
Where do you feel the breath?
When the breath comes in, what are the sensations that let you know it's coming in?
When it goes out, what sensations let you know it's going out?
Are those sensations comfortable?
If they are, let them be.
If they're not, you can change them.
What this means is you can focus anywhere in the body where it's clearly telling you, “Now the breath is coming in, now the breath is going out.” And notice how you're maintaining that focus.
Is it a comfortable place to stay focused?
Are the sensations themselves comfortable sensations?
What can you do with the breath to change them if they're not?
If they're comfortable can you make them even more comfortable?
This is all part of evaluation.
This is how you get started on jhana practice.
Some people classify this as a samatha or tranquility practice, but the Buddha himself said that you need two qualities to do jhana properly.
One is samatha, or tranquility.
The other is vipassana, or insight.
In other words, tranquility and insight together form the two sides of the practice we're doing, and the Buddha recommends that you get them balanced.
So it's not the case that you just do tranquility practice and then you drop it to do insight practice.
A lot of people think that way, though, and so the question often comes up, “How much tranquility do you need before you can do insight?” That's a question never addressed in the Canon because they didn't see things in those terms.
They saw tranquility and insight as two sides of one practice.
Both sides are essential.
Sometimes you find that one side comes up before the other, sometimes they arise together, but ideally they foster each other.
If you have one without the other, you have to strengthen the one that's lacking, so that you can bring things into balance.
The samatha side is closely related to directed thought.
How do you steady your directed thought?
How do you steady the mind?
How do you get it to settle down, to gain confidence in its object?
That's largely a question of making it comfortable, yet at the same time maintaining enough alertness and awareness so that you don't blur out.
To make it comfortable you've got to get sensitive to what's going on right now.
This is really important.
When you're with the breath, try to be as directly with the sensations as you can and notice how good they feel.
Is this something you can settle into?
Once you've settled in, how do you stay there?
What do you do to maintain it?
This is evaluation — and it's where the beginning of insight comes in, for if you don't have any insight you start drifting off.
Concentration is not simply a matter of will power, of forcing yourself to stay in place.
There has to be some understanding as well.
You develop it by evaluating the breath, evaluating your focus, to see what needs to be adjusted so that the mind can settle down and stay there, stay there, stay there consistently, without wandering off.
As the mind gets steadier, you can then drop the evaluation and simply let the mind be one with the object.
That's how it enters the higher levels of jhana.
But that doesn't mean you're totally done with evaluation, simply that it gets more refined.
You're still going to have to deal with disturbances as you try to make your concentration more solid and continuous, as you try to keep the mind centered at all times.
You get the mind into a good solid state of concentration and then, when it's firmly there, step back to evaluate it in terms of the subtle disturbances still present within it.
This is where your powers of evaluation take on the deeper questions of insight: How should fabrications — these disturbances that come and go — be regarded?
How should they be investigated?
How should they be seen with insight?
How should they be regarded as stressful?
When a thought comes into the mind, can you look at it simply as an instance of stress, rather than getting involved in the content of the thought?
There are several steps here.
First of all, see that the thought is inconstant.
It comes and it goes.
It's a disturbance.
Second, see that this disturbance is stressful.
Keep your analysis just at that level: stress arising, stress passing away.
Don't get involved in what the thought is about.
Just say, “Here comes some stress.
Do I want to get involved in that?
Well, no, it's stress.” That makes it easier to stay away from it, easier to keep the mind focused, easier to keep you from getting involved.
When you see that it's not self, you don't have to get involved in it.
You don't have to identify with it.
You don't have to take it on — which also means you don't have to push it away.
If it's there, let it be in the background.
The more quickly you catch sight of it simply as an instance of stress, the more easily you can tell yourself, “I don't have to go there.” As you get more skilled at this, you hardly even give it time to form into a coherent thought.
We have a tendency that, once a thought arises, we want to peer into it: “What's this about?” And if it doesn't seem to make sense, “Well, how can we make sense out of this?” We get more and more involved in taking it on, making it an intelligible thought, an intelligent thought, making it a thought worth thinking.
But if you see it simply as an instance of stress and catch it more and more quickly, you allow it to be a stupid thought and let it go.
The next time around you allow it to be just a half-formed thought and you let it go.
You allow yourself not to have to peer into and straighten out everything that comes into the mind.
This makes it easier to stay focused.
As for the question of how to investigate these fabrications, investigate them as skillful or unskillful.
It's not the case that all thoughts are useless.
Some are useful, very useful, but they have their time and place.
Thoughts related to the breath are useful for your purposes right now.
Thoughts related to other things — what you did yesterday, what you're going to do tomorrow — are useless.
They're unskillful at the moment.
Because we're so used to thinking, so adept at thinking, it's skillful right now to focus on learning how to be adept at not thinking about anything except the breath.
So think about the breath.
After all, the breath itself is a fabrication, a fabrication you want to hold on to.
So it's not the case that when you see how things are stressful and inconstant, you let go of all of them right off the bat.
You first have to focus on maintaining the ones that are skillful, and letting go of the unskillful ones.
If you have trouble getting away from a particular type of unskillful thinking, you can learn to analyze it to see how it leads where you don't really want to go.
Like that chant we had on the body just now.
That's useful for lust.
When you find yourself focused on lust, remind yourself: What exactly is this object that you're getting so worked up about?
What's in there?
Is it something you really want?
Do you really want to go where the lust will lead you?
If you apply the perspective of that chant just now, you're more inclined to say, “Well, not really.” And the lust subsides.
So that kind of thinking is useful.
When it has done its task, you can put it aside.
Get back to the breath.
So the questions that give rise to insight are questions, one, dealing with ways of not identifying with your thoughts, and then, two, since you don't have to identify with them, what do you do with them?
You see when they're useful and when they're not.
They can lead you in directions you want to go or in directions you don't.
You're learning to look at thoughts not as sources of content but as parts of a causal chain.
They're important not so much for what they say as for what they do.
This way you understand that even though you may not want to identify with any fabrications, still there are the fabrications that form the path.
Those are the ones you want to encourage, because they're skillful.
Ultimately, they take you beyond fabrication.
This is a part of insight.
The fabrications that keep the mind still and steady, that keep the mind engaged in the pursuit of what's skillful, are the ones you want to encourage.
So this practice of steadying the mind, maintaining that still, steady flame, requires both tranquility and insight.
And, of course, once the mind settles down, the insight gets more refined.
The tranquility gets stronger.
In this way the practice of jhana depends both on tranquility and on insight, and it creates the conditions for more refined tranquility and more refined insight, step by step.
They all go together.
Understand them as different tendencies or qualities of mind, but do your best not to see them as radically separate.
You don't have to worry about, “When do I do insight?
When do I do concentration?” They all come together.
The question then becomes: If you begin to notice an imbalance in the mind, how do you bring it back into balance?
If you're thinking too much and it's snuffing out your concentration, drop the thinking for a while.
If your concentration is getting too dull, learn to probe it with a few questions.
And in trying to find that balance, you develop sensitivity to the mind — the basis for discernment.
This is the whole purpose of jhana practice.
It's not a matter of showing off: “Well.
I've got the third jhana; you've only got the second.” Or, “I jumped through all eight jhana hoops in eight days.
How about you?” That's not the purpose.
The purpose is to get the mind steady enough, long enough, so it can see.
When it sees, it can let go.
When it lets go, it's free.
That's what this practice is all about.
That's what the Buddha meant when he said, “Go, do jhana.” It encompasses all of the aspects of developing the mind.
Ajaan Suwat used to say that settling into concentration is like falling asleep — except that you don't go to sleep.
And that's where it gets tricky.
In other words, how do you bring the mind to stillness and yet stay awake?
It basically happens in three stages.
You start with your ordinary, everyday level of concentration.
It's called “momentary concentration”: the kind that allows you to listen to things, to memorize things, to read a book and remember what you've read so that it all makes sense.
That kind of concentration is something we all have, and it lasts for a moment, or it lasts for a series of moments.
You might find yourself slipping off and coming back, slipping off, coming back, but at least there's enough continuity so that you can remember.
That's the kind of concentration you start out with when you focus on the breath, or focus on buddho, or whatever your meditation object is.
You find the mind slipping off but you bring it back.
It slips off and you bring it back.
There's kind of a rhythm to it, like music: You play a musical phrase, and then you pause; another phrase, and then a pause.
But there's enough continuity so that the phrases form a larger whole.
The same holds true when you start trying to stay with the breath.
You may stay with a couple breaths and wander off, say, maybe between the in-breath and the out-breath, or the out-breath and the in-breath, and then start up again.
This is normal.
The important point is that you keep coming back, coming back, coming back.
As you work with this kind of concentration, you begin to realize why there are pauses.
This level of concentration can't withstand displeasure, boredom, or pain — anything negative or unpleasant.
Even the slightest little bit of displeasure and it gets knocked off.
The mind loses its focus because of that.
This is why the way to move on from this stage of concentration to the next one is to learn how to work precisely with the sense discomfort.
You don't have to start with major pains, just the slight discomfort you may sense in the breath.
Maybe it's a little too long, too short, too shallow, too deep — whatever.
You learn to adjust it, you learn to work with it.
That gives you confidence.
You don't have to be afraid of these things.
A little bit of discomfort comes up and you can deal with it.
This allows your concentration to get more continuous.
This brings you to the next level, which is called “threshold,” “access,” or “neighborhood” concentration.
It's in the neighborhood of getting really settled down, but it's not quite there yet.
This is where the mind grows fairly peaceful, but at this stage it can easily lose its focus.
As I said, with momentary concentration, the problem is that it can't withstand displeasure.
Well, the problem with access concentration is that it can't withstand pleasure.
It loses focus when it runs into real pleasure.
This is the way the mind normally is.
It's so used to falling asleep when things get relaxed that it just lets go.
People who tend to have visions will have visions in this state.
People who don't, still find that they drift off very easily.
They fall into what Ajaan Lee called delusion-concentration: moha-samadhi.
Things are quiet, pleasant, still, but you have no idea where you are.
So the important thing in this stage is to give the mind work to do in the pleasure.
Just as with momentary concentration you focus directly on dealing with the problem — its weakness in the face of pain or displeasure — here the problem is the mind's weakness in the face of pleasure, so you focus on the pleasure.
This is why Ajaan Lee has you spread the breath throughout the body: both to give you work to do within the pleasure and to enlarge your frame of reference.
Normally, as you get more settled down, and the breath gets softer, more refined, it gets harder and harder to keep track of.
So you need to expand your frame of reference to include the whole body.
That you can keep track of, even if the in-and-out movements of the breath grow still.
There are lots of ways of working with the breath in the body.
One is to stay focused on the same spot you're always focused on, and just broaden your sense of awareness — the range of your awareness — so that it encompasses the whole body.
Then you allow the breath to adjust so that it feels good, as good as possible, throughout the whole body.
Another way is to go through the body, section by section, working on the breath energy in each section until it feels pleasant, and then letting the pleasure in all the sections connect.
This way you get used to working with your pleasure.
This is one of the distinctive features of the Buddha's teachings.
He doesn't take pain or pleasure as an end in and of itself.
Each of them has its uses.
When pain comes, what do you do with it?
When pleasure comes, what do you do with it?
Instead of simply suffering from the pain or enjoying the pleasure, you learn how to work with these things so that they can take the mind to a deeper level of concentration.
What happens when you work with that sense of pleasure and broaden your awareness is that the mind gets so totally involved as a whole that it can't do anything else.
It's as if you've nailed its hands and its feet down to the floor, so all it can do is just be there.
Or you might make another comparison: The mind that slips off to the past or the future has to be a very small mind.
It's almost as if it needed to go down a little tube to go to the future or to the past.
But when the mind is large like this it can't fit down the tube.
It's stuck.
If it's going to go, it has to shrink.
So as you're sitting here with this broadened awareness — centered in one spot but filling the whole body — you're really fixed in the present moment.
This is why this third level of concentration is called “fixed penetration.” And from that point on, all you have to do is maintain that state, learn to keep your balance there.
The breath will go still — sometimes it even seems to stop.
Just let it stop.
You don't need the in-and-out breath anymore, for the brain is using less oxygen, and you're getting all the oxygen you need through your pores.
Remember the gold woman in Goldfinger?
Remember why she died?
Because the gold paint had covered her pores, and she couldn't get the oxygen she needed through her skin.
This shows that there's already a lot of oxygen coming through the skin.
So when the breath stops coming in and out, don't worry.
You've got all the oxygen you need.
The body can be still, filled with awareness.
And that's it.
This is the state of concentration that doesn't get waylaid either by pleasure or by pain.
It's the kind of concentration you want.
You get here by letting go of other thoughts, but also by being very focused on the breath.
This is where it's different from falling asleep.
When you fall asleep, things get still and then you just let go totally, let go of all your mindfulness, all your alertness, and move off into another stage of becoming, as the texts call it.
Whatever little dream world happens to appear in the mind as we fall asleep, that's becoming in action, and it's usually in this state of threshold concentration.
So this is what you have to work past.
Learn not to get carried off by the pleasure, the sense of ease.
Tell yourself: There's work to be done.
It requires skill.
If you're not skillful, working with the pleasure can create pain and the mind won't want to settle down.
But keep working at it again and again, and after a while you'll develop skill.
You do your work, but you work in pleasure.
You create an even more agreeable place to stay as you work with the sense of energy in the body in whatever way gives results.
Ajaan Lee gives some recommendations, but notice that in his Dhamma talks he talks about the breath energy in all kinds of ways.
There's no one way of conceiving the breath that's going to work for everybody.
So explore and work things out on your own.
After all, it is your body that you're settling into.
You listen to the instructions to gain pointers, but you also have to use your own imagination, your own ingenuity, your own powers of observation to see exactly how the energy in the body is comfortable or not, where you can maximize the comfortable spots and let everything spread so that the comfort all connects.
Then you learn how to stay there.
And don't think of the staying there as just waiting blankly until you're allowed to do insight practice.
The skill of learning how to stay in concentration develops precisely the mental qualities you're going to need for insight — because you're going to get more and more sensitive to even the slightest fabrications of thought in the mind.
You learn to see right through them and not get carried off into their little worlds.
And that's precisely the skill you're going to need in order to see fabrication just as that — fabrication.
It's like taking the old Zen story of the finger pointing at the moon and turning it around: You don't want to look at the moon; you want to look at the finger — because the finger is what's fooling you.
It's pointing you away from what it's doing.
You don't want to look where your thoughts are pointing your attention; you want to look at them simply as fabrications.
So all the important work in developing concentration and insight happens right here: learning how to deal first with pain and then with pleasure, so that the mind can settle down in a way that's still, solid, and very alert, no matter what.
Respect for concentration.
It's interesting that of the factors of the path — virtue, concentration, and discernment — the Buddha singled out concentration as something worthy of respect.
At one point he called it the heart of the path.
And yet the reason he needs to remind us to respect it is because we tend to overlook it, to step on it.
Those little moments of stillness in the mind: We tend to ignore them, we don't pay them much attention.
We're so much more interested in running after things, getting the mind all stirred up, yet ignoring those little moments of stillness between what basically come down to moments of disturbance in the mind.
We see the disturbance as interesting and the stillness as boring, and so we keep running after whatever flashes in and looks interesting.
But after we look at it for a while, we see that there's not much there.
So we drop that, the mind goes still for a moment, and then we move to something else.
Those little moments of stillness are pushed so far in the background that we hardly even see them — and yet these little moments of stillness are what the Buddha wants us to work with, to respect.
Without these little moments, for one thing, the mind would go crazy.
It wouldn't have any rest at all.
At the same time, if you're going to develop stronger concentration, you've got to start with these little moments.
Start connecting them up.
Resist the temptation to go running after any new flashy distraction that comes barging into the mind.
Make up your mind that you're not going to fall for the hype.
You're going to stay right here with the breath.
The breath is not that colorful an object — at least on the surface.
You find, though, as you get to know it, that the more you spend time with it, the more it has to offer, the more absorbing it gets.
But to reach that state of absorption, you have to start out with small moments of concentration, of stillness.
Pay attention to them, look after them.
To describe this process, Ajaan Fuang often used the Thai word prakhawng, which describes what you would do if a child was learning to walk and you were standing behind it.
You want it to learn how to walk on its own, but you don't want it to fall.
So you're gently hovering around it to make sure it doesn't fall, while at the same time not preventing it from walking on its own.
That's the kind of attitude you should have toward your concentration.
In the beginning you need to have faith that the concentration is going to be a good thing.
The passages you've read in the texts are there to give you inspiration: “a sense of rapture permeating the body.” The image they give is of a spring of water welling up, permeating a lake; or of lotuses saturated with water from the tip of their roots to the tip of their buds.
Sounds good.
Something you'd like to experience.
The images are attractive for a reason.
One: They're really precise descriptions of the levels of concentration.
Two: They're designed to make you want to go there, to remind you that these little states of concentration that seem so unpromising on their own, if you stitch them together, develop a strength, develop a depth, provide a sense of intense gratification that they wouldn't if left on their own.
When you take these lessons to heart and carry them through, you find that the sense of peace, space, and stillness in the mind becomes more and more attractive.
You want to move into that sense of peace for good.
The Buddha calls this taking emptiness as your dwelling.
Instead of focusing on the figures in the foreground, you focus on the still space around them.
You realize that this space is an appealing space.
It's quiet, undisturbed.
“There's only this modicum of disturbance”: the singleness of mind focused on the breath, or whatever your topic of meditation is.
You let go of all other concerns.
When you do that, you realize how much weight you've been carrying around, how many unnecessary burdens you've been creating for yourself.
You come to appreciate how good it is to have this still space in the mind surrounding everything else.
You want it to become more and more pervasive.
It's so easy to lose, though, because you've still got that old habit of running after things you think are important or interesting, things you think have a lot of value, things you've got to look into, to look after all the time.
So the Buddha gives you tools — the three characteristics — for undoing those habits, to help you realize that those things aren't really worth all that much worry, worth all that much care.
They're not worth burdening the mind.
It's important to note, though, that he doesn't have you contemplate things radically in terms of the three characteristics until you've got this state of concentration and you appreciate it.
Now, sometimes he does have you use the three characteristics in a less radical way to help you get into a state of concentration, to help clear away the entanglements that keep the mind from settling down in the first place.
But for the really radical analysis, he has you wait until concentration is solid.
Some people start analyzing things radically in terms of the three characteristics before they have sufficient skill in concentration, and it can get pretty depressing, pretty disorienting.
It can short-circuit the practice.
You manage a little bit of concentration and then you lose it, so you console yourself by saying that you've gained all the insight you need from concentration.
You've seen that it's impermanent, so you don't have to do it anymore.
And that short-circuits the path.
But if you contemplate the three characteristics in the context of a well-mastered state of concentration, it actually accomplishes something.
It becomes liberating.
You begin to realize that these disturbances in the mind that tend to wipe out the emptiness, create problems in the emptiness, destroy the emptiness, cut it up in little pieces, are not worth all that much care.
They're not worth all that much worry or concern.
You don't have to go flowing out after them.
That's the point in the practice where the Buddha has you think about the three characteristics in a radical way, to see that the things that you've really worried about, the things that you've really held on to tight, are pretty empty, too.
This is where their emptiness becomes a positive thing instead of being depressing or nihilistic.
It means you don't have to burden yourself with them.
You can live with them in such a way that they don't put any weight on the mind.
When the Buddha talks about emptiness in the Pali Canon, he does so in two major contexts.
One is this sense of dwelling in emptiness as the mind gets still and the emptiness begins to surround things.
That's the side of emptiness that's obviously positive.
Then there are other passages where he talks about emptiness in the sense that things are empty of self or anything pertaining to self.
In other words, they're not you, not yours.
They don't belong to you.
Out of context, that sounds kind of negative.
The things you used to pin your hopes on are not really you or yours, they're not under your control.
If you take this teaching out of context, it sounds like you're depriving yourself of something or that these things are negative.
Actually, the things in and of themselves are not the problem.
The problem is our attachment to them, the attachment that keeps destroying our concentration, destroying our stillness of mind.
When you see things as inconstant, stressful, and empty of self from the perspective of trying to maintain this dwelling in emptiness, then the contemplation of their emptiness serves a positive purpose.
It makes it easier not to get disturbed by them.
The two different types of emptiness begin to connect.
You can maintain this spacious sense of dwelling in emptiness and, at the same time, the things that used to bother you, the things that used to weigh you down, become empty, too: empty of self.
Because they're empty, they don't disturb the emptiness of your awareness.
You can live together.
You can live with these things but not be weighed down by them.
The emptiness of your mental dwelling isn't disturbed by the emptiness of the things that used to disturb it.
When it's not disturbed, you can look into it more carefully, to the point where you see that even the emptiness of concentration is fabricated.
It, too, is empty of anything worth taking as you or yours.
When you see this, you lose the passion that keeps you fabricating it, and in that way the mind is released.
That's when these two different meanings or the two different contexts for emptiness come together in a way that creates freedom for the mind.
This positive intent applies to of all the passages where the Buddha focuses on the negative side of things.
There's a passage in the Sutta Nipata where he describes how, as a young man, he looked at the world with dismay.
The human race as a whole seemed like fish fighting in a dwindling puddle of water.
There's not enough water for them, so all the fish are struggling with each other.
That's the way the world is.
People are constantly struggling as if there weren't enough in the world to feed everybody, to clothe everybody, to give everybody shelter.
It's a constant competition, and everywhere he looked he found that everything was laid claim to.
There wasn't a spot in the world where you could simply be free.
There wasn't a spot in the world where you wouldn't be squeezed out by somebody else.
This gave him a strong sense of samvega, a strong sense of dismay.
But then he realized that the problem was not in the world.
It lay in the heart.
There was an “arrow in the heart,” as he called it.
If you could pull that arrow out, then there would be no more problem.
His description of the world may sound pessimistic, but it's there for a positive purpose.
If we didn't see the world as confining, that would indicate that our hearts are small.
But our hearts are large.
Our problem is that we're trying to use the world to fill up the heart and that's impossible.
The world isn't large enough for the heart.
The only thing that can fill the heart is the sense of emptiness — the peace, the lack of disturbance — that comes from concentration, from focusing the mind on a particular object, and even more so from letting go of attachments.
Our problem is that we're trying to fill up our lives with the wrong things.
We're trying to fill them up with things, rather than filling them up with the space and peace that can come as we work with the concentration, as we develop discernment.
Another negative-seeming passage is the one where the Buddha talks about the body in terms of its parts.
You take the body apart, look at each piece, and realize that there's nothing there in the body that you'd want to get attached to.
You've got lungs, you've got a liver, you've got intestines, and you've got the contents of your intestines — all the way down the list.
Many people object to this contemplation, saying that this is a negative way of looking at the body, but the purpose of this contemplation is to free the mind.
It leads to a sense of lightness; it helps you realize that you don't have to take such obsessive care of the body.
You don't have to be so attached to it; you don't have to regard it as an end in and of itself.
It's a useful tool and we need it in the practice, but when we make it an end in itself we burden the mind, we weigh it down.
The purpose of this analysis is to free the mind, to give it a sense of lightness, to fill the mind up with the space of concentration.
So these ways of looking at the world that seem so negative actually serve a very positive purpose: to remind ourselves of the happiness that comes when we don't confine ourselves to narrow desires, narrow obsessions; when we can free the mind from the straitjackets it's imposed on itself; when we can pull out that arrow, the arrow of the craving based on the ignorant notion that somehow we're going to get satisfaction out of our body, satisfaction out of our possessions, satisfaction out of our relationships, satisfaction out of building a nice coherent philosophy, satisfaction out of the world.
We look at these things in this way to see through them, to realize that our attachments, our clingings, are nothing but forms of confinement for the mind.
When we have concentration as a counterbalance, it's easy to follow through with this sort of analysis and not get depressed, for it opens the mind to stronger, more lasting, more solid, more spacious states of peace.
So at whatever stage you are in the practice, remember that respect for concentration forms the basis for everything else: appreciation for the stillness in the mind, those little spaces that may not seem all that impressive in the beginning but can lead to true happiness if you take them seriously, if you treat them with respect.
This is another common theme throughout the Buddha's teachings: that little, impressive things in the mind, if you pay them attention, if you look after them — if you, in Ajaan Fuang's word, prakhawng them — can more than repay the effort needed to develop them.
The potential for happiness lies in little, unexpected things that may seem unremarkable but really show their true colors when you pay them respect.
As in those fairy tales where there's a little ugly troll whom everybody despises: When a little child takes the time to show a little respect to the troll, the troll reveals his treasure of gold and gives it to the child.
It's the same with these qualities of the mind.
When you show them respect, they give you their gold.
We're here to look after the health of our minds because the mind has a tendency to fall prey to diseases.
There's a passage in the Udana where the Buddha right after his Awakening surveys the world, and he sees everybody on fire with the fevers of passion, aversion, and delusion.
So when we talk about the diseases of the mind here, we're not talking about the ones that would throw you into a mental institution.
We're talking about the diseases everybody is born with.
We come into the world carrying germs inside.
Or you might say that we're born with a low resistance to disease.
The mind doesn't have its immune system up, and as a result it catches fire — catches these diseases — when germ-laden stimuli come in from the eyes, ears, nose, tongue, and body.
As you know, we live in a world full of germs, but they can take hold in the body only when our resistance is down.
The same principle holds with the mind: There are all sorts of things out there that would spark passion, aversion, and delusion, but only when our resistance is down do these things actually take over the mind.
There are times when you can look at something really beautiful and feel no passion at all.
Events can be really bad and yet there's no aversion.
That's a sign that your resistance is on a high level; your immune system is working.
So the cure the Buddha offers is a double one.
As a stopgap measure he says to practice restraint of the senses so you don't take in too many germs from outside.
If you notice that when you focus on certain details the mind gets worked up, don't focus on those details.
Often when we hear “restraint of the senses,” it sounds like we've got to put blinders on — we're not allowed to look, we're not allowed to listen, which would cause all sorts of repressed things to come boiling up out of frustration inside.
That's the image we have.
But that's not what the Buddha's talking about.
He says to watch for the details.
What are the little things that set you off?
Oftentimes that's just what the problem is: the little details.
When you focus on the details and not on the whole thing, the mind comes up with a lopsided or unbalanced response.
So if something with beautiful details is giving rise to passion, look at its repulsive details.
That's why we chant that contemplation of the thirty-two parts of the body almost every morning — as an antidote, to give you some perspective.
As for people or situations that get you angry, look on the good side, look for the good details.
Don't focus on the details that get you upset.
As Ajaan Lee says, “If you look at things with only one eye, you see only one side of the situation.” If you look at both sides, that helps get rid of delusion.
So that's the stopgap measure: restraint of the senses.
If you're really diligent in practicing it, things get a lot easier in the meditation.
Our problem is that in the course of the day we leave our mind on a long leash and let it get involved in all kinds of stuff.
Then when the time comes to meditate, it's like a dog on a long leash.
You've got to pull here and unwrap it there because the dog's gotten the leash wound around a lamppost, wound around a bench, wound around bushes and all kinds of stuff.
By the time you've unwound it, the meditation session is over.
At the same time, the mind hasn't just gotten wound around things.
It's also picked up all kinds of germs, and you've got to sit here treating its illnesses.
But if you really exercise restraint over the senses — if you notice when the mind is getting worked up in an unskillful direction and you counter it immediately — that's developing mindfulness and alertness right there.
So you're strengthening your immune system at the same time you're keeping germs from coming in.
The enemies of our inner immune system are the mental qualities called, “anusaya” — one of those Pali terms that's really difficult to translate.
Sometimes it's translated as “latent tendency,” because literally “saya” means to “lie down;” and “anu” means to “be with” or “following.” But if you look how the word is used in the texts, it's more like “obsession.” In other words, your thoughts keep lying down with a particular object, a particular pattern.
They're obsessed.
There are particular types of obsessions, and these are the things that cause trouble.
For instance, when pain comes, the pain itself is not all that big an issue, but on its heels comes the obsession of resistance.
You get obsessed with resisting the pain, and then you start looking for an escape.
And because you see sensual pleasure as the only escape from pain, that's where you go looking.
You want to find some sort of sensual pleasure to cover up the pain, get rid of the pain, push it away.
Then once the sensual pleasure comes, there's the obsession of passion.
You get obsessed with passion for that pleasure.
You want to keep it going to counteract the pain, to protect you from the pain.
And as for delusion, that usually centers on feelings that are neither pleasant nor painful: neutral feelings.
You don't pay much attention to them.
You don't really see them, because you're out looking for the pleasure and trying to push away the pain.
The neutral feelings seem unimportant, and so a lot of delusion comes into the mind right at that point.
That's where the Buddha says the ignorance obsession tends to focus.
He said that these obsessions circle around the pain, the pleasure, the feeling of neither pleasure nor pain.
They're the things that cause problems in your immune system.
Now, the mind's immune system doesn't work quite like the body's.
To strengthen it requires understanding — understanding that there are alternatives to the ways you ordinarily react to pleasure or pain.
The texts talk about three ways of doing this.
In the Culavedalla Sutta, Visakha, a layman, asks his ex-wife, Dhammadinna — who's now a nun — some questions on the Dhamma.
After she explains these three obsessions — resistance, passion, ignorance — he asks, “Is there passion obsession with every feeling of pleasure?
Resistance obsession with every feeling of pain or disease?
Ignorance obsession with every feeling of neither pleasure nor pain?” She answers, “No,” and goes on to explain: “You can focus on the pleasure of the first jhana, and the passion obsession doesn't come into play there.” It's a different kind of interest, a different kind of attachment.
There is attachment to that state, but it's not quite the same as the obsession you have for sensual objects.
It actually builds up your resistance to those obsessions.
As for the desire for Awakening, she says, “Even though it may be unpleasant to think about how far you have to go, or how much you want to be awakened and you're not awakened yet, it's still a useful unpleasant feeling.” A lot of people say, “Don't let yourself have the desire for Awakening, because you're going to make yourself miserable.
Just be content with where you are.” That's not how the Buddha taught at all.
He said, “If you don't have the desire to awaken, how are you going to awaken?” When you're shooting a gun, you can't hit higher than you aim.
You've got to aim high.
So the frustration of aiming at a goal, an Awakening, you haven't yet attained: That's a useful sense of dis-ease, a useful sense of “something's got to be done, something's not quite right yet.” In the course of that useful dis-ease, though, there's no obsession of resistance, so that helps break this cycle of these obsessions.
As for the ignorance obsession that tends to hang around neutral feelings, you can cut through it with the fourth jhana, where the mind settles down to a state of neither pleasure nor pain — total equanimity.
“Purity of equanimity and mindfulness,” it's called.
Total, full-body awareness, like a white cloth covering the body from head to toe.
There's no ignorance obsession there.
So these obsessions that circle around pleasure and pain can be cut when you realize that there are alternative ways of dealing with pleasure and pain, alternative pleasures and pains to focus on.
When there's pain in the body, you can still find a way of giving rise to jhana.
You focus not on the pain but on the parts of the body that are still comfortable, at ease, and you maximize that sense of ease.
This leads you either to the point where the physical pain goes away or to the point where, even if it's still there, it doesn't matter.
You've got a better place to be, which at the same time doesn't have the drawbacks of sensual pleasures.
That sets you on the path to cutting those other obsessions as well.
So the work here is twofold, just as it is when you try to protect the body from disease.
On the one hand, you don't expose yourself to more germs than you need to, and then, on the other, you build up your resistance, strengthen your resistance, strengthen your immune system.
To do this you start with the practice of jhana, the practice of good solid concentration, so you can cut through those obsessions, so that you gain alternative ways of relating to pleasure and pain.
As the Buddha said in his sutta on the two arrows, if there's pain in the body it's like being shot with one arrow.
When these obsessions get involved with the pain, it's like shooting yourself with another arrow — although for most of us it's not a second arrow, it's a third, fourth, fifth — whole flurries of arrows get shot there, right in the mind, over one little pain.
It's even worse with big pains.
In other words, the germs get in and simply take over.
So you build up your resistance through the practice.
Ultimately, when discernment finally breaks through to the ultimate level, you can go wherever you want.
No germs can touch you because your immune system is totally in control.
But until that point, you have to be careful, working both on the outer and on the inner level.
When you work on the two of them together, that's when you get the best results.
Your mind gains a better sense of what it means to be really healthy, to have real sense of wellbeing no matter what happens, because you know the basic principles of looking after the mind's health.
After all, the Buddha said he was a doctor for the mind.
This was the kind of medicine he practiced, not where he cures our diseases, but he tells us how to cure our own diseases — which is what we're doing right now.
We all carry whole worlds in our heads, whole worlds in our bodies.
I once saw a cartoon of a meditator being taken over by her thoughts.
In the first panel she's sitting very quietly.
Then the word think appears in her head.
Then another think gets added onto her neck, and then another one in her chest, and finally, by the end of the cartoon, the words think think think think think blot out her entire body.
That's the way it is with us: Our bodies are filled with thoughts.
We ordinarily think of thoughts as filling the mind, but they also take place in the body as well.
The mind is what does the thinking, but parts of the body get involved in the process.
This is how we carry those whole worlds around.
You sit here with your body, and all of the sudden it turns into someplace else.
It's all happening right here in the mind and body in the present moment, but in the course of the process the body and mind get turned into another world and another time.
You can compare it to the control keys on computer keyboards.
If you ordinarily push a P or a Q you get a P or a Q on the screen.
But if you push the control button and then push the P or the Q, they're not P's and Q's anymore.
You get something else.
The machine prints or it quits.
All of the sudden the key does something else, for it's in a different context.
The same with the mind and the body in the present moment: You press your inner control key and all of a sudden you've got another world.
It's not just the body sitting here breathing.
It's Thailand or Europe, New York or Texas.
In addition to the worlds we intentionally carry around, there are also lots of unintentional ones that come blowing through our minds.
Those come because of the force of our old actions.
As those storms come blowing through, sometimes the best thing you can do is simply hold onto the breath.
Just as you would batten down for a storm, you just lie low and try to hold tight to the breath for dear life as the winds blow through.
You hang onto the breath as tenaciously as you can.
Even though it doesn't fill your awareness, it at least gives you a corner where you're still in the context of the present moment.
In the Discourse on the Establishing of Mindfulness, you're told at the first stage to subdue greed and distress with regard to the world: vineyya loke abhijjha-domanassam.
In other words, you may not be able to stop these various worlds from happening in the present moment, but you can work at subduing any greed or distress with regard to them as they come through.
In other words, try to be as equanimous as possible, as uninvolved as possible in the process.
Stay with the breath as much as you consciously can.
As you keep this up, after a while the storms begin to calm down.
Then, if you're holding onto the breath consistently enough, you can begin to see things a bit more precisely.
You see more and more how much you're conspiring with those various worlds coming in.
But the initial principle is that whatever conscious decisions you're making, make sure they're decisions to stay with the breath.
At the very least, don't get involved in other things that come along, even if they're filling your body and mind.
This helps establish a beachhead in the present.
Without that beachhead you simply get blown around.
Even though this standpoint may ultimately be a fabrication, it's a useful one.
In the beginning you hardly notice that it's a fabrication.
You just notice that it's a place where you stand still, where you take your stance and try to stay as solid as possible, as uninvolved as possible, so that your frame of reference doesn't shift — so that you don't find yourself suddenly in Las Vegas or Pattaya.
You're right here.
Those other worlds are coming through, but they're coming through right here.
And you do your best, even though you may get involved a little bit, to make sure you feel no greed or distress with regard to the worlds coming through.
In other words, you don't get involved with any narratives that would pull you in even further.
You don't let these things get you upset.
Sometimes this requires just standing still with the breath.
Other times it requires reflecting on those various worlds: What do they give you?
What do they hold for you?
How real are they?
There's a passage where Ven.
Ratthapala is talking to a king who wants to know why Ven.
Ratthapala ordained.
After all, his family is wealthy, his parents are still alive, he himself is young and healthy.
Why would anyone who's not obviously suffering want to ordain?
Ven.
Ratthapala says he considered that “All worlds are swept away; they don't endure.” That's his way of expressing the principle of inconstancy and impermanence.
“They offer no shelter; there's no one in charge.” No one can protect you from the suffering of those worlds.
That's the principle of stress and pain.
“The world has nothing of its own; one has to pass on, leaving everything behind.” That's the principle of not-self: There's nothing you can really hold onto in any of these worlds.
No matter how much you grasp at them, they just slip right through your fingers like water.
Finally, “All worlds are insufficient, insatiable, a slave to craving.” No matter how good they get, they're still not good enough for the mind.
Once the mind develops a sense of desire for these things, it's never fulfilled.
The Dhammapada contains a verse where the Buddha says that even if it rained gold coins we still wouldn't have enough for our sensual desires, because all the things they could buy keep slipping away, slipping away.
They're impermanent, unstable, stressful, not-self.
They offer no real protection, nothing you can really hold onto.
Reflecting on this makes it easier to let go of these worlds as they come roaring through.
If you sense any temptation to get ensnared in a particular world, if it seems interesting or intriguing, just reflect on this: No matter how good it gets, it's never good enough.
At the same time, it can cause a lot of suffering, not only for you but also for the people around you.
You sit here with a mind capable of creating these worlds, but they require a body as their staging ground.
And just keeping this human body alive: Think of how much other people have to suffer so that you have enough food, shelter, clothing, and medicine to keep going.
And then what do you do?
You use this body to entertain yourself, as a staging ground for your private worlds.
How selfish and thoughtless can you get?
So these worlds that you're building: You're building not only on your own suffering, but also on the suffering of others.
When you think about this, it sets you wondering: Can you develop the skill where you don't have to build these worlds and still be happy?
Can you find a happiness that doesn't depend on the body?
The first step, as I just said, is learning how not to get involved in the worlds coming through the mind.
Try to establish this frame of reference right here, at the body in and of itself.
Even though the breath might not fill all your awareness right from the very beginning, even though these various worlds may keep barging in, you at least lay claim to a corner of your awareness and hold on.
The basic principle is that you don't get involved with anything else but the breath.
You just stay right here.
Then, as you stay here with more consistency, you find that this frame of reference begins to fill more of your awareness.
This “in-and-of-itself” frame of reference becomes more and more predominant as you develop an interest in the breath.
It's not just a matter of in-and-out.
There are all kinds of variations in the flow of breath energy coursing through the body.
As you explore them, you find that you're learning not only about the breath but also about the mind.
You begin to see the mind a lot more clearly as you're staying with the breath and you get more absorbed in this frame of reference: body, feelings, mind, and mental qualities in and of themselves, all present right here at the breath.
This is what helps keep you anchored.
More and more, this fills your awareness.
When the body fills your awareness and your awareness fills the body without all those other worlds coming in, when you finally get a sense of seclusion where you're not involved in those things: That's when you can settle down in Right Concentration.
This gives you a stronger and stronger frame of reference right here.
Then you look into the process where this frame of reference gets switched.
What's the control key that turns a simple P into a print command?
What's the switch in your frame of reference that turns the process of fabrication in the body and mind into another world?
You have to be quick to catch these things as they happen.
The more quickly you notice this process of fabrication — before it starts forming a world, when it's just a little stirring in the mind — the better.
Here the first step is learning simply how to notice it and dissolve it away, notice it and dissolve it away.
Make it your sport.
As soon as there's any stirring that could turn in to a world, as soon as you're aware of its happening, just zap it.
Breathe right through it.
Release whatever tension there may be around it, in whatever part of the body it may show itself, because whenever a thought shows itself in the mind, there's going to be a corresponding tension in the body.
When you're consistently with the breath, you can see this clearly.
And you keep zapping that tension with the breath to dissolve it away, zapping it to dissolve it away.
It's like shooting rubber ducks in an arcade.
Nothing really gets harmed.
They're not real ducks that you're shooting.
Just try to get really good as a marksman.
The Buddha compares this to someone who's really good at firing arrows, who can pierce great masses, and can fire arrows in rapid succession.
In other words, once you gain a sense of being established in the body in and of itself, or in feelings in and of themselves, you want to shoot down the process of fabrication as quickly as you can.
As soon as it switches from the “in-and-of-itself” to another frame of reference, shoot it down.
Gradually you get quicker and quicker and you begin to see more and more how you've been involved in the process.
There are points where you make a decision: “Am I going to let what I've got here shift into another frame of reference?” And there's that curiosity: “What's this thought going to do?
What's that thought going to do?” You're always hoping for something to provide satisfaction, to provide entertainment, but if you keep in mind the fact that these things never can provide enough satisfaction no matter how great a world they create, you can just shoot them down.
There's the example that Ven.
Ratthapala gave of the king who controls a really large, prosperous territory.
Word comes that there's another territory to the east that he could conquer and rule as well.
So he sends troops to conquer it.
Then he's told of another territory to the west.
If he wants, he could probably send over his army and defeat that one, too.
So he goes over to the west and just keeps expanding, expanding his territory until he's got everything — east, west, north, south — on this side of the ocean.
Then someone tells his of another territory that he could conquer on the other side of the ocean, so he decides to go ahead and do that.
That's the way it is with the mind: There's never a sense of enough.
These worlds we create never provide satisfaction.
When you reflect on that, it's easier to give yourself over to the process of shooting them down, shooting them down.
Any distraction that comes up and could disturb your concentration, just shoot it down as soon as you realize it's happening.
The breath is very useful in this process.
As your awareness begins to fill the body, you get more and more sensitive to obscure places in the body where thoughts can land on the body or take different sensations in the body as their basis.
The more completely your frame of reference fills the body, the more quickly you can see these things.
You can shoot them down, shoot them down, and then you begin to see: What are the raw materials that these worlds are created from?
Well, there's not much: just a little stirring here, a stirring there, and you connect them up.
You stitch them together.
To what purpose, to what end?
You begin to realize that there's nothing there of any real satisfaction.
The worlds you create offer no satisfaction; the things you create them from are all very ephemeral.
They offer nothing really solid that you can hold onto.
It's like building a house out of frozen meat.
It's bound to melt and start stinking up the place.
Realizing this gets you more and more firmly established in your frames of reference in the present: the body in and of itself, feelings, mind, mental qualities, all in and of themselves.
Before these things can turn into anything more elaborate, you keep them really cleaned out, cleared out, as uncomplicated as possible.
Ultimately your gaze will turn on the basic building blocks themselves.
Even this present frame of reference: That's a kind of becoming, too.
There's an element of fabrication, an element of creation in here as well.
But before you start taking this apart, you've got to get it really solid as a basis for taking other, more obvious things apart.
Most people, when they practice, are in too much of a hurry.
They get a little bit of concentration and they say, “Okay, the next step is discernment.” So they abandon their concentration and destroy it before it's really had a chance to do its work.
We like to figure things out too much in advance.
After all, we think we're clever; it would take less energy, take less time if we could move on as fast as possible.
But some things you just can't rush.
The analogy the Buddha gives is of a woman who's pregnant.
She asks her husband to take a monkey and dye it so that when the child is born it will have a little monkey to play with.
The husband wants to know what color to dye it, depending on whether it's a boy or a girl, so the wife tears open her womb right there — and of course that kills the child.
Some things you can't rush.
The same with training the mind: You've got to get it really solidly established, really centered here on the breath.
Don't worry about the next step, where it's going to go.
When you settle down with the breath, you do need to remember that this is not the ultimate — it's just a temporary resting spot — but at the same time you need to try to make it as good and as comfortable as possible, as solid as possible.
Only then can it provide you with a framework from which you can see other things that are subtle and refined.
Try to inhabit this world as continuously as you can — the world of the present moment, the world where things are kept simple: body in and of itself, feelings in and of themselves, mind in and of itself, mental qualities in and of themselves, before they get turned into something else with the control key that transforms your frame of reference.
Keep this frame of reference as consistent as possible so that you can see the other movements of the mind, understand how they happen, how things come about, how they arise, stay, how they pass away.
Try to keep this spot as solid as possible so you can see those other subtle movements in the mind.
That, you find, will cut away a lot of the suffering that goes along with those things.
Without this solid foundation you just get swept away.
The world gets swept away — you get swept away along with it.
The world offers no shelter — you've lost your shelter here in the present moment.
These worlds have nothing of their own — well, you have nothing of your own in the present moment, because you keep destroying it, abandoning your frame of reference, to go running after shadows.
These worlds are a slave to craving — you're the slave.
So do your best to establish a good solid state right here in the present moment, at whatever level you can manage, whether it's simply the level of not getting involved in greed and sorrow for the worlds that come blowing through your mind, or the level of being more and more independent from them.
Ultimately you want to get to the point where you're totally independent of any world.
Anissato viharati na ca kinci loke upadiyati, as they say in the Satipatthana Sutta.
You dwell independent, not attached to anything in the world.
That's the direction you want to go, where you're not attached to any world at all.
So, whether it's simply the level of withstanding the worlds that seem to be totally beyond your control, or you're getting more and more sovereign and independent: Whatever level you're at, do your best to stay as solid as possible, as uninvolved as possible.
Don't get upset because you're not totally uninvolved.
Work at whatever level you find yourself, because the work of the practice does build on your earlier, more faltering steps to make something more solid and secure.
It's a path where you can make progress, even if it's just step by step.
A lot of people say, “I don't want that.
I want sudden Awakening.” Well, some things can happen suddenly, but no understanding, no skill comes with sudden things that happen haphazardly in the mind.
We're working on a skill here, the skill of learning to stay centered, keeping this frame of reference, not shifting to others.
Just that skill in and of itself can cut through a lot of suffering.
So as you meditate, try to keep your nose down.
Try to keep as close to the ground as possible.
As always, the people who stay close to the ground are the ones who don't get blown away.
The people who keep their nose down get to sniff interesting things, get to find out interesting things that everybody else tends to overlook.
People have a lot of resistance to contemplating the body as a topic of meditation.
Some of them complain they already have a negative body image so why focus on the negative side of the body?
Others say that body contemplation is a way of fostering aversion to the body, which is an unhealthy mental state.
Others say they're not all that attached to their bodies, so why should they have to focus on the body?
Or they'll refer to that story where the Buddha recommended contemplation of the body to some monks and then went off into the forest for a couple of months.
The monks got so disgusted with their bodies that they started committing suicide, while others hired assassins to kill themselves off.
When the Buddha came out of the forest, he found the community of monks was a lot smaller than it had been before, so he called the remaining monks together and told them to practice breath meditation instead.
Some people cite this as proof that contemplation of the body is an unhealthy practice.
However, the fact that people resist this meditation so much shows that it's important.
It's threatening, for it gets right to the core of our attachment.
There's nothing in the world we're attached to more than our own bodies.
That's why people have so many excuses for not focusing right here.
If you don't focus right here, what's going to happen?
You're going to maintain your deep attachment to the body.
It's not going to go away on its own.
Some people think they can short circuit the process of attachment by going straight to their sense of self, thinking that by cutting out the sense of self they won't have to work on contemplation of the body because the work they're doing goes deeper, straight to the root.
But attachment is like a vine: You can't find the root until you take hold of the nearest branch and trace it back.
You can't really get to the root of your attachment to self until you've looked at where your most blatant day-to-day, moment-to-moment attachment is: right here at the body.
The least little thing happens to your body and you can't stand it.
A little bit of hunger, a little bit of thirst, too much heat, too much cold sets you running off.
A little bit of illness and you go running for medicine.
If that's not attachment, what is?
So it's important that we look right here.
Otherwise we stay attached to the suffering the body is going to bring us.
As we all know, it grows old, gets sick and then dies.
If you don't think that's going to be suffering, then go spend some time with some very old people, some very sick people, with dying people.
See how much they suffer.
When I was back at my father's house two weeks ago, I helped every day with the daily ritual of turning him over so my step-mother could take off his diaper.
While she was doing that, I got to see what an old body with bed sores looks like, how an old body functions and doesn't function, how much suffering it brings when it's helpless, not only for the person in the old body but also for the people taking care of him.
I also saw what it's like to be old and not to have trained the mind.
The mind at a time like that is totally out of control because as the body gets weaker, your energy falls.
The thoughts that come barging into the mind can take total control if you haven't developed the ability to counter them.
Then there are all the indignities of aging.
It's as if the human body is designed to undercut any sense of pride we might feel.
Other people have to wipe you; other people have to turn you over; whatever sense of privacy you used to have about your body gets thrown out the window.
You can't control your urinating, can't control your defecating.
Everything goes out of control.
And it's good to contemplate this, not to develop a sense of aversion but to look at the universality of this bodily condition and to develop a sense of samvega, seeing how much effort goes into maintaining the body and then where all that effort ends up.
If that's where you're looking for happiness, you're looking in the wrong place.
That's what this whole contemplation is about.
If you don't learn how to give up your attachment now while you're still healthy and strong, it's going to get harder and harder as the body weakens, as the body grows old.
So we have to develop a sense of pasada, a sense of confidence in the contemplation of the body.
There's no way you're going to get over your attachment to the body if you don't look at it very, very carefully.
The reason we're attached is because we don't look carefully.
This is what the contemplation of the parts of the body is all about: contemplating the body in terms of the elements, for that's all it is.
What have you got here?
Just physical elements.
Wind, or energy.
Fire, warmth.
Water, coolness.
And earth, solidity.
Do they belong to you?
No, they're all part of the world.
As the saying goes, “Ashes to ashes, dust to dust.” As long as we're alive, we take in the elements as we eat and we expel elements as we defecate, and then when we have to give the whole thing up, it all goes back into the elements as we die.
So where are you going to find true happiness there?
After all the effort that goes into the body, is the body true to you?
Sometimes it does what you want but a lot of times it doesn't.
When it starts getting old and grows sick and dies, it doesn't ask your permission.
You'd think that after all the effort you put into it, it would show some gratitude but it can't.
That's not its nature.
We're the ones who've been animating this thing.
One of the images in the Canon is of the body as a puppet.
We pull the strings for a while and then they snap; the pieces break down.
It's good to develop a sense of dispassion and disenchantment for the body, to develop a sense of samvega, so that when it breaks down we don't break down, too.
We chant the parts of the body so often that the chant has become almost automatic.
You can do it without even thinking about what you're saying, so stop and focus on each of the parts, one by one.
Stop and visualize each one as you go down the list.
Start with hair of the head, hair of the body, nails, teeth, skin, flesh.
As you visualize each part, also try to have a sense of where exactly in your body the part is located.
When you get to the skin, you realize you've got the whole body all surrounded right there.
There's skin all around you, on all sides.
Flesh is all over the place, with the bones at the core.
Go through the various parts until you hit one that really strikes you, really hits home.
Remind yourself, “Oh yeah, there's one of those in this body, too.” And it really hits you how incongruous it is.
You have a liver, a gall bladder, a large intestine, hours out of the day.
You've been carrying this thing around with you all the time — “this thing” being whichever part gives you a sense of how odd or disgusting or unclean or peculiar this body is, whichever part hits you in any way that's helpful for contemplating.
Here you've been taking so much care of this, looking after it so much, and this is all you've got to show for all that effort.
We're not bad-mouthing the body, we're just looking at it for what it is.
Ultimately we want to learn how to use it simply as a tool without attachment, but to counteract the attachment you've got to go very far in the other direction to counteract all the hype, all the slick advertising slogans you've used to sell yourself on the body: about how important it is, how essential it is, all the good things that come from looking after it very carefully, doing all the yoga, giving it exercise, eating all the right foods.
You can do those things and yet still it's going to age, grow ill, and die.
One of the meditation techniques Ajaan Fuang liked to teach when people developed a sense of light in the body was to have them visualize themselves within that light.
Sometimes they didn't even have to will it.
The image would appear on its own right there in the light.
They could see themselves sitting right in front of themselves.
Then he'd say, “Okay, think about what the body is going to look like five years from now, then ten years, fifteen, twenty, on up to when you die.
What is it going to look like when you die?
Then if you keep it around the second day after you die, the third day, fourth day, fifth day: What will it look like then?
After seven days, cremate it.
Watch the cremation flames.
And then what's left?
Just some ashes and bones, and then over time the bones themselves will ultimately turn to ash.
You've got nothing but a pile of powder.
Then it gets blown away.” Then he'd have them run the film backwards, reassemble the whole thing until you got back to the present moment to reconnect with the fact that what you've got right here is inevitably headed in the direction you just saw.
The benefit of all this is that when there's the least little delusion about the body, this contemplation helps to cut right through it.
Then the desire for an ideal body, any thought that, “Other people may get old but I'm going to do yoga, I'm going to eat right, and I'm not going to get old as fast as they do”: You see how deluded and futile it is.
This is not to encourage you not to take care of the body, but simply to watch out for any delusion that gets built up around it, so that when aging, illness, and death come you're more prepared.
Another reason to contemplate it is to ask yourself: Aging, illness, and death are coming — have you attained the state of mind that's going to be free from suffering when they arrive?
If you haven't, how much time do you have?
You don't know.
So get to work right now.
When the urge comes to cut short your meditation, remember this: How much more time will you have to meditate?
Have you gotten to where you want to go?
After all, this is the end of the story line for all of us.
Aging, illness, and death: This is where it's all headed.
You've got to be prepared.
Otherwise you'll lie in bed hallucinating when you get old — seeing strange dogs in the corner and people committing suicide out in the yard — because the fact of your being old, the fact of your approaching death, is just too much for you to think about, too much for the mind to handle.
The mind starts blocking things out.
When it blocks things out in that way, it heads toward delusion.
It tries to run away as much as it can from the unpleasant things, but you can't run away from them.
They're right there.
You have yourself trapped.
The only way to get out of this trap is to dig down into the mind and uproot your attachments.
That's where your hope lies.
When the Buddha points out the negative side of things, it's never just to stop at the negative side.
It's to point you toward the Deathless.
It's to remind you as a warning: This is the way things are, so what are you going to do to stay happy in the face of how they are?
Only the Deathless can give you a secure refuge at a time like that.
We like to think that life will come to a nice point of closure where the loose ends get tied up, where everything gets settled, as at the end of a movie or a novel, but that's not what happens.
Everything just unravels, falls apart.
Things don't come back together and resolve themselves nicely.
There's is a huge dissonance at the end of life as things trail off every which way.
That's how the body comes to an end.
The question then is: Will the mind go the same way as well?
We have the choice.
This is our opportunity — the practice — so we contemplate the unattractive side of the body to develop a sense of samvega, to encourage us to practice and dig deeper.
As the Buddha said, mindfulness immersed in the body ultimately leads to the Deathless if you do it right.
If you do it wrong and develop a sense of aversion like the monks in the story, then — as the Buddha advised them — go back to the breath.
That will help dispel the aversion in the same way that the first rains of the rainy season dispel all the dust that has filled the air during the hot season.
But that doesn't mean you stop doing contemplation of the body.
It simply means you have to learn how to do it skillfully, so that the sense of samvega is always there, inspiring a sense of pasada in whatever way will give you some release, provide the escape, so that — as the sutta says — you'll be happy even when ill, happy even when aging, happy even when you die.
But because our attachment to the body is so strong, we need strong medicine to counteract it.
Body contemplation is not something you do once every now and then.
It's something you have to do repeatedly.
You have to keep coming back to this theme because it's the only thing that will keep you sane, the only thing that will provide real release.
If you find yourself resisting this practice, look into that resistance to see exactly what it is.
It's usually a disguise for your attachment.
The body isn't the problem; the attachment is the problem, but to deal with the attachment you've got to focus on the object where the attachment holds on very tight.
When you really look at it, you see that the body's really not much, it's not worth much, and yet your attachment builds up so many narratives, so many desires around it.
So this is a topic of meditation you need to have close at hand at all times because these attachments come up in all kinds of ways at all times.
You want to be ready for them, on top of them.
As the body continues doing its thing — it wears down here, wears down there, this illness comes up, that illness comes up — you'll be prepared.
In Thailand they have the tradition of printing books at funerals, and in the beginning of each book there will usually be a little biography of the person to whom the merit is dedicated.
A lot of the best Dhamma books in Thailand are the ones printed at funerals, so as you read these Dhamma books you can't help but look at some of the biographies.
They all follow the same pattern.
The person was doing well, had a happy life, wife, husband, children, whatever.
Then after a while he or she started to develop a particular ailment, maybe a little bit of kidney problem, a liver problem, maybe a heart problem.
At first it didn't seem too serious, the medicine took care of it, but after a while it became more and more chronic, more and more troublesome, ultimately to the point where doctors couldn't do anything.
They just had to throw up their hands, and although they did their best, the person died.
And it's ironic: The human mind has the tendency to think, “Well, that's them.
Somehow I'm different.” But you're not different.
Look at yourself; look at all the people around you.
What disease will strike down the person next to you?
What disease will strike down that person over there?
What disease do they already have inside them that's ultimately going to do that?
What disease is inside you?
The potential is already there, doing its work.
One of the contemplations I'd frequently do in Bangkok, as I was riding a bus, would be to remind myself that “All the people in the bus have a funeral ahead of them.
There's going to be a funeral for this person, a funeral for that person, a funeral for that person over there.
It'll hit all of them.
And me, too.” And it's funny: You might think that this sort of thinking is pessimistic or sad, but it's not.
It's liberating.
It's a great equalizer.
You don't get tied up in the particulars of liking this person or not liking that person, being worried about this or that issue in your life.
You know it's all going to end in death.
And that thought frees you to focus on things that really are important, like the whole issue of attachment.
Try to see this practice as liberating, because it is.
If you appreciate that fact, you find you get more and more mileage out of it.
If you have the right attitude toward contemplation of the body, it can take you far.
It can provide a lot of freedom even in the midst of aging, illness, and death, in the midst of all the indignities and pains and problems of aging, illness, and death, for it helps point you in the right direction, to the part of the mind that is free.
The last time I saw Ajaan Suwat, shortly before his death, he mentioned that his brain was beginning to malfunction, that it was giving him all sorts of weird perceptions.
But he added, “That thing I got through the meditation, though, that hasn't changed; it's still there,” which is why the suffering of the body didn't weigh on his mind, why the weird perceptions produced by the brain didn't deceive him.
He showed that it's possible not to suffer in the process of growing ill and dying.
And when something like that is possible, you really want to aim all of your efforts in that direction.
As one of the chants says, don't be the sort of person who later regrets that you didn't take advantage of the opportunity to practice when you were still healthy and strong.
The Buddha's basic teaching on insight is the four noble truths.
We tend to lose sight of that fact, thinking that insight means seeing the inconstancy, stress, and not-selfness of things.
It does in part, but that insight has to take place in a larger context, which is of the four noble truths.
And these truths in turn come down to cause and effect, skillful and unskillful: the things you do that lead to suffering and the things you can do that lead to the end of suffering.
The doing there is important, because we shape our experience much more than we normally imagine, and insight lies in seeing precisely that fact: seeing what we're doing to shape our experience, even though we may think we're sitting here perfectly still doing nothing at all.
There's an undercurrent of sankhara, or fashioning, going on in the mind all the time, even now.
Insight shows its usefulness in pointing out that we're doing this shaping, and also in showing us where we're doing it in unskillful ways so that we can learn to do it more skillfully.
Essentially, insight consists of catching yourself creating trouble; catching yourself creating stress, creating unnecessary burdens for yourself; seeing what you're doing as you actually do it; realizing that you chose to do it.
Ajaan Fuang once said, “Insight comes down to seeing your own stupidity.” You've been doing things that you don't have to do, that create suffering for you and the people around you.
And even though these things cause suffering, you keep on doing them again and again and again.
That's stupidity.
We don't like to think of ourselves as stupid but we are.
When you finally develop the equanimity needed to admit your stupidity, when you can step back and learn how to unlearn all those stupid actions: That's where insight shows its benefits.
It can teach you to fashion things in a new way, a better way, so that your participation in shaping your experience, your participation in the world around you, gets more and more skillful.
If insight didn't help in these ways, it wouldn't really be worth much.
There are lots of teachings about emptiness and inconstancy or impermanence that are wide of the mark.
They may be interesting to reflect on, to speculate about, but if they don't make any difference in what you're actually doing from moment to moment, they're pretty useless.
This is why the Buddha avoided many of the issues that everyone else in his time was worked up about.
Is everything a oneness?
A plurality?
Is the body the same as the life force?
Is the body different from the life force?
Is the world eternal?
Is it not eternal?
Is it finite?
Is it infinite?
When people reach the end of the path do they exist, not exist, both, neither?
These were the hot philosophical issues of the day, but the Buddha refused to get involved in them because they didn't make any difference in terms of this one issue: What are you doing that's skillful and unskillful?
Can you learn to act more skillfully than you've been doing?
A lay follower of the Buddha was once approached by a person who asked just these questions: “What does your teacher teach?
Does he teach that the world is finite or infinite?” And the lay follower said, “Well, no.” — “Eternal, not eternal?” — “No, he doesn't address that issue either,” and so on down the list.
And the first person complained, “Well, your teacher doesn't seem to teach anything at all.
So the lay follower said, “That's not the case.
He teaches what's skillful and what's unskillful.” Remember that.
That's the most basic issue the Buddha addresses and he addresses it in a lot of detail.
If meditation were simply a matter of learning how to get very still in the present moment, how do you think all of those different Dhamma teachings would have developed?
All of what they call the, different division of the Dhamma in the Canon came from someone who was really focused on the issue of skill and lack of skill, trying to develop more skillful ways of approaching everything in life.
This is how your daily practice intersects with your meditation practice: Just try to be more skillful in what you say, more skillful in what you do.
Develop that habit of being very clear about what your intentions are, very clear about what your actions are, and about their results.
When you develop that attitude in your external actions and then bring it into your meditation, you get more skillful in what you think.
You start seeing things you didn't see before.
At the same time, as you develop in your meditation, you get more sensitive to your external actions as well.
So in this way your practice of sitting still with your eyes closed and your practice of walking around with your eyes open, out dealing with people in the world, become more of a whole.
You're tackling the issue of skillfulness on all fronts.
Make this the thread connecting everything you do as you practice.
This is the thread that turns daily life into a genuine “practice of daily life.” Your interaction with other people then actually does become part of your practice.
The work you do becomes part of your practice.
Everything you do and say and think can become part of your practice if you approach every activity with the question, “What's skillful here?
What's not skillful here?
What choices do I have?” Take advantage of the freedom that every moment offers to make the best choice possible.
When issues come up in daily life, try to approach them as a challenge in this way.
When issues like lust, anger, or fear arise in the mind, take the opportunity to approach them skillfully.
All too often we're afraid of fear, angry about our anger, lustful for our lust.
In other words, we approach these unskillful mental states in unskillful ways that simply compound the problem.
So the issue lies in learning how not to be angry about your anger, how not to be lustful for your lust, how not to be afraid of your fear.
That way you can deal with these issues in a more effective, more harmless way.
For example, anger.
Frequently we've heard, and it's constantly repeated, that the antidote for anger is metta, or goodwill.
In the Canon, though, the Buddha actually offers a wide range of approaches for dealing with anger.
In a few cases he advocates developing metta for people who are harming you, but more generally he cites all four Sublime Attitudes as antidotes to anger.
In other words, the antidote includes metta but not just metta.
You want to develop the other Sublime Attitudes, too.
And the attitude the Buddha recommends most is equanimity: equanimity in the sense of stepping back from the situation and seeing it as part of a universal pattern, not just as something personal between you and the person you're angry with.
One of the traditional ways to develop equanimity is to contemplate the principle of karma: that what you do is important.
Particularly, in the situation in which you find yourself, what's important is not so much what the other person is doing as what you're doing.
Focus on that.
If you let yourself get worked up about what the other person is doing, how often he's done it, and how he's come back with it again and again and again and again: If you carry that thought around, you make it more and more difficult to deal with your response in the present moment.
So, drop any thinking about what the other person has been doing and turn around to look at what you've been doing and are about to do.
To do this, it's useful to divide the anger into three parts: one, the object of the anger; two, the anger itself as a mental state; and three, the physical manifestations of the anger.
When you can separate them out in this way, anger becomes a lot easier to deal with.
To separate the anger itself from the object of the anger, you step back and think in terms of equanimity.
Here the Buddha recommends looking at the universality of your problem.
In one sutta he divides up the reasons for being angry and sets them out in kind of a chart.
One reason for being angry is that this person has done something harmful to me.
Or this person has done something harmful to people I love, or this person has done something helpful to people I don't like at all.
In each case you're supposed to reflect, “Well, what should I expect?
It's the way of the world.” That question — What should I expect?
— asked with a cynical tone of voice, is meant to pull you back a little bit, to get you to see the situation in a larger context.
Then you go on to: This person is doing something harmful to me, this person is doing something harmful to people I like, or this person is doing something helpful to people I don't like.
In other words, you bring the whole set from the past into the present tense, and again the question is: What should I expect?
The next set of three puts all three variables into the future: This person is going to do something harmful to me, and on down the line.
When you stop to think like that, the simple act of stepping back from the situation and putting it into a larger framework can provide you with some perspective.
In other words, you reflect on the ways of the world.
This is a world of friends and enemies, where any action is bound to displease somebody.
This is the kind of world you were born into — and you were the one who wanted to be born here.
This is the way things are everywhere in this world.
A lot of wisdom lies just in being able to step back and remember that fact.
Look at the situation in terms of a larger framework, so that your thoughts aren't focused with such narrow intensity on the person or the activity you don't like.
When they're narrowly focused like that, the huge blind spots around them make us lose our perspective — not only about what's happening but also about what we should be doing.
Often what gets shunted off to the side when we're angry is the sense of shame and the sense of fear for the consequences of our actions.
People can get extremely courageous in dumb ways when they're angry, because their fear of consequences gets shoved off to the side, like a poor relative or an unwanted child.
So the first step is to take that larger viewpoint, to see the situation in a larger framework, so as to eliminate the blind spots.
Within that framework, your anger becomes something you obviously don't want to follow through with.
You don't want it to influence your actions.
If you know that you're the heir of your actions, you don't want to inherit any actions done with an unskillful state of mind.
The function of equanimity is to remind you of that fact.
That's when you can drop your focus on the object of the anger and turn to look at the anger itself in the mind.
Here the problem is complicated by the fact that anger is usually accompanied by a physical reaction.
When a flash of anger bursts into the mind it really sets our bloodstream churning.
All sorts of hormones come roaring out, our heart beats wildly, we breathe in a different way, and an oppressive sense of tension or discomfort develops in the body.
Our immediate reaction is that we'd like to get that discomfort out of our system.
But if we try to get it out of our system in the usual way, which is speaking or acting under the force of the anger, that just compounds the problem.
Also, the physical reaction confuses us.
Sometimes we can actually think ourselves into a better perspective about the anger, but the bloodstream is still churning and it makes us think we must still be angry.
That churning of the bloodstream can last a long time.
After all, our bodies are built for the fight-or-flight response, and we normally need more than just a few seconds if we're going to fight, more than a few seconds if we're going to flee.
In cases like that, those long-lasting hormones are useful.
But when you're trying to overcome the anger in the mind, the lastingness of those hormones is not helpful at all.
So make sure to see the thoughts and the physical symptoms as two separate things.
The mind itself may have calmed down somewhat from the anger, but the physical manifestations are still present, obstructing your view of the mind, so you want to deal with them.
Breathe through the tension.
Breathe in a way that gets your heartbeat back to normal.
Breathe in a way that gets the level of tension in your body back to normal.
You might want to think of the tension in your body as flowing out your feet, out your hands, all through the in-breath, all through the out-.
Open up those energy channels so that you're not carrying the sense of oppression around.
That makes the anger a lot easier to deal with, because you feel less burdened, less irritated, less constricted physically.
Then you can look at the mind in and of itself.
What is this state of anger in and of itself?
As I said, it's often a blinding of the mind, putting blinders on the sides of your mental eyes, so you can see only certain things and focus only on certain details.
The state of being constricted mentally like this is really unpleasant.
Just stepping back to look at it helps take off some of those blinders.
You don't have to be afraid of the anger, or angry about the anger.
Just ask: What is this state, to be angry?
Taking a look at it begins to open things up inside.
But again, your looking has to come from the larger perspective that helps you see through the anger, helps you dis-identify with the anger.
The anger may still be there in the mind, but you don't have to identify with it.
You can see it as a separate mental event.
That's important because you then realize that there are parts of the mind that really aren't angry, that aren't involved in the anger at all.
The anger seemed to consume the mind, but that's just because it narrowed your perception of the mind's full range.
So as you open things up like this, you can help weaken the anger, weaken the hold of the anger on your mind.
When you develop a larger perspective, you can step back and see what really should be done.
“What's the most skillful thing to say here?
What are my opportunities?
What are the choices available to me?” If you have a broader viewpoint, then it's easier to see the choices than you could have when the blinders were on.
Then you can see what really would be appropriate.
You can see: If you were to say what you feel so much like saying, what would the results really be?
As the Buddha points out, many of the things we want to do under the force of anger are precisely the things our enemies would like to see us do: destroying our good looks, destroying our property, destroying our friendships, doing things that will get us punished.
Do you want to please your enemy that way?
If you look dispassionately at the actions you wanted to do and can see that the results wouldn't be good, remind yourself, “I don't want that.
Maybe this is not the best time or place to say anything at all.
Maybe I should wait for circumstances to change.” Because you've breathed through the physical side of the anger, you find it a lot easier to delay your actions to a more appropriate time, because you don't feel the compulsion of bottled-up frustration.
Or, if it so happens that something should be done right away, the fact that you've broadened your perspective helps you to see better alternatives: better things to do, better things to say right away.
So remember this as an appropriate antidote to the normal way of reacting to anger.
Too often when we're angry about what someone has done, we're either angry at the person or we turn around and get angry at ourselves for the anger, neither of which really is very helpful.
Instead, we should step back to see the actions of that other person in context: “After all, this is the way the world is.” That helps you to react in a more skillful way.
When we talk about the limitations of the world, it sometimes seems very confining and depressing but it's not.
Actually to think about these things is a very liberating teaching.
There's no way you're going to make the world perfect, so you don't have to make the world perfect.
That takes a huge burden off the mind right there.
You simply think of what should be done right now in this particular set of circumstances, given the larger perspective, looking at the world as a whole, looking at human nature, looking at the whole human enterprise.
You view your interaction with other people within the context of a much larger perspective.
These are the ways of the world.
Of course it's going to be imperfect.
What did you expect, given the fact that the world is imperfect?
Given the reality of the situation, what are you going to do right now to respond in the most skillful way?
This way you find that, of the lessons from the meditation, this quest for skillfulness is precisely the lesson that translates best into daily life as you deal with lust, anger, fear — as you deal with all of the imperfect situations in the world.
You see that they're imperfect and yet you try to find a skillful response.
This quest for skillfulness requires that you use your imagination.
That's what the larger perspective is for.
It opens up more possibilities to your imagination so that your old habits don't form ruts that you can never get out of.
You think of new ways of responding, unexpected ways of responding.
This is where insight really opens up new possibilities in your life, where it shows its true worth.
The ability to see the movements of the mind minutely is an important insight only if it makes you more skillful in the way you act and speak and think.
So keep that perspective in mind.
Keep that quest for skillfulness in mind as well, so that your actions really do fall into the path that leads to the end of suffering and don't keep falling into the path that leads to more and more compounded suffering again and again and again.
This is where the meditation shows its true value in our lives, even if we don't get all the way to the ultimate skill of reaching the Deathless.
The fact that we've trained ourselves to be more and more skillful leads the mind in the direction of less and less suffering.
It inclines the mind in that direction.
If you don't make it all the way to the Deathless in this lifetime, your quest for skillfulness insures that your next lifetime will keep heading in that direction.
You build up a momentum.
So do your best to head your mind in that direction, because otherwise this samsara, this wandering around that we keep doing, is pretty aimless.
The image the Buddha gives is of throwing a stick up in the air.
Sometimes it falls on this end, sometimes it falls on the other end, sometimes it falls flat on its side: all pretty random, aimless.
Try to turn your life from a stick thrown up into the air into an arrow flying straight in a particular direction, toward more and more skillfulness.
Ultimately, someday, whether in this lifetime or the next, that arrow will reach its target — but only if you focus on this issue of skillfulness right here and right now.
And keep it right here right now, every right here and right now.
That's what builds up the momentum.
That's what gives direction and meaning to life.
Every now and then you read a piece taking the Buddha to task on the first of the three characteristics.
The thrust of the piece usually is: “What's wrong with change?
Change is a good thing.
If it weren't for change, we wouldn't have happiness.
There would be no art in the world, no music, no literature.
All the things that make life enjoyable,” they say, “come from change.
So what's wrong with it?
You have to look at change in context.
That's what Ven.
Ratthapala's four Dhamma summaries — the comments he made to the King Koravya to explain why he ordained — are all about.
They tie into both the teachings on inconstancy, stress, and not-self, and into the simple facts of aging, illness, and death.
The first of the summaries has to do with inconstancy: “The world is swept away; it does not endure.” This, on its own, may not be a bad thing.
Certain things' getting swept away would not be bad for the world.
But then Ven.
Ratthapala illustrates his point with aging.
When King Koravya was young he was so strong he felt that he had the strength of two people.
But now he's years old and, as he says, “I think I'll put my foot one place and I end up putting it someplace else.” We don't even have that much control when aging comes.
Change can be nice when it's well handled, but, when you think of all the beautiful music in the world, think of all the lousy music, too.
People actually make an effort to write lousy music.
Not that they intend it to be lousy, but it's very difficult to write good music, create good art, write great literature.
If change were a good thing in and of itself, good literature would be easy to write, good paintings easy to paint.
But these things are hard.
It takes an awful lot of skill to make change happy.
And even with people who are very skilled at it: What happens to them over time?
They grow older.
As they grow older all kinds of indignities come to them.
The body can't function, and when the body can't function they can't entertain people as they used to.
They get less control over themselves, their bowel movements, their memory, their minds, less and less control over their relationships.
It's a pretty sad state of affairs.
Think of the misery suffered by Beethoven, Brahms, and Mozart as they approached death.
That kind of change is inevitable.
It's built into the way things are.
If you think about it, you realize that the change we try to create through art, literature, music goes against the way things are.
Works of art and literature have a nice beginning, they build up a little tension, but then it's nicely released at the end.
There's a sense of completion, a sense of coming to a satisfying goal.
But life isn't like that.
At the end of life everything gets disjointed and simply falls to pieces.
That moves into the next Dhamma summary: “The world offers no shelter; there's no one in charge.” Ratthapala illustrates this with the fact of illness.
He asks the king, “Do you have a recurring illness?” And the king answers,” Yes, I have a wind illness” — which in those days meant sharp, shooting pains going through the body — and he adds that when he has an attack all his courtiers and relatives hang around saying, “Maybe he'll die now, maybe he'll die now.” They might be saying this out of fear, or out of hope: Some of them might want him out of the way so that they can grab power.
So Ratthapala asks the king, “Can you ask those friends, courtiers, and relatives who are hanging around to please share out some of your pain?” The king replies, “No, of course not.” Not even a king can ask other people to share out the pain that comes with illness.
This illustrates the second of the three characteristics, the stress and suffering that come along with change — in other words, the natural change of the body.
When you're in pain, you have to suffer it on your own.
Then the third characteristic, of not-self: “The world has nothing of its own; one has to pass on leaving everything behind.” The king has lots of wealth all stored up, and of course, he has a strong sense that it's his own wealth.
But when he dies he won't be able to take it with him.
He's got to leave it behind.
That's the ultimate not-self teaching.
Even your body, your feelings, your perceptions, your thought constructs, your consciousness: You can't take those with you, either.
These first three Dhamma summaries provide an interesting point to reflect on — that the Buddha's teaching on the three characteristics may have come from the simple facts of aging, illness, and death.
Aging — inconstancy; illness — stress and suffering; and death — not-self.
The fourth Dhamma summary shows why those three characteristics are so threatening: “The world is insufficient, insatiable, a slave to craving.” There's never enough.
No matter what you create in this world, there's never a sense of true completion.
Even the sense of the completion that comes at the end of a piece of nice music, the end of a good novel, a good book, is false.
Aside from Awakening, there's never a point where all your problems in life are settled, where there's nothing more to do.
There's always a lot more to do.
As long as there's craving, there's still an underlying sense of dis-ease and discontent in life.
You keep looking for other works of art, other music to create that sense of completion, but they just can't provide it.
Ratthapala illustrates this fourth summary by asking the king, “Even though you already reign over a very prosperous country here, suppose someone were to come to you and say, 'There's a country to the east with lot's of wealth, but, in terms of its military strength, it's weak enough that you could conquer it given the forces you have.' Would you conquer it?” The king says, “Of course.” “Suppose someone were to come from the west with the same news?” “Well, I'd conquer the kingdom to the west.” “…the north, the south?” “…I'd conquer the kingdoms to the north and south.” It's unending.
“What if someone were to come and say, 'There's a country on the other side of the ocean?'” Well, the king would send his forces there, too.
It's not the case you satisfy desire and craving by giving in to your desires and cravings.
You simply make them hungrier for more.
It becomes more and more habitual that once there's a craving, once there's a desire, you've got to satisfy it.
And when you think of how things are inconstant, stressful, and not-self, and how you yourself are subject to aging, illness and death, there's no end to it all.
There's never a point of satisfaction.
Even death doesn't put an end to things.
The Buddha says that we travel on through the craving.
Just as wind can carry a flame from a burning house to another house and set the second house on fire, he says, craving carries us over from one lifetime to the next.
What's interesting is that the Buddha says all this inconstancy, stress and not-self is rooted in desire.
And yet because of the desire we're never satisfied.
It's through our lack of satisfaction that we want this and want that, and yet the things that we create in order to fill up that lack never really give satisfaction.
So we desire more.
We create more.
The process keeps feeding on itself, but it can never make itself full.
All that work, and yet it can't bring us to a point of completion.
That's the ordinary way of the world.
No matter how good change gets, no matter how skilled you are at riding the waves of change, it's never enough.
That's why the Buddha advises us to look elsewhere for true happiness.
And what he does is to tell us to take that craving and try to manage it wisely.
In other words, that thirst of craving basically wants as much happiness as possible, as quickly as possible, and with as little effort as possible.
But to develop discernment, he says, you take that desire for happiness and adjust it a bit: “What could we do to give rise to true happiness, long-lasting happiness, a happiness that wouldn't change?” In this way you take your desire, you take the possibility of change, and you turn it into a path that leads beyond, that finally does lead to a point of completion, a point of total satisfaction, what many of the Thai ajaans call, “The Land of Enough.
That's what we're doing as we're practicing here.
We're trying to take that craving and turn it into something wise, use it wisely — this desire that the Buddha said lies at the root of all things, the root of all dhammas.
“Dhammas” here means any phenomena of any kind, but it can also mean what we think of Dhamma with a capital “D” — the Dhamma that leads us out, the Dhamma of practice.
There has to be a desire underlying the practice.
If you're going to walk across the room, you've got to have the desire to get to the other side.
The question is how to use that desire in a skillful way.
Walking across the room is not a big issue, but the issue of desire in the practice is a lot more subtle, a lot more intricate.
We want the desire that impels us along the path, but we don't want it to be so overwhelming that it gets in the way.
We need desire to be focused on this one issue: What can we do that gives rise to long-lasting happiness, and ultimately, a happiness that doesn't give rise to change at all?
That's what we're working on here.
Wherever we may be in the practice right now, that's the general direction we're heading.
That's the question that underlies everything we do.
But to make sure that the desire doesn't overwhelm us, we have to refocus it on the practice, on the individual steps that will take us where we want to go.
So look at the particulars of what you're doing, in terms of your thoughts, words, and deeds, not only while you're sitting here meditating, but also in the whole course of the day.
What habits do you have that get in the way of long-lasting happiness — your habits in terms of dealing with yourself, dealing with other people, how you manage the day, where you devote your time, the intensity in which you focus on what you're doing.
All of this is part of the practice.
These are things you can look at.
And this is important.
All the things the Buddha teaches are things we can actually look at.
He wasn't a mystifier.
He didn't make anything into a big mystery.
He said that everything you need to know is right in front of your eyes.
The problem is that you're looking past it.
So look very carefully at your intentions, right here.
I was reading today a blurb for a book on Buddhist ethics in which the author was proposing that the precepts are too simple-minded because our actions have so many ramifications that morality should be seen as a big world of mystery.
What the author is doing is to take the mystery and confusion the Buddha removed from our lives and put it back in.
What does mystery do aside from providing a convenient hiding place for the defilements?
So do your best to clear away the mystery by looking right at what you're doing.
If you look very carefully at your intentions, you can see whether they're skillful by the mental qualities that underlie them.
Then you stay right there and act on that insight.
Is there anger motivating your thoughts, words, and deeds?
Is there greed?
Delusion?
If there are these things, don't act on them.
Keep your focus right here.
This way the process of change in your life becomes something you can manage more and more skillfully.
Don't lose sight of what's right here, because everything you need to know to attain true Awakening, to discover that happiness beyond change, is right here in your body and mind.
The process of sitting right here with the mind on the breath, thinking about and evaluating the breath, perceiving and feeling the results: All the factors you're going to need to know are right here, and yet you tend to look past them.
So try to keep your focus right here.
The irony of it all is that the more “right here” you are in your focus, the longer-term the happiness that comes from your actions.
As you get more and more skillful at this one point, it has ramifications that go out in all directions.
The process of change is something that's happening right here.
Learn to master it right here.
Instead of becoming the change that leads to more and more stress and suffering, to more separations, to a greater sense of dissatisfaction, you turn it around.
You take that craving and you tame it by focusing it right here.
The more “right here” you are, the longer the good results will last.
You give up the guesswork and speculation, you focus on things you can really know right here, right now.
That's why the Buddha's teachings are for everybody.
Think about it.
Most of the great ajaans in Thailand came from peasant families.
That was back in the days when the Thai government was very proud of what it was doing to Buddhism.
It was straightening out Buddhism; it was restructuring everything, starting from the top down, for the sake of the nation-state.
But that didn't have nearly the effect, the long-term beneficial effect, that the actions of a few peasants' sons had out there in the boondocks, out there in the woods, focusing on things they could know for themselves right there in their own thoughts, words, and deeds.
Those were the ones who had the biggest impact, the most long-term and deepest impact on keeping the Dhamma alive, not only in Thailand, but around the world.
So given the way the whole process of change and causality operates in this world, the more careful you are about what you do and say and think in the immediate present, the better the long-term results are going to be.
Instead of trying to satisfy your desires for happiness within the world of change, you take that world of change and use it to attain the changeless.
Look directly right here, right now, at every movement of craving so that you can take it apart: “Why is there craving for this thing that changes?
What can be done to channel it properly?
What can be done to put it to an end?” That's what the teaching on the three characteristics is about.
That's why the Buddha keeps reminding us about aging, illness, and death — because otherwise we tend to get contented with this, that, and the other thing: “This seems to be okay, that seems to be okay, this is good enough in the practice.” But that fourth summary reminds you that it's never enough until you get to the Deathless.
Only then will there be a true sense of enough.
That's where the craving finally disbands.
So this is why we keep chanting these passages again and again about aging, illness, death, and separation: “The world is swept away.
It does not endure.
It offers no shelter.
There's no one in charge.
It has nothing of its own.
One has to pass on, leaving everything behind.
The world is insufficient, insatiable, a slave to craving.” It all sounds pretty negative, but it has a positive import: to remind us not to settle for less than the best.
Instead of being depressing, these teachings are liberating.
They remind us not to look in the wrong place, not to weigh ourselves down with expectations that can never lead to true happiness at all.
Instead, they remind us to look in the right place, where ultimately all worlds disband and the happiness of the Deathless can be found.
So, even though the teachings may sound negative, they have a very positive aim.
Try to get comfortable.
Sit with your back comfortably straight.
If you're bending over, it's going to put a lot of pressure on your back.
And be comfortable with your breath.
Find the breath sensations in the body that feel comfortable and stick with them.
Allow them to stay there, undisturbed.
As that sense of comfort begins to grow, be careful not to get sucked into it too much.
Try to maintain your mindfulness and your alertness so that the mind doesn't start drifting off.
That's one of our problems: We get a little bit of pleasure, a little bit of comfort, and we let go, wallowing in the pleasure, forgetting where we are, forgetting what we're doing.
As a result, the pleasure goes away because the causes for keeping it there get dropped.
The mindfulness, the alertness, the ardency of your effort to stick with it weaken.
And when they weaken, so does the pleasure.
So try to stay alert.
As soon as there's a sense of pleasure, try to be aware of the whole body, letting the pleasure seep through the body, and keep that awareness going.
You'll find that it's not as easy as it sounds because the mind has a habitual tendency to shrink.
Keep reminding yourself: “Whole body breathing in, whole body breathing out.” And the amount of mindfulness and alertness that are required to keep that whole body awareness going will keep you awake, keep you alert as long as you maintain them.
This is one very immediate, very visceral way of showing goodwill to yourself, providing yourself with a sense of pleasure and ease.
When you think about it, just about everything we do is based on the pleasure principle, trying to maximize pleasure and minimize suffering.
We come to the meditation because we've found that other ways, other strategies for pursuing the pleasure principle haven't worked or are not working to our satisfaction.
This is why the Buddha points his teachings at the issue of suffering and the end of suffering.
These are the big issues in our lives, and there's a lot of bewilderment surrounding them.
As the Buddha said, our reaction to suffering is one, bewilderment, and two, a search for someone to show us a way out.
This is why the Buddha put so much emphasis on who you hang around with, who you associate with, who you look to for your advice, because they can set you on the right path to the end of suffering or they can set you on wrong paths winding in all kinds of directions.
This is why you have to be very careful.
We'd like to think that all paths lead up to the top of the same mountain, but I don't know any mountain in the world where that principle works.
The path to the top of Palomar doesn't lead to the top of Everest.
And there are a lot of paths on each mountain slope that lead away from the top of the mountain.
Some lead you over a cliff.
So we have to be very careful about which path we choose.
The same is true with the old idea that all rivers lead to the ocean.
They don't all lead to the ocean.
Think of the rivers that end up in Great Basin.
They just dry up.
The water will evaporate and form clouds and maybe someday fall down in the catchment basin of another river that will flow to the ocean, but that can take a lot of time.
So you have to be careful about who you hang around with and what kind of strategies you employ for a lasting happiness.
The Buddha said that this is the beginning of wisdom.
When you find wise people, you ask them, “What can I do that will lead to my long-term welfare and happiness?” Then you reflect on their answers.
You compare them to the strategies you've been pursuing and you see what's worth giving a try.
Most of our strategies work to some extent.
If they didn't work at all, we would have discarded them long ago.
But the Buddha saw that a lot of our strategies don't work as well as they could.
For example, there's a habitual strategy to avoid even thinking about suffering.
You do anything you can to put the thought of suffering out of your mind — the idea being that if you avoid thinking about it, pay it no attention, ignore it, it'll go away.
And there may be a few cases in life where that works — where focusing on your pains makes them worse — yet there are so many cases where it works only for a while and then it breaks down.
But because we're used to this approach, used to this strategy, we feel a lot of resistance to even listening to the Buddha's first noble truth.
This is why there's so much misunderstanding about the first noble truth as well.
People think that the Buddha says that life is suffering.
Then they think, “That's not true.
I don't believe that.
There's plenty of joy in life.” Actually, there's no place where the Buddha said that life is suffering.
It's amazing how many people — even scholars and Dhamma teachers — believe that, but that's not what he said.
He simply said that there is suffering in life.
You can't argue with him there.
And he points out all the obvious sufferings we live with.
Birth is suffering, all the pain that goes into being born and giving birth.
Aging, illness, and death: These are all suffering.
Being separated from what you like, having to live with what you don't like.
Then he summarizes his definition of suffering with the five clinging aggregates.
This is where he starts getting technical, and where he starts attacking another one of our common strategies, which is our sense of self.
This is another one of the Buddha's great insights — that our sense of self is an activity, a strategy for avoiding suffering, for maximizing happiness.
We latch onto certain things and say, “This is me.
This is what I have to watch out for.
As long as I watch out for this, maximizing the happiness and wellbeing of this thing, that'll provide the happiness I want.” This way of thinking is an activity, a strategy.
It works to some extent, but then there are areas where it breaks down because the things we latch onto are all impermanent.
No matter how much time we try to dress them up, fix them up, keep them going, they ultimately break down.
Form, feeling, perception, thought constructs, even sensory consciousness: They all break down.
But we're strongly addicted to this approach, to hanging onto them as ends in themselves.
Which is why, again, we spend so much time misinterpreting what the Buddha said.
“The Buddha says there is no self,” we think, “but he can't be right.” We're not looking at what he's actually saying.
He's saying your sense of self is a strategy — an attempt to maximize happiness and minimize suffering.
To some extent it works, and he actually has you use your sense of self as part of the practice, teaching you to be self-reliant, to look after your true self-interest — in other words your long-term welfare and happiness.
His teachings on generosity, virtue, and the development of goodwill — all the things that come under the category of merit — are skillful ways of employing your strategy of self.
Basically, he has you take your sense of self, your sense of a continuing identity not only in this lifetime but also even into other lifetimes, and shows how to work with it intelligently so that you're not causing harm to yourself, you're not causing harm to other people.
You're creating the conditions for a relatively reliable happiness in this world and on into the next.
He also uses the development of goodwill — immeasurable goodwill, compassion, appreciation, and equanimity — to clean up one of the major problems we have in this sense of self: our sense of responsibility, knowing that in the past we've done things that are not all that good, and that the results will come back to haunt us.
He has us develop these sublime attitudes, these immeasurable states of mind, as means to allay our fear of the consequences of those unskillful actions.
As he says, don't let yourself get tied up in remorse.
Focus on the present moment, resolving not to make the same mistakes you made in the past, and at the same time develop an attitude of limitless goodwill, because within a mind like that, the impact of past bad actions gets weaker and weaker.
The more limitless your goodwill, compassion, appreciation, and equanimity, the weaker the impact of past bad actions.
So in all these cases — giving, virtue, the development of goodwill — he takes your sense of self and tries to get you to use it intelligently.
That's a strategy for maximizing happiness.
Ultimately, though, self as a strategy can only go so far.
This is where the not-self strategy comes in.
Look at the various things you hold onto, this activity of creating a “me,” or a “mine”: Exactly what are you creating it out of?
Look at the raw materials and you'll see that they can't possibly be you.
They can't possibly provide true happiness in the ultimate sense because they're so unstable and inconstant.
They're all stressful because they're all fabricated.
They're made, they're intentional.
And intentions are inconstant.
When the cause is inconstant, how can the result be constant?
This analysis, though, goes against the grain.
But hopefully, by the time we come to it, we've been practicing the Buddha's teachings — especially the ones on generosity, virtue, and goodwill — and our confidence in the Buddha's teachings has grown.
Our standards for what counts as true happiness have become more refined.
Particularly as we develop our powers of concentration and get used to a more and more refined sense of ease, a more expansive sense of ease, we grow more discriminating in our taste, in our appreciation for what true happiness can be.
And there comes a point where we're willing to uncloud our minds and say, “Well, maybe the Buddha is right.
Maybe if we let go of these things we won't be burdened by them.” This is what the not-self strategy is all about: learning how to let go of all the makeshift things we cling to in order to find the greater happiness that comes from letting go.
So he takes us step by step, starting with our normal desire for true happiness.
He says to focus on happiness, focus on what needs to be done for happiness, but also be aware of the limitations of how you've been looking for happiness.
As you get more sensitive to those limitations, you can uncloud your mind to want something more refined.
That's where he offers you more refined techniques, more refined strategies.
So in that sense, it's a seamless practice, but when we're immersed in the practice it doesn't seem seamless at all.
Our minds go back and forth.
We seem to advance for a while and then retreat, advance and retreat, go left, go right and all over the place because some of the Buddha's strategies go so strongly against our old habits.
The mind tends to rebel.
So we have to learn how to be patient with it.
As with anyone overcoming addiction, there are going to be ups and downs.
But if you're patient enough, sensitive enough, and rely on your powers of perseverance, they see you through.
You become more mature in understanding your desire for happiness.
After all, we really do want true happiness.
It's not an artificially induced desire.
It's something that already underlies all our action.
What we're doing is putting the mind in a position where it has a better and better chance of gaining that kind of maturity.
It's finally willing to give the Buddha's approaches a try, to replace our old strategies — which have had some success, but not total success, but to which we're so attached — with new strategies that promise something more.
Although those new strategies may initially seem counterintuitive, they make more and more sense as you get to know them.
And they really do give results.
The promised results.
A happiness that's unconditioned — because that's the only kind of happiness that can last.
Conditions — where do conditions come from?
Ultimately, they come from our intentions.
And what are our intentions like?
Well, you've seen your intentions — they go up and down, backwards and forwards.
Even when you try to make them constant in concentration, you find that even the most refined states of concentration have their ups and downs.
In this way the Buddha has you cornered.
You let go of the grosser forms of happiness, the grosser strategies for happiness, and get used to more and more refined ones.
And they finally take you to the point where there's no course left but to let go of strategies.
All strategies.
It's like painting yourself into a corner.
The only way to get out of the corner is not to be anywhere.
When you can manage that, you see that what the Buddha taught was right.
He really knew what he was talking about.
This is the way to true happiness.
The Buddha's last words were to become consummate through heedfulness.
Being consummate, of course, means developing the path to its fullness, so that it can take you all the way to release.
And the way to do that, he said, is through being heedful.
The Pali word is appamadena.
It's interesting, that word “heedful.” It's not one we use very much in ordinary everyday language.
And all the other words that could be used for translating appamadena — “by being vigilant,” “by being non-complacent”: These aren't words we use in everyday language, either.
They're perfectly good words — we know their meaning — but in terms of our active vocabulary, they tend to disappear.
We'd much rather hear the word “trust,” “being trustful.” We'd like to be able to trust in certain things: trust that our innate nature is wise, our innate nature is to be awakened, and that we can trust in our nature to take care of these things for us.
But that's not what the Buddha taught.
He didn't say anything about innate nature at all.
The only thing he assumed about people is that they want happiness but are ignorant in how to go about it.
This is why he said that you have to be really careful; you have to be watchful; you can't be complacent.
There are dangers to your happiness out there.
And there are dangers in here as well.
In fact, the dangers out there come from the dangers in here.
If you're not careful, the dangers in here are going to take over and drown you.
So you have to be heedful, you have to be watchful.
The Buddha once said that all skillful mental qualities are rooted in heedfulness and have heedfulness as their leader.
It's because we're heedful of the dangers that we arouse the energy needed to develop skill in the mind.
We see that we're suffering, that we're surrounded by suffering, and a lot of suffering lies ahead of us if we're not careful.
It's through being careful, through being heedful, through not being complacent, that we can do something about it.
That's the important message here: We can do something about this suffering.
Aging, illness, and death are lying in wait, and they're not pretty things.
Sometimes you hear people saying that we shouldn't bad-mouth aging, illness, and death, that there's a beautiful side to them as well, like a lovely flower that's wilting.
It has its own kind of beauty.
But being a person isn't like looking at a flower.
It's a miserable experience being an aging person, being an ill person, being a dying person.
Look at all the indignities, all the suffering, all the pain and anguish that serve no purpose at all.
They just load you down.
It doesn't seem to serve any purpose that we have to die with a lot of pain, or have our bodily functions leave us one, by one, by one, so that we're totally dependent on other people.
It serves no purpose, but that's the way things are.
Some people might say that trying to get out of this suffering is being aversive to life, but it's being realistic.
And it's being true to our hearts.
We don't want to go through all that needless suffering.
And the Buddha says there's a way out.
When there's a way out, that means that trying to find the way out is not being aversive; it's being intelligent.
As with any danger in life, if you see a way out of the danger, you take the way to safety.
Here, though, the safety is something we have to find in our own minds in the midst of the qualities that we can't trust within ourselves: our laziness, our complacency, our willingness to put up with second-best, our desire to turn the responsibility over to somebody else — either a great teacher, some divine being — or just hope that the way of the world will take care of us.
But look at the way the world is.
I went to Alaska years back — one of the last real wildernesses remaining in this country — and was impressed by how implacable it was.
The wilderness would not give one damn if I died.
If I died nicely or if I died a miserable death, it wouldn't care.
Being surrounded by all that indifference was a sobering experience.
That's the way of nature.
Animals die.
Before they die, sometimes they go through a lot of pain and anguish and terror, all alone, with no one to sympathize, no one to comfort them, no one to help.
Nature doesn't care about any of us at all.
So it's up to us to make the difference, to make sure that we're not going to suffer from those things, and that means we have to be very watchful, very heedful, because as I said, the danger comes from within.
We have this tendency to get sloppy.
We're meditating and things get good for a while, and so we get careless.
Inattentive.
Complacent.
These are precisely the qualities that are going to do us in.
When things go well, we have to keep reminding ourselves that they could get worse, but they can also get better.
How do they get better?
Well, for one thing, when you get a good state in concentration you try to maintain it.
Do what you can to keep it going.
This requires skill, knowing how to hold onto it not so tightly that you squeeze it to death and not so loosely that you lose it.
Like holding a hummingbird in your hand: If you hold it too tightly, it'll die; if you hold it too loosely, it'll fly away.
You have to watch and see precisely how much pressure is just right.
It's interesting: The Buddha never defines the term “heedfulness,” or appamada, in the Canon.
But he does give instructions on how to be heedful, how to develop heedfulness.
Realizing that the problem comes from within, he says that the first place you've got to look is in your intentions.
Before you sit down to meditate — before you do anything at all — he says, look at the quality of the intention.
Is it going to be skillful or not?
If it's not a skillful intention, don't act on it.
If it is skillful, be clear about it.
As when you're meditating: Sit down and remember that you have a purpose for being here.
Remind yourself of that purpose every time you meditate.
This is why we have the chanting in the evening before we meditate as a group.
When you're meditating on your own, take the time to remind yourself, “Why am I meditating?
There are a lot of dangers here in the mind.
You've got to learn how to sidestep them, how to cut through them.
So be clear about what you're doing.
Don't just go through the motions because you've scheduled x number of periods to sit during the day and you're just putting in time.
Be careful.
Be diligent.
Be scrupulous in what you're doing.
And scrupulous in checking for the results — that's the other side of heedfulness.
When you do something that you think is going to work out well, look at the results while you're doing it and after it's done.
Be honest about the results.
What kind of results are you actually getting from the practice?
What could you change to get better results?
This principle applies all the way from initially getting used to the principle of karma, getting used to the principle of being a responsible person on the external level, and going all the way through into the very refined states of concentration.
Even when the Buddha talks about emptiness, what he says follows the same pattern: Be clear about what you're doing.
Once you can maintain a good state of concentration, the next step is to look at what's going on.
In what way is this concentration empty of prior disturbances?
In what way is there still disturbance in it?
And where?
If you look carefully enough, you find that the disturbance is related to something you're doing: the way you're creating that state of oneness in the mind.
The oneness itself is a disturbance; it's an intention based on a particular perception.
So what do you do?
If you let go of the oneness, if you go back to having your mind scattered all over the place, that's not skillful.
The skillful thing is to go forward to more subtle states of oneness, based on more subtle perceptions.
In other words, when you see that the way you're focused on your object is causing stress, learn to focus in a way that's less stressful, that causes less disturbance to the mind.
You can pursue this principle all the way through the various levels of concentration, even to the objectless concentration of awareness, where you've let go of the oneness, where there's no specific perception at all — it's almost as if you're not intentionally meditating — but the mind is centered.
It's simply that it doesn't have a particular theme or object for its center, not even a formless one.
And even there, the Buddha says to watch it carefully.
If you look at it really carefully — and this takes very subtle, very intent powers of observation — you begin to see even there there's an element of fabrication.
Intention.
It's willed.
So you learn how to drop that, realizing that it wasn't the underlying principle of the nature of — the underlying awareness of — reality that you thought it was.
To see this requires that you be wary about what's going on.
That's another translation of appamada: wariness.
Not so wary that you're not willing to get into the concentration and work at developing it.
Wariness here means that once you've done the work to get into concentration, you don't get complacent about it.
You don't allow yourself to be deceived about it, to think that it's more than what it is.
This is your protection in the practice, to make sure that you don't overestimate what you've got, you don't settle for second-best, you don't leave yourself open to the dangers out there and in here.
So what heedfulness comes down to is being very clear and very scrupulous about your intentions, about what you're doing, and the results that you're getting.
If you see that the results are not up to par, ask yourself: What can you do to change what you're doing?
Be honest about it.
This principle of honesty is what underlies the whole principle of being heedful and non-complacent.
The Buddha once said this was his one prerequisite for someone he would take on as a student: “Bring me someone who's honest,” he said, “and no deceiver, and I'll teach that person the Dhamma.
So we have to learn to make ourselves trustworthy people, because no matter what promises you get from outside, the test is inside.
This is another function of being heedful: learning to test things, test yourself, test particular practices as they're recommended to you.
When insights arise in your meditation, you can't be complacent, believing that everything that arises in a still, expansive mind has to be true.
You've got to test all your insights.
No matter how impressive the insight, the vision, whatever: Only when things pass the test can you have a really secure sense of what you can trust and what you can't.
We'd like to think that all the teachings out there are simply different ways of getting up to the top of the same mountain.
You can choose whichever you like because all of them are guaranteed to work.
But they're not.
Just as all rivers don't flow into the ocean.
Some of them — the Severn, the Humboldt — flow into the Great Basin and just disappear.
So how are we going to know what works?
We have to test things.
We have to put ourselves to the test, and keep reminding ourselves that no matter how good things get in the meditation, we have to be wary, we have to watch out, because the ability of the mind to deceive itself is so pervasive, so prevalent.
The only way we can get beyond that self-deception is by being very scrupulous, very careful, very clear about what we're doing.
It's a quality the Buddha called by different names: ardency, alertness, intentness.
But it all comes down to being heedful.
This is what sees us through.
This is why the Buddha made heedfulness his last message, because this quality will get all the good results we want.
He could have ended his teaching career with some nice platitudes about emptiness or nirvana or the Deathless.
But there was no need for that.
He said that if you work on this quality of non-complacency, that's what's going to get you there, and then you can know nirvana and the Deathless for yourself.
So heedfulness is the heart of the practice, the heart of the teaching.
And it's aimed at giving our heart what it really wants.
The heart doesn't want to be life-affirming; it wants to be happiness-affirming — affirming that there is a true happiness, that there is a Deathless happiness, something we can really trust.
That's what we really want.
So this quality of self-honesty — willing to test, test, test things over again because you're not complacent, because you're wary and heedful and vigilant — is what's going to see you through.
It's what's going to deliver release.
We're here for the sake of true happiness.
That's why the Buddha left his palace and went out into the wilderness.
He wasn't satisfied with the happiness that comes in normal, everyday life.
He wanted a happiness that was dependable, a happiness really worth all the effort that would go into it.
All kinds of happiness require effort in one way or another.
The question is, “Is the effort worth it?” In terms of fabricated things, conditioned things, many times the answer is No.
In fact, if you make any conditioned thing an end in and of itself, the effort isn't worth it, for ultimately it will leave you high and dry.
Yet the Buddha realized that conditioned things have another side as well.
Not only are they conditioned, they're also conditioning.
In other words, as conditioned things they're dependent on other causes; they arise and fall in line with those causes' arising and falling away — sometimes immediately, sometimes over time.
But then they themselves give rise to other things.
The Buddha's major discovery was that even though certain things are conditioned — in other words the elements of the path are conditioned — they can lead to an opening to the Unconditioned.
And this is what makes the path worthwhile, what gives hope to our lives.
In Thai there's a term for the state of mind where all you can see is the bad side of conditioned things: Everything passes away, passes away, passes away, and everything starts seeming hopeless, pointless.
It's called narrow equanimity, small minded equanimity.
In other words, you get disenchanted with everything, but the disenchantment doesn't lead to the opening to the Deathless.
You stay stuck there on the disenchanted side.
If you stay stuck there, it's easy to get hopeless, apathetic, depressed.
But the Buddha pointed out another side to conditioned things, too.
A potential for true happiness lies here in the practice.
We're fabricating conditioned things.
Right View, Right Resolve, all the way down to Right Concentration: These are all conditioned things.
They're the highest of all conditioned things.
But even though they're the highest, you don't stop there.
They're a path.
They open up to something even bigger.
So make sure that you look at life from both sides.
In other words, you're focused on the drawbacks of taking conditioned things as your goal so that you don't get complacent.
Sometimes it's easy: You get a nice, calm state in meditation, life around you seems pretty effortless, and it's very tempting — and this happens to many, many meditators — to say that this is fine enough right here.
It's in cases like that that the Buddha points out all the drawbacks of conditioned things, all the drawbacks of conditioned happiness.
Not only is a lot of effort wasted in creating that happiness, but sometimes in order to maintain it you also start doing things that go against the precepts, that go against the principles of morality, concentration, and discernment, so that your conditioned happiness causes suffering not only in passing away but also in leading to all kinds of bad things down the road.
So you have to watch out.
You can't be complacent.
On the other side, the Buddha emphasizes the fact that heedfulness really does pay off.
If everything were negative, then no matter how heedful or careful you might be then there'd be no chance for any true happiness.
But skillful action does pay off.
That's why heedfulness is so important.
If you're careful, if you're circumspect, it'll make a big difference.
So we have to ask ourselves, What kind of happiness are we going to pursue in our lives?
And we have to be single-minded in the practice, because it's so easy to stray off in other directions.
Some of the side roads are blatantly bad, and others are relatively good.
With the good ones, it's easy to talk yourself into saying, “Well, this is a good thing to do.
There's nothing wrong with doing this.” In a general sense, yes, that may be right.
But if it's second best, if it's not all the way to the Unconditioned, you can't let yourself stop there.
You can't turn off the road there.
You've got to be careful to stay on course.
The problem is that we come to the practice with many minds.
We don't have any single-minded determination.
Ajaan Mun in his last Dhamma talk referred to single-mindedness as being the essential element in the practice: the single-minded determination not to come back and let the defilements step all over you as before — the determination not to come back to suffering.
But that determination is something that we have to develop over time.
We don't come into the practice this way.
We start out with two or three minds about the whole thing.
This is what training the mind is all about: getting the mind to gather around that single-minded purpose, that single-minded intention.
This kind of training starts with the precepts.
They show us exactly where our minds are many-minded.
When you observe the precepts, you have to focus on your intentions all the time.
As you get to know your intentions, you begin to realize that the mind is like a committee.
Sometimes it's not just a committee — it's a whole crowd.
Even concentration is not the kind of single-mindedness we're talking about, but it's a basic prerequisite.
It's part of the training that takes you there.
We take one intention and run with it as far as we can in the face of the inevitable contrary intentions that counteract it.
In the beginning, the intention to stay with the breath, to stay with the meditation, is bound to be weak, and it's easy to get knocked off course.
But as you begin to feel at home here, at ease here, you grow more resistant to getting knocked off because you don't want to leave what you've got.
This feels like the right place to be.
Then you can start taking on the more deep-rooted intentions that come your way.
You take them apart to understand, “Why do they seem to have such force?” You overcome distraction, you overcome the defilements of the mind not by pushing them away and pretending they're not there, but by understanding them — and “understanding” means the ability to watch them from a good solid standpoint.
That's what concentration is for.
As things keep coming up, you realize, “This isn't really an intention I want to abide by, and that's not either.” So you cut them away, cut them away, until you run into the really big defilements, the really important ones.
Sometimes they'll knock you off base again, which is a sign that your concentration and insight need further development.
The path of practice is not a smooth straight line on a graph.
It has its ups and downs.
It has its drama.
As you learn in any writing class, one of the basic principles of story construction is that a story has to have setbacks in order to be interesting, in order to be realistic.
In the same way, the story of your practice of the Dhamma is bound to have setbacks — the difference being that you're not reading it, you're living it, and many times you'd rather not experience the interesting setbacks.
But keep reminding yourself of why you're here.
You're here for true happiness, genuine happiness, a happiness that's not going to let you down, a happiness that's going to be worth all the ups and downs that go into finding it.
When you look at all the other happinesses you gain from getting off the path, you see that they all let you down in one way or another.
This realization helps pull you back on the path, so that ultimately you can start cutting through the big distractions, the big defilements.
But whether the defilements are big or small, they require a similar practice, a similar technique: You see where there's stress, you see what you're doing to cause that stress, and you see that you don't have to do that — you can stop, you can let it go.
This is the basic pattern.
It's simply that with stronger powers of concentration, stronger mindfulness, stronger alertness, you can cut through things that you couldn't cut through before.
Over time, that single-minded determination not to let yourself suffer gets stronger and stronger, plays a larger and larger role in the committee discussions until finally it's the voice, the unanimous voice in the mind.
All the other voices have been eliminated.
Either that or they've been converted.
But even when there are still a few traitorous voices lurking in the background, remember that the important voice is this one, the one resolved not to stop short of genuine happiness.
Try to strengthen that voice as much as you can, because that's the voice that saw the Buddha through.
Look at all the setbacks he encountered in his practice: finding teachers and then realizing that they couldn't take him all the way; going as far as austerities could take him, and then realizing that that didn't go all the way either.
And then he was stuck.
He had tried all the alternatives that had been suggested in his culture, and they hadn't worked.
But he was determined not to give up.
That's what saw him through to Awakening.
Whatever there is of that determination in you is what's going to give you the strength to pick yourself up, dust yourself off, and keep on going.
So make sure that that determination stays nurtured, for that's what'll see you through.
Here are some of the many ways you can access ATI.
Thanks to the ingenuity and generosity of several ATI readers, offline versions of the website are available for several handheld mobile devices.
These free apps allow you to browse the website without the need of any kind of network connection.
To locate the app that is suitable to your device, you can search the iTunes Store, Windows Marketplace, or the Android Store, as appropriate.
Please understand that these are not “official” Access to Insight apps.
If you have any problems or questions about any of them, please contact their developers directly.
A quick glance through the pages of the Pali Text Society's publications catalog should be enough to convince anyone that there is much more to classical Pali literature than the Tipitaka alone.
Intermingled with the familiar Nikayas, Vinaya texts, and Abhidhamma are scores of titles with long, scarcely-pronounceable Pali names.
Although many western students of Buddhism may be unacquainted with these works, these books have for centuries played a crucial role in the development of Buddhist thought and practice across Asia and, ultimately, the West.
In fact, in some countries they are as deeply treasured as the suttas themselves.
But what are these ancient books, and what relevance do they have to the western student of Buddhism in the st century?
Although complete answers to these questions lie well beyond the range of my abilities, I hope that this short document will provide enough of a road map to help orient the interested student as he or she sets out to explore this vast corpus of important Buddhist literature.
This article is in two parts.
The Introduction provides historical background to the texts and offers some thoughts on why these texts are so valuable to the Theravada tradition.
The Field Guide is essentially an annotated table of contents, in which I borrow heavily from a variety of sources to describe each text.
The Tipitaka assumed its final form at the Third Buddhist Council and was first committed to writing sometime in the st c.
BCE.
Shortly thereafter Buddhist scholar-monks in Sri Lanka and southern India began to amass a body of secondary literature: commentaries on the Tipitaka itself, historical chronicles, textbooks, Pali grammars, articles by learned scholars of the past, and so on.
Most of these texts were written in Sinhala, the language of Sri Lanka, but because Pali — not Sinhala — was the lingua franca of Theravada, few Buddhist scholars outside Sri Lanka could study them.
It wasn't until the th c.
CE, when the Indian monk Buddhaghosa began the laborious task of collating the ancient Sinhala commentaries and translating them into Pali, that these books first became accessible to non-Sinhala speakers around the Buddhist world.
These commentaries offer meticulously detailed explanations and analyses — phrase-by-phrase and word-by-word — of the corresponding passages in the Tipitaka.
After Buddhaghosa the catalog of post-canonical Pali literature continued to grow with the addition of commentaries by both Buddhadatta and Dhammapala, and sub-commentaries by Dhammapala on several of Buddhaghosa's Atthakathas.
During this time, and in the centuries that followed, other writers prepared Pali translations of additional early Sinhala texts.
These ranged from poetic hymns in celebration of the Buddha, to chronicles tracing the first millennium of Buddhist history, to detailed Abhidhamma textbooks.
Most of the major post-canonical works, including the sub-commentaries, were completed by the th c.
Post-canonical Pali literature supplements the Tipitaka in several important ways.
First, the chronicles and commentaries provide a vital thread of temporal continuity that links us, via the persons and historical events of the intervening centuries, to the Tipitaka's world of ancient India.
A Tipitaka without this accompanying historical thread would forever be an isolated anachronism to us, its message lost in clouds of myth and fable, its pages left to gather dust in museum display cases alongside ancient Egyptian mummies.
These texts remind us that the Dhamma is not an artifact but a practice, and that we belong to a long line of seekers who have endeavored, through patient practice, to keep these teachings alive.
Second, almost everything we know today about the early years of Buddhism comes to us from these post-canonical books.
Though the archaeological evidence from that era is scant and the Tipitaka itself contains only a handful of passages describing events that followed the Buddha's death, the commentaries and chronicles contain a wealth of historical information with which we are able to partially reconstruct the early history of Buddhism.
The texts illuminate a host of important historical events and trends: how the Tipitaka came to be preserved orally; when it was first written down, and why; how the Tipitaka came close to extinction; how the Buddha's teachings spread across south Asia; how and when the various schools and factions within Buddhism arose; and so on.
But these are not just idle concerns for the amusement of academicians.
Any practitioner, of any century, stands to benefit from understanding how the early Buddhists lived, how they put the Buddha's teachings into practice, what challenges they faced; we stand to learn from those who have gone before.
And there are other lessons to be learned from history.
For example, knowing that it was the actions of just a few individuals that averted the extinction of the Tipitaka reminds us that it is ultimately up to individuals like ourselves to safeguard the teachings today.
Without the post-canonical texts important lessons like these — if not the Tipitaka itself — might have been lost forever to the mists of time.
Third, these texts — particularly the commentaries — help us make sense of the suttas and give us clues about their context that we might otherwise miss.
For example, the famous Satipatthana Sutta is popularly cited today as evidence that all one needs to achieve Awakening is a week or two of unrelenting mindfulness practice.
But the commentary suggests another viewpoint.
It explains that the Buddha's audience for this particular discourse were already well established in their practice of mindfulness and virtue.
They were not coming to meditation practice “cold” but were, in fact, unusually well prepared to receive this deep teaching — a point not apparent from the text of the sutta itself.
The commentary thus reminds us that there are some important fundamentals to be developed before one undertakes intensive meditation practice.
Finally, the commentaries often contain magnificent stories to illustrate and amplify upon points of Dhamma that are made in the suttas.
For example, Dhp takes on a much richer meaning in light of the commentary's background story — the famous parable of Kisagotami and the mustard seed.
Commentarial stories like this one offer valuable Dhamma teachings in their own right.
One might reasonably wonder: how can a collection of texts written a thousand years after the Buddha's death possibly represent his teachings reliably?
How can we be sure they aren't simply derivative works, colored by a host of irrelevant cultural accretions?
First of all, although many of these texts were indeed first written in Pali a thousand years after the Buddha, most Sinhala versions upon which they were based were written much earlier, having themselves been passed down via an ancient and reliable oral tradition.
But mustn't those early texts themselves be suspect, since they are based only on hearsay?
Perhaps, but by this argument we should reject the entire oral tradition — and hence the entire Tipitaka itself, which similarly emerged from an oral tradition long after the Buddha's death.
Surely that is taking things too far.
But what of the credentials of the commentators themselves: can their words be trusted?
In addition to living a monastic life immersed in Dhamma, the compilers of the commentaries possessed unimpeachable literary credentials: intimate acquaintance with the Tipitaka, mastery of the Pali and Sinhala languages, and expert skill in the art of careful scholarship.
We have no reason to doubt either their abilities or the sincerity of their intentions.
And what of their first-hand understanding of Dhamma: if the commentators were scholars first and foremost, would they have had sufficient meditative experience to write with authority on the subject of meditation?
This is more problematic.
Perhaps commentators like Buddhaghosa had enough time both for mastering meditation and for their impressive scholarly pursuits; we will never know.
But it is noteworthy that the most significant discrepancies between the Canon and its commentaries concern meditation — in particular, the relationship between concentration meditation and insight.
The question of the authority of the post-canonical texts thus remains a point of controversy within Theravada Buddhism.
It is important to remember that the ultimate function of the post-canonical texts is — like that of the Tipitaka itself — to assist the student in the quest for nibbana, the highest goal of Buddhist practice.
Concerns about authorship and authority recede when the texts are subjected to the same healthy skeptical attitude and empirical approach that should be familiar to every student of the suttas.
If a commentary sheds light on a murky corner of a sutta or helps us understand a subtle point of Vinaya or of Abhidhamma, or if the chronicles remind us that we hold the future history of Dhamma in our hands, then to that extent they help us clear the path ahead.
And if they can do even that much, then — no matter who wrote them and from whence they came — these texts will have demonstrated an authority beyond reproach.
In the following guide, I have arranged the most popular post-canonical titles thematically and by date.
Authors' names are followed by the date of authorship.
The authors of these texts were all monks, but for the sake of concision, I have dropped the honorific “Ven.” from their names.
Each non-commentarial title is followed by a brief description.
Many of these descriptions were lifted verbatim from other sources.
Page numbers from these sources are given in the braces.
Most of these titles have been published in romanized Pali by the Pali Text Society; the few for which English translations are available are noted with a dagger, followed by the translator, date of translation, and publisher.
For the purposes of this guide, the post-canonical texts may be grouped into the following categories:
Abhidhamma: In the discourses of the Pali Canon, this term simply means “higher Dhamma,” a systematic attempt to define the Buddha's teachings and understand their interrelationships.
A later collection of analytical treatises based on lists of categories drawn from the teachings in the discourses, added to the Canon several centuries after the Buddha's life.
Apāya: Realm of destitution.
One of the four lower realms of existence, in which beings suffer because of their bad kamma: hell, the realm of hungry shades, the realm of angry demons, and level of common animals.
In the Buddhist cosmology, a person reborn in any of these realms may stay there for long or short periods of time, but never for an eternity.
After the bad kamma has worked out, the person will return to the higher realms.
Arahant: A “worthy one” or “pure one;” a person whose mind is free of defilement and thus is not destined for further rebirth.
A title for the Buddha and the highest level of his noble disciples.
Āsava: Effluent; fermentation.
Four qualities — sensuality, views, becoming, and ignorance — that “flow out” of the mind and create the flood of the round of death and rebirth.
Bodhisatta: “A being for Awakening;” a term used to describe the Buddha before he actually become Buddha, from his first aspiration to Buddhahood until the time of his full Awakening.
Sanskrit form: Bodhisattva.
Brahmā: A deva inhabitant of the higher heavenly realms of form or formlessness.
Brahman: A member of the priestly caste, which claimed to be the highest caste in India, based on birth.
In a specifically Buddhist usage, “brahman” can also mean an Arahant, conveying the point that excellence is based not on birth or race, but on the qualities attained in the mind.
Deva: Literally, “shining one.” An inhabitant of the heavenly realms.
Dhamma: Event; a phenomenon in and of itself; mental quality; doctrine, teaching; nibbāna.
Sanskrit form: Dharma.
Hīnayāna: “Inferior Vehicle,” a pejorative term, coined by a group who called themselves followers of the Mahāyāna, the “Great Vehicle,” to denote the path of practice of those who aimed at Arahantship, rather than full Buddhahood.
Hīnayānists refused to recognize the later discourses, composed by the Mahāyānists, that claimed to contain teachings that the Buddha felt were too deep for his first generation of disciples, and which he thus secretly entrusted to underground serpents.
The Theravāda school of today is a descendent of the Hīnayāna.
Idappaccayatā: This/that conditionality.
This name for the causal principle the Buddha discovered on the night of his Awakening emphasizes the point that, for the purposes of ending suffering and stress, the processes of causality can be understood entirely in terms of conditions in the realm of direct experience, with no need to refer to forces operating outside of that realm.
Jhāna: Mental absorption.
A state of strong concentration focused on a single sensation or mental notion.
Kamma: Intentional act.
Sanskrit form: karma.
Maṇḍala: Microcosmic diagram, used as a power circle and object of contemplation in the rituals of Tantric Buddhism.
Māra: The personification of evil and temptation.
Nibbāna: Literally, the “unbinding” of the mind from passion, aversion, and delusion, and from the entire round of death and rebirth.
As this term also denotes the extinguishing of a fire, it carries connotations of stilling, cooling, and peace.
“Total nibbāna” in some contexts denotes the experience of Awakening; in others, the final passing away of an Arahant.
Sanskrit form: nirvāṇa.
Pali: The canon of texts preserved by the Theravāda school and, by extension, the language in which those texts are composed.
Pāṭimokkha: The basic code of monastic discipline, composed of rules for monks and for nuns.
Samaṇa: Contemplative.
Literally, a person who abandons the conventional obligations of social life in order to find a way of life more “in tune” with the ways of nature.
Saṃsāra: Transmigration; wandering through death and rebirth.
Saṅgha: On the conventional level, this term denotes the communities of Buddhist monks and nuns; on the ideal level, it denotes those followers of the Buddha, lay or ordained, who have attained at least stream-entry.
Stūpa: Originally, a tumulus or burial mound enshrining relics of a holy person — such as the Buddha — or objects associated with his life.
Over the centuries this has developed into the tall, spired monuments familiar in temples in Thailand, Sri Lanka, and Burma; and into the pagodas of China, Korea, and Japan.
Tādin: “Such,” an adjective to describe one who has attained the goal.
It indicates that the person's state is indefinable but not subject to change or influences of any sort.
Tathāgata: Literally, “one who has become authentic “ an epithet used in ancient India for a person who has attained the highest religious goal.
In Buddhism, it usually denotes the Buddha, although occasionally it also denotes any of his Arahant disciples.
Theravāda: The “Teachings of the Elders” — the only one of the early schools of Buddhism to have survived into the present; currently the dominant form of Buddhism in Thailand, Sri Lanka, and Burma.
Vinaya: The monastic discipline, whose rules and traditions comprise six volumes in printed text.
Although I have tried to be as consistent as possible in rendering Pali terms into English, there are a few cases where a single English term will not do justice to all the meanings of a Pali term.
The rule of one English equivalent per one Pali word may make for consistency, but any truly bilingual person knows that such a rule can create ludicrous distortions of meaning in translation.
Thus, while I have not consciously used one English term to translate two different Pali terms, there are cases where I have found it necessary to render a single Pali term with two or more English terms, depending on context.
Citta in some cases is rendered as mind, in others as intent.
Similarly, loka is rendered either as cosmos or world, manas as intellect or heart, āyatana as medium, dimension, or sphere, upādāna as clinging or sustenance, and dhamma as phenomenon, quality, or principle.
Also, with some of the Pali terms that are central to the teaching, I have chosen equivalents that do not follow general usage.
In the following list I have indicated these equivalents with asterisks; explanations for these choices are provided at the end of the list.
Fabrication: Saṅkhāra literally means “putting together,” and carries connotations of jerry-rigged artificiality.
It is applied to physical and to mental processes, as well as to the products of those processes.
Various English words have been suggested as renderings for saṅkhāra — such as “formation,” “determination,” “force,” and “construction” — but “fabrication,” in both of its senses, as the process of fabrication and the fabricated things that result, seems the best equivalent for capturing the connotations as well as the denotations of the term.
Frame of reference: The literal rendering of satipaṭṭhāna is “foundation of mindfulness,” “establishing of mindfulness,” or “application of mindfulness,” all of which require a great deal of explanation to make them intelligible in English.
However, the actual function of satipaṭṭhāna in practice is precisely that of the English idiom, frame of reference.
Although adopting this rendering requires some inconsistency in translating sati — using “reference” here, and “mindfulness” otherwise — this seems a small price to pay for instant intelligibility in an otherwise obscure term.
Inconstant: The usual rendering for anicca is “impermanent.” However, the antonym of the term, nicca, carries connotations of constancy and dependability; and as anicca is used to emphasize the point that conditioned phenomena cannot be depended on to provide true happiness, this seem a useful rendering for conveying this point.
Stress: The Pali term dukkha, which is traditionally translated in the commentaries as, “that which is hard to bear,” is notorious for having no truly adequate equivalent in English, but stress — in its basic sense as a strain on body or mind — seems as close as English can get.
In the Canon, dukkha applies both to physical and to mental phenomena, ranging from the intense stress of acute anguish or pain to the innate burdensomeness of even the subtlest mental or physical fabrications.
Unbinding: Because nibbāna is used to denote not only the Buddhist goal but also the extinguishing of a fire, it is usually rendered as “extinguishing” or, even worse, “extinction.” However, a study of ancient Indian views of the workings of fire will reveal that people of the Buddha's time felt that a fire, in going out, did not go out of existence but was simply freed from its agitation and attachment to its fuel.
Thus, when applied to the Buddhist goal, the primary connotation of nibbāna is one of release and liberation.
According to the commentaries, the literal meaning of the word nibbāna is “unbinding,” and as this is a rare case where the literal and contextual meanings of a term coincide, this seems to be the ideal English equivalent.
The following secondary sources were useful in placing the teachings of the Pali canon in their historical context, both social and intellectual:
The little book you are now holding in your hand grew from the faith and conviction of a Westerner of Jewish extraction, named Dr.
Philip, who came to study Buddhism in Thailand in, when I was staying on Phuket Island.
He practiced meditation with me for a full six months and seemed to develop not only peace of mind but also a great appreciation for Buddhism's worth.
Before returning to Hawaii, he asked me to jot down a few short, simple points for him to take and continue practicing, so I wrote down ten points.
Afterwards, I learned that he had had them printed abroad in a periodical whose name slips my mind at the moment.
The thought has occurred to me that this little book might be of use to those who are interested in practicing meditation, as it is small, easy to carry and read through quickly without taxing the brain.
So I have edited it, polishing the style and adding more points — in particular, point and onwards — in order to make the book more complete, fit to be a guide to the practice of meditation: showing the worth of meditation, the way to meditate, which ways of meditation are right, which are wrong, and in detail how to correct those things that should be corrected in the practice.
I hope this little book will be of use to those who are interested.
If anything written here deviates from the truth, I ask for all the responsibility to be placed on me alone, as I still lack experience in terms of education, practice, writing skills, and knowledge of many fields.
If knowledgeable people should come across this book, I would be very grateful if they would correct and enlighten me.
A basic tenet of the Buddha's teachings is that the mind and body work together, but that the body lies under the control of the mind.
The mind is what orders the body to do this or that activity, but when the body wears down, the mind is of necessity put to some hardship as well.
It doesn't lie under the control of the nervous system, although the brain can be regarded as a central office.
When the body dies, disintegrating in line with the nature of its various elements, the mind — if the necessary conditions of unawareness, craving, attachment, and kamma are still present — will have to reappear in this or that plane of existence and to continue experiencing suffering and stress.
In order to do away with unawareness, craving, attachment, and kamma — which are the chief instigators — we must first of all practice abandoning the elementary evils of word and deed by observing the principles of morality corresponding to our station in life.
In other words, lay people should observe the five precepts and, periodically, the eight precepts; novices should observe the ten or the twenty precepts; and monks, all precepts of the basic monastic code, together with the principles of pure livelihood, restraint of the senses, and proper use of the requisites of life as formulated by the Buddha.
As long as your precepts aren't being kept pure, your mind isn't yet ready for training.
Even if it is trained, its training won't lead to progress and development in the Dhamma, for its foundations aren't yet firm enough to advance along the Noble Path — and we can say that it hasn't yet reached the refuge of the Triple Gem.
A true Buddhist must before all else be firmly based in the Triple Gem and the principles of morality.
The Noble Eightfold Path and the three teachings at the heart of Buddhism — the avoidance of all evil, the perfection of skillfulness, and the purification the heart — have to be established first on the principles of morality.
This is why, for the Buddha's teachings, morality forms the beginning of the religious life.
The next step is to train the mind to develop concentration and absorption through the practice of tranquillity meditation.
Once the mind is adept at maintaining a steady focus, we can then develop clear insight based on an understanding of the Three Characteristics of inconstancy, stress, and not-self.
This will lead us to pure knowledge and vision of things as they actually are, and thus to release from all things detrimental and defiling.
For Buddhism, the true aim in developing concentration and absorption is to gather one's mental energies and make them steady and strong in a single point.
This then forms the basis for the knowledge and discernment capable of gaining true insight into all conditions of nature and eliminating all that is detrimental and defiling from the heart.
Thus, stillness of mind is developed not simply for other, external purposes, such as the various fields of science.
Instead, it's meant specifically for use in cleansing the heart of such defilements as the five Hindrances.
But when you have practiced to the point of proficiency, you can use your stillness of mind in any way you like, as long as that use isn't detrimental to yourself or to others.
In training the mind — which is a mental phenomenon — material objects such as chains and leashes are of no use.
The mind has to be trained by tutoring it, first by listening to the explanations of those who are already skilled, and then by being determined to practice in line with those explanations, basing your initial efforts on a sense of trust and conviction if your own independent explorations into cause and effect don't succeed.
By and large, people who start out by exploring cause and effect on their own don't reach their desired goal because they lack the proper approach.
They miss the true path, tending instead to be biased in favor of their own opinions.
To develop first a sense of trust in the individual giving the training and in the practices in which one is being trained until the mind is firm and unwavering, and then to begin exploring and figuring things out, in line with the way they really are: This is what will give satisfactory results.
This is because any beginning exploration of cause and effect is usually a matter of looking at things from the outside, following external influences — i.e., “This person says that… That person says this.” But to investigate and explore cause and effect exclusively within the bounds of the body — i.e., “What is this body of mine made of?
How does it come about so that its parts are complete and able to perform their functions well?
What is it to be used for?
What keeps it going?
Is its fate to develop or to deteriorate?
Is it really mine?” — and then, going on to mental phenomena — “Do greed, anger, delusion, love, hatred, and so forth, arise at the body or at the mind?
What do they come from?
When they arise, are they pleasant or stressful?” — to reason and explore things strictly internally in this way is, in and of itself, training the mind.
But if your stillness of mind isn't yet strong enough, don't go reasoning in line with the books you may have read or the things you may have heard other people say, because even though you may think things through, it won't lead you to the truth.
In other words, it won't lead you to a sense of dispassion and detachment.
So instead, explore and investigate things in line with the causes and effects that actually arise from the mind in the present.
The mind investigating and figuring things out in line with its own personal reasonings in this way will tend to focus exclusively on examining a single spot in a single object.
This is called one-pointed concentration.
This is a gathering of the mind's energies so that they have great strength, able to uproot attachments — mistaken assumptions — and to cleanse the mind so that it is, for the moment, bright and clear.
At the very least, you will experience peace — an extreme sense of well-being in body and mind — and perhaps knowledge of one sort or another: knowledge of a strange and striking sort, for it arises, not from mental imaginings, but from the causes and effects of the truth acting in the present, in a way that has never happened before.
Even if it is knowledge of something you may have suspected all along, only now is it your own, making your mind bright, driving away all doubt and uncertainty about matters that may have been occupying your thoughts.
You will say to yourself with a sense of deep satisfaction and relief, “So that's how it is!
Those whose sensitivities are dull, though, won't be convinced and delighted with their knowledge until someone else confirms it or they see teachings of the Buddha in books bearing witness to what they have learned.
This is in line with the fact that the Buddha's followers are of various sorts.
This type of knowledge — no matter how much or how wide-ranging it is — won't weigh on your nerves.
On the contrary, it's a form of calm and true well-being that will greatly brighten and refresh your nerves.
At the same time, it will refine your mind and manners in a way that will be very inspiring to others.
Whatever you say or do, you will do mindfully, with hardly any careless lapses.
Once this happens to you, you should then try to maintain all these traits and not grow careless or complacent.
These are all individual matters and won't occur in every case.
But at any rate, when you have trained the mind as explained above, even if you don't gain the results in full measure, you will still experience a striking sense of peace and well-being in proportion to the extent of your own individual practice.
You should then try to maintain this mental state.
Don't let feelings of greed or desire, disappointment or dejection arise.
Keep the mind neutral and continue practicing as I have explained from the beginning, with a sense of trust and conviction.
Be mindful, careful, and observant at every stage of your practice, and you will then meet with the results you hope for.
If training the mind in line with points and doesn't produce results, then gather your awareness and focus it firmly with a single object or mental image as its target.
For example, focus on an aspect of the body — the bones or one of its internal organs — so as to see its objectionable nature.
Or you may simply focus the mind on bare awareness itself — for the mind is something that can't be seen with the physical eyes.
If it isn't focused on a single spot, you won't know whether or not it's present.
The mind is like the wind: If the wind doesn't come into contact with anything, you won't know whether or not it's there.
So it is with the mind.
If a new trainee doesn't have a target for the mind, he or she won't really be able to catch hold of the mind.
But please don't choose anything outside of the body as your target.
Make your target — i.e., the object of the mind — an aspect of the body, as already mentioned.
And when you take aim, focus on a single object which seems right for you.
Don't be greedy, first taking some of this and then a little of that.
In focusing, examine the object in line with the principles of the foundations of mindfulness.
In other words, sort out the body's various aspects until you can see, “This isn't me.
This isn't myself.
There are two ways of doing the focused examination that prompts this realization:
b.
When focused exclusively on the target, at the same time keep yourself aware that, “This is the target of the mind.
This is the mind examining.
This is mindfulness, i.e., the act of remembering to keep the target in mind.
This is discernment, which sees into the truth of the object under consideration.
Both methods work, although method is suited for beginners and those whose sensitivities are not yet developed, while method is suited for those who are sensitive and experienced.
Both methods, though, if you practice them diligently, give rise to the same results, namely concentration and discernment.
In training the mind as explained above, no matter which method you choose, please don't let yourself wonder about whether or not you're going to attain concentration and discernment.
And put aside all desires based on the various rumors and reports that get passed around by word of mouth.
Just follow correctly the method mentioned in point, and you'll be doing fine.
At the same time, observe the approach you've taken to see how you brought the mind to the object, how you maintained mindfulness, and what happened to the mind as a result.
If acting in that particular manner made the mind open and bright, keep at it until you're adept and able to do it all the time.
But if the results weren't like that, i.e., just the opposite, then without delay use your powers of observation, in the way already mentioned, to make adjustments and corrections.
In observing how the mind behaves under training, some people will be able to observe their state of mind while the mind is still in that state; others, only after the mind has withdrawn from that state and stopped still for a moment.
Both ways work.
They are simply a matter of individual temperament.
But if you don't use your powers of observation at all, progress in mental training will be hard to achieve and — even if you do happen to achieve it — hard to maintain.
While you are training the mind, one thing — strange and striking — may occur without your intending it.
That is, the mind will withdraw from its external objects and gather into a single whole, letting go of all labels and attachments dealing with past or future.
There will be just bare awareness paired with its preoccupation in the present.
This is something with no sense of “inside” or “outside” — a condition whose features are peculiar to the mind itself.
It is as if everything has undergone a revolution.
This is the mind coming to its own level: the bhavanga.
In this moment, everything has reference only to the mind.
Even though life may still be going on, the mind when it reaches this level lets go of all attachments to the body, and goes inward to experience nothing but its own object, all by itself.
This is termed bhava-citta, the mind on its own level.
The mind on its own level still has a refined version of the five khandhas complete within it, and so can still experience birth and states of becoming, and give rise to continued births in the future.
Reaching this state is somewhat like dozing off and dreaming.
The difference depends on how much alertness there is.
Those who are collected and perceptive will — when the event first occurs — be aware of what is happening and what they are experiencing, and so won't get excited or upset.
Those who are gullible and not very mindful, though, will be just like a person who dozes off and dreams.
When they come to, they will tend to be startled or get misled by the visions they may happen to see.
But when they have trained themselves until they are skilled at giving rise to this state often, their sense of mindfulness will improve and their various visions will go away.
Gradually they will gain insight until they see into natural conditions as they actually are.
The phenomenon discussed in point — even though it doesn't give rise to discernment capable of exploring into the patterns of cause and effect in a wide-ranging way — is still a preliminary stage in training the mind.
It can suppress the five Hindrances and at the same time give rise to a sense of peace and well-being in the present.
If it is properly developed so that it doesn't deteriorate, it will lead to a good rebirth in the future, in line with one's karmic background.
Incidentally, when visions and signs of various sorts appear, it's usually in the mental moment we are discussing here.
But this doesn't mean that when the mind reaches this stage there will have to be visions or signs in every case.
With some people and at some times, they will occur.
With others and at other times, they won't.
This is another matter of individual temperament — and of other factors as well.
To be perfectly truthful, when it comes to the question of visions and signs that arise in the course of meditation, you can say that they're good only in the case of meditators who are quick-witted and astute enough to see through them; who — when they see visions — don't fall for them or latch onto them as being the self or as really belonging to themselves.
They see the visions simply as visions, enough to use them as tools or a temporary dwelling place for the mind, and then let them go.
As for people who aren't especially mindful or alert — and who are gullible to boot — when a vision arises they will get extremely excited and may even become so deluded as to lose touch with reality because they believe the vision to something real and true.

In addition, people who have trained their minds to this stage are usually stubborn and bull-headed in their opinions, due to their strength of mind.
When they think about something, they tend to see it from one side only.
They won't easily give any heed to the opinions of others, because they believe that their own opinions are perfectly reasonable and trustworthy — even though their opinions are actually self-serving and very much lacking in reason, and can easily pervert the way they see things.
But at any rate, whether or not visions and signs arise, they're not really what you want here, because aside from being defilements, clouding your discernment, they are also obstacles to the development of clear insight.
The aim of training the mind is to let go of the five Hindrances and then to examine the khandhas so that they become clear, to see them as they actually are to the point where you grow disenchanted with them, loosen your passion and fascination with them, and let them go, never to enter into and take hold of them again.
When you have trained the mind to be firmly enough established in absorption and concentration to suppress the five Hindrances, then you should work at developing clear insight.
Actually, clear insight may arise at the same time you are working on tranquillity.
In other words, discernment may brighten so as to know and see clearly the truth that all conditioned things that arise are bound to disintegrate and pass away.
They can't last.
They aren't “me” or “myself,” but are simply natural conditions acting on their own.
When this sort of knowledge arises, it will make the mind become disenchanted and dispassionate towards to all conditioned things.
The mind will dwell entirely in a state of matured and chastened dispassion, no matter what it sees or hears, and no matter where.
This is called clear insight occurring together with tranquillity.
If, however, insight doesn't arise in this way, then when you have practiced tranquillity meditation until the mind is firmly established, then you can select either a part of the body — such as the bones or the intestines — or else a topic that's occupying your thoughts at the moment, and examine it so as to see that all the things which the mind fastens onto as stable and real, as leading to true happiness, actually fall under the sway of the Three Characteristics.
The way we assume things, saying, “This is this, and that is that,” in line with our imaginings, is not in any way true.
All conditioned things simply arise from their causes: unawareness, craving, attachment, and kamma.
When their causes are exhausted, they disband of their own accord.
No one forces them to disband.
Even the body we are living in is able to survive only in dependence on causes, such as breath and food.
When these things are exhausted, the body has no meaning at all.
When you examine things in this way, using the power of a fully concentrated mind, you will reach the goal of the mind's training.
The light of discernment will arise, complete with the insight into cause and effect you have discovered totally on your own.
This is something that arises not from appropriating labels or theories remembered from other people, but from realizing the causes and effects entirely within your own heart.
The mind will never again be deluded into becoming attached, passionate, pleased, or displeased with any conditioned thing at all.
Incidentally, we can say that if the mind hasn't truly and clearly seen into the object of its meditation, then it hasn't really yet gathered itself together and settled down.
But the reason why the training of the mind isn't called insight meditation before this point is because discernment is still weak in terms of cause and effect, and lacks circumspection.
To summarize: The purification of our words and deeds has to begin with training in moral virtue.
The purification of the mind has to begin with training in tranquillity — concentration and absorption — until the mind has enough strength to suppress the five Hindrances.
When the mind is adept at concentration and absorption, able to enter, withdraw, and stay in place at will, then discernment — the light of knowledge seeing into the truth of all natural conditions, together with the causes for their arising and passing away — will arise in a remarkable way.
This sort of knowledge may arise only to certain individuals in certain circumstances.
But in any case, those who have trained their minds to this level should realize that a mind that has reached this point is fit to be trained to give rise to clear insight.
They should thus take any aspect of the body or any mental phenomenon that occupies their thoughts, and examine it from the standpoint of the Three Characteristics, as explained above.
Then they too will develop the light of insight, seeing clearly into all conditioned things — and be able to uproot attachments to physical and mental phenomena of every sort.
Even though the mind is intangible, it has influence over the body and all things in the world.
It is capable of bringing everything in the world under its power.
Still, it isn't so vicious or savage as to lack all sense of good and evil.
When a person of good intentions trains the mind to enter correctly into the path of the Buddha's teachings as explained above, it will be tractable and quick to learn, developing the wisdom to bring the body, which may be behaving without any principles, back into line.
In addition, it can cleanse itself to be bright and clean, free from defilements, able to realize by itself truths that are subtle and profound, and to bring dazzling light into this world so dark with blindness.
This is because the true substance of the mind has been, from the very beginning, something bright and clear.
But because of the preoccupations that have seeped into it and clouded it, the brightness of the mind has been temporarily darkened, making the world dark as well.
If the mind were originally dark, there probably wouldn't be anyone able to cleanse it to the point where it could give rise to the light of discernment at all.
So whether the world is to be dark or bright, whether it is to experience well-being or suffering, depends on the mind of each individual.
We as individuals should thus first train our own minds well, and then train the minds of others.
The world will then be free from turmoil.
The visions and signs that arise from the practice of meditation are a strange and uncanny affair.
They may delude a gullible person of weak judgment into being so convinced of their truth as to lose touch with reality.
For this reason, those who practice meditation should be cautious, examining and reflecting on them carefully, as I will now explain.
The signs arising from meditation are of two sorts: visions and signs.
In other cases, visions of divine beings or of hell and hungry shades may sometimes appear.
b.
As for signs: When the mind gathers, as already mentioned, a whispering voice may appear.
It may be the voice of a person we respect, telling us to examine a particular truth, or to beware of a coming event; or else it may be the voice of an enemy who means to harm us, appearing to us just before he/she will come to do us harm — which shows how the mental currents of different individuals impinge on one another.
On the other hand, the same sort of thing may occur involving a person who means us well.
Sometimes an unidentified voice may come to tell a truth that's thought-provoking and worthy of consideration, which meditators in general call the teachings and warnings of the Dhamma, or abhiñña.
It's not the case that visions and signs will occur to all meditators.
With some people, no matter how refined a level their minds attain, visions and signs won't appear.
With others, the mind may gather in a flash for a brief moment, and all sorts of visions and signs will appear.
This depends on the individual's temperament.
With people who are gullible and don't give much thought to what is reasonable, visions and signs tend to occur quickly and grow all out of bounds, to the point where they can lose their bearings.
So treat them with caution.
Visions and signs arise from the power of mundane jhana and are sustained by attachment and mental concocting.
They thus fall under the Three Characteristics: They're inconstant — they can't last; they're stressful; and they're not-self — i.e., they aren't yours or anyone else's.
They are conditions that do nothing but constantly arise and fall away in their own way at all times.
Examine them to see their true nature in this way and then let them go.
Don't be deluded into latching onto visions and signs, which are the results.
Instead, work at the cause, jhana, so that you become more and more adept to the point where you can attain it at will.
The visions and signs will then take care of themselves.
Also, learn to see the drawbacks of visions and signs.
Once they arise and we get fooled into latching onto them, they will cause our jhana to deteriorate, just as sound waves are an obstacle to a person trying to quiet the mind and explore phenomena that are subtle and deep, or as waves in clear water prevent us from seeing our reflection on the water's surface.
The visions and signs that appear to a meditator just beginning to attain jhana tend to be extraordinary and amazing.
The acts of mental grasping and concocting will tend to fasten tightly to them, and they will be indelibly impressed on one's inner eye.
If the above methods for curing and removing these visions and signs don't produce results, then try not to have the mind enter jhana.
In other words, don't put your mind to it, don't let the mind be still, don't take a liking to the visions or signs.
Sleep and eat as much as you like, perform heavy tasks until the body is very tired, think of objects that will give rise to defilements, such as beautiful sights or sounds that will give rise to desire — and once the mind withdraws from its absorption, the visions and signs will disappear of their own accord.
If the student meditator can't solve the problem with these methods, then the teacher should try to help by using the same sort of approach.
The quickest and most effective way is to find an issue that will provoke the person attached to visions and signs to extreme anger.
The visions and signs will immediately disappear.
The basis for giving rise to knowledge into the Dhamma is threshold concentration, which is of two sorts:
b.
The mind becomes more and more refined until it is able to let go and withdraw from the object it is considering, so that the object disappears.
This is called fixed penetration.
There is full mindfulness and alertness to a sense of emptiness, not grasping after or fastening onto anything at all, simply partaking of its own exclusive object.
When the mind comes out of this state and is again considering the Dhamma — objects, cause and effect — this is threshold concentration coming out of fixed penetration.
Both sorts of threshold concentration can form a good basis for insight into particular truths and various events, which is different from the knowledge arising from the visions and signs mentioned above, because visions and signs arise from mundane jhana, whereas the knowledge we are discussing here, even though it arises from mundane concentration, gives more dependable results.
And if your concentration becomes transcendent, it will do away, step by step, with all the effluents of the mind.
In short, the knowledge arising from visions and signs, and the knowledge arising from threshold concentration, differ in terms both of origin and of quality.
An item deserving a little more explanation here is the term fixed penetration.
Fixed penetration is a superior human attainment.
By and large, people who reach fixed penetration tend to focus on the in-and-out breath as their object of meditation.
As they focus on the breath and come to pay attention to its arising and falling away, or just to its falling away, the mind gradually becomes more and more refined until, step by step, it lets go of all its preoccupations and gathers together to become fixed, as explained above.
The stilling of the in-and-out breath is what indicates fixed penetration.
In some instances it is called fixed jhana because it comes from the act of becoming absorbed in the breath.
It is called fixed concentration because even though there is no in-and-out breath when the mind reaches that point, mindfulness is still absolutely full.
When you're in this state you can't examine anything, because the mind is totally uninvolved with anything at all.
Only when the mind comes out of this state and enters threshold concentration can you begin examining things again.
You will then see clearly into all the truths that the Buddha said are to be known, and into other matters as well.
There will be no visions and signs, as mentioned above, but the knowledge here will be based on cause and effect, complete with analogies and similes that will utterly erase all doubt.
In some cases, meditators will be considering objects of meditation other than the in-and-out breath, and yet will still be able to reach fixed penetration in the same way as those who practice mindfulness of breathing.
When the mind gathers to a point where there is no more in-and-out breathing, that's fixed penetration.
This, at any rate, is my opinion on the matter.
Meditators shouldn't take my opinion as their criterion, because the thoughts and opinions of people in this world — even when we see the same things under the same conditions in the same place — can formulate different names for, and reach different understandings about, those same things, and thus give rise to endless disputes and arguments.
Simply let us all work with our own objects of meditation so as to reach fixed penetration as discussed above and then — with a fair mind free from bias — compare what we experience with what has been formulated in the various texts.
Our knowledge will then be paccattam — arising exclusively from within ourselves.
That is what I would like to see in this regard.
All transcendent phenomena are rooted in mundane phenomena.
The Wings to Awakening, which are classified entirely as transcendent, have to begin first with mental and physical phenomena, i.e., this mundane body and mind.
Visions, signs, and the knowledge resulting from jhana are obstacles to the one-eyed — those who are simply developing jhana — but can provoke insight for those with two eyes, i.e., those who are developing discernment along with concentration.
Every sword and ax is made with both a sharp and a dull edge, each with its own different uses, but a person who confuses those uses, aside from getting nowhere with the sword or ax, may actually harm himself or the work he is doing.
Insight and the defilements of insight come from one and the same basis.
When people without discernment consider things wrongly, they will give rise to the defilements of insight; but when they consider things rightly, using the proper approach, the same things will become true insight.
Mundane phenomena — when we clearly see and know them and their causes for what they are, and when seeing their drawbacks we grow disenchanted with them, not being deluded into latching onto them — then turn into Dhamma.
But when we get taken in by them and are unwilling to let them go… It's not the case that the world will stay the way it is forever.
The world of the Brahmas may degenerate into the world of the Devas; the world of the Devas, into the human world; the human world, into the lower realms.
Just as liquids tend to seek out low-lying places, so it is easy for the minds of living beings to seek out what's low — namely, evil.
Even though the practice of meditation is a self-revolution, you must be willing to risk your life.
At the very least, if you don't succeed, you should threaten yourself with self-exile.
Those who don't make such a vow can look forward only to being a slave to others — the defilements — throughout time.
The daily schedule at Metta Forest Monastery includes a group interview in the late afternoon and a chanting session followed by a group meditation period later in the evening.
The Dhamma talks included in this volume were given during the evening meditation sessions, and in many cases covered issues raised at the interviews — either in the questions asked or lurking behind the questions.
Often these issues touched on a variety of topics on a variety of different levels in the practice.
This explains the range of topics covered in individual talks.
I have edited the talks with an eye to making them readable while at the same time trying to preserve some of the flavor of the spoken word.
In a few instances I have added passages or rearranged the talks to make the treatment of specific topics more coherent and complete, but for the most part I have kept the editing to a minimum.
Don't expect polished essays.
The people listening to these talks were familiar with the meditation instructions included in “Method “ in Keeping the Breath in Mind by Ajaan Lee Dhammadharo; and my own essay, “A Guided Meditation.” If you are not familiar with these instructions, you might want to read through them before reading the talks in this book.
Also, further Dhamma talks are available at dhammatalks.org.
As with the previous volumes in this series, I would like to thank Bok Lim Kim for making the recording of these talks possible.
She, more than anyone else, is responsible for overcoming my initial reluctance to have the talks recorded.
I would also like to thank the following people for transcribing the talks and/or helping to edit the transcriptions: John Bullitt, Kathy Forsythe, Roger Fox, Gareth Fysh-Foskett, Richard Heiman, Linda Knudsen, Addie Onsanit, Nate Osgood, Xian Quan Osgood, Malcolm Schaeffer, Walter Schwidetzky, Atthaññu Bhikkhu, Balaggo Bhikkhu, Gunaddho Bhikkhu, Khematto Bhikkhu, and Vijjakaro Bhikkhu.
May they all be happy.
Right concentration forms the heart of the path.
The other factors of the path serve two functions.
One is to get you into concentration; the other is to make sure you don't get stuck there.
In other words, concentration on its own is a state of becoming that's useful on the path.
Even though you eventually want to go beyond all states of becoming, if you don't first master this state of becoming you'll be wandering around in other states of becoming where it would be hard to see what's going on in the mind.
As the Buddha said, when your mind is concentrated you can see the four noble truths as they actually come to be.
When it's not concentrated, you can't see these things clearly.
Non-concentration, he says, is a miserable path, leading nowhere useful at all.
So concentration is the essential factor.
Only when the mind is stable and still can it really see what's going on inside.
To get into right concentration, you need the other path factors: right view all the way up through right mindfulness.
Right view starts with conviction in the principle of kamma, that there are good and bad actions that give good and bad results — not only in this lifetime but also in future lifetimes — and that there are people who really know these things from direct experience.
It's not just a theory.
What's interesting here is that when the Buddha presents this introduction to his teaching on kamma, he focuses on two types of good actions to stress their importance: gratitude to your parents and generosity.
These things really do have merit; they really do have value.
The fact that your parents gave birth to you was not just a set of impersonal processes that just happened to happen.
It's not the case that you don't owe any debt of gratitude to your parents for having gone through all the pain of giving birth to you and then raising you once you were born.
There really is a personal debt there.
They made choices, sometimes difficult choices, that allowed for your survival.
Generosity is one of the ways you pay off that debt, and it's also one of the valuable ways you interact well with other beings, benefiting both them and yourself in the process.
The Buddha's attitude towards generosity is instructive.
He's very clear on the fact that when he's telling you what you should do, the “should” is based on a condition.
After all, the Buddha didn't create you.
You might resist his shoulds with the thought, “Who is he to tell me what to do?
Years back I was sitting in on a course on the Metta Sutta.
The first line in the Metta Sutta starts: “This is what should be done by one who aims at a state of peace.” As the teacher started out with that line, a hand immediately shot up.
A man sitting in the class said, “I thought Buddhism didn't have any shoulds.” And they spent the rest of the morning going back and forth over that one issue.
Actually, Buddhism does have a lot of shoulds.
You look at the Dhammapada and you'll see that it's full of shoulds.
But each should is based on a condition, as in the first line of the Metta Sutta: “This is what should be done by one who aims at a state of peace.” The Buddha doesn't tell you that you have to aim at a state of peace, or that you have to want true happiness.
That's your choice.
But if that is what you want, this is what you've got to do.
The nature of cause and effect is such that these are the practices you have to follow.
The Buddha isn't saying, “Well, this is what worked for me and it may work for you, but I'm not sure, so you have to find your own way.” That's not what he would say.
He'd say, “This is what works if you're aiming at this goal.” And it's up to you to decide whether you want to aim at that goal.
If you do, then you've got to do it this way.
There's a passage where King Pasenadi comes to visit the Buddha, and his first question is, “Where should a gift be given?” The Buddha responds, “Wherever you feel inspired.” In other words, there are no shoulds in this area aside from your own sense of inspiration — where you feel the gift would be well used or where you just want to give.
There are no restraints placed on the act of generosity at all.
But then the King follows up with another question: “Where, when a gift is given, does it bear great fruit?” And the Buddha says, “That's a different question.” This is where the principle of cause and effect kicks in, placing its imperatives.
You have to give to someone whose mind is pure or to an institution where the people are being trained to make their minds pure — i.e., the Sangha — if you want your gift to bear great fruit.
So there are shoulds in the Buddha's teachings, but they're based on the principle of what actually works for the purpose of true happiness.
As for what you want to do with your life, there's no imposition there at all.
It's your choice.
But once you appreciate the principle of generosity and see that it is really worthwhile, you've made the choice to get started on the path.
As the Buddha said, it's impossible for someone who is stingy to attain jhana, to attain any of the noble attainments.
So you start with the principle that generosity is good and that your actions matter.
When you dig a little bit deeper into the principle of action, you realize that your intentions are what matter in your actions.
This insight leads to the next step in the path: right resolve.
You want to avoid intentions that would make it difficult to get the mind into concentration, so you want to learn how to go beyond being resolved on sensual passion, being resolved on ill will, being resolved on harmfulness — because all these things stir up the mind and interfere with its settling down.
There's a passage in the Canon where Prince Jayasena, walking for exercise through a forest one day, comes across a novice staying in a little wilderness hut.
He says to the novice, “I hear that when the monks really apply themselves, they can get their minds into a state of one-pointedness.
Is that true?” And the novice says, “Yes.” And the prince says, “Well, explain it to me.” And the novice, who probably knew the prince's reputation, says, “You wouldn't understand.” The prince responds, “Well, I just might.” So the novice replies, “In that case, I'll explain it to you, but if you don't understand, don't harass me with more questions, okay?” So the prince agrees.
But when the novice explains it to him, the prince says, “That's impossible.
Nobody can get their minds concentrated like that.” He gets up and leaves.
The novice then goes to see the Buddha and tells him what happened.
And the Buddha says, “What did you expect?
That person is immersed in sensual passion, on fire with sensual fever, being chewed up by his sensual thoughts: How would he understand anything like this — something that has to be attained through renunciation?
This is why the Buddha has you put sensual passion aside, for it prevents the mind from getting concentrated.
It prevents you from even conceiving of the possibility of getting concentrated.
Similarly with ill will and harmfulness: If you hold ill will for somebody, if you want to be harmful to that person, then as soon as the mind settles down to be quiet in the present moment, those thoughts are sure to flare up.
They obsess you.
So the Buddha has you resolve to put them aside.
When you want to act on those right resolves, this is where right action, right speech, and right livelihood come in.
Some people find the Buddha's precepts too hard to follow; other people say they're not inclusive enough.
The ones who say that they're not inclusive enough insist that we have to be more responsible.
If there's a precept against killing, you shouldn't be able to eat meat.
If there's a precept against stealing, you shouldn't abuse the earth's resources.
They make the precepts bigger and bigger and bigger all the time to the point where they become impossible, too big to be fully put into practice.
Or in some cases it is possible to practice them fully, but the Buddha said it wasn't necessary to go that far.
We're working on the precepts that help the mind get concentrated, which is why they go only as far as they do.
In other words, you don't want to act on an unskillful intention and you don't want to tell other people to act on those intentions.
But as far as breaches of the precepts where you don't know what's happening or it's not intentional, those don't count.
After all, the intention is the important part of concentration, and you want to train the mind to master its intentions in areas where you have some control over your life and over your actions.
Once you've created this context for the practice, you're in a better position to follow the parts of the path that deal directly with right concentration.
First there's right effort, which means generating the desire to get rid of unskillful qualities of the mind — i.e., the things that get in the way of concentration, like the hindrances — and then to give rise to skillful qualities, like the factors for Awakening.
This is an area where desire is a useful part of the path.
It gives you the energy you need to work on the mind and to realize that you've got to make choices.
There are skillful and unskillful things arising in the mind, but right view — in terms of the principle of kamma — reminds you that the unskillful ones will lead to bad results, and the skillful ones to good results.
So you can't just sit there totally passive as you watch them arise and pass away, because that doesn't lead to concentration.
You've got to foster the good qualities and abandon the unskillful ones.
In the next step of the path, the Buddha surrounds right effort with right mindfulness — “surrounding” it in the sense that you add two additional qualities to right effort.
As the text says, you bring three qualities to bear on your contemplation: You want to be ardent, alert, and mindful.
The ardency there is right effort.
The mindfulness means that you keep your frame of reference in mind — as when we're keeping the breath in mind right now.
The alertness means seeing what's happening in the present moment, seeing if you really are with the breath, if the mind is settling down well with the breath, and catching it when you've forgotten.
You're trying to establish a frame of reference here because these four frames of reference — the body in and of itself, feelings in and of themselves, the mind in and of itself, and mental qualities in and of themselves — are the themes or topics of right concentration.
Mindfulness practice and concentration practice go hand in hand on the Buddha's path.
Then, as you're trying to get the mind to settle down with its frame of reference, you have to start evaluating it to see what works and what doesn't work.
As your frame of reference gets more and more solid, you actually move into the factors of jhana.
So that's what you should do to get into jhana — if you want it.
Again, the Buddha doesn't say you have to do it, but if you want it, this is what you should do.
Jhana on its own doesn't lead to the end of suffering.
There are a lot of passages describing people who attain different levels of jhana and are able to maintain them, but if they don't go beyond that, they end up getting reborn in the various Brahma worlds after they die.
Then when they fall from there, who knows where they're going to land?
One sutta shows people falling from the Brahma worlds and doing really stupid things.
They've been so blissed out for so long that they've forgotten that their actions can carry consequences, so they act in wanton and careless ways.
This is why, once the mind is firmly in jhana, you've got to start applying right view again.
Only this time it's right view in terms of the four noble truths: looking for the stress in your activities and seeing where it's coming from in your mind.
In other words, you look at mental events and mental states simply in terms of cause and effect, what's skillful and what's unskillful.
Those are the basic categories underlying the four noble truths.
So as we're meditating here, remind yourself that the concentration is what we're after, what we're focusing on doing right here.
Everything else on the path is aimed either at getting us here or else at making sure that once we are here we make the best use of the opportunity really to see things as they happen.
In particular, we want to see this issue of how the mind is creating all this unnecessary stress all the time and what can be done to stop it.
Of course, if you only want to follow part of the path, that's up to you.
Remember, the Buddha never forced us to do anything.
But if you want the best results, this is what you've got to do.
A recurrent theme in the teachings of the forest ajaans is that all the steps of the practice are of a piece.
In other words, having attained Awakening, they don't say anything disparaging about the early steps in the practice, that they're only elementary and that you have to drop them to move on to the more important stuff.
As Luang Pu Dune put it, “The Dhamma is one thing clear through.” Or as Ajaan Maha Boowa once said, one of the realizations that comes when you hit Awakening is that everything is the same teaching, starting from generosity and gratitude, all the way up through Awakening.
There are different levels of subtlety, but it's all the same principle.
And you could see this fact in their lives.
Even having attained Awakening, they didn't just sit around and say, now that their own job was done, they didn't have to do anything further.
They were very industrious people.
Ajaan Fuang, even when he was sick, would get out every evening and do some chore around the monastery.
When we were doing construction work, he wasn't up to doing any of the heavy jobs but at the very least he would go out and pick up the thrown-away nails.
He was very frugal, very meticulous.
So it's important to keep this principle in mind: that the practice here is a practice of generosity, of gratitude, of goodwill and kindness, all the way through.
Look at the Buddha's teachings on the four noble truths.
What are they motivated by if not goodwill?
The desire for an end of suffering, the desire for happiness that doesn't place any burdens on anyone else: What is this if not compassion?
And look at his teaching career.
Wherever there was anyone ready to learn the Dhamma, he would go there.
In those days, that meant going on foot.
He traveled all over northern India on foot just to teach.
Even the very last day of his life, he knew there was one more person he had to teach before he entered total nibbana.
So, even though he was suffering from dysentery, he walked all the way to Kusinara — a full day's walk — because there was one more person, Subhadda, he had to teach.
What this means in our practice is that we should value all levels of the practice.
It's not that you put in time with the elementary levels and then drop them as you move on to the higher ones.
You simply add more and more levels of subtlety to your practice, more and more levels of generosity, goodwill, and gratitude.
The Buddha started his teaching with very basic mundane right view: the teaching on kamma.
And he introduced kamma with two teachings: one on gratitude, one on generosity.
He started out by saying that generosity is real.
The gifts you give actually benefit you and the other person.
This is something of real value.
And you can think of the whole practice — all the way through the abandoning of greed, anger, and delusion — as an act of generosity, an act of goodwill.
The less greed, anger, and delusion you have, the better off not only you are, but also everybody else.
Think of all the suffering you've inflicted not only on yourself but also on other people through your anger, your greed, your delusion.
You give these things up not only for your own benefit but for the benefit of the people around you as well.
Then there's the teaching on gratitude.
The Buddha focused on the gratitude we owe our parents — that the good they've done for us is something of value.
We really are in their debt.
All that your mother went through just to give birth to you: Think about that.
In Thailand it's traditional for there to be a chant on this topic before an ordination.
They hire somebody to come in, and he chants for a couple hours about all the hardships your parents went through to raise you, as a way of reminding you of your debt to them.
In Thailand, there's a very strong sense that you ordain as an act of gratitude to your parents.
You dedicate the merit to them.
So right before the ordination they remind you of exactly how big that debt is.
If the chant lasts for four hours, three and a half of the hours are about the pains your mother went through being pregnant with you.
You're fortunate she didn't abort you — she could have done that.
You're fortunate your parents didn't abandon you after you were born — they could have done that as well.
They went to all that trouble to raise you, to teach you how to speak, how to sit, how to walk.
There's a huge debt of gratitude you owe them.
As the Buddha said, gratitude is a sign of a good person.
If you don't appreciate the good that other people have done for you, it's very unlikely that you're going to do good for anybody at all.
Ajaan Fuang, if he noticed that people didn't have gratitude for their parents, didn't want to associate with them.
If people can't appreciate their parents, what are they going to appreciate?
Gratitude is essential to every form of goodness.
And it carries you all the way through.
This is why we're generous; this is why we practice the precepts, why we're harmless.
We meditate to train the mind so that it's harmless.
Not only harmless, but also more energetic.
If you're not weighing yourself down with greed, anger, and delusion, you have a lot more energy to help other people.
And even though there's that popular conception of Theravada as a selfish path, as someone who had studied Buddhism both in Japan and in Thailand once said, you won't find that Thai people are any more selfish than Japanese people.
In fact, it can often be the other way around.
The example of the Buddha in the Pali Canon is not a selfish example.
Sariputta and Moggallana were extremely helpful not only in teaching other monks but also in teaching laypeople.
And look at all the rules in the Vinaya for the monks to look after the monastery.
Basically, the monastery is pure generosity.
If you were to open your eyes right now and look around, everything you'd see would be somebody's gift.
And as for the monks, the longer you live as a monk, the more and more the very bones of your body are the results of somebody's generosity.
They say that after seven years all the cells in your body have been changed, so once a monk has hit seven years, his whole body is somebody else's gift.
So you've got to use it wisely, generously, in the same spirit with which it was given to you.
And as for the monastery around you, you're trained to look after the place.
The Buddha encouraged the monks to be clean, to be careful in the way they use things, to put a lot of energy into looking after the results of other peoples' generosity.
In the forest tradition, there's a very strong tradition of keeping alive the protocols that the Buddha gives in the Khandhakas.
There's a Vinaya textbook that the monks in Thailand are supposed to study, written by a city monk back at the beginning of the twentieth century, and he cut back on a lot of these rules.
This textbook was never popular with the forest tradition.
They preferred an older book that went into a lot of detail, particularly on the protocols, most of which deal with looking after the monastery: when you come to a monastery, how you're supposed to set things in order; when you leave, how you're supposed to leave it in good shape; and while you're there, how you keep it clean.
A lot of energy should go into keeping the monastery in good shape because a lot of energy went into giving the monastery in the first place.
So the Buddha never discouraged people from being generous.
He never discouraged people from being energetic.
Ajaan Suwat liked to make this point again and again: There's no place where the Buddha encourages laziness.
Even though he teaches contentment, it's contentment with the material things you already have, so that you can devote yourself to building on that, and especially so that you can devote yourself to the training of the mind.
But contentment doesn't mean that if you find the place dirty you leave it dirty.
Contentment means that if you just have a little shack, you're content with your shack, but you make it a clean shack.
You keep it spic and span, in good repair.
Utthana-sampada is the word in Pali.
It means that you take initiative, you're energetic.
And this translates into your meditation.
The sort of person who's energetic in keeping the place clean tends to be more energetic in meditating.
Once when I'd just arrived in Bangkok on some visa business, I was in the midst of cleaning my room, sweeping it, wiping it down.
A Western monk who'd just returned from Burma knew that I might be there, so he came around and sure enough I had just come in.
But as soon as he saw me wiping down the floor, he said, “You Thai monks!
All you do is spend your time cleaning up.
Over in Burma, we have other people who do that for us.” And as you looked at the quality of his meditation, you could see that he was used to having other people doing things for him.
His meditation had gotten slack and sloppy as well.
This is a strong tradition in the forest tradition, starting from the time of Ajaan Mun.
He was very diligent in keeping his place clean.
His place in the forest wasn't just some hovel.
Everything was neatly swept, everything in its proper place.
As Ajaan Fuang said, even the rags for wiping feet at the base of the stairs to his little hut: If they were torn, he would sew them; if they were dirty, he would wash them.
And this quality of being energetic and meticulous translated into his meditation as well.
So don't think that the elementary practices are just for people on an elementary level.
They're for everybody.
That's how everybody gets started and everybody keeps going.
You build on them.
You don't abandon them.
You build on them.
You include more and more subtle levels.
But the basic levels stay there as well, until, as the texts say, generosity is no longer something you do for your own sake or for the sake of other people.
It becomes just a natural expression of the mind.
All the steps of the practice become a natural expression of the mind once it's fully trained.
Reflect back on the passage we chanted just now: “May I be happy.
May all living beings be happy.
May all beings be freed from their suffering.
May those who are happy not be deprived of their happiness.” These are good thoughts to think.
They put the mind in a good place, a place where you're not wishing ill to anyone at all.
You're wishing them well.
And you're wishing well for yourself, too.
Sometimes people find that hard, but if you can't wish for your own true happiness, what are you wishing for?
The desire for true happiness is nothing to feel ashamed about.
In fact, the whole teaching of the Dhamma is based on that desire, recognizing that if you follow through with your desire for true happiness intelligently, if you really are careful about how you go about finding it, you'll actually find it and won't harm anyone in the process.
It's a desire that should be respected.
The world, however, teaches us not to respect it.
People will tell you, “Forget about true lasting happiness; just go for the thrill of purchase, the thrill of a relationship in the beginning stages.
Go for the quick and easy, but also the quick to fade.
As for true happiness, forget about it.” That's what they say.
But the message of the Dhamma is that if you don't wish for true happiness, what are you wishing for?
This is the one assumption that the Buddha makes about human beings.
Sometimes you read that the Buddha assumes that everybody is basically good at heart, but you can't find that in the texts.
What he does assume is that everyone wants happiness.
The problem is that we go about it in confused and misinformed ways.
But if we can find a path to true happiness that really works, everyone would be happy because true happiness is something that doesn't harm anyone at all.
Your true happiness doesn't conflict with anyone else's true happiness.
Keep that in mind.
This is why we chant this passage every day.
They say that Ajaan Mun spread thoughts of goodwill to all living beings three times a day: in the morning when he woke up, in the afternoon when he woke up from his nap, and at night before he went to sleep.
In this way, the desire for goodwill, the desire for true happiness, framed his practice.
So it's good to establish it as a frame for your practice as well.
It helps remind you of why you're here.
There will be barren patches in your meditation, patches where things don't seem to be going the way you want them to.
When you hit these patches, remember that you're doing this for true happiness, something that goes beyond the ordinary quick fix.
That helps get you over the rough spots.
So always keep these thoughts in mind.
Remember that goodwill and compassion are qualities you can't separate from the Buddha's teachings on wisdom and discernment.
You have to understand how to go about true happiness if your desire for happiness is actually going to get results.
What this comes down to is training the mind.
All the Buddha's teachings — on generosity, virtue, and meditation, or on virtue, concentration, and discernment — are aimed at training the mind because the mind is what shapes our experience of pleasure and pain, happiness and suffering.
A well-trained mind can deal with any situation in life and not have to suffer at all.
What does it mean to train the mind?
It means to look at what you're doing and to see what the results are.
Then you learn to refrain from things that cause suffering, no matter how much you like doing them, and to do the things that lead to true happiness, whether you like doing them or not.
Some of the things that lead to true happiness are really pleasant to do.
Others require effort.
They go against the grain.
You have to learn not to let your resistance to the effort get in the way.
You need a clear sense of cause and effect.
That's what discernment is all about: seeing what really works in terms of cause and effect, what doesn't really work, and then adjusting your actions accordingly.
We're here to train the mind to be its own best friend.
One very visceral way of doing this is to focus on your breath.
When the Buddha analyzes the way you cause yourself suffering, very early on in the list he says that if you're ignorant of what's really going to work, then even the way you breathe can lead to suffering.
So let's focus on the way we breathe.
Where do you sense the breath right now?
When you close your eyes, what sensations let you know that now the breath is coming in, now the breath is going out?
Focus on them.
They can be in any part of the body at all, for “breath” here means the flow of energy.
Sometimes you'll sense the breath as the feeling of the air moving in and out of the nose, but it can also be the rise and fall of the abdomen, the rise and fall of the chest.
Sometimes those movements send ripples out to different parts of the body, so that you can sense even in your arms or your legs whether you're breathing in or breathing out.
So wherever you find it convenient to focus, focus on the breath sensations there.
Then allow them to be comfortable.
In other words, don't put too much pressure on them as you focus on them.
At the same time, notice how long an in-breath feels good.
At what point does the in-breath start feeling uncomfortable?
Just breathe in as long as is comfortable, and then allow yourself to breathe out.
Breathe out only as long as is comfortable, and then breathe back in again.
Try to sensitize yourself to what feels good right now in terms of the breathing.
Think of the whole body breathing in, the whole body breathing out, with every cell in your body bathed with breath energy.
When you think of the breath in that way, what kind of breathing feels good?
You might find, as you start thinking in that way, that the breath gets deeper.
If that feels gratifying, fine.
If it feels uncomfortable, change the rhythm.
Just think, “What would be more comfortable right now?” and see what the body does in response.
Think of yourself as hovering around the breath.
You're not squeezing it out; you're not forcing it in; you're just staying very close to it, watching it, letting it adjust in whatever way feels good.
Give it some space to adjust.
Sometimes you might want to nudge it a little bit and see what longer breathing would feel like, or what shorter breathing would feel like, faster, slower, deeper, more shallow, and then notice what happens.
At first you may not sense much difference, but after a while you begin to get more sensitive to the breathing process.
You become more of a connoisseur of your own breathing.
You gain a sense of what kind of breathing really feels good for the body right now.
The more satisfying the breath is, the easier you will find it to stay with the breathing.
If the mind wanders off, just bring it right back to the breath.
If it wanders off again, bring it back again.
Ask yourself, “Is the breath as comfortable as it could be?” and see what you need to change.
But don't browbeat yourself over the fact that the mind is wandering.
Don't get upset or discouraged.
It's natural that it'll wander, for that's what it's been doing for so long.
You've probably heard the word samsara.
It means wandering around.
That's what the mind is used to doing.
It's used to wandering.
When you try to get it to stay in one place like this, it's going to resist.
It's like training a puppy.
You want it to come, and it seems to want to do everything else but come.
But if you're firm with it, at the same time rewarding it when it does come, after a while it'll come willingly.
So have some confidence in yourself.
Remind yourself that this is a really useful skill to have, because we cause ourselves so much unnecessary stress and strain simply because we breathe in unskillful and oblivious ways.
If you can master just this one skill, you change the way you relate to your body, you change the way you relate to the present moment, you have a greater reserve of wellbeing to draw on in any situation.
If they threw you in prison, you could just sit there and breathe really comfortably.
They wouldn't have to know.
So in that way, you're not adding suffering to the pain already there.
So, you have an hour to get acquainted with the breath, to try to see what kind of breathing feels good right now, and then right now, right now.
The needs of the body will change over time, so you have to be on top of them.
Notice how they change.
Make it a game.
Don't be too grim about the meditation.
After all, we're here trying to find pleasure in the breath.
So treat it as a sport, something you want to learn how to enjoy.
As with any sport, it takes time, it takes training, it takes discipline.
But there's also the element of enjoyment that comes when you're doing it well.
It feels good.
It feels right.
After all, the breath is the process in the body that you experience most directly.
You sense your body through the movement of the breath.
If the breath were not moving, of course you'd be dead.
But if you could somehow be alive while the breath was not moving, even then you wouldn't sense the body at all.
In fact, there are stages of concentration where the breath energy stops.
The oxygen coming in through the pores of the skin is enough to keep you going because the brain is very still and isn't using much oxygen at that time.
When that happens, you find that the shape of the body begins to dissolve.
The breath is that essential to how you know your body.
In addition, the breath is also instrumental in how you move your body, by means of the breath energy running through the nerves and along the blood vessels.
So here you are sensitizing yourself to your most direct experience of the body, and you're learning to relate to the body in a way that's comfortable.
At the same time, you find that the breath is a mirror for the mind.
A sudden emotion comes into the mind, and the breath will change.
That's one of the reasons we sometimes feel that we've got to get our anger out of our system: The way the breath has changed in response to the anger is uncomfortable.
So you can undo that effect.
As soon as you sense a change in the breath, you can consciously breathe in a way that dissolves away whatever tension has built up in the breathing.
That weakens the power of the anger.
This is another way the breath can be your friend.
It's like having a friend who reminds you when you get angry that it's not in your best interest to be angry.
It can soothe you when you're angry, put you in a better mood.
It can be your friend when you're sick; it can be your friend when you're suffering from fear or any other strong, unpleasant emotion.
The breath can be there as your friend, but only if you learn how to befriend it.
Get to know it.
As with any friendship, it takes time.
You can't just walk in and shake hands and say “Hi, you're my breath, I'm in charge of you, let's go.” The breath doesn't respond well to that, just as a person wouldn't respond well to some stranger coming up and saying that.
After all, you've been a stranger to your breath for who knows how long.
It has been there for you, but you haven't been there for it.
You haven't paid it much attention.
You don't really know it well.
So here's your opportunity to get on good terms with the breath.
When you have your breath as your friend, you have a friend wherever you go, in any situation.
As the Buddha said, to really get to know someone requires time and being very observant.
So.
Here you've got a whole hour of time.
It's up to you to be observant and to see how well you can get to know the breath.
To show some goodwill for the breath in a very direct and visceral way like this is to show goodwill for yourself, the wish that's expressed in that chant: “May I be happy.” Here's one way to act on it.
At the same time, you cause no harm to anyone else.
The way you breathe doesn't directly affect anyone else at all.
Indirectly, if you breathe in unskillful ways and uncomfortable ways, you're going to get irritable and take it out on other people.
But if you're breathing comfortably, there's no irritation to take out on anybody at all.
In this way, the fact that you're working with your breath is a way of showing goodwill for other people too.
So try to make the most of this opportunity.
As you're sitting here, there are a lot of things you could focus on in the present moment.
You could focus on the sound of the crickets.
You could focus on the sound of the bombing practice off to the west, the temperature of the air — all kinds of things.
The question is: Which thing are you going to focus on that's going to deliver the best results for the mind?
This is where the breath comes in.
It's something that's here all the time — coming in, going out, staying still — giving us our sense of the body.
It's a place where we can settle down, something we can stay in touch with at all times — if we're mindful.
It's important to understand what mindfulness is: It's the act of keeping something in mind.
The word sati is related to the verb sarati, which means to remember.
You focus your attention on one particular thing and then keep reminding yourself to stay there.
This is how concentration is developed.
But concentration is not just a question of memory.
To be a part of the path, it has to be alert as well.
We're not trying to put ourselves into a trance.
We simply want to stay focused on an aspect of the present moment that's going to be helpful.
Mindfulness is what reminds us to stay at that present sensation or present occurrence; alertness is what allows us to see what's going on.
The third quality we add is persistence or ardency.
Keep with it.
No matter how loud the bombs or incessant the crickets, you're not going to send your attention after them.
You know they're there.
You're not going to deny that they're there, but they're simply not places you want to go.
You're going to keep tabs on this one thing: the breath coming in, going out.
If you prefer a meditation word, you can stay with buddho.
If you want, you can focus on the parts of the body, like the bones, skin, your liver — anything that keeps you grounded here in the present moment in a way that helps mindfulness and alertness to grow, to develop.
Your ability to stick with these qualities is what's going to help them grow.
When you notice yourself wandering off, ardency means that you bring the mind right back.
If it wanders off again, bring it back again.
You don't give up.
You don't get discouraged.
While you're with the breath, ardency means that you try to be as sensitive as possible to the sensation of the breathing.
The more consistent your sensitivity, the more refined the sense of comfort you'll derive from the breathing.
As Ajaan Lee says, when you're mindful and alert like this, mindfulness and alertness change into the factors of jhana, or steady absorption.
We often hear that mindfulness practice and concentration practice are two different things, but the Buddha never taught them that way.
He said that right mindfulness leads naturally to right concentration.
In all of the descriptions of the path — such as the noble eightfold path, the five faculties, the seven factors for awakening — right mindfulness always precedes right concentration.
So don't think of them as separate practices; think of them as qualities of the mind that help each other along.
Mindfulness turns into directed thought as it shades into the steadiness of concentration.
Once concentration gets more solid, your mindfulness gets a lot steadier.
When you reach the fourth jhana, the Buddha says, that's where mindfulness becomes pure.
The word jhana is related to a verb jhayati, which is a homonym for a verb to burn — to burn in a steady way, like the flame of this candle at the front of the room.
Pali has different verbs for the word to burn.
There's the burning of an ordinary fire that flickers and flares, but then there's jhayati, which describes the burning of an oil lamp — steady, so steady you can read by it.
And that's the whole purpose of getting the mind to stay steadily here in the present moment: so that you can read what's going on in the mind.
In the beginning, the steadiness requires some protection, just like the candle here.
If the wind outside started to flare up more than it is right now, we'd have to put a glass globe around the candle to keep the flame steady.
That glass globe is directed thought and evaluation.
Keep reminding yourself to come back — stay with the breath, stay with the breath, stay with the breath — consistently.
And then evaluation, which grows out of alertness, looks at the breath: Is this a comfortable place to stay?
What do you need to adjust?
Do you need to move the focus of your attention?
Do you need to adjust the breath?
Do you need to adjust some of the concepts in your mind about what you're doing?
If the breath is too subtle to follow, can you stay simply with the sense of the body sitting here?
There are lots of things to evaluate.
This is where the element of discernment or insight comes into the practice.
Again, we often hear that jhana practice is a tranquility practice and insight practice is something else, but again, the Buddha didn't divide things up that way.
He said that you need tranquility and insight in order to get the mind to become steady like this.
The insight lies in understanding what problems you have to face and how you can get around them; the tranquility lies in the element of steadily, calmly watching things.
So you use directed thought and evaluation to protect what you've got.
As a sense of ease and fullness develops in the present moment, you've got to protect it even more.
Stick with it, work at whatever you need to do to maintain that sense of wellbeing — learning when you're trying too hard to make it better, learning when you're not trying hard enough to notice what can be done to relax things even further, make them even more gratifying and pleasurable.
That's all a function of insight: watching things, evaluating things, figuring out which causes to change to make the effects just right.
This is the element of insight, the element of discernment that we're working on while we're on the path.
We develop it in simple practices like this: learning what's just right in terms of the breath.
That's the middleness of our middle way right now.
The word middleness also applies to the appropriateness of what we're doing.
Sometimes we have to be very protective of what we're doing when there are lots of external distractions, or when the mind itself seems to be rambunctious and hard to control.
We have to make an extra effort during times like that.
At other times, the effort doesn't have to be quite so strong: All you need to do is just watch, keep tabs on things, and they seem to behave on their own.
If you mess with them too much, they're going to rebel, so you have to be very sensitive to what's needed, what's going on.
This is part of the middleness of the middle way: the appropriateness of what you're doing.
As you develop this sense of appropriateness, this sense of “just right,” you're developing discernment in the midst of concentration practice.
The Buddha said there's no discernment without jhana, no jhana without discernment.
The two qualities help each other along.
So if you find yourself slipping off the breath, slipping off the topic of your meditation, remember these things.
When things get balanced, you don't have to think about them that much.
Once you develop a sense of balance, you just maintain that balance in your practice.
It'll be sub-verbal.
It's like sailing a boat.
When you get on the boat for your first sailing lessons and you're told to steer the boat to the left, sometimes you flip it over because you steer too hard.
Or you're told to steer to the right, and again you flip it over in the other direction because you're steering too hard.
But after a while you begin to get a sense of exactly how much pressure you have to apply to the rudder, and you get so that you hardly even think about it.
It becomes an intuitive sense.
You're alert to it — you have to be alert — but you don't have to verbalize it.
This is what we're working toward in the practice: gaining that intuitive sense of what's just right for right now — when you have to apply a little bit more pressure, when you have to hold back a little bit — so that you don't need all these concepts.
As the meditation gets more and more intuitive, as the mind gets more and more firmly settled right here, you can actually drop the directed thought and evaluation and just plow right into the sensation of the breath or whatever your object is.
When you get there, you begin to wonder, “Why did you ever think you had to do anything more in the meditation than just be right here?” That's what it seems like from that perspective.
So watch out that you don't get complacent, because you can lose this.
It's simply a matter of having that intuitive sense of where your spot is and how to stay there.
This is how to develop a foundation for the mind: You use mindfulness and alertness, you use your discernment to get the mind concentrated, and then once it's concentrated you use that concentration to discern things even more clearly.
All the factors of the path help one another, and they all come together.
There's a unity to the path.
Even though it has eight folds, it's one piece of paper.
So if these thoughts are helpful when you find yourself drifting off or losing balance, keep them in mind.
There will come a point where you don't have to consciously remember them.
All you'll have to do is be very watchful, very alert, making sure you're not complacent, and you can drop the concepts.
Dropping them doesn't mean you'll forget them.
They'll be there to pick up again when you need them, but you don't have to carry them around all the time.
They're like a magic set of tools: They float right within reach.
You don't have to carry them.
Or like your shadow: It goes everywhere you go, but you don't have to carry it with you.
It places no weight on you at all.
I once heard of a tennis pro whose game had gone into a slump.
He tried everything he could imagine to get his game back: fired his trainer, got another trainer, tried different rackets.
Then one day he realized he'd forgotten the number one lesson in tennis: Keep your eye on the ball.
The same sort of thing often happens in meditation.
You start out with a very simple process and then it gradually grows more complicated.
After a while you forget the first principles: i.e., stay with your breath.
So try to spend the whole hour staying with the breath, no matter what.
Be really sensitive to how the breath feels, and to what you're doing to the breath.
The breath is a fabrication, which means that there's an intentional element in the way you breathe.
You want to be very sensitive to that, to what you're adding to the breathing process.
Try to do it skillfully.
As long as you're going to add an intentional element, add something good.
Your relation to the breath is something very intimate, very private.
Often it's hard to talk about how the breath feels, because the breath feels like the breath feels.
It doesn't quite feel like anything else.
So we talk about it indirectly, in terms of metaphors and similes, realizing that our descriptions are approximate.
When you hear something in the instructions, learn to translate it in such a way that it relates to what's happening in your direct experience.
And keep your inner experience primary.
For example, I've noticed that one of the best ways of getting the breath energy in the body to be comfortable and full is not to put any effort into the out-breath at all.
What effort there may be goes into the in-breath.
As for breathing out, you don't need to help the body.
It's going to breathe out on its own.
When you don't force it out, that allows the breath energy to fill up in the body.
This is hard to put precisely into words.
It's not like you're trying to stuff the breath in, but because you don't squeeze it out, then each time you breathe in, breathe in, breathe in, and allow the sense of fullness to run along your nerves, the nerves begin to glow.
Again, this doesn't fit easily into words, for it's not a visible glow.
But there's a feeling of glow-like energy filling the nerves, radiating out from them, radiating out of the blood vessels.
You try to breathe in such a way that maintains that sense of radiance.
The body then feels a lot more comfortable, the blood can flow freely through all the different parts of the body.
It feels really good.
So try to relate that to what you're doing right now and see if you get results.
If you don't, try experimenting a little bit on your own to see which way of breathing really does feel good in the body.
When you do this, it sets up the issue of pleasure and pain, cause and effect, right from the start.
That's what the Buddha's teachings are all about: Why do we suffer from pain?
How can we use the pleasure of a concentrated mind to lead us to even greater ease and wellbeing?
Often it's best not to analyze the issue too much in advance.
You can read the books on jhana or vipassana, and then try to impose the words on your experience.
And of course your understanding of the words comes from where?
It comes from ignorance.
So that takes you away from your direct experience, away from this very private matter of why the mind is causing itself suffering, how your intentions are causing suffering.
So instead, try to approach the meditation from a standpoint that's more familiar: How do you feel right now?
Which ways of thinking about the breath, which ways of letting the body breathe, lead to pain and a sense of constriction?
Which ones lead to a greater sense of openness and ease?
Start from your immediate experience and branch out from there.
That's the way Ajaan Fuang used to teach meditation.
He'd have people get in touch with their breath.
He'd use a few analogies and similes, and then he'd listen to the words they used to describe their own experience of meditation, when the breath felt “sticky,” when it felt “solid” or “dense,” when it felt “full.” And then he'd use their vocabulary to teach them further.
For instance, one of his students would talk about the “delicious breath,” so Ajaan Fuang would start his instructions to that student by saying, “Get in touch with the delicious breath.
In this way, the meditation is not something imposed from outside.
It's something that develops from your own inner sensitivity.
Then somewhat after the fact, after you've had some direct experience with it, you can read the books and begin to relate their terms to what you've experienced.
Even then, though, it's always best to take those terms and use them as post-it notes, for as you develop your inner experience further, your understanding of the inner terrain is going to change.
You may have to move some of those notes around.
This is a much more trustworthy way of approaching the meditation than trying to fit the mind into a mold based on your understanding of what somebody else has written or said.
If you do that, it takes you away from your direct experience, from your own sensitivity.
And there's always that element of doubt: Does this really qualify as what they're talking about?
Whereas if you approach it from the other direction — “If I do it this way, how does it feel?” — you know better than anybody else how it feels.
Now, your sensitivity may not be refined enough to see subtle levels of stress, but there's no way you're going to see those subtle levels until you deal with the blatant ones first.
And it's a natural matter that over time, as you get more familiar with the breath, more familiar with the way the body feels from the inside, your powers of sensitivity are going to develop.
You pick up things that you didn't notice before, both in the breath and in the way the mind relates to the breath.
This way you keep the meditation very direct.
It's your own private matter.
Ajaan Fuang once said that he didn't want his students discussing their meditation with anybody else aside from him.
When you talk to other people, they have their ideas, they have their preconceived notions.
Maybe they know something about meditation, maybe they're very wise, but that in itself is a questionable thing.
You don't know how experienced they are, how much they really know.
Secondly, you may start taking their words and trying to fit them on your own experience.
If you don't have enough inner experience, it's very easy to get messed up.
Even when they simply ask you a question, the way they frame the question already embodies a certain viewpoint.
And that viewpoint may be questionable.
So keep your meditation a private affair.
After all, the suffering you're causing yourself is a private affair, something nobody else can see.
Even when we live together day in and day out, each of us is making a lot of decisions that nobody else here will know.
We may see some of the outside effects, but the actual experience of suffering — your suffering, your pain: You're the only person who can feel it.
And you're the only person who can know which little decisions you make from moment to moment to moment.
That's what you want to learn how to observe.
So try to develop your inner sensitivity as much as you can, so that you can make sure your decisions are going in the right direction.
The intentional element here is to try to minimize suffering as much as possible.
This is why breath meditation relates directly to the sublime attitudes we chant every evening.
This is your front row seat on the question of how to bring about more happiness.
“May all living beings be happy”: All living beings are out there, but you're one of them, too, in here.
This is the being you have the most direct impact on.
So if you learn how to be kind to yourself in the way you breathe, it's going to be easier to be kind to other people.
If you see that there's some stress and suffering inside, have some compassion for yourself.
Try to breathe in a way, try to relate to the breath in a way, that minimizes that stress.
When you learn compassion for yourself inside like this, it's a lot easier to feel compassion for others outside.
The same with empathetic joy and equanimity: When the breath is going well, appreciate it.
Enjoy it.
As for the uncomfortable things in the breath that you can't change, you've just got to watch them for a while.
The word for equanimity — upekkha — actually relates to that quality of just watching, looking on.
In other words, you see that this may not yet be the time to do anything, but you never know when the situation will change, so you just keep watching, watching, watching, until you detect things.
And even here the breath helps a lot.
It gives you a foundation from which to watch.
As you're staying with the breath, you're in the present moment.
Simply being with the sensation of breathing helps pull you out of a lot of your thoughts, that ongoing committee discussion in the mind.
If you're with the breath, you're like an outside observer on the committee meeting.
You're not necessarily pushed around by the voices in the committee.
In that way, you're in a better position to see, “Is this the time to exercise goodwill?
Or is it more the time to exercise equanimity, compassion, or empathetic joy?
So these two types of meditation — the meditation that develops the sublime attitudes and the meditation on the breath — really come together like this.
The breath gives you practice in the proper attitudes and puts you in a position where you can see which of these four attitudes is appropriate at any one time, always taking your inner experience of stress — something you're most intimately related to — as your touchstone.
That way, your knowledge is not just words.
There's a direct experience underlying it all.
As your skill is being developed, you're growing more sensitive to what that experience is, and more honest with yourself about where you're still causing yourself stress.
Your experience of stress is your only proof of whether the meditation is working, and even then it's reliable only if you're honest with yourself.
You may want to look for an outside authority to verify things for you, but that leads to the question of who out there is awakened, who is not.
You may have some ideas, you may have some intuitions, but you can't really prove anything about what's going on outside.
Your only real proof is what lies inside.
And until you make the inner proof as clear and as honest as possible, you'll have no proof about anything at all.
So this inner sensitivity, something totally private to you, is what you're trying to develop here.
That's where you start; that's what helps keep you on the path.
And of course, this sensitivity doesn't necessarily have to be here only while you're sitting and meditating.
Try to keep in touch throughout the day with your inner experience of what you're doing and what stress is or is not arising as a result of what you're doing, the little choices you make inside.
Try to carry that awareness around as much as you can, in all your activities.
Make that your first priority.
When you act, act from that point.
When you speak, speak from that point.
When you think, think from that point.
In that way the meditation becomes timeless.
Ajaan Fuang once made the comment that our lives are often chopped up into little times: time to eat, time to talk, time to go here, go there, do this, do that.
Instead of having more time when life has more times like this, everything gets chopped up into little tiny pieces and becomes less.
But when you make this inner sensitivity as continuous as possible — you breathe in, let the body breathe out if it wants to, but you don't have to force the breath out; breathe in again, breathe in again — that inner sense of wellbeing can grow.
Then as you carry it through the day, it becomes solid.
It may take time to focus on it, time to get a sense of what helps it, what doesn't help it.
But the sense of inner refreshment that comes: You want that to be as continuous as possible.
The more continuous it is, the more strength it develops.
The more resilient it becomes, the more you can rely on it, even in very difficult situations.
This involves unlearning some old habits.
Society often teaches us to give all our attention to things outside.
What happens of course is that we lose touch with our own inner sensitivity.
We become strangers to ourselves.
So reintroduce yourself to this inner sensitivity.
Open up this area of your awareness, and be as sensitive to it as possible.
In that way the meditation will grow in an organic way — not from words imposed outside, or ideas imposed from how you understand the words outside, but from a direct experience of what's actually going on inside.
What works and what doesn't work, what's skillful, what's not, where there's stress, where there is no stress: These are the questions that only you can observe and only you can know.
And they can be answered only by a very honest sensitivity that's always willing to learn more.
Ajaan Lee sometimes talks about not being aware of the breath in the whole body.
He sometimes recommends focusing on one spot and just staying right there.
Some people, he says, find it too distracting to deal with the breath sensations in the different parts of the body.
As you're thinking about your hand, your arm, or your leg, other thoughts related to hands, arms, and legs might sneak in and carry you off someplace else.
He compares this to starting an orchard.
If you plant your whole orchard all at once, using all your resources, you may find that you've overextended yourself.
You're faced with a drought for several days, the trees all die, and you end up with nothing.
In cases like that, it's smarter to start out with one little area and to focus on planting just that, caring for that.
Say you plant a mango tree.
You care for it for a couple years, and then when they give their first crop of mangoes, you collect the seeds and plant them.
The same with the second crop.
That way you gradually enlarge your orchard until you fill your whole plot of land.
So if you find that focusing on the breath here and there in the beginning of the meditation gets you distracted, just focus down on one spot and stay right there.
Tell yourself: You're not going anywhere else.
You may want to use the word buddho to help keep things under control.
But just use one spot in the body: It might be right between your eyes, the middle of the forehead, wherever you feel is closest to the center of your awareness in the body.
You stare right down, right there.
The one warning is that you not tighten up around that spot.
Think of the area as being open and free flowing.
In other words, the blood can flow in, the blood can flow out.
Energy flows in, energy flows out, but you are not moving.
You're going to stay right here.
No matter what happens, you're going to stay right in this one little spot.
That can gather the mind together and keep it there.
You're not trying to take care of too many things at once.
Other people find that one spot is not enough.
In that case, you might want to try two spots.
There was an old schoolteacher I knew who had come to meditation late in life.
After she retired, she went to stay at Wat Asokaram.
She found that the easiest way to get her mind down — she told me once, well before I was ordained — was to focus on two spots: one right between the eyes, the other at the base of the spine.
She'd try to keep both spots going at once.
In her case, she said, it was like connecting the two poles of a battery.
As soon as the two poles were connected, things lit up inside.
That enabled her to get the mind into concentration really quickly.
What all this shows is that concentration is an individual matter.
Different people find that their minds settle down in different ways.
And there's room in the practice of concentration for you to experiment and see what works for you.
There's no one ideal method that's going to suit everybody, and the whole purpose of the concentration is for the mind to settle down with something it likes, something it finds interesting.
The iddhipada, or bases for success, basically say that concentration will succeed by stressing one of four different qualities.
For some people, it's fired by desire.
For others, persistence, the energy of stick-to-it-ividness.
Other people find that concentration works best when it's based on the quality of intent, when you dive in and give it your entire attention.
Other people find that analysis works.
It's by analyzing the breath, by making it interesting — and finding that it really is interesting, the way the breath energy flows in the body, how it can be very different from what you might expect, by playing with it, by experimenting with it — that you find yourself absorbed in the present.
Not because you're forcing yourself to be there, but simply because you get interested, just as you can get absorbed, say, in painting a picture.
As a child I used to find that drawing would have me absorbed for hours.
I'd be working on a drawing and I'd have no sense of the passage of time.
It'd be time for dinner before I knew it.
And the same can work in your meditation as you learn to analyze the breath.
You pull yourself into the present moment not with any force, but simply through the power of your curiosity.
Some people, though, find that analyzing things like this gets them distracted: You start thinking about the breath, and then you start thinking about your stomach, and then about the doctor who looked after your stomach, and all of a sudden you find yourself thirty miles away.
In that case your meditation may succeed based either on the desire to stay here, or the effort to stay focused on just one spot, or being intent on one spot, or on two spots, whatever you find works.
So there's room for experimentation; there's room for you to learn what works for you.
Keep this in mind as you practice.
Sometimes you've got to use your ingenuity.
As Ajaan Fuang once noted, all the elements in really well-balanced concentration are there in the seven steps in Ajaan Lee's instructions.
The problem is simply that different people will find different steps to be the ones that really pull them in.
Once they've been pulled in by one of the steps, they've got to balance out the other ones.
Ajaan Lee talks about finding your one spot in the body and staying focused there, but some people miss this step because it comes after the steps that tell you to explore the breath throughout the body.
But the steps don't have to be done in sequential order.
Think of them as different component factors of concentration.
You may have to start out with just the one spot.
Once that's established, you can develop the other components.
In other words, you stay focused in your one spot and then see how it's related to the area right around it.
Then radiating out from there, you look at the areas right around that, until you've got the whole body in your frame of awareness, even though you're still really staring down on the one spot.
You can't help but be aware of the body.
In other words, you don't totally blank out the rest of the body.
After all, the purpose of concentration is to be aware all around as a basis for discernment.
Discernment can arise only when you're aware all around.
If your concentration is the sort that blocks things out, it's not going to be a good basis for discernment.
You won't see unexpected connections.
You'll have huge blind spots in your range of awareness where all kinds of things can hide.
So one way to start is to go right for one spot and then gradually expand from there.
But if you find that too confining, if the mind rebels against being forced into one spot, you can have it range around your body.
Notice how the breath feels in the toes, how it feels in the fingers, how it feels in the arms and the back, how your posture effects the breath, how your breath effects the posture.
In other words, use the meditation as an opportunity to explore.
This is one of the good things about the breath as a focal point for meditation.
You can use it both as an object to stare at and as an object to analyze.
If you find that the mind needs more tranquility before it's going to get anywhere, okay, you can just settle down and be very, very still.
It's almost like you're not even watching the breath.
You're more focused on the direction in which your awareness is beamed.
You're preoccupied with just keeping the beam steady.
The one danger you have to watch out for there, of course, is that you might clamp down on the blood circulation in that spot.
So watch out for that.
Allow things to come in and go out, but you stay at that one spot as consistently as possible.
But as for the connections you can see when you use the breath as an object for discernment, they're infinite.
We were talking earlier this morning about name and form and how they play a role in the arising of suffering.
Well, they also play a role in the path leading to the end of suffering.
You've got form, which is the form of the body, the four great elements, and the breath is the most prominent element.
You've got perception: whatever perceptions you have of the breath, whatever ways you have of conceiving the breath.
That's an effective way of getting the mind to settle down: simply by holding that perception in mind.
You pay attention, which is another element of form.
You've got the intention to stay.
And then you've got the feeling that arises when you try to create a feeling of ease.
In other words, instead of allowing these things to happen willy-nilly, you try to bring as much awareness and clarity to how they function in bringing the mind to stillness.
So these elements — which if left to their own devices based on ignorance would lead to suffering: You're now playing with them, all the while being very aware of how they interact.
This is one of the best ways of learning their interactions: by playing with them.
You adjust your attention or your intention and see what happens to the feeling.
You change your perception, and see what effect it has on the mind.
What we're doing is to take the basic causes of suffering and to bring as much awareness to them as possible — specifically awareness in the form of the four noble truths: Where is there stress, what are you doing that's causing stress, and what can you change to make the stress go away?
You start with blatant levels of stress related to how you're sitting here breathing, trying to get the mind to settle down.
And then from there, you grow sensitive to levels that are more and more subtle.
You're here right where all the action is.
It's simply a matter for you individually to figure out exactly where you can get your first handle on these issues.
Establish that as your beachhead, and then from there your understanding will begin to spread out.
There will come times in the meditation when you begin to think that just being very still right here is kind of stupid.
Nothing is going to happen.
And you wonder what else is there to do next.
Well, ask yourself: Who says that it's stupid?
Why do you need to push the “what's next”?
Those are perceptions right there.
Right there you've got some issues you can work through.
Everything you need to know for the purpose of putting an end to suffering is right here.
Just bring a lot of alertness to it.
A lot of mindfulness to it.
And notice what works for you in getting the mind to settle down.
That's how insight arises, by seeing what works.
That's the way the Buddha tested all of his insights: Did they work?
In other words, he was looking for pragmatic truth, the knowledge that would make a difference.
As for truths that wouldn't make a difference, he just put them aside.
He was very single-minded in his quest.
Whatever was necessary for putting an end to suffering, he focused on that.
Whatever wasn't necessary, he might know it but he didn't let it clutter up his mind.
As he said in describing his Awakening, he learned the equivalent of the leaves of the forest.
What he brought out to teach — in terms of focusing on the issue of suffering, its cause, its end, and the path to its end: That's just like a handful of leaves.
But it's precisely the handful you need.
If you were to make a comparison with medicine, there can be lots of medicine in the forest, but just this one handful is what you need for your specific disease.
As for the other leaves, if they're not helpful for your disease, why bother with them right now?
The mind has this disease of ignorance, craving, greed, anger and delusion.
And if we don't take care of it, it's going to fester, going to cause a lot of suffering for a long time to come.
So focus on the leaves that will cure it.
As for the other leaves in the forest, you can pay attention to them after you've got this specific disease cured.
So everything you need to know is right here.
It's simply a matter of paying attention.
See which perceptions work, which perceptions don't work, which ways of paying attention work, and which ones don't, which intentions work, and which don't.
Just by exploring these issues, you can learn an awful lot about the mind — and make a big change in the mind as well.
Once, soon after I had first met Ajaan Fuang, I had a dream.
In the dream I was visiting Ajaan Lee's monastery.
I had never been there, but in the dream they had a big museum several stories high.
I had the choice to climb the stairway or to climb a ladder up on the side of the building, going straight to the top floor, and I chose the ladder.
I wanted to go straight up to the top.
But as I was climbing, the ladder fell down.
Fortunately I was caught.
The problem was that the ladder wasn't leaning against anything solid.
At the end of the dream I found myself at the door again, having to contemplate going up the stairway.
That's when I woke up.
And that's pretty much a story of how my practice started: A lot of things happened very quickly those first couple of weeks with Ajaan Fuang but then they all unraveled, and I had to start back at the beginning, step by step by step.
This can sometimes be discouraging.
It happens to all meditators.
Sometimes by fluke we happen to hit something very advanced — or at least it seems to be very advanced — in the meditation and then it all unravels right before our eyes.
At first it can be encouraging, but ultimately it turns discouraging as we see the defilements we're still living with in our minds — that those quick, flashy experiences didn't actually make much of an impact.
The follow-up work seems a lot less glamorous, and a lot of people give up right there.
But it's important that you don't give up and that you don't look down on the situation where you are.
Don't get discouraged, because wherever you go, those are the issues you have to deal with, that's the situation you have to address.
If you don't deal with it now, you have to come back to that same situation all over again, and sometimes it gets worse.
So the proper attitude is that whatever issues arise in the meditation, those are the ones you have to deal with.
Don't compare them with where you've been before in the meditation, or with the issues you'd like to be dealing with now, or where you want the meditation to go.
Most of us would like to be magically beamed up to a higher level of concentration or a higher level of insight.
But it's often the case that our refusal to look at the situation in our minds right now is what's preventing concentration and insight from arising.
So look at what you've got.
Look at where you are.
Don't pass judgment as to whether the problem you're facing is elementary or advanced.
It's the problem you're facing.
It's the problem that has to be dealt with.
Bring all your powers of attention to bear right there.
And be glad that you've got the opportunity to practice.
Don't view it as drudgery.
A lot of people are in situations where they have no inclination, have no idea what the practice is about.
Or they may have an idea and the inclination but they don't have the opportunity.
Here we have the opportunity.
We've got the inclination.
We have some idea of what the problem is all about.
These opportunities are rare to find.
So the teaching on acceptance means accepting where you are.
It doesn't mean that you accept that you're going to stay there forever.
You simply accept that this is the situation you're facing right now.
Whether it's something you like or not, whether you find yourself attracted to it or not, that's not the issue.
The issue is: Are you willing to work with what you've got?
That willingness is an important element in all levels of practice.
It starts with our willingness to help other people, and goes on with our willingness to practice the precepts.
This volunteer spirit is an important part of training the mind.
That's what it's all about: realizing that you've got to put energy into it if you're going to get anything out of it.
When you're willing to take that first step, make that first gift of your energy, that's where the practice starts to grow.
Without that attitude, it doesn't go anywhere.
All we can think of is what we'd like to get out of the meditation, but before you can get anything you have to give.
As for generosity, sometimes people look at what they've got and they'd like to be able to give much more.
They'd like to make a more impressive offering, but their means are limited.
So they have to content themselves with giving limited gifts to begin with, but the momentum builds on that.
Sometimes the little gifts bring the greatest reward.
Ajaan Fuang liked to tell the story of a man and his wife who had only one upper cloth between them.
They each had a cloth to cover the lower parts of their bodies, but only one cloth between them to cover the upper parts of their bodies.
That was back in the days in India when you didn't go out of your house unless you had two pieces of cloth around you: one wrapped around your waist, the other over your shoulders.
Because they only had one upper cloth between them, they'd have to leave the house at separate times.
If one was going out, the other had to stay at home.
They were that poor.
One night they heard that the Buddha was going to be giving a talk, so they agreed that the husband should be the one to go.
The talk was basically on the rewards of generosity.
The husband kept sitting there thinking, “This is why I'm so poor.
I haven't been generous.
What have I got to give?
Nothing.
All I have is this one cloth, and if I give this I won't be able to go anywhere.
But if I don't give this, what can I give?
I won't be able to give anything at all.” So he battled back and forth, back and forth, back and forth in his mind for hours, and the Buddha, noting what was going on, just kept on talking and talking on generosity.
It was originally supposed to be a short Dhamma talk, but it went on and on and on until midnight.
The king was in the audience, lots of people were in the audience, and they were wondering why the Dhamma talk was going on for so long.
Finally around midnight the man stood up shouting, “Victory!
Victory!” He had overcome his stinginess.
He was going to give the cloth to the Buddha, so he went down and gave the cloth.
People in the audience wondered who this was, and why he was shouting “Victory.” When they learned of his poverty, they were very impressed.
The king said, “Okay, I'll give him another cloth and other things in addition” — a cloth and a horse and an elephant, all kinds of stuff.
One of each.
And because the man was on a roll, a generosity roll, he gave all those things to the Buddha, too.
So the king upped the ante — gave him two of each.
The man gave all of that.
The king kept doubling: four, eight, finally sixteen.
At that point the man decided to keep eight of each of these things — eight pieces of gold, eight pieces of silver, eight pieces of cloth, eight horses, eight elephants.
He gave the other eight to the Buddha and went home with his remaining eight.
The lesson of the story is that a small gift by a person of little means translates into a lot more in terms of its rewards than a large gift from someone of large means, because the first gift requires more of a sacrifice.
The same principle applies in the meditation.
When things aren't going well, you have to make a sacrifice of your pride, a sacrifice of your likes and dislikes, and get down to dealing with what's actually happening in the mind.
Only when you're able to make that sacrifice can the rewards come.
In the beginning they may not be all that impressive.
You may not get a piece of gold, a piece of silver, an elephant or whatever, but you do make a step, you see a slight change in the mind.
That's much better than just sitting around being discouraged.
So whatever the issues you're facing in your meditation, be content to deal with them, because those are the real issues, the genuine issues you've got to face.
They may not stack up against the things you've read about or the things you've experienced in the past, but a little solid progress is much more valuable than all the quick and flashy special effects out there in the world.
Ajaan Fuang sometimes had students who would come to sit and meditate with him for the first time and gain visions of their past lives or of heavenly beings.
Some of his older students felt jealous and discouraged by that.
Here they'd been sitting and meditating for months with nothing special happening, and this person comes in and has all kinds of interesting things going on all at once.
It often happened, though, that the quick and flashy students didn't last very long.
When the visions stopped, when there was no more entertainment, they left.
It's the steady progress that makes all the difference, that turns out to be the winner in the end.
So sacrifice whatever attitudes get in the way of looking at the issues staring you right in the face, because those are the genuine article.
They're right here.
They're not abstractions.
We can sit around and think about Dhamma abstractions from dawn to dusk and dusk to dawn, but the problems in the mind aren't composed of abstractions.
They're not composed of memories.
They're composed of movements in the mind right now.
Look at what the mind is doing, how it moves.
Can you change the way it moves?
You've got to poke around in what's actually going on in your mind to see which parts of the present are made of elastic and which parts are made of steel — in other words, the things you can change and the things you can't.
There will be drudgery and there will be mistakes, but these are the things you learn from.
This is the kind of knowledge that really makes a difference in the mind, because this is how you develop your sensitivity, how you get a sense of how to balance excessive desire with lack of desire, how to balance excessive effort with lack of effort, and all the other balancing acts that need to be done in the meditation.
You learn from falling down and picking yourself up again.
And you do this not by thinking about the ideal of balance, but by gaining an intuitive feel for it by poking at this, poking at that, leaning this way, leaning that.
Whatever the attitude that's coming up in the mind — the discouragement, the frustration, the irritation, whatever — you poke at it.
You don't necessarily have to believe it.
And whatever positive attitudes come up in the mind, no matter how small they might seem, those are what you've got to work with.
After all, redwood trees come from tiny seeds.
If you step on them, they never have a chance to grow.
But if you look at them carefully, you can recognize them, you can see that they're different from weed seeds.
That gives you an idea of what you've got to encourage and what you've got to discourage in the mind, what you've got to cultivate and what you've got to cut out, uproot.
So gardening like this may not be glamorous work and it may not be flashy, but this is how all genuine work is done in this world.
This is how things come to blossom.
You poke around bit by bit by bit, paying careful attention, making mistakes and learning from them.
That's the sort of work that gets solid results, results that build on a good solid foundation, where you take the stairway and it does ultimately get you up to the top floor — with no danger of crashing down.
Conceit is one of those qualities we all have — and it's a slippery friend.
There are times when it's useful, as in that passage where Ananda teaches a nun that we practice to overcome conceit and yet we have to use conceit in the practice.
The example he gives is that when you hear of someone who has put an end to suffering, has made it all the way to the goal, you can reflect, “That person is a human being; I'm a human being.
That person can do it; so can I.” To that extent, you need conceit in the practice.
If you believe that you can't do the practice, or if it seems way beyond you, you end up giving up, you set your sights low.
And as we all know, you never hit higher than you aim.
So to that extent, conceit is helpful.
But it has its fangs.
Ajaan Maha Boowa calls it the “fangs of ignorance” when you have the conceit that, “Well, this is going to be easy,” and you get careless, complacent.
And conceit has another side as well.
The Buddha talks about comparing yourself to other people: thinking that you're better than they are, or equal to them, or worse than they are.
All of these comparisons count as conceit.
In other words, the idea “I am this,” “I am that” gets brought into every issue, and this is where it grows fangs: “I'm really good at everything, therefore I'm going to be good at this,” and you get careless.
Or you may think, “I'm not up to this.
This is beyond me,” and you give up.
You make the practice harder than it has to be.
So it's a fine line, realizing where conceit is going to be helpful and where it's going to bite.
First, there's the issue of confidence.
On the one hand, it's important to realize that this path you're on is a hard path to follow, so you can't go on the complacent assumption that, “This is going to be easy for me.” On the other hand, you don't want to discourage yourself with the thought, “It's going to be impossible for me.” The problem isn't the path, or how easy or hard it is.
It's the me in there.
That's the fangs.
So try to put that word aside as much as you can.
Remind yourself simply, “This is what has to be done.” “Is it going to kill you?” “Well, no.” “Then you can do it.
That's what Ajaan Fuang said to me once.
One evening, after a long day of work, he told me to sit up all night.
This was very early on in my time with him, and I was dumb enough to say, “I don't think I can do that.” He looked at me and said, “Is it going to kill you?” “Well, no.” “Then you can do it.” This didn't mean that it wasn't going to be hard.
It was hard, but after all, this is a hard practice.
It goes against all our inclinations.
We like our greed.
We like our anger, sometimes.
We like our delusions, and yet all these things have to be put aside, let go of as we practice.
But it's within human capability to do this.
Even if you do die in the practice, it's a good way to die.
It's better than dying without having accomplished anything or dying doing something really stupid.
So try to think in those terms: Realize that even though it's hard, this is part of being a good friend to yourself.
One of the definitions of a good friend is someone who is able to give what's hard to give, to do what's hard to do, to endure what's hard to endure.
If you meet friends like that, associate with them.
Value them.
Treasure them.
These are the people you really want as your friends.
And you want to be able to make yourself your own best friend in just the same way.
Ask yourself, “What's hard for you to give, and yet something that's actually a burden for you?” Forgiveness is one thing.
It's funny how sometimes material things are easy to give, but forgiveness, which is totally free, can be very hard.
Just go down the list of the people in your life who you find it hard to forgive, and try it: Forgive them.
Try not to carry a grudge and you'll find that that's a really good gift to give to yourself.
Do what is hard to do.
Meditate longer than you might want to.
Do walking meditation longer than you might want to.
Put more effort into the practice than you want to, and you'll find that you benefit.
This ties in with enduring what's hard to endure.
Pain is hard to endure.
Other people's dislike is hard to endure.
Well, learn to endure it.
It's not going to kill you.
This doesn't mean that you sit there and grit you teeth through the pain.
Learn to use your wisdom.
As Ajaan Chah once said, if you could gain Awakening simply by endurance, chickens would have attained Awakening a long time ago — they can sit for really long hours.
You have to use your wisdom.
When something seems burdensome, why is it burdensome?
Exactly what is it placing a burden on?
And why do you want to identify with what's being burdened?
Can you learn not to identify with it?
A good way to learn these lessons is to force yourself into situations where you've got to face this difficulty head on.
Okay, it's there, it's a problem, and try to use your ingenuity to get around it.
It's when you're cornered that you realize that you've got to find a way out.
And that you can.
So learn to be your own best friend.
It's not a matter of being pessimistic or optimistic.
It's a matter of learning to be heedful.
Heedfulness involves an interesting combination of qualities.
On the one hand, you're confident that your actions do make a difference, so heedfulness is not negative or pessimistic.
On the other hand, you realize that there are dangers out there, dangers inside as well.
There are difficulties you've got to work with.
You respect those difficulties but you don't get overwhelmed by them.
In other words, you've got to drop the element of conceit from your grasp.
Don't bring your “self” into what you're doing.
Don't bring “I can do this really easily” or “I can't do this at all.” Just put them aside and see what you can do.
Even if things don't work out well the first time, try, try, try again.
This is how people grow.
One of Ajaan Fuang's terms of criticism was of someone who was “good even before he'd tried something” — in other words, the sort of person who's got it all figured out beforehand.
He didn't trust people like that.
At the same time, though, if he found that you were getting very pessimistic about your ability to practice, he didn't want you to stay there, either.
Being overly optimistic or overly pessimistic were, as far as he was concerned, really unskillful ways of approaching the path.
They're both forms of conceit.
Admit that things are difficult but do what you can.
And learn to develop your discernment.
Watch out for those fangs of ignorance: the “I am this” or “I am that” or “I'm not used to this,” “I can't stand this,” “This is hard for me.” Drop the “I,” the “me,” and things get a lot easier.
So even though it may be hard, you can do it.
The things that are hard to give, you can give.
The things that are hard to do, you can do.
The things that are hard to endure, you discover you can endure.
It may not be easy the first time.
You may find yourself running into a brick wall, but even brick walls can be battered down.
They have their cracks.
There are ways around them, under them, over them, through them.
All you have to do is find where they are.
So learn the proper use of conceit: the confidence that, yes, you can do this; other people can do it, it's something human beings have done — you're a human being, you can do it too.
Once you've got that amount of conviction, drop the “you,” drop the “me,” the “I,” and then set to work.
That right there makes it a lot easier.
And this way you become your own best friend.
As you embark on the practice — and as you stay with the practice — it's best to think of it as a voyage of discovery.
After all, the Buddha says that the goal is to see what you've never seen before, to realize what you've never realized before, to attain what you've never attained before.
So you're going into the unknown.
This means that you're going to have to deal with risk and uncertainty, which require an interesting mix of attitudes.
On the one hand, you need a certain amount of confidence.
On the other hand, you need humility.
The confidence is confidence in your ability to deal with unknown factors as they arise.
The humility is the realization that you can't expect everything to follow your preconceived notions.
The path is going to stretch your imagination and ask more out of you than you might originally be prepared to give.
So you need the confidence that Yes, you can do this and Yes, this is a good place to go.
And you need the humility to realize that No, you don't know beforehand what it's going to be like.
You have to be willing to learn.
Some people want to have all kinds of guarantees before they embark on this training, but you can't really guarantee anything.
You can guarantee that when you reach the goal it's going to be good, but how much is that guarantee worth for someone who hasn't experienced it yet?
Just one more thing to take into consideration.
The Buddha, when he embarked on his quest, had no guarantee that all the sacrifice was going to be worth it, that he was going to find the deathless, or even that he was going to survive.
But he had reached a point in his life where he realized that if he didn't at least try it, he would feel that his life had been wasted.
And so for him it was a huge experiment.
There was a lot of risk and a lot of uncertainty.
And yet he was willing to take the risk and to face the uncertainty.
For us, it's not quite that drastic.
We have people who've gone before.
There's the question of whether we can trust them and believe them, but then look at the alternative: a life lived devoted to the pursuit of sensual pleasures, trying to squeeze happiness out of things that are going to die and that we'll have to leave in the end — if not before the end.
So at the very least you say, “Well, there's a possibility here.
Let's give it a try.” Try to have that sense of adventure.
Be open to new things and learn how to deal with uncertainties.
Earlier today we were talking about the maps for the jhanas.
When you try to apply the map to your actual experience, it's going to be uncertain for a while.
You read the description of directed thought and evaluation, rapture and all, and the question is: What do those terms correspond to in your actual experience?
You may have some ideas, but they may be wrong.
Is that going to stop you from practicing?
It shouldn't.
It should simply alert you to the fact that you're going to be dealing in uncertainties for a while.
When you place labels on your experiences, they have to be post-it notes, signposts to use in the meantime until you get a better sense of the terrain.
The surest of the signposts is the one for the fourth jhana — when the in-and-out breath stops and stays stopped for the duration of that state of mind — but that's all the way in the fourth.
So how are you going to know the signposts for one, two, and three?
Well, you guess for the time being and you attach a few notes here, a few notes there.
And have the confidence that when you find something more certain, you're going to be in a position to rearrange the notes if need be.
The sense of adventure also means that you may have some anticipations of what's going to work and what things should be like in the practice.
But right anticipation is not part of the path.
Sometimes your anticipations can push things in the wrong direction.
The Buddha's instructions are very precise, and pretty simple, and part of us doesn't believe anything that simple could really work.
There must be some secret; there must be some way you can speed the process along.
But sometimes in speeding along you derail yourself.
It's like sharpening a knife on a stone.
If you're in too much of a hurry, you can ruin the blade.
So you sit there very carefully rubbing it against the stone, rubbing it against the stone, making sure that the pressure is even all along the blade.
Then you realize that you may be at this for a while.
Part of the mind says, “Well, I'd like to have it done fast so I can go off and do something else.” But there also has to be another part of the mind that says, “If you try to speed it up, you could ruin it.
So keep doing what you're doing.” Even though the results don't appear as quickly as you'd like, maybe the slow results are the ones that will be the most lasting.
So you have to put your preconceived notions aside.
Don't try to skip over the steps.
The Buddha does teach a sense of urgency, but he also teaches patience.
And you have to learn how to balance the two and be willing to learn new things.
This evening I was reading a study guide to some of the suttas that raised questions about different passages in the suttas that just didn't sound right to the author, or didn't seem to fit in with his preconceived notions.
But there's always the question of whether our notions, rather than the passages, are wrong.
There's a lot going on in the texts, maybe more than we realize.
The Buddha was talking to people in a different time, with a different range of experiences.
Sometimes he was talking to people with extremely unusual meditative experiences.
In other words, maybe he knew what he was talking about, why he had to address that issue in that particular way.
Maybe the texts are accurately reporting what he said — even though they don't fit into our preconceived notions of what the texts would be like if they were written for a modern American audience.
So what you are asked as you read the Dhamma — and as you approach the practice as a whole — is to stretch your imagination a bit.
It's not the case that the Buddha will be able to prove everything to you beforehand — before you're willing to act — so that you can act with confidence and full awareness of where you're going to go and how you're going to get there.
You have to be willing to live with uncertainty and to put question marks against a lot of your assumptions.
Remind yourself that your assumptions are the assumptions of a person with defilement, the assumptions of a person still suffering.
Perhaps it would be in your best interest to put them aside for the time being instead of demanding that everything fit into your preconceived notions of how things should be.
And you should be willing to embark on this without a % guarantee that everything is going work out the way you want it to.
Have a clear sense of the precariousness of your own position, of where you are right now.
Where do you get your sustenance?
Where does the mind gain its pleasures?
Are those things solid and secure?
When you go into the uncertainty of the path, are you leaving an area of true certainty and assuredness to go off into figments of someone's imagination?
Or are you leaving the world of your current uncertainties to test some different uncertainties that ultimately promise something more certain than where you're staying right now?
This is why one of the basic principles in the practice is practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma — in other words, not in accordance with your preconceived notions, not in accordance with your ideas of what you want before you're going to commit yourself to the practice.
Instead of reshaping the Dhamma to fit your notions, maybe you have to reshape yourself to fit the Dhamma.
There is bound to be a period of discomfort, bound to be a sense of frustration when things are not quite working out the way you wanted them to.
But you need the maturity to learn how to deal with that.
This is not a path for immature people.
It's a path for people who know that they are in a very precarious position already, and that their ideas and assumptions are especially precarious.
But the ideas and presumptions of a materialistic worldview, which is what we were brought up in, offer a very limited range of happiness, whereas the Dhamma offers a lot more.
It's simply up to us to decide whether we're willing to make the sacrifices and take the risk to see if the “more” is a reality, if what the Buddha had to say is true.
Once the Buddha was extolling the advantages of breath meditation, the benefits that could be derived from keeping the breath in mind, and one of the monks said, “I already do breath meditation.” So the Buddha asked him, “What kind of breath meditation do you do?” And the monk replied, “I sit breathing, putting away any desires for the past or future, and any irritation in the present moment” — i.e., developing a sense of equanimity for what's arising and passing away right here and now.
And that was it: That was his method.
The Buddha responded, “Well, that is a form of breath meditation.
I don't say that it's not, but that's not how you get the most benefit out of the breath.
So he proceeded to teach breath meditation in a much fuller way.
And it's important to look carefully at how the Buddha taught breath meditation, because you begin to realize how proactive his method was.
You also realize that many of the steps contained in his method are more like questions.
He said, “Do this,” but without fully explaining how you might go about doing it, which means that you have to test and explore.
The first two steps are exercises for gaining practice in discerning the breath — discerning when it's long, discerning when it's short — to help sensitize you to how the breath feels.
When you do that, you begin to notice which kind of breathing feels best.
He simply mentions long or short, but there are other qualities you can look for as well: deep or shallow, heavy or light, fast or slow.
In other words, you want to get in touch with the physical sensations of the breath.
When you breathe in, where do you feel the sensation of breathing?
When you breathe out, where do you feel it?
The Buddha doesn't say that you have to focus on any particular point.
He simply says, “Bring mindfulness to the fore.” In other words, be very clear about what you're keeping in mind, which is the meaning of mindfulness.
To have a purpose in mind, what you're planning to do, and then your ability to remember that: That's mindfulness.
As for actually watching what's going on, that's called alertness.
You need both qualities, but it helps to know which is which.
Because the Buddha doesn't say where in the body you have to focus, you can ask yourself, when you breathe in, where you actually feel it.
Put aside your preconceived notions of where you should be feeling it: Where do you actually feel the breath?
Where is it comfortable; where is it uncomfortable?
From those steps in learning how to sensitize yourself to the breathing, the Buddha then moves on to a whole series of trainings in which you have to learn how to do something.
You will something to happen.
This is where the breath meditation gets more proactive.
The first training — which is the third step — is to learn how to breathe in and out sensitive to the entire body.
In other words, you try to create an expansive state of mind.
You're conscious of the breath but you're also trying to be aware of the body as a whole, from the top of the head down to the tips of the toes.
The question is: How do you do that?
Some people find it very easy to go straight to the whole body.
Other people have to work gradually up to it.
One way of doing that is to go through the body section by section, noticing how the different parts of the body feel as you breathe in, how they feel as you breathe out.
And to help yourself along, you might try making the breath more comfortable wherever you focus.
For example, as you focus on the back of the neck, notice: Is there tension there?
When you breathe in do you build up tension there?
When you breathe out are you holding on to tension?
What can you do to relax it?
This is actually moving into the fourth step, which is to calm what's called “bodily fabrication”: the effect of breath on the sensation of the body.
But you can combine the two steps.
As you go through the body, working up to this full body awareness, you can also learn how to calm the breath so that the sensation of breathing feels good.
You begin to realize that the breathing is not just a process that you feel in one or two points in the body.
The entire body is involved in the breathing process, or it can be involved in the breathing process.
The more it becomes a whole-body process, the more refreshing it feels.
This moves on to steps five and six: training yourself to breathe in and out with a sense of refreshment, with a sense of ease and pleasure.
You build up to these steps as you try to find which rhythm of breathing is best for each part of the body until you're ready to settle down at one spot.
Then think of your awareness spreading from that spot to fill the whole body.
Then you go back again and follow the strict order of the steps, which is, once you're aware of the whole body, to allow the sensations of the breathing to calm down.
You begin to notice that your ideas about the breath will have an effect on how calm it can get.
You can perceive the breath in different ways.
For instance, you can hold in mind the perception that it's a whole-body process.
Think of the breath coming in and out every pore of the skin.
And there is oxygen exchange happening at the skin.
The more wide open your pores, the more oxygen gets exchanged.
If you think of the skin as being wide open, the muscles of the rib cage can do less work.
Just make the mind still and hold that perception in place: The breath can come in and go out from any direction through all the parts of your body, all the pores of your skin.
It all connects on its own, without your having to massage it through the body.
You'll notice that there are subtle sensations in the body as you breathe in, as you breathe out, that correspond to the grosser sensations of the movement of the rib cage, the movement of the diaphragm.
Allow those subtle sensations to blend together in a way that feels harmonious.
Think of every part of the body being connected, all the energy channels in the body being connected, so that the breath energy spreads through them instantly and automatically, independently of the in-and-out breath, without your having to do anything to breathe it in or out.
Here you're using one of the aggregates, the aggregate of perception, to help calm the breath down.
And you notice that it does also induce a sense of piti, which is usually translated as “rapture,” although in some cases it's not quite as strong as what we would ordinarily call “rapture.” It's more a sense of refreshment.
The body feels full, satisfied.
It's as if every little cell in the body is getting to breathe to its heart's content, and is not getting squeezed by the other cells in the process.
A sense of ease will come along with this.
Once the body has been really refreshed in this way, things will begin to calm down even further.
This is where you get sensitive to what the Buddha calls mental fabrication: feelings and perceptions.
You've already noticed that changing the perception of how you breathe will have an effect on the breathing process and the feelings that arise from the breathing process.
It also has an effect on the mind.
It calms things down.
So you can continue exploring exactly which perceptions help to calm the mind down even further.
What you're doing here is learning both calm and insight at the same time.
The Buddha never treats these two qualities of mind as diametrically opposed.
He points out that they can develop separately, but ideally they should be working together.
As you calm things down mindfully, you at the same time gain insight into the workings of the mind.
Here you begin to see, on the one hand, the impact the breathing can have on the mind.
The more soothing the breath becomes, the more the mind is willing to settle down in the present and feel soothed by it.
At the same time, you see the impact of the mind on the breath.
The way you perceive the breath is going to change the way the body actually breathes.
Your mental picture of the breath, of the breathing process, will have an impact on which parts of the body actually get involved in the breathing process.
As things grow more and more calm, they lead to a point where you can sit here just looking at awareness — the awareness of the mind itself as it's watching the breath.
This is an important ability in the meditation: learning how to observe the mind.
It's almost as if there are two minds: the mind being observed and the mind doing the observing.
You can watch the state of the mind as it stays with the breath.
Then you begin to notice that sometimes it's steady and sometimes it's not.
Sometimes it can maintain its concentration; sometimes it can't.
Sometimes it feels refreshed and gladdened by doing the meditation; other times it feels like the meditation is more of a chore, when you're just going through the motions.
You want to learn how to read your mind in this way.
Once you can read it, you can then learn to provide it with whatever it needs.
For instance, how do you gladden the mind when it's feeling a little bit down, a little bit bored by the process?
What can you do to make it more interesting?
The analogy the Buddha gives is of an intelligent cook working in the palace for a prince.
Now to get to be a cook working for a prince, you have to be sensitive to what the prince likes.
The prince isn't going to come down to the kitchen and say, “Hey, buddy, tomorrow I'd like fried chicken,” or “Tomorrow I'd like tofu.” The prince will sit there at his table and he'll reach for this food and not reach for that food, take a lot of this and take only a little bit of that.
So you've got to notice that.
You have to pick up on the signs the prince is sending.
Whether he's sending them consciously or not, you want to notice them.
And then, when you can read his signs, you can anticipate his wants every day.
As King Asoka once said in one of his edicts that if the people who worked for him were going to please him, they had to know what he wanted even before he knew.
You have to learn how to be that quick at reading your own mind.
What does the mind need right now?
What is it going to need with the next breath?
Sometimes it gets bored with the breath, so you can give it other things to think about.
You can develop qualities of goodwill, compassion, empathetic joy, or equanimity.
You can think about the Buddha, the Dhamma, the Sangha.
All of these are valid topics of meditation.
They're there to inspire the mind, to gladden the heart.
You can think about the good times you've been generous in the past, when you didn't really have to share something but you felt moved to share.
Or of the times you could have gotten away with harming somebody or taking something away from them, but you didn't.
Think about those times.
They help bring joy to the practice.
In other words, like the cook, you learn how to read your mind and then provide it with whatever food it needs.
The same with the issue of steadying the mind: When the mind is feeling kind of wobbly, how do you get it fully and firmly fixed here in the present moment?
You might want to go back and review some of the steps in the meditation: Which ones are you forgetting?
Have you forgotten to stay with the whole body?
Have you forgotten how to give rise to a sense of rapture, refreshment?
Well, go back and do those things.
Or you might be able to change the way you perceive the breathing.
Think of the breath going down into your bones.
Focus on the breathing sensations in your hands and feet.
Some people find that focusing on one spot at a time is not enough to keep them really transfixed, so give yourself two spots.
I knew an old woman in Thailand when I was first getting involved in meditation.
She was a retired schoolteacher and she said that one of the quickest ways of getting the mind to settle down and stay really focused in the present moment was to focus on the sensations in the head and the sensations at the base of the spine at the same time.
Think of those as two breathing centers.
And you may find that the effort involved in keeping two things going at once — thinking of a line connecting the two to make it a single sensation — really steadies the mind, focuses it, gets it to settle down and stay still.
The next step the Buddha recommends is learning how to release the mind.
Here he's not talking about the ultimate release, but simply about how you refine your concentration.
One of the important ways of gaining insight while you're in the process of developing concentration is to be able to notice the differences among the various levels of concentration as you go through them.
Sometimes you settle down and you're still sort of hovering around the breath as you try to adjust it.
Other times you can let yourself simply dive into the breath, to be bathed by the breathing, without having to analyze much at all.
What you've done is that you've moved from using directed thought and evaluation to help with the concentration to the point where you don't need them anymore.
You can let them go.
There's a much greater sense of refreshment that comes, a greater sense of fullness, as you're one with the breath as opposed to hovering protectively outside.
That's one way of releasing the mind.
Then you can compare which state is more easeful, which state has more stress.
And then again you can provide the mind with what it needs.
Once you've learned these ways of dealing with the breath, the workings of your mind become a lot more transparent, just as the breath element in the body becomes more transparent.
That's when you're ready to take the work of insight even deeper, seeing the inconstancy of anything that's intended, whether it's physical or mental — anything that's fabricated in any way at all, whether it's a bodily fabrication or a mental fabrication.
No matter how easeful and refreshing and stable the mind in concentration may be, there's still a slight instability, a slight wavering you can detect.
And as the mind develops a sense of dispassion for everything intentional, it grows disenchanted.
It's had enough of this.
That's when it's really ready to let go — i.e., it loses interest in fabricating these fabrications, and so they stop.
That's when everything gets relinquished, including the path.
This is how you can get great benefit, great rewards out of the practice of breath meditation.
It's not simply a means for calming the mind down.
The breath itself becomes a way of understanding the process of fabrication in both body and mind.
And it ultimately allows you to develop a sense of dispassion, not because you come into the meditation with a negative attitude, but because you've learned how to outgrow the exercises that the Buddha has set out for you.
It's like a child outgrowing a game.
You've played the game enough so that you know everything the game has to offer.
You've mastered all the challenges and are ready for something more.
So the dispassion here is more like the dispassion that happens when you naturally grow up, when you mature.
It's the dispassion that comes when you realize there must be something better.
You sometimes hear that the point of meditation is to learn simply to accept things as they are and not to be too demanding of what you need to be happy.
That principle works on an outside level, teaching contentment with your external situation, but it doesn't work on the inside level.
The Buddha said that he gained Awakening by not resting content with the state of his mind.
On the inner level, he said to notice what things can provide what level of happiness, and to see how far you can push this process of fabrication.
Because that's what you're doing as you breathe in this way: You're exploring the potentials for bodily fabrication, verbal fabrication, and mental fabrication to see how far they can go.
Once you've explored their limits, you want something better.
You realize that you can't look to fabrication, to these acts of intention, for true happiness any further.
You've got to go deeper.
You've got to learn how to abandon even these skillful intentions.
What this means is that you maintain a high standard for what it means to be happy.
In fact, you heighten your standards for what's going to count as true happiness as you grow in the practice.
You begin to realize that in the past you've been looking in the wrong place.
You've been settling for a crude and unreliable happiness.
You've been looking for all your happiness in things that are fabricated.
Is it possible for there to be happiness in something totally unfabricated, totally unintended?
You look for that — something that lies even beyond the intentions of equanimity, the intentions of calm or stillness, the intentions of insight.
You can't get to that level without having developed these other skills, because these are the skills that refine your powers of awareness.
They're not taking you to a place that you could create, which is what you've been doing all along, but they are taking you to a dimension you couldn't have found without having created the creations.
The act of creation sensitizes you, and as you get more refined in your skill, it clears away a lot of the static in your experience of the present.
It sensitizes you to very, very subtle things.
It's like tuning in on a radio.
The more sensitive your ear, the more you can tell whether you're tuned into the radio station very precisely or you're off a little bit.
If you're off a little bit, there's going to be static, interference.
So you keep tuning in, tuning in, as your ear gets better and better.
You don't want even the least little bit of static.
And that's how you get right on target.
This is how the breath leads you all the way to nibbana.
Of course the breath doesn't do that itself.
But if you follow the Buddha's steps, learning how to master the steps he recommends for you to experiment and explore, the breath does become a path.
It's a path happening right here all the time.
So try to take advantage of what's right here and see how far you can go.
We live in a stormy world, a world of constant change.
As in that passage we chanted just now about aging, illness, death, and separation — which, when you think about these things only that far, gets pretty depressing.
But fortunately we don't have to think about these things only that far.
We can think a little further.
As in the other chant: “May I be happy.” The Buddha has us respect that wish for true happiness.
And he points out the way to true happiness, which is through our own actions.
That's the part of the first chant that says, “I'm the owner of my actions, heir to my actions.” This is what we can depend on.
Even though our actions may change, we try to develop a certain amount of constancy in the mind.
This is why we're practicing concentration, focusing on the breath, staying with the breath as it comes in, staying with the breath as it goes out, doing what we can to make it easy to stay with the breath.
Part of that involves allowing the breath to be comfortable, and having the sense that the breath is not just air coming in and out of the lungs.
We learn how to perceive the breath as the whole-body energy flow.
How do the different parts of the body feel during the in-breath?
Do you tend to tense up around your neck, or in your shoulders?
Can you breathe-in in a way that you don't tense up?
It's all connected — your posture, the way you breathe, the way the blood flows through the body.
You can explore these issues as a way of making it easier to stay here.
Another way of making it easier to stay here is to have the right view about what you're doing.
It may seem a little thing, just keeping the mind in one spot.
You can think of all the other things you might be doing right now, all the other responsibilities you have, all the other problems you could solve.
Those things can pull you away — because it's not just gross manifestations of greed, anger and delusion that pull us away.
Your misinformed sense of responsibility can also pull you away: that sense of, “Well, I've really got to think about this.
I've got to prepare for that.
I've got all these other responsibilities out there in the world, things I've got to prevent, things I've got to encourage.” But when you think in those ways, you're neglecting one of your major responsibilities, which is that if you're going to do anything effective, anything skillful, the mind has to have a good solid basis inside.
It's like a post at the edge of the ocean.
If your post is planted firmly down in the sand — or even better, if it's firmly planted down into the rock below the sand — then when the waves come in, the waves go out, the post doesn't go in, doesn't go out with them.
You can use that post for lots of useful things.
It can become a post on which you build a house.
It can be a post to which you tie up your boat, so that the boat doesn't get washed out to sea.
And the post itself doesn't get damaged much by the waves.
But if you take your post and lay it down at the edge of the ocean — thinking that by laying it down there you can prevent the waves from coming in much better than if it's standing in one spot — what happens of course is that the post gets washed in, washed out, and after a while, it gets smashed against a rock someplace.
If anything is tied to the post, it'll get smashed, too.
In other words, if you take on too many responsibilities out in the world but don't have a firm foundation for the mind, the mind ends up getting smashed to pieces.
And it's of no use to anybody.
So while you're focused on one small point right here — just the breath, just the body — it may seem like you're neglecting your other responsibilities, but in actuality you're not.
You're providing a solid foundation for the mind.
A mind with a solid foundation is a lot more useful, both for you and for the people around you.
Take this as your prime responsibility.
Because there's really only so much you can do for the world.
You may think about other people you'd like to help, but there are areas of their minds, areas of their experience, where you can't reach, where you can't touch them at all.
You see this very clearly when someone is sick and suffering in pain.
You can't go in and help share out the pain.
You may be able to give that person a medicine that helps relieve the pain somewhat.
But sometimes there's so much pain that it goes beyond the reach of any morphine, any opium, any painkiller at all.
That's where that person has to be responsible for him or herself.
You see this in other people and it should remind you that you're going to have to face those same issues someday yourself.
That's an area where each of us has to be responsible.
If we can be responsible about how we handle our pain, we're much less burdensome to the people around us.
After all, it is our responsibility.
We were the ones who chose to be born here.
It was because of our desires and our cravings that we took birth as human beings.
When you're responsible for your birth, then you also have to be responsible for how you handle your aging, illness, and death.
They all come as part of the same package.
And the point from which you're going to learn how to handle these things is this point right here — as you're focused on the breath, focused in the present moment, learning how to let go of all your other wrong views, all your other distractions, all the other things you might cling to that are going to end up getting you smashed against the rocks.
So try to maintain this spot.
Think of it as a post planted against the waves of the ocean.
Even though the post gets knocked over, you realize you shouldn't let it stay knocked over.
You know it's in a better position when it's standing up, planted down deep into the sand.
Just knowing that much can help a lot.
Otherwise, you feel you owe it to other people to let your post lie down in the waves, thinking that the post somehow will protect them from the force of the waves.
But what happens is that sometimes the waves come behind the post and push up against other people, smashing them up against the rocks.
So it's both for your own good and for the good of the people around you that you try to keep this post firmly planted right here.
And try to keep your views right.
There's a lot out there in the world that you cannot change.
There's a lot you can't even know.
Kierkegaard once commented that we live life forward but we understand backwards.
In other words, there are a lot of decisions we have to make right now, but we don't really know how they're going to turn out tomorrow or the next day, next month, next year.
We can look back on decisions we made in the past and say, “Gee, I shouldn't have done that; I shouldn't have said this.” And in some cases, we made the wrong decision fully knowing what we were doing.
Those are the decisions that carry a lot of blame.
But a lot of times, we made that wrong decision because we couldn't know.
That kind of decision is something you can't blame anybody for.
Nobody can blame you; you can't blame anybody else.
So you have to leave that to being uncertain.
It's part of the winds and the waves.
Like tonight's weather forecast: They say there may be a storm coming in.
We don't know for sure.
We do our best to prepare.
If the storm doesn't come in, will we say, “Well, all that preparation was a waste of time, a waste of energy.
We could've done other things.” That's not the right attitude.
You prepare as best you can.
And as for the things you don't know, you just let them go.
What you do know are certain basic principles.
If you can develop more mindfulness, more alertness, more concentration, more discernment in the mind, you'll be better prepared for handling things as they come up, even if you don't know ahead of time what they will be.
If you've got these qualities developed in the mind, you'll be in a better position to handle anything, whatever comes your way.
The prime means for developing these qualities is by giving the mind one place to stay still, and then maintaining that stillness regardless of whatever else may come to knock it over.
In some cases, that requires just being mindful and alert to what's happening.
In other cases, it requires more discernment, catching the currents of the mind that would knock you over, learning how to resist the ones that say, “You really ought to think about this; you really ought to worry about that.
You're sitting here with your eyes closed focusing on your breath, ignoring your responsibilities.” You've got to learn how to be able to argue with those thoughts so that they don't overcome the mind.
So remember the post at the edge of the sea.
If it's just lying down there on the sand, the waves will come up, and the post will get washed back and forth.
If there are people standing on the beach, the post might hurt them.
If there are rocks on the beach, the waves might wash the post up against the rocks and smash it.
You don't want that.
If your post is planted firmly there at the edge of the water, it's a lot more useful for yourself and for the people around you.
So have a sense of the value of staying firmly planted right here, focused right here, developing this stillness as a skill, getting the mind to be as constant as possible.
We know that the constancy you create through concentration like this cannot be totally constant.
After all, you're building your path here out of what are called aggregates.
And as the Buddha said, all these aggregates are inconstant, stressful, and not-self.
When we're resisting that to some extent, we know that we can't ultimately make our state of concentration permanent.
But what we are doing is giving the mind the strength it needs to let go of things that cause harm, of things that cause suffering, because we're letting go from a position of strength.
We don't let go out of weakness.
If people let go out of weakness, there's bound to be an element of sour grapes, an element of dissatisfaction or resentment, which means that they don't really let go.
They're hoping for some other time when they can latch on again.
But if you let go out of strength, you let go for sure.
When you've let go of things outside your concentration, then you can turn and look at the concentration itself.
You realize that your concentration and discernment have taken the mind this far, but they can take it no further.
The only thing that's keeping you from going further is the fact that you're holding on.
That's when you let go out of genuine strength.
When you let go in that way, you find that there's something deep down in the mind that's constant, totally free from stress, beyond even the issues of self and not self — something that can't be affected by the wind or waves at all.
The image in the texts is of a stone post sixteen spans tall, planted into the solid rock of a mountain.
Eight spans are buried in the rock; eight spans are aboveground.
No matter which direction the wind comes from, it can't make the post shake at all.
But until you can get to that point, use your post at the edge of the ocean.
It may get knocked over now and then, but you know well enough once it's knocked over how to plant it down in the sand again.
Even just this much can help you through a lot.
It can help eliminate a lot of suffering even before you come to the end of suffering.
And that's quite an accomplishment right there.
Sometimes when you hear the Buddha's teachings explained, it's almost as if he's playing gotcha.
He talks about jhana — the ease, the rapture that can come from concentration — but then you're told that if you try to attain jhana, you're not going to get there.
Or once you get there, you have to be very careful not to get attached to it.
It's dangerous, so you shouldn't do it too much.
Similarly with nibbana: We're told that nibbana's the highest ease, the highest happiness, and yet if you want it, you can't get it.
It's like he's dangling these things in front of you and taunting you, saying you can't have them.
That's not the way he taught at all.
The ease and pleasure that come from jhana, he said, are totally blameless.
As he was struggling to find Awakening, he spent six years practicing different austerities and finally realized that austerities were a dead-end.
So the question arose: Is there an alternative way?
He thought of the time when he was a child sitting under a tree while his father was plowing, and his mind entered the first jhana.
So he asked himself: “Why am I afraid of that pleasure?
Why am I afraid of that rapture?
Is there anything blameworthy about it?
Anything harmful about it?” And the answer he came up with is No.
After all, it's a pleasure that can arise simply by focusing your mind on the breath.
You're not harming anyone at all.
And in following this pleasure, you're not getting intoxicated with youth or health or life or the other things that intoxicate the mind.
So it's a good pleasure to pursue.
In this way, jhana was the first factor of the path that the Buddha realized in his quest for Awakening.
And as with all the other factors of the path, he said it's something to be developed.
So when states of ease and pleasure arise in your meditation, try to develop them.
Try to master them as a skill.
A similar principle applies to nibbana.
The path to nibbana does include desire, even though nibbana itself is the ending of all desire.
If you had to drop all desire in order to get on the path, nibbana itself would be the path to nibbana.
That would put you in a double bind.
But the path actually includes desire.
On the one hand, there's right resolve.
The resolve to overcome attachment to sensuality, the resolve to be harmless, the resolve not to feel ill will: These are all types of desire.
And even more explicitly, the factor of right effort starts out when you generate desire for doing away with unskillful qualities and making sure they don't arise again.
You generate desire to give rise to skillful qualities and bring them to the culmination of their development.
In other words, the desire here focuses primarily on the path.
Nibbana itself is beyond skillful and unskillful, but the factors of the path, such as right mindfulness and right concentration, are skillful qualities you want to develop, to give rise to, and then bring to the culmination of their potential.
So the Buddha is a very straightforward teacher.
He points out that there are good things in the path and it's okay to desire them, simply that your desire should be mature.
Immature desire is the kind that wants to get the results without putting in the effort, or focuses so exclusively on the results that you neglect the effort.
As the Buddha said, you focus on the causes, and when the causes are ripe, they yield the results.
Through developing the path, you come to realize the cessation of suffering.
So you focus on the path and the goal takes care of itself.
Sometimes you may hear that the path and the goal are one.
And the one way in which that teaching makes sense is if you realize that in the doing of the path, the goal gets realized.
In other words, you're not supposed to sit there just going through the motions of the path, passing the time saying, “When is the goal going to appear?” — i.e., doing the path but with one eye someplace else.
You focus your attention totally on developing the path.
And in developing the path, the realization of the end of suffering appears right there.
So focus on bringing the mind to stillness.
If the mind hasn't yet come to stillness, ask yourself: What's getting in the way?
Use your ingenuity.
It's not just a matter of desire.
You use desire, you use persistence, you use your intent, as you really focus on what you're doing.
And you use your powers of analysis and ingenuity, figuring out what's going wrong, what's not working right here, what distractions are getting in the way.
You bring all of these bases of success to bear on what you're doing.
But they all start with desire.
There are lots of good reasons to want to bring the mind to concentration, not only for your own sake, but for the sake of other people as well.
If your happiness is more inwardly based, you need less and less from the outside world.
Now, as the Buddha said, in order to attain strong states of concentration, the body needs to be nourished.
You need a certain level of comfort for the mind to settle down.
But it's not that much.
The more reliable your concentration gets, the easier it is to make do with less and less outside.
You're placing less of a burden on other people.
You're competing with them less.
That means you can treat them more fairly.
You can go into a situation and base your actions, your words, and your thoughts totally on goodwill and compassion — because you realize you don't need anything from those people.
It's when you need something from others that your actions are tilted in terms of bias or prejudice: in terms of things you desire, things that irritate you, things you're deluded about, or things you fear.
This is because your hopes for happiness are focused on something outside.
But when your desire for happiness is focused inwardly, you place less of a burden on things outside.
You need less from the outside world, which means your compassion for other people can be more clearheaded, balanced, and fair.
In this way, the pursuit of happiness through developing strong concentration for the pursuit of total freedom is not a selfish thing.
As long as your concentration is imbued with the other factors of the path — right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness — it's perfectly safe.
They sometimes talk about getting stuck on concentration or becoming a concentration junkie, but those are cases where the concentration lacks the other elements of the path.
Your understanding of why there's suffering in the world is skewed, or your understanding of why you're suffering is skewed.
You spend all your time just focusing on your breath and not wanting to do anything for anyone else anywhere, not wanting to be bothered by the world.
You have to realize that it's not the world that's bothering you; you're bothering the world with your demands.
A weakness in your concentration and a weakness in your discernment make you think that way.
If your concentration is really solid, you can stay in all kinds of difficult situations and maintain your balance.
Or even if you get knocked off balance in the areas where you're still attached, you can get back into balance a lot more easily if you've got right view and the other elements of the path.
So the dangers of concentration come when it's pursued to the exclusion of the other factors of the path.
But right concentration, being focused in this present moment with full body awareness, a sense of ease and rapture that then shades into equanimity: That's a valuable skill.
There are greater dangers in the path, such as the danger of getting teachers who say, “Well, you can't gain concentration or you shouldn't try.” That's pretty dangerous.
Or other teachers who tell you you've attained some level of Awakening when you haven't yet.
Holding on to their estimation of things is extremely dangerous, because it makes you complacent.
It really blocks the path.
But if you stay in right concentration imbued with right mindfulness and right view, it's in the concentration that you start seeing the stress of clinging to the aggregates.
What the Buddha does, basically, is to teach you how to take these aggregates — which we normally cling to in an unskillful way — and learn how to cling to them in a more skillful way, pointing out that, Yes, it is possible to attain happiness here.
As you get more and more sensitized to the grosser suffering outside, your hopes for happiness get more and more focused on the concentration.
When they're totally focused here and have gotten good results, you can start taking the concentration apart, realizing that even this source of happiness is composed of aggregates.
It still has a potential for being inconstant.
Stressful.
Not-self.
That spurs you to look for something deeper.
But it puts you in the position where you can see that “something deeper” more clearly as well.
In other words, your taste for happiness has grown more refined.
Repeatedly, the Buddha talks about analyzing the concentration in and of itself, seeing what in the concentration is form, feeling, perception, thought fabrication, or consciousness.
You realize that even when you let go of outside aggregates, or the grosser aggregates, there are still these subtler aggregates inside.
It's right here that the work can be done.
So the Buddha's teachings are very straightforward.
Here, he says, is a better, safer, more blameless form of happiness.
Go for it.
As you master it, you find there are even deeper levels of happiness, ultimately to a level that's totally unconditioned.
But it's okay to desire these things.
It's okay to make an effort in these directions.
It's through the desire, through the effort, that you get there.
So we learn how to take that desire and focus it in the right place — on the path, on the causes — and the results will come.
That's about as straightforward as you can get.
One of the Buddha's essential insights was that the suffering that really weighs down the mind is a suffering we create — and it's unnecessary.
Even though we create it and we suffer from it, we cling to it.
This has some unexpected implications.
One is that for a lot of us, if we didn't suffer, we would be lost.
Even the simple idea of not suffering would leave us hanging.
This is because our strongest sense of who we are often comes from being treated unjustly.
We define ourselves through the suffering that comes from being treated unjustly.
If we were to deny ourselves that perverse pleasure, we'd feel lost.
But when other people treat us unjustly, we start treating ourselves unjustly.
When other people criticize us unfairly, we start criticizing ourselves unfairly.
We suffer from all of this, but we would feel lost without the sense of self provided by that unfairness.
The mind can be really perverse.
To work around this problem, the Buddha has us focus simply on the problem of suffering without asking who's causing this, or who you are, or what you have to do to your sense of self to make it better.
He says, “Just look at the suffering in and of itself.” That's important: the “in and of itself.” That helps get you out of the entanglements that come from your clinging to your suffering.
When you can look at these things as events simply on their own terms, simply as a pattern of cause and effect without asking how you're involved in it, when you can simply see the fact of suffering as it's being caused, then you see the connection to its cause.
You realize that you don't have to engage in the cause.
That helps loosen up your attachment to the suffering.
So it's important to understand this process: that you're clinging to, identifying with, the very things that cause you to suffer.
Even though that's what defines you, it's simply a definition you've imposed on things.
You don't really need it to function.
You don't really have to worry about being annihilated if you stop the suffering.
For many people that's a scary idea, because the connection between their self and their suffering is so strong.
This is why the Buddha focuses you back on just the suffering in and of itself.
Don't ask who's doing this.
Don't ask how you're involved in it.
Just ask, “What's happening here?” Look at things in and of themselves as events, as processes.
Start with the breath in and of itself.
That's pretty neutral.
And ask yourself, “What's going on in the process of breathing?” You breathe in until breathing in starts getting uncomfortable.
Then you breathe out until breathing out starts getting uncomfortable.
Then you start breathing back in again.
You're bouncing back and forth between the discomfort of too much in and too much out.
Yet you need to breathe.
If you tried to stop breathing by holding your breath, that would be painful too.
You've got to breathe, yet it's breathing between one extreme of breathing out too long, and the other extreme of breathing in too long.
The breath is an impersonal process, something you can watch in and of itself, and it teaches you a lesson about suffering in and of itself.
Fortunately for us there are not too many elaborate theories about the deeper meaning of breath.
Just the fact: The breath is now coming in; the breath is now going out.
You can't watch your future breaths; you can't watch your past breaths.
You've just got the present breath.
And it's impersonal.
You know that everybody has the same breathing.
You simply ask the question of whether it feels good or not.
That's all you've got to ask right now.
As for other larger issues, you can put them aside.
Get used to dealing just on this level, the immediate experience of the breath, in and of itself.
In doing that, you help to de-personalize the issue of suffering.
From this point you can begin to spread your attention to other problems that need depersonalizing as well.
But make sure you've got this foundation strong.
Simply stay with the issue of how the breath is coming in, how the breath is going out.
Are you enjoying it?
Even though the breath moves between two different types of pain, if you adjust it properly you can make the experience of the breath in between, the feel of the breath in between, really gratifying — as it feels good coming in, coming in, down to the lungs, down to the abdomen.
It can feel refreshing, gratifying.
And just that fact of how it feels in the present moment, without your having to get involved in thoughts of identity, the narratives of your life, your worldviews: Get used to looking at things simply on this level, just the experience in and of itself.
This gives you a new foundation.
You get in touch with the ability, in the midst of the potential for pain, to make the present moment pleasant.
And it's not threatening.
It's gratifying.
You shift your center of gravity away from the sense of self that needs to suffer in order to maintain its identity, to a different sense of self: one based on a sense of pleasure, combined with a greater sense of competence.
You're developing a skill and you see the results immediately.
This new center of gravity then acts as the fulcrum from which you can pry loose your other attachments, the old ways of identifying yourself.
They've done studies of people going through psychotherapy, trying to figure out which method — Jungian, Freudian, or whatever — works best.
And they've discovered that the actual method doesn't make all that much difference.
What does make a difference is the ability of the patient to get inside his or her body, to fully inhabit the body, and then from that standpoint to work through whatever issues there are in the mind.
This is what you're doing as you work with the breath.
You're getting into the body, getting more sensitive to the body, creating a new center of gravity for yourself, a new area of sensitivity.
A lot of the Buddhist texts, when they talk about the knowledge you gain from meditation, express it as a form of vision, something you see.
You're working toward knowledge and vision, they say.
The first experience of Awakening is the opening of the Dhamma Eye.
Full Awakening comes with knowledge and vision of things as they have come to be.
But there are also passages that describe this knowledge as something sensed not through the inner eye, but through the body.
All the teachings about jhana are concerned with gaining a sense of ease and wellbeing from the breath and then allowing it to permeate the whole body.
Some of the texts talk about “touching” the various formless dimensions that can be accessed through jhana, touching them with your body.
One of the texts says that those who practice jhana touch the deathless with the body.
And one of the verses in the Dhammapada says that you see the Dhamma with the body.
The Sutta Nipata describes the Buddha as the All-around Eye: His whole body was an organ of vision, an organ of sight.
So one of the things we want to do as we practice is to get out of our heads — where we have all these notions about who we are and how we relate to other people, how we have to maintain our identity, which is centered on suffering, in the face of the onslaughts of the world outside — and learn how to fully inhabit the body.
As we inhabit it, the body itself becomes an organ of vision, an organ of sight.
You see things going on in the body you didn't see before.
You re-sensitize the body.
As a meditator you work from a new center of gravity so that when you start taking apart your habits of creating your sense of self — the habits that make you suffer but that you cling to so tightly — it's a lot less threatening.
You don't feel that you're going to be obliterated by the process.
Taking apart these old habits becomes something you really like to do, because you're looking from another point of view.
You're looking from the point of view of full-body awareness, full-body competence.
This is why it's so important to get in touch with the breath and to learn to breathe with the whole body: whole body breathing in, whole body breathing out.
It develops a sensitivity and a foundation you need to do some really radical work on how the mind is causing itself to suffer, and how you can uproot all the ways that cause you to suffer.
It's only from this different point of view that the work can actually be done.
Once, when Ajaan Suwat was here, he asked me to give the Dhamma talk in Thai.
I had been translating Ajaan Lee, so I used one of Ajaan Lee's images: comparing the practice to digging a well.
Generosity was like a very shallow well, virtue a deeper well, whereas concentration was a well down to the water table.
Afterwards he told me that the Dhamma talk had been too interesting.
It was distracting people from their meditation.
So don't listen to me.
Focus on your breath.
The talk is here in the background to catch you if you wander away from the breath, like the catcher in the rye.
I'm standing at the edge of a cliff in case those of you who are running around in the rye aren't really looking at what you're doing.
If I see that you're heading to the edge of the cliff, I'm here to catch you, to make sure you don't fall away from your meditation object.
Or you can think of the talk as a fence.
When you start leaving the meditation object, the first thing you'll run into is the fence formed by the sound of the talk.
That's to remind you to go back.
The word desana, the word we usually translate as “Dhamma talk,” actually means pointing.
And the talk is here to point you back to the breath, back to your present awareness, to make sure you don't go wandering off.
Try to stay with the breath.
Be one with your meditation.
There are two words with “one” in the Buddha's descriptions of jhana.
One is ekaggata, as in ekaggatarammana, oneness of preoccupation, or singleness of preoccupation; and ekaggatacitta, singleness of mind.
This kind of oneness applies to all levels of jhana.
It means being focused on one thing, like the breath.
You stay steadily focused on it, at the same time making it the one thing filling your range of awareness.
So you start out trying to do that.
But in the beginning, there are two ones.
There's the mind aware of the breath, evaluating the breath, commenting on the breath.
That's one thing.
And then there's the breath.
One subject, one object, and you want to keep both of them “one” in their own ways.
You want to make sure that the one topic of your inner conversation is the breath.
As for other things that have been going on in the course of the day, you don't talk about them.
Don't go slipping off into the past, slipping off into the future, wondering about what you're going to do tomorrow, what you're going to do at the end of the meditation, or how much longer you have to meditate here.
That's introducing other topics of conversation.
And the mind never really settles down.
So just keep the topic of conversation on one thing, on the breath, and evaluate how it's going.
What kind of breath would you like to breathe right now?
You're perfectly free to choose.
You may not be able to think about other things right now, but they're off the agenda.
They don't really matter right now.
When the breath is the one item on the agenda, you can give it your full attention and you're totally free to explore it.
What kind of breathing would really feel good right now in your stomach?
Let the body breathe that way.
Focus on your stomach for a while and see what kind of breathing really feels good there.
What kind of breathing feels good going down your backbone?
What kind of breathing feels good in your legs?
You may not yet be able to breathe with your legs, but there is a breath energy that can flow down through the legs.
See what rhythm of breathing keeps that breath energy alive, awake.
Ajaan Lee talks about using your awareness of the breath to wake up the different properties of your body.
This is what he means: having a sense that there's an energy flowing through your legs, flowing through your arms, all around your head, all the different parts of your body, out to the fingers and toes, like an electric current.
There is even an energy, if you're really sensitive, that surrounds your body.
Can you be sensitive to that?
And what kind of breathing makes those different parts of the body feel good?
Go through the body and tell yourself that you're breathing specifically for your stomach for a while, so what kind of breathing would feel good right there?
If the stomach could speak, what kind of breath would it ask for?
Then breathe specifically for the sake of your chest: What kind of breathing would feel good in your chest?
And so on through the rest of the body: in the shoulder, in the back of your shoulders, between your shoulder blades, in the small of your back, in your hips, in your legs, in your toes, in your eyes.
Then try to be aware of the breath in the whole body.
This is how the breath, the object of your conversation, becomes one: It fills the range of your awareness.
Think of the whole body breathing in, breathing out, and let the whole-body breath flow as comfortably as you can.
Then, after a while, when you've been evaluating the breath, and it really feels good as you're breathing in, breathing out, there comes a point where you don't have to evaluate it any more.
As Ajaan Fuang once said, as you fill up the breath energy in the body it's like filling up water in a jar.
There comes a point where the jar of water — here we're talking about those big jars that they used to line up along the sides of houses in Thailand to catch rainwater off the roof, enormous jars, sometimes bigger than a person: After a while the jar is so full of water that no matter how much more water you pour into it, it can't hold any more.
The excess just flows out.
The same principle holds with the breath.
You get to a point where the breath energy feels full throughout the body.
The legs feel full, the arms feel full with a pleasant buzz of energy.
They feel energized.
Awake.
And you don't need to do any more evaluation, for they're as full as they're going to get.
You're now free to just dive into the breath.
This is where the other word for oneness in the descriptions of jhana, ekodi-bhava, comes into play.
Ekodi-bhava means unification.
It starts at the second jhana.
The oneness of your awareness and the oneness of the breath become a single oneness, totally unified.
You don't hold anything back.
That sense of the observer, which is sometimes like an animal perched on your shoulders, looking through your eyes, looking at the breath in different parts of the body: You want to obliterate the sense that that observer is separate from the breath.
So you breathe into the observer.
Thinking of the breath energy in your eyes is especially helpful here, in creating a sense of being one.
Many of our ideas of subject/object dichotomies come from our sense of sight — the object's out there, the eye is in here, and they don't touch.
One good way of erasing that dichotomy is to focus on the breath-energy flow in your eyes.
The breath is right there; the eyes are right there in the same place.
There's no dividing line between them.
This helps to induce a sense that awareness is fully one with the breath; the breath is fully one with the awareness.
Then you simply maintain that.
Any thought that spills out from that, you don't want.
Totally throw yourself into the breath.
There's nothing else you have to do, nowhere else you have to go, nothing that has any need to pull you away.
Ajaan Lee makes the comment that this breath, if you're totally immersed in it, will take you through all the levels of jhana, up to the fourth.
The difference is simply a matter of how steady you are in staying one with the breath, and of how still the breath grows in response.
Ajaan Fuang noted that this sense of total oneness or unification with the object can take you all the way up to the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
It's simply a matter of the perception you hold in mind.
After the fourth jhana, you drop the perception of the form of the body — the still breath allows you to do this — and you can focus on the sense of space permeating the mist of sensations that remains.
After that perception of space is unwavering, you turn to focus on what's aware of the space.
That puts you into the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
To get beyond that, to the dimension of nothingness, you have to drop the oneness.
But these tactics work only after this sense of total oneness is developed and strong.
It takes some energy to do this.
You've got to throw all your energy into being one with the breath.
But you find that by giving all your energy, you get a lot of energy back.
That's when everything in the body is really awake.
Your sense of awareness permeates every cell.
The breath permeates every cell.
It flows so well that the in-and-out breath can grow more and more still.
This is when your preoccupation with the object of your meditation really does become one, not simply in the sense that it's the one thing you're talking about to yourself.
Actually, you're not talking about it much any more.
You're just in with it.
And it fills the whole range of your awareness.
When you do this, you find that any movement of mental chatter in the mind becomes very obvious.
When you see it, just drop it, drop it, drop it.
When a little stirring happens in your awareness, zap it before you even know what it's going to talk about.
This is not the time for chatter.
You've got something much better going on here.
The mind is snug with the breath like a hand inside a glove, totally surrounded in the breath.
The breath has you surrounded on all sides.
You're not pulling back to watch it from outside.
You're totally immersed in it.
To use a phrase from the Pali, this is kayagata-sati: Your mindfulness is immersed in the body, your awareness is totally surrounded by the breath, totally surrounded by the body.
Once you can do this, just try to maintain it in a very balanced state.
Part of the mind might object: “This is stupid.
You're not thinking about anything.” But that's precisely the point: You don't have to think about anything.
The mind needs this opportunity to rest, to gain energy.
Ajaan Lee compares this to putting a knife in a scabbard.
You want to make sure that your knife is sharp when you need it, so you have to protect it.
Put it in something that keeps it snug and protected on all sides.
When you need it to cut something, you take the knife out of the scabbard.
Because it's sharp, it can cut right through things.
But in the meantime, you've got to keep your mind well protected, well energized.
This is when the mind enters into fixed penetration in a very strong and solid way.
This is the heart of the path.
The other factors will come out of this and surround this — or, as the Buddha says, support this.
But this oneness of the mind with its object is the center from which everything else happens.
Ajaan Lee talks about this as the point where all four frames of reference — the body in and of itself, feelings in and of themselves, the mind in and of itself, mental qualities in and of themselves — all become one.
You could look at this sense of oneness as any one of the four.
From one perspective it's body, from another it's feeling, or mind, or mental qualities.
But they're all here in the same place.
If you want to see the actual distinctions among them you have to bring them together first.
If you draw lines around them before making them one, the lines tend to come more from your ignorance than from genuine knowledge.
But if you make them one, then when they finally do separate out, it's not because you tried to pry them apart.
Ajaan Lee's analogy is of heating a piece of rock containing different kinds of ore.
You heat it to a certain temperature, and the silver melts out; at another temperature, the gold melts out; at another temperature, the tin — all of their own accord.
In other words, you're not dividing things up in terms of your preconceived notions.
Instead, you put the energy of this oneness into the breath, to make everything one.
That's when things are allowed to separate in a natural way, in ways that you may not have expected.
But in the meantime, keep trying to make them one.
Get really good at this.
This is an essential skill in the meditation.
As for the insight that will arise from this, you don't have to worry about it, at least not yet.
Just make sure the foundation is solid.
People often ask how to bring the practice into daily life.
The answer is relatively simple.
It's one many people don't like to hear, but it is simple: restraint.
There are basically two kinds of restraint.
There's restraint in what you do, and restraint in how you look and listen and smell and taste and feel and think about things — in other words, restraint in what goes out, and restraint in what comes in.
And both kinds of restraint require a good amount of skill.
Take restraint of the senses: There's a skill to looking, a skill to listening.
You want to look at things in such a way that you're not exciting greed, anger, or delusion.
You want to listen to things in such a way that you don't excite greed, anger, or delusion.
And so on down through the senses.
This is a skill.
You want to be able to do it in such a way that you don't starve yourself of pleasures to the point where you break down and suddenly find yourself in front of an open refrigerator, scarfing down a gallon of ice cream.
You need to know how to keep the mind well fed even as you're starving your defilements.
In mastering this skill, it helps to have concentration as a foundation.
The texts often give restraint of the senses as a prerequisite for concentration, but as is so often the case in the Buddha's teachings, the two qualities actually help each other along.
Try to notice when you look at something: Does your attention go flowing out?
Do you lose your sense of the body?
If you do, it's a sign that your looking isn't all that skillful.
You want to be able to stay in the body as you look, as you listen, to maintain your sense of the breath energy throughout the body.
If you can't, that's a sign either that you're looking for the purpose of forgetting the body — in other words, you're looking for the purpose of greed, anger, or delusion — or you're simply careless, and the sight, the sound, the smell, or the taste, whatever, happened to catch you off guard.
That's how most people look and listen and smell and taste and feel and think about things.
They forget their inner center and suddenly find themselves centered outside, trying to get some pleasure from grabbing onto a sight or a sound and then elaborating on it — either to make it more attractive or to make it seem more meaningful than it actually is.
If the mind is in a mood for a little bit of anger, you focus on the things that would provoke the anger and then you can elaborate on it, proliferate as much as you like.
Those are where our skills tend to be.
We're great at proliferating.
But if you think of input at the senses as a kind of food for the mind — which is how the Buddha sees it — you have to ask yourself: Are you preparing good food for the mind or junk food?
Or poisonous food?
That's the kind of cooking we're used to.
We think we're cooking up great meals, but they can make us sick.
So you've got to learn a new way to cook for the mind.
The Buddha counts sensory input among the four foods for consciousness.
It actually includes three of the four: contact at the senses; intentions at the senses — why you're looking at these things, listening to these things to begin with; and then consciousness of the act of sensing.
These three aspects of sensory input are what the mind is feeding on all the time.
The basic skill in learning new ways to cook this food is to focus on the breath and get the mind centered inside.
You're actually changing the level of the mind when it's inside the body in this way.
Instead of being on the sensual level, it's suddenly on the level of form, which is a higher level than the level of sensual desire.
Even though there may be the desire to stay here at the level of form, it's a skillful desire because it raises the level of the mind.
You're not so dependent on things outside for your happiness, so you're in a position where you can look at sensual pleasures from above.
At the same time, you're learning how to make the most of what you've already got.
As Ajaan Lee says, it's like learning how to grow food on your own property rather than invading the property of others to plant crops on their land.
Learn how to develop a sense of ease, a sense of fullness and refreshment right here in the body.
Make that your food.
Try to preserve and protect that level of the mind.
That's the skill in how you look at things and listen to things: maintaining this sense of the center in the body, a sense of ease, refreshment, and fullness no matter what happens outside.
That puts the mind on a higher plane — and in a much better position.
When you handle restraint of the senses in this way, you're not depriving the mind.
You're simply learning how to give the mind better food, to nourish it in a healthier way, a way that's totally blameless.
Sometimes you hear people talking about the dangers of getting attached to jhana, as if it were a huge monster waiting to ambush you on the side of the path.
But the dangers of jhana are relatively minor.
The dangers of being stuck on the sensual level, though, are huge.
When your happiness is dependent on sensory pleasures being a certain way, it can lead to all sorts of unskillful behavior as you try to keep on feeding the mind the kind of sights, sounds, etc., it likes.
This is why we see so much killing and stealing, illicit sex, lying, getting drunk around us in the world.
All the precepts get broken because of people's attachment to the pleasures of the senses.
You don't see anybody killing or stealing because of their attachment to jhana.
So even though this is an attachment, it's a better one.
And when your happiness is not dependent on things outside being a certain way, people outside have less power over you.
We see this so much these days.
All they have to do is wave the red flag: “There's danger out there; there are terrorists out there; they can harm us.
We've got to do all kinds of evil things to stop them.” That's what they tell us.
If the mind's only nourishment is things outside, you're going to be swayed by those arguments.
But when you can step back, and say, “No, I've got a source of pleasure, a source of happiness inside, that people outside can't touch,” then you're much less likely to be led astray.
In this way, your ability to find nourishment inside is protection for the mind.
The pleasures of the world outside hold a lot less poison because you're not trying to feed on them anymore.
They're still there, but you can learn how to handle them more skillfully, use them more skillfully, as you try to make the mind even stronger.
For instance, there will be times in your meditation when things aren't going as well as you'd like.
In cases like that, it can be helpful to go outside and look at the beauty of nature around you — the clouds, the sunset, the moon and the stars at night — to help clear and refresh your mind.
There are passages in the Canon where MahaKassapa, who was one of the strictest and sternest of the Buddha's disciples, talks about the beauty of nature.
The constant refrain in his verses is of how the hills, the mountains bathed in rain, and the jungle refresh him.
Some of the first wilderness poetry in the world is in the Pali Canon — an appreciation of the beauties of not just nature but of wild nature.
That sort of appreciation is part of the skill in learning how to gladden the mind.
What this comes down to is that, as the Buddha said, even something as simple as looking or listening can be developed as a skill.
You look and listen while at the same time trying to maintain your sense of being centered inside.
This is one of the best measurements for how much greed, anger, or delusion is lurking in the mind and pushing it around.
If you catch the mind flowing out to a particular object, there you are: You've found a defilement.
Many of us in the West don't like the word “defilement.” We deny that there's anything defiled in our minds and yet, when the mind is clouded by desire, narrowed by desire, that's precisely what the Buddha means.
Your sense of inner awareness gets obscured and narrowed as your attention goes flowing out.
According to Ajaan Lee, the tendency to flow out to things is the meaning of asava: effluent or fermentation.
That kind of looking and listening — the kind where your mind flows out to the object — is unskillful looking, unskillful listening.
If you're skillful, you can stay inside while you see and hear.
When you catch the mind in the course of flowing out, you've learned an important lesson: that there's still greed, anger, and delusion in the mind.
If you want to look for it, here it is.
Only when you see it can you actually do something about it.
You begin to sense the danger of falling for those currents.
You develop the motivation to want to do something about it, so that you don't have to get pushed around like this any more.
You find ways of stopping the flow at its source.
This is where you find that being inside the form of the body really is a higher level of food for the mind, a higher level of happiness, a better place to be.
You want to do everything you can to stay here, regardless of what happens outside.
When a wildfire swoops down the mountainside at you, you want to stay right where you are.
You may want to move the body, of course, but you want your center to stay right here inside the body.
When disappointments come in life, you still want to stay here and not let the disappointments from outside make inroads into the mind.
When a cold wave comes, a heat wave comes, you want to be able to find your refreshment, your sense of wellbeing, here in the body.
This is why restraint of the senses is not deprivation.
It's actually a way of feeding the mind better food, giving it a higher level of pleasure.
But you can't have everything.
If you go for the more dangerous food, you miss out on the better food.
You've got to make the choice: health food or junk food.
In that sense, restraint is a form a deprivation.
But it's actually a trade.
You're getting something better in return.
As you go through the day, keep asking yourself that question: “What am I feeding on right now?
And what is it saying about the mind?
What am I learning about the mind by watching the way I feed?” In this way, the simple act of looking or listening is part of the practice.
If you do it skillfully, it's nourishment for the practice.
It keeps it going.
The path doesn't provide refreshment for the mind only while you sit here with your eyes closed, or while you're doing walking meditation.
When you know how to exercise restraint, you can gain refreshment throughout the day.
There's a continuity in the practice.
When you sit down and close your eyes, you're right here.
You don't have to spend the whole hour pulling the mind in like a cat on a leash, because it's already here.
You've already been developing the wisdom and discernment that protect the mind, keeping it here.
You don't have to cook them up fresh every time you sit down and meditate.
So think of everything you do throughout the day as a skill, including the way you exercise restraint.
Sometimes that means not looking at or listening to the things you don't know how to deal with yet — like a beginning boxer who knows enough not to take on a world champion.
But you won't have to go through life with blinders on all the time.
You can teach yourself how to look at things that used to set off your anger or set off your lust, but you do it in a new way, a way in which they don't set you off.
If there's something you feel greed for, look at the unattractive side of getting: what would be involved in trying to gain that thing and keep it.
If there's lust, think of the unattractive side of the human body: your own and that of everyone around you.
As Ajaan Lee would say, look at things with both eyes, not just one.
And furthermore, stay centered right here while you're doing your looking so that you can check and see if, as you're looking and listening, you're really staying separate from the defilement.
Or are you sneaking it in, are you flowing along with it?
This is why restraint is a good check on the mind, in two senses of the word check: Not only to stop it, but also to keep tabs on what's actually going on.
If the defilements seem really quiet while you sit in meditation, well, here's your chance to test them.
Do they flow out during the rest of the day?
Restraint is what provides continuity to the practice.
If you do it skillfully, your looking and listening all become part of the practice.
They can keep you on the path all day long.
     In Thailand, it's common that when an ajaan arrives at a monastery he's never been to before and wants to check out how serious the monks are about practicing, he looks at the walking meditation paths.
If they're well swept and obviously well worn by walking, he takes it as a good sign.
One of the reasons, of course, is that if you look at the place where someone sits you can't see how worn it is through the sitting, whereas walking wears a rut in the path.
But the other reason is that walking meditation is an essential part of the practice that people tend to underestimate.
By and large we emphasize the sitting and see the walking simply as an opportunity to get a change of pace from the sitting, to get up and stretch our legs a bit.
But that's not the only purpose for the walking.
In the Canon, when the Buddha talks about the benefits of walking meditation, some of them are health benefits, but in terms of the mind, he says that the concentration developed while walking is not easily destroyed.
This is an important point to ponder.
When we sit quietly, we're trying to get the mind still, and we try to keep the body still as a way of helping the mind along.
But you also want to be able to keep the mind still in the midst of movement, in the midst of activity.
That's where walking meditation comes in.
When you get up from your sitting meditation to walk, try to maintain the same center you had while sitting.
You might think of it as a bowl full of oil that you're carrying with you as you get up from the seat and walk over to the path and continue walking.
You don't want to spill a drop.
That requires a readjustment in where you keep your focus.
Normally, when you open your eyes, the first tendency is for your awareness to go flowing out the eyes, out into the world of your visual sphere.
You lose some of your sense of being inside the body.
So remind yourself not to lose that sense.
Maintain it even as you open your eyes.
You may find that this can knock you off balance the first time you try it, for it means finding a different kind of balance from what you're used to.
But it's important that you develop this new sense of balance, this sense of being fully inside your body, fully in the breath, even while walking, even while moving, even while negotiating with the surroundings in which you walk, because eventually you want to get to the point where you can maintain that same sense of center in the midst of all your activities — talking, working, eating, whatever — wherever you are.
And this is a good first step in that direction.
Walking meditation is a means of connecting your sitting meditation with mindfulness throughout daily life.
If, when you get on your walking path, you find that your center has slipped, immediately bring it back.
Then walk to the end of the path at a normal pace — or slightly slower, if you find it helps your concentration — but don't walk at an abnormally slow pace or you won't get the practice you need in bringing centered mindfulness to your normal activities.
Don't glance around at the trees or the other sights around you.
Keep your eyes downcast, focused on the path several steps in front of you.
You can hold your hands in front of the body or in back, the important point being that you don't swing your arms around.
When you get to the end of the path, stop for a brief second to reestablish mindfulness in case it slipped away while you were walking, and then turn, stop for a second, and walk back in the other direction.
Always try to turn in the same direction, either clockwise or counter-clockwise, to the right or to the left, so that you don't have to keep deciding which way you're going to turn at the end of the path.
Aside from that, try to maintain the same sense of center you had while sitting with your eyes closed.
In other words, focus on the breath.
Even though you're walking and looking ahead to make sure you don't trip over things, you want to maintain the sense of being centered in the breath as much as possible.
Don't let the looking and the walking pull you away from your center.
This requires practice, maintaining a center in the midst of movement.
This is important for two main reasons.
One, as I said just now, is that it gets you used to maintaining your center in other activities as well, so that even when you're engaged in complex activities, even when you're thinking about things, you can still have a sense of inhabiting the body, being centered within the breath.
You may have so many other things going on that you can't keep track of when the breath is coming in or going out, but you should be able to maintain a sensitivity to the energy tone in the body — where it's relaxed, where it's tight, what you can do to keep it relaxed and comfortable in all situations.
You're inhabiting the body.
You're not going off entirely into some other thought world.
This keeps you grounded.
It gives you a place to return to as soon as you've done whatever work needs to be done in that thought world.
Otherwise, you hop trains, from one train of thought to the next train of thought, like a hobo, and you end up in Lincoln, Nebraska.
Whereas, if you're grounded here, as soon as the thought world has done its work, you're back here with the breath again.
That way you can stay grounded in the midst of your different activities.
You don't get lost in the course of the day.
The other reason why it's important to develop this ability to stay centered in the midst of activity, is that while you're doing walking meditation, you begin to observe how the mind slips out.
It's often the case that you gain insight into the movements of the mind a lot more easily while you're walking than while you're sitting, because when you're sitting, everything is supposed to be totally still.
You don't have to pay attention to anything else at all.
You can clamp down on everything and get very, very centered, very, very still.
But while you're walking, you still have to watch; you still have to move; there are decisions to be made even in the simple matter of walking.
Where you're going to place your eyes, where you're going to step, noticing how close you are to the end of the path: simple things, but they're movements of the mind.
And when the mind moves that way, it's easy for other intentions to sneak into the movement to divert it to their own ends.
If you're not careful, they'll pull you away.
But if you get used to looking for them, you gain a sense of how the mind tends to flow out.
Luang Pu Dune talks about this in his short definitions of the four noble truths.
The mind that goes flowing out, he says is a cause of stress.
It's good to be able to catch that flowing out in action, to see the current, to see how and why it moves, and to get practice in not flowing along with it.
Ajaan Lee also talks about this in his discussion of mind as a frame of reference.
You start, he says, with a sense of awareness that's still and bright.
Then a current flows out from that awareness and goes to sense objects.
Sometimes it's looking for something to get angry about, sometimes for something to get greedy about.
The reason we don't notice what's happening is that we tend to go with the flow.
But if you put yourself in the same position as when you're doing walking meditation — that you're going to stay still even though other things have to move — you can develop the skill needed to stay still while the current of the mind is flowing out, and you don't go with it.
You watch it go for a little ways, and because you're not inhabiting it, it just falls short of its mark and dies.
So you get to see the mind in action and yet not get carried away by the action.
This way it's a lot easier not to go along with everything that comes flowing through the mind.
You get a stronger sense of the observer that can watch the movements of the mind as events, not as worlds to inhabit.
If you got into those worlds, they'd turn into all kinds of stories and take you to a dark place on the outskirts of Bangkok, shoot you, and dump you out of the car.
But when you see them simply as events, you don't get involved unless you see clearly that they really are useful.
This puts you in a much better position not to get carried away by things.
The same ability to watch movement but not move along with it, helps you analyze your own concentration.
The Canon talks about developing an ability to step back a bit from your concentration after you've mastered it.
In the first stages of concentration practice, the Buddha recommends learning how to indulge in the concentration, enjoy it, immerse yourself in it, really get absorbed.
In other words, you fully plant your mind in the object and become one with it.
While you're doing that, you can't think analytically about what you're doing at all.
You're totally focused on the one object, the one perception.
You may adjust it a little here, a little there, but when you've done enough adjusting, you allow yourself to get immersed in it.
While you're in that state, you can't do much analyzing of any sort.
But then the Buddha talks about stepping back a bit.
The image he gives is of a person sitting, looking at someone who's lying down, or of a person standing, looking at someone who's sitting.
You're above the other person a bit, and you can observe what the other person looks like, what he or she is doing.
In the same way, you can learn how to observe the mind while it's still.
You aren't so totally implanted in the object, but at the same time you don't totally leave concentration.
The reason you can do this is because you've developed the skill through walking meditation for the observer to be still even though there's a little bit of movement in the mind.
This way you can observe your state of concentration.
The Buddha recommends lots of ways you can observe it.
Look for whatever you can recognize as form, feeling, perception, thought construct, or consciousness within the concentration, and then contemplate its behavior.
One simple way is contemplating the activity of perception.
To what extent does the perception you're using as a marker for your concentration create stress or disturbance for the mind?
Learn to observe that perception, the label you place on things, as an act of the mind.
There's an element of intention behind it.
Or, many times, there's a whole frame of reference for that particular perception, a whole world of background.
But if you can see the perception as an activity with a beginning, a middle, and an end, you see that the perception is one thing, the actual object of the perception is something else.
One of the classic analogies the Buddha gives is of a mirage.
You see a tree in the mirage, even though the actual tree is much farther away than the image of the tree in the mirage.
The tree in the mirage is one thing; the actual tree is something else.
They're connected but separate.
When you can see the distinction between the perception and the actual object, you can start seeing the perception in motion and see what kind of effect it has as part of a causal chain.
That way, you can see which kinds of perceptions are helpful, which ones are not.
Ajaan Lee points this out in his breath meditation instructions.
The way you perceive the breath in the first jhana is going to be different from the way you perceive it in the second, the third, or the fourth.
In the fourth jhana, you perceive the breath as a still energy field.
What you've done is to tune in to a still energy field that's already there in the body.
The way you can tune in is through this perception.
What do you have in your current range of awareness that's breath energy but still?
If you can't focus on that just yet, focus on the perception of breathing in, breathing out, trying to get the right length of breath, the right quality of breath.
That will help you to get centered and to settle down.
But there will come a point where the understanding of the breath that got you into concentration gets in the way of your moving to more subtle levels of concentration.
So you need alternative ways of perceiving breath in the body.
Instead of focusing on the in-and-out breath, try focusing on the subtle breath energies that flow through the blood vessels, flow through the nerves.
They're a very subtle form of the in-and-out breath.
Then there's a more subtle energy that goes very fast.
As soon as you start thinking of breathing in, it's already gone around the body, throughout the body, from head to toe.
And then there's another level of energy, the still breath, something that's always there, regardless of whether there's an in-breath or an out-breath.
Ajaan Lee mentions one of the energy centers where you can access this — where the diaphragm connects to the rib cage right under your lungs — but there are other spots where you can first access it as well.
The in-breath and out-breath can impinge on this still energy, can squeeze it, but if you decide not to let the in-and-out breathing interfere with that sense of still energy, you can then let that sense of stillness suffuse the whole body.
You move to a deeper level of concentration, where everything feels wide open, still, and free.
You've done this by focusing on your perceptions as events, testing their results, and then changing them to give better results.
As you grow more proficient at this, you can start observing the entire process, to see how perceptions shape your experience as a whole.
That's one way of developing a sense of disenchantment and disengagement, seeing how what you thought were the raw data of experience are already shaped by perception.
This is one way to develop insight in the course of practicing concentration.
This all depends on that ability to observe the mind in action and yet not get caught up in the action.
And this is why walking meditation is so important, because it helps give you practice in perfecting that ability.
So don't think of the walking simply as something you do when you get too tired to sit, or as something where you simply go through the motions until you're ready to sit again.
It's not a meditation break; it's an essential part of the meditation.
It develops an added skill, the skill to be centered in the body not only while the body is still, but also while the body is moving.
Walking meditation teaches you to be still in the midst of movement, to get a stronger sense of the mind as the observer that doesn't move along with the things it observes.
Remember that chant about respect for concentration.
It doesn't apply only to sitting concentration.
It also applies to walking meditation as an essential skill in your concentration practice.
To develop respect for these things, as the Buddha said, puts you in the presence of nibbana.
If you've ever opened a book to look at dependent co-arising, your first impulse was probably to close the book because the topic is so complex.
But actually there are some good basic lessons you can learn, even from your first impressions.
The primary factor is ignorance.
That's what starts suffering in motion.
When you replace the ignorance with knowledge, that cuts the chain of causes and conditions leading to suffering.
So it's good to know precisely what kind of knowledge is called for here: knowledge of the four noble truths.
This is why right view is always given as the first factor in the noble eightfold path.
It starts with conviction in your actions: that your actions are real, that they really do have results, and that the quality of the results is determined by the quality of the mental state engendering the action.
It's within this context that the four noble truths make sense.
After all, suffering is a result of a particular mental action, or a series of mental actions — craving and ignorance being primary.
If mental actions didn't have an impact on your life, the four noble truths would be meaningless.
This, of course, directs us to where we have to practice: We've got to train the mind.
Notice that each of the four noble truths entails a particular duty, each of which is a skill to be mastered.
You're trying to comprehend suffering so that you can let go of its cause.
You develop the path so that you can realize the end of suffering.
Those are the duties you have to master as skills.
This is why in the Buddha's teaching there's no big controversy over sudden versus gradual Awakening.
The kind of knowledge we're developing here, like any skill, is incremental.
The more you work on it, the more sensitive you get.
Ultimately you reach a point where you really understand.
The image in the texts is of the continental shelf off of India.
It's a gradual slope and then there's a sudden drop-off.
It's not all or nothing.
The build-up is important, because the build-up is what makes you more sensitive.
Only when you're really sensitive can you have those “Aha” moments that really go deep into the mind, open things up, change your perspective on everything.
This is why the eightfold path is not only composed of right view, but also other factors that help to increase your ability to know, to learn, to be aware of the mind, and to help you let go of the factors that obscure the mind.
That's why one of the Buddha's terms for the path is “developing and letting go.” You're developing clarity of mind; you're letting go of the things that obscure and defile the mind.
So that's the big, important factor in the chain of causes and conditions: whether you're operating out of the right view of the four noble truths, or the wrong view of ignorance.
The other point that will immediately strike you if you look at dependent co-arising is how many of the factors come prior to sensory contact.
Things don't just begin with sensory contact.
You bring a whole load of preconditions to any experience, and working on those preconditions is what's going to make all the difference.
For instance, building right off of ignorance there are what they call fabrications.
The way you breathe, if it's done in ignorance, can contribute to suffering.
That's physical fabrication.
Verbal fabrication consists of the way you direct your thoughts to things and then comment on them.
If this is done in ignorance, it's going to lead to suffering.
Mental fabrication consists of perceptions and feelings: If you fabricate these things out of ignorance, they're going to lead to suffering as well.
This is why a large part of the practice is focused on the issue of perception: the way you label things, how they fit into the larger picture of your thoughts.
And this is why the Buddha didn't just sit people down, and say, “Okay, just be in the present moment and don't think about anything else.” He would often start his instructions by leading up to an understanding of why we're in the present moment, exactly what we're trying to look for in the present moment, what we're going to do about it when we see it.
This is why there are so many analogies and images in the Canon.
They give you a framework for understanding what you're doing.
And again, many of the images and analogies have to do with skills: Being a skillful meditator is like being a skillful cook, carpenter, or archer.
There's a skillful way to perceive; there's even a skillful way to feel.
Feeling comes not only from raw data, streaming in from the outside, but also from an element of fabrication and mental impulse.
A physical impulse comes up your nerves, and your mind processes it before you're really conscious of it.
What we're trying to do as we meditate is to learn how to bring some of these unconscious processes into the light of day.
And a central element in these processes is the way you perceive things.
You can consciously train yourself to perceive things in more useful, more skillful ways.
There's a series of meditations called guardian meditations, which are very helpful in using skillful perceptions to get the mind in the right mood, in the right attitude, with the right understanding, as you come into the present moment.
You'll often find, as you're sitting here meditating on the breath, that the problem is not with the breath.
It's with the mental baggage you're carrying with you.
So you want to open up the bags and throw out all the unnecessary weight.
There's an image they have in Thailand of the old woman who carries around a huge bundle of straw on her back.
She's always bent over because she's carrying so much straw.
People ask her why she doesn't put it down, and she says, “Well, someday this straw's going to come in handy, so I'm carrying it for the day I'll need it.” So she carries it wherever she goes.
Of course there are many other things she could be carrying, but she can't because the straw is such a huge bundle, and of course it's pretty useless.
So you want to look into your baggage to see how much straw you're carrying around, so that you can lighten your load.
Then you can replace it with better things, things that really will be useful.
And the guardian meditations are a good way of sorting things out in your baggage.
The first guardian meditation is recollection of the Buddha, keeping in mind his Awakening, reflecting on it as a central event in the history of the world.
The fact of his Awakening shows that through human effort true happiness can be found.
It's an important point to keep in mind because so much of our modern culture tries to say, “Hey.
You can't have an ultimate and deathless happiness, but you can have the happiness that comes from our eggbeater with an MP player built right into the handle,” or whatever.
In other words, they keep you focused on what you can get out of buying their stuff, which is all pretty miserable.
How many articles in The Onion are based on this: “Woman discovers that buying that new mop did not deliver the fulfillment that she hoped it would bring to her life.” In other words, our culture keeps us aiming pretty low: “Go for the quick fix.
Go for something that doesn't require any effort or skill on your part, just money.” They dress it up, make it sound like you'll be really happy if you buy their stuff.
So it's important to keep in mind that there was someone in the past who found true happiness and it was through his own efforts.
And, as he said, it wasn't because he was a special god or anything.
It was simply through developing qualities of mind that we can all develop — man, woman, child, lay or ordained: ardency, resolution, heedfulness.
We all have these qualities to some extent.
It's simply a matter of developing them.
The same with virtue, concentration, discernment: These are things we all have to some extent.
It's simply a matter of learning how to make them all-around.
So when you're tempted to go for the quick but short happiness, remind yourself, “The Buddha says that true happiness is possible, and that it can be gained through human effort.” Do you want to live your life without exploring that possibility?
Or do you just want to write it off?
In this way, keeping the Buddha's Awakening in mind is an important perception, an important perspective, to bring to all of your experiences.
And there are many other things that you can gain by thinking about the Buddha's life: the sort of person he was, his last message to be heedful.
He was the sort of person who had already found true happiness.
He didn't need to gain anything from anyone else, but he went out and he taught for years, walking around Northern India.
Wherever there was someone who was ready to be taught, ready to benefit from his teachings, he would walk there.
That's the kind of person who taught this Dhamma.
Not someone who was running a retreat center and needed to bring in cash, and who was willing to say anything to attract clientele, but someone acting totally out of pure motives, pure compassion.
So that's the kind of practice we're practicing as we follow his path.
And it's ennobling for us to practice in that lineage.
So these are good perceptions to hold in mind.
Especially when you're getting discouraged or tempted to give up on the practice, or if you think, “Well, maybe I'm not up to this”: Remember that the essential qualities for Awakening are qualities that everybody can develop.
But we have to develop them ourselves.
We can't depend on anyone outside to come and do it for us.
That's the other part of the message of the Buddha's life, the part that keeps you on your toes.
The second guardian meditation is goodwill.
You want to bring an attitude of goodwill to everybody around you.
When the Buddha talked about goodwill in the brahma-viharas, it wasn't ordinary, everyday goodwill.
It was goodwill all around, without limit.
That's not easy.
It doesn't come naturally to us.
We tend to have goodwill for certain people, and not so much for other people.
As a result, our actions very easily turn unskillful.
It's very easy to do harm to the people we don't care about or who aren't on our list of people who deserve to be happy.
And it's also easy to drop people from the list when the mood strikes us, to treat even the people we love in unskillful ways.
So to protect yourself from that kind of unskillful action, you've got to learn how to make your goodwill all-around, /.
That doesn't mean creating a cloud machine that sends out billowing clouds in all directions to hide your lack of goodwill.
When you start spreading thoughts of goodwill, first you spread it to people who are easy — the people you already love and like — and then to people who are harder.
Even though you don't like them, you can ask yourself: “Why would I not want this person to be happy?” After all, when people aren't happy, they can do cruel and miserable things.
The world would be a better place if everyone could find true happiness inside, regardless of whether you like them or not, or whether they've been good or not, or whether they're on your list of the “deserving.” And besides, who made you the National Bureau of Standards?
Why should your likes and dislikes rule the world?
In this way, goodwill meditation is meant to be a challenge for you to really think through why you'd want to limit your goodwill, and to remind yourself of why it's good to have goodwill for everyone.
You can't act on harmful intentions if your goodwill is all around.
This is why it's called a guardian meditation.
The third guardian meditation is of the foulness of the body.
A lot of people don't like this one.
If we took a poll of meditators here in the West, we'd probably find this at the bottom of the list of popular meditation topics, yet it's very useful.
Some people say, “Hey, I've already got a negative body image.
Why do you want me to make it even more negative?” Well, there's healthy negative body image, as well as an unhealthy one.
Unhealthy is when you see that your body is ugly, but other people have beautiful bodies.
Healthy is when you see that we all have the same garbage inside ourselves: Nobody's liver would win the Miss Universe contest.
This contemplation is helpful because it's a guardian.
It protects you from inappropriate lust.
There are so many people out there you could feel lust for, but if you acted on it you'd create a lot of trouble.
Even if you're not practicing celibacy, you need a way to guard yourself against that kind of vagrant lust.
So the next time you see an attractive person, instead of weaving all sorts of narratives from the ideas and associations you've developed around beauty, it's good to teach yourself other narratives, other associations.
Right under the skin, what have you got?
You've got all these blood vessels and nerves and uck!
And as you go deeper, it's gets more uck!
And what do you gain out of lusting for that?
Why would you want it?
This sort of contemplation really goes against the grain, which is one of the reasons why it's useful to reflect on over and over and over again.
Ajaan Maha Boowa keeps making the point: Don't count the number of times you've reflected on the foulness of the body.
Just keep doing it until it's done its job.
After all, our lusting after the human body is what led us to be born.
This is what keeps us wanting to come back, and it makes us do really stupid things.
So this contemplation is a useful tool to have in your arsenal.
It's a useful new set of perceptions to develop.
Our perceptions of beauty are dangerous, so it's good to learn how to see that beautiful bodies are not really beautiful.
All you have to do is look inside a little bit and you see all kinds of stuff that can kill the lust if you really allow yourself to look at the body as a whole, and not just at the few parts you tend to focus on as being attractive.
The fourth guardian meditation is recollection of death.
For most people this is pretty disturbing and depressing, but it's meant to be used in a way that's inspiring, that helps us to follow the path beyond death to the deathless.
Remind yourself that we've got this practice that allows us to prepare for death and transcend it.
Have you fully developed it?
Are you really prepared?
And the answer is almost always No.
Okay, then, you've got work to do.
This is a good antidote for laziness.
There's a great sutta where the Buddha talks about eight reasons for laziness and eight reasons for being diligent, and for both lists the external conditions are the same.
You can be lazy because you're feeling sick; you can be lazy because you are about to go on a trip; you can be lazy because you've just gotten back from a trip; you can be lazy because you just recovered from an illness; you can be lazy because you haven't eaten enough; you can be lazy because you've eaten too much.
But you can also use those circumstances to remind yourself: “I don't have much time.” When you just recover from an illness, instead of saying, “I'm still weak, I'm not quite well yet, let me rest,” you remind yourself: “I could get sick again.
I could have a relapse, but at least now I've some strength, let me give this strength to the practice.” If you haven't eaten enough, remind yourself, “The body is light; I'm not spending all that time and energy digesting my food, so I've got more energy now for the practice.” You've got the right conditions for sitting very quietly, very still.
So your attitude is what's going to make the difference between whether the circumstances you've got right now are reasons for laziness or reasons for diligence.
When you remind yourself that you don't know how much time you've got, it should stir you to action — so that when the time comes, when you really do have to go, you're ready, prepared.
You've got the concentration, you've got the power of discernment, you've got the strength of mind to deal with whatever comes your way.
If you sit around saying, “Please may I not die, please may I not die,” someday you'll still have to die no matter how much you plead.
A wiser attitude would be: “Please may I be ready when the time comes.
May I have the strength to deal with any difficulty that might come my way.” Then you realize that this is something you have in your power: to work on those strengths.
After all, we've got the example of how the Buddha died.
This is why these two recollections — recollection of the Buddha and recollection of death — go well together.
The Buddha shows you how you can prepare.
You look at the way he died: one last trip through all the jhanas.
He died with no suffering at all and gained total release.
It's possible for a human being to do this.
If you think that comparing yourself to the Buddha is too much of a stretch, think about the members of the Sangha.
You can read the verses of the elder monks and the elder nuns.
Some of them were pretty miserable, total losers in meditation at first, and yet they were able to pull themselves together.
They could do it; you can do it.
So these four contemplations are guardian meditations to bring wisdom into your perception of things, the labels and ideas you bring to your experience.
The more you develop them, then the better the set of associations, the better the set of narratives you bring to, say, just the fact you're breathing, or the fact you're seeing, hearing, tasting, or touching things in the present moment.
In other words, what you bring into the present moment is going to make all the difference.
This is why we train the mind.
This is why we practice — so that when the time comes to perform, you can perform well, in a way that doesn't lead to suffering.
You bring knowledge into the equation so that no matter which factor of dependent co-arising you're looking at — whether it's feelings, contact, craving, clinging, or whatever — you can untangle the conditions for suffering and replace them with conditions that lead to the end of suffering.
So learn how to develop these topics along with the breath.
They help put the whole practice into the right narrative, into the right perspective, and they protect you so that you aren't constantly causing suffering for yourself and the people around you.
That's the best protection there is.
There's a famous poem in Thailand about the amorous adventures of two men trying to outdo each other in terms of the number of women they can sleep with.
It's pretty light entertainment, but one of its most interesting passages is when one of the men is entering the apartments of a woman he's enamored with.
He opens the door and there's a folding screen painted with a story.
At that point the poem drops the story of the man and the woman, and goes into the story on the screen, describing not only the events depicted on the screen but also how they're depicted.
It turns out the woman herself had painted the screen.
So as the man goes from panel to panel, he not only learns the story but also gets a very good sense of what kind of person she is by the way she handled the scenes, how she painted the characters.
So even though you haven't met her yet in the poem, by the time you finish the story in the screen you know her through her handiwork.
This is a principle you find throughout Thai culture.
Back in the old days, people would learn about each other by the way they did things, by the things they made.
If you were a young man and wanted to appeal to a young woman, you'd carve a pole for her to carry over her shoulder when carrying gifts to the monastery.
And she'd get a very good sense of what kind of person you were both by the fact that you made a pole for that purpose, and by your handiwork in the way you carved it.
Most of us nowadays would be hopeless in a situation like that.
We're not used to making things.
This is one of our problems as meditators.
We don't have many physical skills; we haven't learned the mental qualities that go with developing a physical skill.
So we've got to go back and learn them from scratch.
This is why the training is not just a matter of sitting and walking; it's a whole lifetime.
All the things you do throughout the day are opportunities to develop mindfulness, alertness, learning how to be meticulous in what you do.
There's the saying, “How you do anything is how you do everything.” It may not be absolutely true, but it's close.
Ajaan Lee devotes almost a whole Dhamma talk to the topic of cleanliness.
The title of the talk is “Reflection on Virtue,” or “Recollection of Virtue,” but a good two-thirds of the talk is about being clean.
That's an important part of virtue.
In other words, while you're living here, don't think that the day-to-day facts of eating or having a place to sleep are minor matters to hurry through so you can get to the real business of meditating.
If you're sloppy with things outside, you're going to be sloppy with your meditation.
It's a basic principle.
You want to learn how to be meticulous, clean, neat, alert in all the things you do.
In that way, the activities become not a chore to be disposed of as quickly as possible, or something just getting in the way of your meditation.
They become part of the meditation.
After all the word for meditation is bhavana: It means “to develop.” You're developing qualities of mind.
And the mind that cleans your room is the same mind that tries to clean itself out.
If it's sloppy in cleaning the room, it's going to be sloppy in cleaning itself out.
So you've got to take these things seriously.
I remember Ajaan Fuang telling me about his time with Ajaan Mun, how Ajaan Mun was extremely meticulous, very clean about everything.
Even living out in the forest in the dry season when there was a lot of dust, his hut and everything around it was very neat, very clean.
Everything was in its right place.
Even the rags he used to wipe off his feet: He always kept them well washed.
If they got torn, he would sew them up.
He didn't let anything go to waste.
So try to have this attitude in all your activities.
When you're training the mind, the mind is there not only when you meditate.
It's the same mind that goes through the day: what you do, what you say, how you do your chores.
Those are the areas where you show the qualities of your mind.
Those are the areas where they're also being developed.
If you're developing sloppy, lazy habits in your day-to-day chores, those habits are going to get in the way of your meditation.
If you learn to be meticulous and neat, those habits will come help your meditation — because the mind is like a large tree.
Some trees — like banana trees — have only one shoot at the end.
They grow very fast but don't give much shade.
The trees that give a lot of shade are the ones that grow lots of branches.
There's a lot to be covered in training the mind.
It's not just a matter of mastering one single technique.
I was once asked the question, “How does someone who's mastered meditation overcome the problem of pride?” After all, you've been able to master this technique; you're pretty sharp.
Well, that happens mainly in places where everything is reduced to a meditation technique, in meditation centers where the people who meditate don't have anything else to do.
Everything gets channeled into that one shoot at the end of the banana tree.
Things may happen fast, but there's no shade.
It's an incomplete training.
The complete training has to go all around.
It has to deal with the way you treat other people, how you handle difficult situations.
Your whole life is part of the training, and in the course of the whole-life aspect of the training, you need to learn how to see how you've been sloppy, how you've been stupid, how you've been ignorant, how you've been thoughtless and careless.
If you don't see those things, you're not going to learn anything.
The experience is chastening instead of pride-inducing.
When the training is complete, every aspect of the mind has been trained, so that you're skilled at all kinds of activities, with an attitude nicely balanced between humility and pride.
Once, during my very first year with Ajaan Fuang, the time came for the kathina, which was the big event of the year.
Lots of people were going to come from Bangkok.
Some of them would have to be housed for a night or two before the kathina, and everybody would have to be fed.
I had a dream a few nights before they came that Ajaan Fuang had a huge closet with lots of different hats.
He would go into the closet and come out with one hat on, then go back in and come out with a different hat on.
And sure enough, in the preparation for the kathina, they had to put up bamboo sheds and they had to arrange for the extra kitchen areas — lots of different tasks — and he was good at supervising them all.
As later he told me, “Practicing the Dhamma is not just being good at sitting with your eyes closed.
It involves learning how to be skillful in everything you do.” This attitude that wants to be skillful: That's what's going to see you through lots of different problems.
If you don't give a damn about things outside, your mind is going to be a “don't-give-a-damn” kind of mind inside as well.
It gets apathetic, careless.
But if you make up your mind that whatever chore falls to you, you're going to try to do it skillfully, then you develop what are called the four bases for success: the desire to do it skillfully; the persistence that sticks with it till you've mastered it; intentness, paying a lot of attention to what you're doing; and analysis, using your powers of discernment to see what's not yet right, trying to figure out how to get around problems, how to solve them.
This fourth factor also involves ingenuity — all the active qualities of the mind.
The texts talk about these four bases of success specifically in conjunction with concentration, but a common teaching all over Thailand is that if you want to succeed at anything, you've got to develop these qualities of mind and apply them to whatever you have to do to succeed.
And regardless of what areas of your life you develop them in, you can take them and apply them to other areas of your life as well.
So see every aspect of your life as an opportunity to train the mind.
If you want to develop good strong powers of concentration, it's not just what you do while you're sitting with your eyes closed.
It's how you tackle any activity: learning how to be focused on that activity, learning to be strict with the mind when it starts wandering off.
That way the mind is right there; you learn how to keep it right there no matter what you're doing.
And when the time comes to sit down with your eyes closed, well, you're right there.
You don't have to go chasing the mind down.
So try to see the practice as a seamless whole.
The word bhavana, as I said, is “to develop.” You can develop your mind in any situation.
Don't think that the important insights are going to come only when you're sitting with your eyes closed.
There are many references to this point in the Canon.
One nun's mind finally came to a good solid concentration while she was washing her feet.
And the poem in which she tells of how this happened is interesting.
After she washes her feet, she goes into her hut and does all the things you're told to do in the Vinaya.
She checks the bed first before she sits down on it and then she takes a pin and pulls the wick out of the lamp to put out the light.
And as soon as the fire went out, she said, that was the moment of her Awakening.
She said the liberation of awareness was like the liberation of the fire.
So it's not only when you're sitting with your eyes closed that important things can occur to the mind, important insights can come, or that the mind can gather into one.
It's amazing.
Sometimes the mind can really get concentrated while you're just doing a chore if you approach the chore with the proper respect.
So remember that this tree of ours has lots of branches and they're all growing at once.
Things may seem slow because they're all growing at once, but at least you're getting a tree that offers really good shade once it's grown.
That's what it means for the mind to be well-trained: trained all-around.
You can watch the mind in its activities, so you want to make sure that it's well trained in everything it does.
Some of the chants we recite in the evening are meant to inspire us, and others are meant to warn us, to keep us grounded, to make sure we don't get lost in abstractions, in ideas that are not all that relevant to where we are.
Like the chant on the requisites.
It's there to remind us — day in, day out — that when you're born, you're born with a big lack.
You've got this body that needs food, needs clothing, needs shelter, needs medicine, and you're not born with an entitlement to those things.
If you were really entitled to them, they would come on their own.
The fact that they seem to come on their own when we're children is because our parents are looking after us, but that means they have to go out and do extra work just to provide for this big, gaping hole they've just given birth to.
And so as you grow up as a human being, you not only carry this huge load of needs around with you, but you also carry a big debt to the goodness, the work of other people.
It's important to keep that in mind.
Part of the reason for that chant is to give a sense of samvega.
You think about all the suffering that goes into making sure that we have the food we need to keep this body going, the clothing, the shelter, the medicine — not only from the work we ourselves have done to get these things, but also all the work and sacrifices that other beings make so that we can have them.
So we come to the practice with a huge debt.
And the Buddha encourages us to have a sense of gratitude to everyone who's provided for us — materially and in terms of the Dhamma — because otherwise we get complacent.
There's a saying that gratitude is the sign of a good person.
If you don't appreciate the goodness of other people, it's hard to make that extra effort needed to be a good person yourself.
So stop and reflect every day on the debts you owe to other people and the various ways you might be able to repay those debts.
This means that you should come to the practice not with a sense of entitlement but with a sense of how much you need the Dhamma practice to help compensate for the debts you've been accumulating over time.
Look at the monastery we have here.
It's come about through the generosity of lots and lots of different people.
They've been generous with their money, generous with their time, generous with their strength.
Everything we have here is the result of somebody's generosity.
One of the reasons we need to be really active in the practice, dedicated to the practice, not complacent in the practice, is because we've got this debt.
As the Buddha once said, the only people who are really debtless in this world are the arahants.
As long as we haven't yet reached that point, we still have a debt to other people, to the other beings all around us.
Whatever way we can build goodness through generosity of our own, observing the precepts, through the meditation, is a way of helping to repay that debt.
At the same time there's the question of keeping this teaching alive.
You need to have a sense of how precious this is, this teaching of the Dhamma.
It's not that beings get to meet with the Dhamma every lifetime.
There are whole eons where the world has no notion of the Dhamma at all.
We were born in a time when the Dhamma is still alive.
There are still people practicing.
The world is not empty of arahants.
So value your opportunity.
Think of your debt of gratitude to all the people who've kept this teaching alive, and do what you can to keep it alive for the people who come after you.
When you read Buddhist history, it can sometimes be a pretty depressing project, seeing how people take the Dhamma and bend it to other needs, other agendas, other ideas.
And yet there are always people who have a sense of the Dhamma's true purpose and work to bring the tradition back in line.
But think of all the difficulties they go through, like Ajaan Mun.
In his days the forest tradition had degenerated.
It was mainly composed of monks wandering around reciting magical spells, selling amulets to people.
It was a kind of business.
But he took the Vinaya and combined it with the forest practice and so rediscovered the way to Awakening.
At that time the Thai Buddhist hierarchy had decided that the way to nibbana was closed.
Nobody seemed to be going that way — that was the official line.
They even had made a survey of meditation temples to prove it.
And Ajaan Mun had to prove single-handedly that it wasn't true, so you can imagine what he was up against — not only his own defilements, but the disapproval of state and ecclesiastical officials.
When you read his biography, you learn just a little about the hardships he went through.
So try to develop a sense of gratitude for what he did, so that you can maintain the Dhamma in your practice as well.
Don't be guilty of the sort of changes in the Dhamma that someone else down the line is going to have to come along and straighten out.
Ideally we should come to the Dhamma not with a sense of entitlement, but with a sense of gratitude — a sense of how important it is and what's demanded of us to be equal to the Dhamma.
When we have that attitude, our Dhamma practice really starts getting results.
There's a lot demanded of us, but if we have a sense of conviction in the importance of the Dhamma, we'll be willing to make whatever effort's required.
Ajaan Fuang once told me that one of his prime motivations in practicing was that he was born into a poor family.
He didn't do well in school, he was orphaned at an early age, and as he was growing up he just didn't have anything to show for himself as a human being.
If you want to make your way in Thai society, you've got to have a lot of good connections.
Well, he had no connections, and he didn't have anything else to fall back on.
He realized that this was his only hope for any kind of happiness: to build up the goodness that Dhamma practice can provide.
So he threw himself into it, and his single-mindedness was what enabled him to attain what he did.
As we come to the Dhamma we need a strong sense of its importance — and a strong sense of our need for the Dhamma.
We come to it not because we're entitled but because we're in debt — to our parents, to all the other living beings who've contributed to the fact that we now have a body and are still alive.
Lots of people talk about interconnectedness as a wonderful thing, but it carries a lot of IOU's.
Try to think about this in a way that makes you willing and happy to repay those IOU's — understanding the need to repay them, and happy that you've found a way to meet that need.
Use that as a motivation to keep your Dhamma practice in line, to keep yourself devoted to the practice.
That way you benefit.
You get the full set of benefits that can come from the practice, and the people around you get a fuller sense of its benefits as well.
We're often impatient at the practice.
We want to go straight to insight, straight to the solution of all our problems, so we can then go back home and get on with the rest of our lives.
But you first have to put the mind in good shape before you can gain any insight.
You have to feed it well: That's what concentration is all about.
As the Buddha once said, if you don't have the pleasure and rapture that can come from at least the first jhana, you're always going to be tempted by sensuality.
Even if you understand the drawbacks of sensual pleasures and sensual desires, if you don't have this alternative way of finding happiness you're going to go back to your old ways.
No matter how much Dhamma you may have read or how precise your understanding of the intricacies of the Buddha's teachings, when the time comes to feed, you're going to go back and feed on the same old roadkill you've been feeding on all your life.
It's like Ajaan Chah's simile: Westerners, he once said, are like vultures.
When they fly, they fly very high, but when they eat, they eat low.
That's one of those quotes you don't normally see in books about Ajaan Chah, but it hits home.
We in the West tend to overlook our need for the groundwork provided by concentration.
The Buddha himself compared the happiness, pleasure, and equanimity that come from concentration to kinds of food.
His image was of a fortress at the edge of a frontier, and different qualities in the path correspond to different aspects of the fortress.
There's discernment, which is like a slippery wall that the enemy can't climb up.
Learning is like a range of weapons to fight off the enemy.
Mindfulness is like the gatekeeper who remembers who to let in and who not to let in.
And jhana, he said, is like stores of food.
The first jhana is like water and grass.
When you work up to the fourth jhana, you've got honey, butter, and ghee.
These are ways of nourishing the mind and providing for its right livelihood.
Even if you're not gaining any higher levels of insight, at least you're finding pleasure in a blameless place.
This qualifies as right livelihood in the path.
The more pleasure, the more a sense of wellbeing and stability you can develop from within, then the lighter your kammic footprint on the rest of the world, the less harm you're causing as you search for your livelihood, both physical and mental.
So as you're practicing concentration, you're developing several factors of the path at once.
There's right resolve, the resolve to renounce sensuality, to find a pleasure that's not involved with sensual passion; right mindfulness, which is the theme of right concentration; and right livelihood, looking after your needs in a skillful way.
Right livelihood is the poor stepsister of the eightfold path.
It's the factor that the Buddha hardly defines at all.
He simply says the disciple of the noble ones avoids wrong livelihood and makes his or her living through right livelihood — which doesn't tell you much.
Part of this may have been simply a question of etiquette.
There's only one passage in the Canon where the Buddha clearly comes out with a general statement condemning certain trades as wrong livelihood.
He lists five — trading in poison, trading in weapons, trading in intoxicants, trading in meat, and trading in human beings as slaves — saying that the disciple of the noble ones avoids them.
You don't set yourself up with a shop to sell alcohol, poison, weapons, meat, or slaves.
But otherwise the Buddha is very circumspect when talking about other people's occupations.
There are two cases where people of questionable professions come to him.
One is an actor; the other, a professional soldier.
They say pretty much the same thing.
“Our teachers who taught us to be actors,” the actor says, “claimed that if you spend your life entertaining people with your imitations of reality, making them laugh, you're going to attain the heaven of laughter after death.
What does Master Gotama have to say about that?
The Buddha twice refuses to answer, but the actor keeps after him, and asks him a third time.
So the Buddha finally says, “Well, it looks like I can't get anywhere with you by saying I don't want to answer that.
So I'll answer you.” He goes on to say that if, as you're acting, you give rise to greed, anger, and delusion in your audience, and your motivation for acting is greed, anger, and delusion, then after you die you're going to go to the hell of laughter — i.e., not the place where people laugh with you, but where they laugh at you.
So the actor breaks into tears.
The Buddha says, “See?
That's why I didn't want to answer your question.” The actor says, “No, I'm not crying because of what you said.
I'm just crying because I've been deceived by my teachers for so long.
Similarly with the soldier.
The soldier says, “I was taught that if you die in battle, you're going to go to the heaven of heroes.
What does Master Gotama have to say about that?” Again, the Buddha twice refuses to answer.
When pushed for the third time, he finally says, “When you're in the midst of battle, giving rise to the desire for the killing of other beings — 'May these other beings suffer, may they be harmed, may they be killed' — that mind state, if you die then, will take you to the hell of heroes who die in battle.” Like the actor, the soldier breaks into tears and the Buddha says, “See?
That's why I didn't want to answer your question.” And the soldier, like the actor, says, “No, I'm not crying because of what you said.
I'm just crying because I've been deceived for so long by my teachers.
The Buddha's etiquette here is interesting.
He didn't set out on a crusade against actors or professional soldiers or advertising people or whatever.
Only if he was pushed would he condemn a particular occupation.
Otherwise, what he would ask you to do is to reflect on your means of livelihood.
Is it harming other beings?
Does it involve lying?
Does it involve unskillful mental states?
If it does, maybe you should look for another occupation — which, of course, may take time.
This may have been one of the reasons why the Buddha observed that etiquette, for a lot of people are stuck in their occupation.
It's going to take a while for them to disentangle themselves if they realize that their means of livelihood is unskillful.
But there's another side to right livelihood, and that's looking at your attitude toward what you consume.
This is one of the reasons why we have that chant every evening, looking back on our use of the requisites during the day.
Why did you use the requisites?
Actually that chant is for when you didn't reflect while you were using the requisites.
Ideally, you should reflect while you're eating: why are you eating now?
When you put on your clothes, why are you putting these clothes on?
When you fix up your house or your hut, why are you fixing it up in this way?
When you take medicine, why are you taking this particular medicine now?
What's your motivation?
The chant reminds you of the ideal motivation: Wear clothing to protect yourself from the elements, to cover up the parts of body that cause shame.
Take food not to put on bulk, not for the fun or the flavor of it.
After all, those who provided the food that you're eating — the farmers who worked, the animals who gave up their lives — didn't provide it in fun.
You take the food simply so you can continue practicing, so you can eliminate hunger pains and yet at the same time not overstuff yourself until there's the discomfort that comes from eating too much.
You're not eating just for the flavor of the food; you're eating for the nourishment of the body, so that you can practice in ease.
Your use of shelter should simply be to protect yourself from the elements and to provide a place where you can be quiet, find some privacy, so you can practice.
And as for medicine, you use it to eliminate pain and to maintain freedom from disease, that's all.
When you think about these things, it forces you to look at your impact when you eat, when you buy clothing, when you buy any of these things and use them: What is your impact on the world?
The fact that you're alive and breathing means that you have a lot of needs, and the needs can be met only by relying on others.
What way can you rely on others so that you're not harming them or causing them unnecessary pain?
This reflection ties in with one of the important principles of what are called the customs of the Noble Ones, which is contentment with your material possessions.
When you think in these ways, you find that you're buying less, using less, because you're looking elsewhere for your happiness.
I.e., you're looking inside.
This is where the concentration comes in.
This is why concentration is an important element of right livelihood.
It provides you the honey, the butter, the grain, and the other foods you need for the mind, for your true happiness deep down inside.
At the same time, this happiness provides you with a good foundation for the insights that are going to come as you start looking at the various ways in which you keep on taking birth.
Because, again, the fact you're taking birth is placing a burden on other beings, a burden on the world.
The insights you're going to need to stop that process can be pretty harsh.
As the Buddha said, when you take food, think about the story of the couple who were going across the desert with their only child.
They got more than halfway across the desert and ran totally out of food.
They realized that if they didn't eat anything, all three of them would die.
So they decided to kill their child and make jerky out of the baby: baby jerky.
That way at least two of them would survive and then they could start a family again when they got to the other side of the desert.
Now, the Buddha said, what would be their attitude toward the food while they were eating it?
Would they be eating it for fun?
No, they'd be thinking with sorrow of what they had to do in this horrible circumstance.
That, the Buddha said, is how you should regard physical food: not something you eat out of joy or for the flavor, but simply to keep life going, realizing that your having to eat causes suffering, causes pain.
That's a harsh contemplation — one of many harsh contemplations in the Buddha's teachings.
The only way the mind can stand up to that kind of contemplation is if you've got the strong sense of wellbeing that comes from nourishing the mind with right concentration.
Otherwise, the insights that can come from meditation, if you don't have a good solid foundation like this, can be disorienting, destabilizing.
So as the foundation for your practice, you want to keep working on these skills.
Appreciate the simple quality of getting the mind still, finding a sense of ease simply by the way you breathe; gaining a sense of wellbeing, rapture, equanimity when you need them.
In this way, you nourish the mind with good food.
That's right livelihood in the highest sense.
It puts you in a position where, while you're still alive this time around, you weigh lightly on the world around you.
And you're developing the skill so you don't have to come back and weigh the world down again.
This is why the Buddha's teachings are not selfish.
They're an act of kindness both for you and for the whole world around you.
When you stop to look at your mind, you begin to realize that there's a whole committee in there: lots of different opinions, lots of different agendas.
You see this especially when you're trying to get the mind to settle down.
One part of the mind decides to focus on the breath, but other parts of the mind want to go other places and couldn't be bothered with anything as ordinary as the breath.
So in the beginning, you have to learn how to strengthen the side of the mind that wants to stay.
You can do this in lots of different ways.
First, you can remind yourself of why you're here, of all the good things that can come through staying with the breath: You develop mindfulness, you develop concentration, the mind gains a sense of inner peace when the concentration gets strong.
You develop alertness: You begin to see your own actions a lot more clearly, and you sense the importance of their consequences.
This is important, as it's the basis for heedfulness.
And heedfulness is so important that it was the topic of the Buddha's last words.
“Watch out,” he said.
When you practice, you have to be careful.
You have to be heedful.
You can't be complacent.
This is because your actions are important.
Think about it: The Buddha could have said a few last words about something wonderful or grand: nibbana, limitless compassion, or emptiness.
But instead, he focused on heedfulness — the principle that your actions are important and you have to be careful about what you do because actions can take you in all sorts of different directions.
They have results.
And so, as you meditate, remind yourself that you're here to learn how to be a lot clearer about what's going on in your mind.
The more steadily and consistently you can stay with the breath, then the more you see in terms of all the subtle politics going on in the mind: the part of the mind that wants to be heedful and the parts of the mind that don't.
There are many different voices in there, after all, many different sides to any question, not just two.
So, when you settle down to be with the breath, be prepared: Lots of other voices will be pulling in different directions.
And it's normal.
Don't get discouraged.
Try to strengthen the good voices by making the breath comfortable, so that there's an immediately felt sense of ease, a sense of wellbeing that comes just by sitting here breathing.
It feels good to breathe in, feels good to breathe out.
You don't have to force the breath, you don't have to hold it in, you don't have to count.
Let the breath come in and out at whatever rhythm feels good for the body.
If the rhythm keeps changing, fine — as long as it feels good.
Be on top of each breath.
Make sure it feels right for the body, coming in and going out.
As you do this, you get more and more sensitive, which means that you can get more and more precise in what you're doing.
The more precise and sensitive you are, the more absorbing the breath becomes.
The easier it is to stay here so that this mindful, alert faction of the mind gets stronger.
It doesn't get kicked out so easily.
Ordinarily, when the factions of greed, anger, and delusion take over the mind, they kick out the mindfulness and alertness; they don't want anybody around watching.
It's like politicians when they're discussing a corrupt deal: They don't want journalists in the room; they don't want anybody to see or hear what they're doing.
You notice this when part of the mind wants to do something unskillful, something it knows it shouldn't be doing: It tries to kick out your alertness, kick out your mindfulness.
It doesn't want to hear what they have to say.
That's how it can then go ahead and do those things.
But if mindfulness and alertness develop a strong hold here in the present moment, they can refuse to budge.
They can stand in the way of any unskillful decisions.
This is why it's important to keep hanging on to the breath and allowing the breath to feel good, to feel clear in the different parts of the body.
This is how you exercise mindfulness and alertness so that they grow strong.
Wherever you can sense the breath, focus on that.
Then let the different breathing sensations connect so that they feel all-around good.
This gives mindfulness and alertness a really solid place to settle in.
And in this way you can turn the fact that the mind is a committee to your advantage.
In other words, when greed, anger, and delusion threaten to take over the mind, they don't get the whole mind.
You have another faction of the committee that says “No.
We don't want to go there, because we know better.
This is called having a sense of shame, a sense of compunction: a fear of the consequences of evil.
Ordinarily, we don't like to hear about the word “shame,” but it's important that we understand what the Buddha meant by the word “shame.” It's not being ashamed of yourself; it's being ashamed of the idea of doing something you know you shouldn't do.
You realize that it's beneath you.
In this sense, shame is a result not of low self-esteem but of high self-esteem.
You know better than to do those things.
You're not the kind of person who really wants to do those things.
So when you have mindfulness and alertness on your side, that sense of shame becomes an important protector of the mind, a protector of your future.
The same with compunction, the fear of the consequences of doing evil: That's a skillful type of fear.
It's wise.
The unskillful part of the mind says, “I don't care what the long-term consequences are.
I want pleasure right now.
I'm going to make my profits right now and run.” But a sense of compunction looks to the future and says, “I don't want to go there.
No matter how much fun this may be right now, even if I run I won't escape the consequences.
So when mindfulness and alertness have developed this beachhead here in the present moment and can stay right here with the breath, then these qualities of shame and compunction come and help, strengthen your heedfulness, strengthen your lack of complacency, strengthen the good members of the committee, the good factions of the mind.
You've got a place where they can all band together and work in unison.
In the past, the good members of the committee were all separated.
They didn't work together.
Like the hummingbirds at the feeder who can't band together to fight off a bigger bird, they got beaten out by the other more forceful factions, the unskillful factions of the committee.
But now you've given them a corner of the mind where they won't budge, where they grow stronger and begin to take over.
When they take over, it's not that they're going to abuse the other side.
In fact, as these skillful members of the committee take over, the whole committee learns that it can live more and more peacefully with itself.
Having this corner of the mind helps you step back and see the mind for what it is, to see what's going wrong.
Without this corner here, you're totally immersed in unskillful states and can't see a way out at all.
But if you remind yourself that the mind is a committee, then even though unskillful things are coming up in the mind, you remember that there can still be a part of you that keeps watching, keeps mindful, alert.
By standing on the breath, you gain a better perspective: You're not totally in your head; you're also in your body.
That takes you out of the back-and-forth of the thoughts in your mind.
This separate perspective is what allows the mind to train itself.
As the Buddha said, training the mind is something you have to do for yourself.
Other people can't do it for you.
They can point out the way, but the actual work is something you have to do.
There would seem to be a paradox there.
If the mind were one solid unit, it wouldn't be able to teach itself anything new.
If it were defiled, it would be totally defiled and wouldn't be able to clean up its own act.
This is the assumption behind the idea that we can't do this work ourselves, that we need outside help and have to depend on some other, outside power.
But the fact is that there are lots of different you's, lots of different minds in the mind.
When you learn to turn that fact to your advantage — strengthening the good voices, not allowing them to get pushed out when unskillful states come in — you find that the mind can train itself.
In other words, the good committee members can band together and start training the less skillful ones, the more short-sighted ones, teaching them to look at things in a longer perspective.
This is how you can bring the mind to a sense of unity, when all the different factions realize that it's in their best interest to undergo this training.
They all start working together instead of at cross-purposes.
This gives the mind strength.
If it decides to work on a project, it'll see the project through.
If it's faced with pain and difficulty, all the parts of the mind work together so that you don't cause yourself suffering.
These are some of the advantages that come from training the mind to stay with the breath.
If you find it difficult to stay with the breath, if you can't quite get it comfortable yet, at least remind yourself that you're headed in the right direction.
You're working on important skills here.
Even though they may take time, whatever amount of time that it takes is well invested, well spent.
That sense of conviction will see you through the difficult patches and remind you that they're not always going to be that way: They're just patches.
If you stick with the training, you develop these qualities of the mind, which, at the beginning, seem to be pretty weak — mindfulness and alertness can seem awfully ordinary and very momentary — but when you get them working together, you find that they develop strengths you wouldn't have imagined before.
Sit with your back straight, facing straight ahead, and your eyes closed.
Place your hands on your lap, right hand on top of your left, and notice your breathing.
Where do you feel the breathing?
What are the sensations in the body that tell you now the breath is coming in, now the breath is going out?
Focus on those sensations.
Allow them to feel relaxed.
There will be a certain amount of tension when you first meditate, because you're not used to focusing on one thing for long periods of time, especially something as subtle and immediate as the breath.
For the most part, we're more used to focusing on our ideas and emotions, or on things outside.
So it takes a while for the mind to get used to being at home, focusing on something inside the body.
Allow the sensation of the breathing to be as relaxed as possible.
Think of the breath energy as something that already fills the body.
As you breathe in, you're simply adding more breath energy, infusing it into the energy already there.
When you breathe out, you're not trying to squeeze everything out.
If all of the breath were squeezed out of the body, you would die.
So try to find the right balance.
At what point does an out-breath start feeling uncomfortable?
When you sense that point, stop breathing out; start breathing in.
At what point does an in-breath start feeling uncomfortable?
Stop there and allow yourself to breathe out again.
Learn how to surf the breath in the same way you'd surf a wave.
In other words, try to maintain a balanced sense of ease in the body whether the wave tends right or left.
That sense of ease is going to be your friend.
Without that sense of ease, the mind starts flailing around, grasping at all kinds of other things.
The idea may seem strange, but the more ease you can create for yourself inside, the more you're actually creating a gift for the world around you.
If you don't have this inner sense of ease and wellbeing, the mind starts grasping at things outside, latching on to things outside, hoping to build some kind of happiness there.
That places a burden on other people.
But when you're more self-sufficient like this, you're less grasping.
You're creating less of a burden.
One of the images of a well-concentrated mind is of a lotus saturated with water.
Some lotus flowers don't ever get up above the water.
They just stay immersed under the surface, saturated with water from their roots up to the tip.
Try to think of your body as being saturated in the same way with a cool sense of ease.
That lotus can be your gift, both to yourself and to the people around you.
At the same time, you're establishing a good basis within the body for a clear, mindful state of mind, an alert state of mind.
All too often our emotions take over the body.
When fear comes in, there's a reaction in your heartbeat.
Hormones start getting poured into the blood, changing your heartbeat, changing the way you breathe, creating tension in the different muscles of the body.
When there's anger, when there's fear, all these emotions create changes in the body.
They basically take it over.
The mind then feels that it's been usurped, and it goes along with whatever the emotion is.
It's like a coup.
Anger comes in, and it may not be well thought through, it may not actually be in your best interest to act on the anger, but the anger seems to have seized power.
So you go along with it.
Then afterwards, you ask yourself, “Why did that happen?
Why did I let myself fall for that?” The same with fear, the same with all of these other emotions: They seem to take over the mind.
They start by taking over the body.
So your first tactic in learning how to counteract them is to get the body on your side.
Get familiar with how good breathing feels.
Then when another emotion comes in, you can realize that although the emotion may create a certain reaction in the body, it doesn't have to possess the whole body, just as it doesn't have to possess the whole mind.
Ordinarily, we tend to be unskillful in how we relate to our emotions.
One of the important skills in meditation is learning more skillful ways of handling them.
For the most part, we think we have to either give in to the emotion or else to deny that it's there, just totally repress it out of existence.
Of course, repressing it doesn't really get rid of it.
It just goes underground like “The Thing” and sends up tentacles someplace else.
And simply giving in to the emotion doesn't get rid of it either.
You simply turn it into bad kamma, which will come back and get you someday.
But as you meditate, you're learning alternative ways of dealing with these emotions, so that you don't have to give in to them, but at the same time you don't pretend that they don't exist.
You admit that they're there, but you also admit that they don't have to take over the whole body.
This requires concentration, it requires mindfulness, along with some discernment — the discernment being the realization that just because there's an emotion in the mind, it doesn't mean that it's your true feeling about something.
It's simply a feeling that came up, a desire that came up to react in a certain way.
But you have other desires as well, such as the desire not to do something foolish and unskillful.
That's a desire to be cultivated and strengthened.
One way of strengthening it is to give it its corner of the body as well.
The hormones may be racing through your bloodstream, but you can still determine the way you're going to breathe.
You can counteract what the hormones are demanding by consciously breathing in another way.
It may not feel all that satisfying to have only one corner of the body, but sometimes a wise warrior will realize that he can't defend his whole territory.
So you establish a base in one part and then, from that one part, you can eventually reclaim the rest of your body.
This also means developing the proper attitude when things are not going the way you'd like them to.
Problems come up, and you'd rather not have those particular problems.
Saunas get set on fire.
You'd rather not have the sauna set on fire, but you don't give in to your regret for the sauna.
You do what has to be done to put the fire out and keep it from spreading.
Storms come in, knock down trees.
You don't go running around outside trying to push the trees back up in the midst of the storm.
You find a safe place to stay and wait until the storm is over.
You tell yourself, “I'll survey the damage when the storm has passed, but in the mean time I'll just hunker down right here.” Instead of getting upset about how much damage might be done, you focus on maintaining your safety and calm.
We've had a couple of really bad storms here at the monastery: so much wind and so much rain, and all you could do was find a safe hut where you were fairly sure the hut wouldn't get blown down on top of you.
As for the rest of the orchard, it had to take care of itself until things were safe enough for you to come back outside.
Try to develop the same attitude toward emotional storms in your mind and your body.
Keep thinking of the mind as a committee.
There are lots of people in there, lots of ideas, some of which are helpful, some of which are actually destructive to your own wellbeing.
You can't regard the destructive ones as your own true emotions or your own true ideas.
They may be real, but they're not the “true you.
Ajaan Lee has a good way of thinking about these things.
He says you have lots of germs and worms and other things in your body, so maybe these thoughts coming through your brain are actually their thoughts.
After all, they're going through your bloodstream, the bloodstream is going through your brain, so who knows who's responsible for thinking what thought?
Just keeping that perspective in mind helps pull you back when you're tempted to jump right into the thought.
You're not denying that the thoughts are there; you simply realize that you have the choice as to whether to take them on, to develop them.
The same holds true when the body isn't feeling well.
Your meditation may not be going as well as you'd like it to, but you don't give up, you don't just throw it away.
You just lower your immediate expectations.
You lower your demands on the meditation.
Again, like a skillful warrior: When you find that you can't defend the whole territory, you find one little corner that you can defend, and you take that as your stronghold.
This is why it's very useful to have a very fluid sense of yourself.
As a meditator, you're not asked to give up your sense of self totally right from the start.
You just learn how to use your sense of self more skillfully.
Make it more adaptable.
When some parts of the body are really painful, establish your stronghold in the parts that you can make more comfortable, through the way you breathe, the way you relax your muscles around them.
Then, from this position of relative strength, if you have the energy, you can start looking into the pain.
Learn how to make the distinction between feeling sensations and body sensations.
Body sensations are things like warmth, coolness, solidity, energy — what are called the four elements or the four properties.
Feeling sensations are the fleeting sensations of pleasure and pain.
Those are very different sorts of things — the feeling sensations and the body sensations — but we tend to glom them all together.
In particular, if there's a pain you tend to glom it together with sensations of solidity, so that your knee is solid pain, or your head is solid pain.
Then you start using the pained parts to do your breathing, which makes things even worse.
But when the mind is in the right position, with the right attitude, you can look into the pain, not with the idea of making it go away, but with the idea of understanding it: “Okay, which sensations in here are pain sensations, which ones are earth, liquid, fire sensations?” If you have to hold on to something, hold on to the body sensations, and let the pain go.
Let it do its fleeting, flitting-around thing.
Or, even better, hold on just to the awareness that's aware of these different sensations, the question that makes these distinctions, if you can separate the awareness and the question out.
That's where discernment comes in.
If you don't have the energy to do this kind of questioning, at least maintain your sense of stronghold in another part of the body.
Guard against the thoughts commenting on how long the pain or exhaustion has been going on, or how much longer it might go on.
Don't think about those things, for they're not helpful at all.
The helpful thoughts are saying, “How do I maintain my awareness right now?
How do I deal with the sensation I'm feeling right now?” As for the sensation of the pain you felt two seconds ago, you can let it go.
It's not there any more.
All that's there is your memory of it and the stories you've built around it.
As for how many more hours, or days, or weeks the pain is going to keep going on, don't think about those things.
Otherwise, you weigh the present moment down with too long a stretch of time, too many burdens, so of course it's going to cave in.
Give it just the duty of being with the present moment.
Thoughts of who you were in the past or who you're going to be in the future are unskillful ideas of self right now.
Adjust your sense of who you are to fit the amount of wellbeing you can actually maintain.
That can be your stronghold.
So, learn to be a warrior.
Sometimes warriors have to admit temporary defeat, sometimes they have to go into retreat, but they don't totally give in.
They simply adjust their tactics to deal with the situation as it presents itself.
Just like the situation in Thailand when England and France were gobbling up colonies: Thailand had to give up some of its provinces.
It was either that or else give up its independence entirely.
So the Thais were willing to make sacrifices in order to maintain at least something of their sovereignty.
As a Thai saying goes, if you have to give up your arm to save your life, choose your life over the arm.
There are times when the body is sick and you have to give up your sense of yourself as being strong and healthy — at least for the time being.
“Okay, I'm sick.
I've got to deal with this sickness with the tools I've got.” Don't totally give in.
The same with your emotions: Sometimes your emotions get really strong, and you have to lie low.
The emotion is there, but you don't have to identify with it.
This is your alternative.
You don't have to act on the emotion and you don't have to squeeze it behind a mental partition and deny that it's there.
You admit that it's there and then just lay claim to another part of the mind, another part of the body, as your stronghold for the time being.
That way, even though you're in reduced circumstances, you're not totally wiped out.
You're still developing some very important habits: the patience, endurance, concentration, mindfulness, and discernment that will serve you in good stead no matter what the situation.
The Buddha never promised us that everything was going to be lovely in the present moment, or that all you have to do is think nice thoughts and the world will be nice in return.
He keeps having us reflect on the fact that aging, illness, and death are normal.
The world is swept away, he says.
It does not endure.
It offers no shelter.
There is no one in charge.
But, he says, here are the tools for finding happiness in the midst of a world that's getting swept away all the time.
These are your weapons; this is your stronghold.
Just make sure that you maintain that heart of a warrior and the wisdom of a warrior who knows which battles are worth taking on, which are worth dropping, which ones are worth avoiding.
That wisdom is what will see you through.
As a culture, we don't have much practice in being alone, even though modern Western culture is unusual in the amount of privacy it offers in its homes.
Ever since the th century, people in the West have slept in private bedrooms more than at any other time in history, or any other culture in history.
You'd think that that would help us develop some skills in being by ourselves.
But that's very rarely the case.
When you're alone in your room, you're not really alone.
Back in the th century, when people started living in private bedrooms, sales in novels shot up.
Now in the st they have all sorts of companions in their rooms: books, magazines, TV, or the Internet.
And so with all these clamorous companions, we don't have much practice in being alone, looking after ourselves.
That passage we chanted just now: “May I look after myself with ease.” It doesn't refer to just being physically at ease.
It also means learning how to look after your own mind, getting a sense of how to correct its imbalances.
This is one of the treasures that the Buddha's teachings have to offer, in that it gives you some pointers in how to look after yourself, how to be alone and not go crazy, how not to get off balance, learning how to be self-correcting, self-governing.
Several years back when the book Into the Wild came out, I was struck by how much the protagonist had to reinvent the Dhamma wheel in figuring out how to live an authentic life, how to be alone facing the wilderness with just the company of his own mind.
He didn't have many good resources to draw on: a few books — a little bit of Thoreau, a little bit of Tolstoy — and a lot of ideas, most of which were untested.
I couldn't help thinking that if he'd been born in Thailand, he might not have died, for they have a whole tradition — the Buddha's teachings — that acts as a storehouse of wisdom on how to be alone.
And the Sangha provides an opportunity to learn directly from people who've had lots of time alone, leading a purposeful life, and have come out stronger as a result.
So it's good to look into the Buddha's teachings not only for techniques in the meditation, but also for the attitudes you need in looking after yourself.
Now, the techniques are important.
They give you a good measuring stick for how things are going as you're alone; they give you something specific to do, a task to focus on, so as to create a sense of purpose over time, and of wellbeing in the present moment by being with your breath.
At the very least, you learn how to approach from the physical side whatever mind state is coming in and oppressing you.
Mind states all have an effect on the breath, but the breath can also have an effect on them.
If you're not skillful, this could become a vicious circle.
You start breathing in weird ways, and that puts you in a bad mood, and then the bad mood makes the breathing get even stranger, and you go spiraling down.
Working with the techniques of breath meditation is one way of cutting those vicious circles, giving you a handle on your state of mind.
But it's also important that you use right view in learning how to step back from your state of mind and evaluate it.
To begin with, right view allows you to see where your thinking has gone off course.
And second, it allows you to realize that you don't have to be immersed in a mood.
One of the basic principles of right view is the principle of kamma, and one of the principles of kamma is that we have freedom of choice in the present moment.
Yet this is an area where the wrong views of our culture get in the way.
We tend to think that our moods are our real self.
We tend not to trust our thoughts because we know we've picked up a lot of ideas from the media and other people around us, but our moods and emotions seem to be genuinely ours, who we are in the present moment.
This is where the Buddha's teachings on understanding yourself are important.
You don't have to identify with your mood.
There is always a spot in the mind that's just simply aware of these things.
And you want to learn how to stand in that spot.
Again, the meditation is helpful in this regard because it teaches you to create a state of mind and then step back and look at it.
As in Ajaan Lee's analogy of learning how to make baskets: You make a basket, then you step back and look at it.
Is it too long?
Too short?
Is the weaving coarse and irregular?
See what's not right and then bring that observation along when you make another basket, and then another one.
If you can learn to look at your moods as baskets — i.e., not who you really are, but simply things you've created — then you can start working on the raw materials and make better ones.
But it's important that you have this ability to step back.
One of the images in the Canon is of a person sitting down looking at someone who's lying down, or a person standing who's looking at someone sitting down.
In other words, you step back a bit, you're slightly above what's just happened, and you evaluate it.
That's the second part of the Buddha's approach: not only having a place to step back but also having good standards to evaluate things.
For instance, when you're in a bad mood, there is a tendency — especially if you're in the West — to say, “Here I am.
I'm finally being honest with myself and I'm miserable.
I'm horrible.
My life is going nowhere.” We tend to think that that's getting down to the true facts of the situation, because it's so harsh.
But why should we believe that?
And in what way is it helpful?
You might say, “Well, it's better to be realistic than living in fantasies,” but your bad mood is just a mood.
It doesn't guarantee the truth of what you see while you're in that mood.
And it's also self-defeating, for as the Buddha points out, it's possible to change your mood and to create moods that are a lot more useful in the practice.
That's why one of the steps in breath meditation is learning how to gladden the mind when it needs to be gladdened.
In other words, see where the mood is leading you, and if you don't like the direction it's heading, realize that you're free to look at things in a different way.
You're not committed to the mood; after all, it's not committed to you.
It comes and goes without asking your permission, so you don't need its permission to push it out.
During my first years as a monk, this was a very important part of the training: not only having the breath meditation technique to deal with whatever was coming up, but also having the opportunity to talk with someone sane — Ajaan Fuang — who had a lot of experience in being alone and learning to gauge what was a healthy mood and what was an unhealthy one.
He had learned that regardless of how true you might think the mood is, you've got to look at its effects.
Where is it leading you?
After all, we're here to follow a path.
So you can ask yourself, what kind of path is a depressed mood?
What kind of path is an unhealthy mood?
It's not a decent path at all.
It's a path downward, not the path you want to follow.
So again, remind yourself that these moods are not necessarily true; they're not necessarily you.
They're like a set of clothing: You can choose to put them on or you can take them off.
The breath provides you with a place to step back and look at yourself, the way you'd look at yourself in a mirror.
The Dhamma gives you a set of standards for judging what looks good in the mirror, what doesn't, what's healthy and what's not — realizing that sometimes the things that we're supposed to abandon at the end of the path are actually a help along the way.
There's that sutta where Ananda talks about how desire is often helpful in the path, conceit can be helpful in the path — in other words the desire to do well, the conceit that says, “Other people can do this, why can't I?” Those are actually useful tools in the path.
All the skills we tend to associate with a healthy ego are also helpful in the path.
For example, anticipation: learning how to anticipate danger — i.e., to see the danger in wallowing in a mood.
In the Buddha's language, this is called heedfulness.
Suppression: The skills that allow you skillfully to suppress moods that you know are not helpful.
You don't repress the mood; you simply realize that you're not going to go running along with whatever mood comes running into the mind.
If you see that it's an unskillful mood, you stand your ground and use the skills of the meditation to cut it off from its sources of strength.
And you use the skills of shame and compunction — these are skills, if you know how to use them right — to remind you of why you don't really want to follow a mood that would lead you to do something unprincipled or harmful.
Another important ego skill is sublimation, which means finding another kind of pleasure, another way of looking at things, to replace your current mood with a better one.
This is what jhana is all about: providing a harmless kind of pleasure that you can tap into at all times, to provide you with the food you need so that you don't go hungering after unskillful pleasures.
Another skill is humor, the ability to laugh at your foibles — not in a nasty, sarcastic way, but in a good-natured, large-hearted way.
The surest sign that you've dropped a mood is when you see how ludicrous it is.
And then there's altruism, realizing that in learning to look after yourself, you're also helping other people.
Remember the Buddha's famous sutta on the two acrobats, where they realize, “If I look after my sense of balance, and you look after your sense of balance, that's how we're going to get down safely from this pole we're standing on.” In other words, remind yourself that it's not a selfish thing to know how to look after yourself; you're not just gazing at your belly button.
You're actually providing help to others.
If you can't look after yourself, you become a burden to others.
This is why the Buddha, in his instructions on breath meditation, included the ability to gladden the mind when it needs to be gladdened — both in terms of the way you breathe, and in terms of the way you learn to think and talk to yourself.
This involves your ability to step back and use the breath as a vantage point on whatever the depressed mood might be, and in developing a set of values that help you to recognize that this is something you don't want to get involved with.
Actually, there's no limit to the number of the tools that can prove useful here: anything you've learned about to how to change a mood — by the way you breathe, by the way you look at things, by what you focus on, what you choose to just let go.
There are also the skills of steadying the mind when the new mood you're trying to create is still unstable.
What can you do to make it more and more solid?
And then there are the skills of releasing the mind, knowing how to free the mind from a relatively skillful mood to reach an even more skillful one.
Even when you've developed a skillful mood, you can then say, “Okay, this can take me only so far.
What kind of mood would take me further?
There's a passage where the Buddha talks about a meditator who finds, as he's focusing on the breath, that there's a fever in his mind.
So he needs to change his topic for the time being, to find something more inspiring, more uplifting.
That could include reflecting on the Buddha, the Dhamma, the Sangha, or whatever you find inspiring that relates to the practice.
Then finally, once you've got the mind in a much better mood, when its fever has subsided, you can go back to the breath, and the mind can really settle down.
It can drop all that thinking and go to a place that's a lot more still, solid, and buoyant.
So when you find yourself overtaken by a mood, or if you're not really sure about how you should approach the meditation when things are going poorly, keep these points in mind.
And you should also keep them in mind when things are going awfully well.
We sometimes feel embarrassed to congratulate ourselves on how things are going, but that embarrassment doesn't help at all.
Recognizing when the meditation is going well and learning how to appreciate when it's going well will give you a reference point.
When you start getting discouraged about the whole process, you can remember that there were times when it went well.
And it's really worth whatever effort it takes to get it going well again.
So to be able to look after your own mind and to thrive at being alone, you need a whole set of skills.
You need a spot where you can step back and look at things, the right set of attitudes that help you gauge the situation for what it is, and then skills in creating and maintaining a better mood.
This is how you look after yourself with ease.
The skills that enable you to be more mature in general, also help make you a more mature meditator.
In this way, as you meditate, you become your own best friend, instead of your own worst enemy.
You learn how to handle being alone.
And it's only when you can handle being alone that you can really handle being with other people.
You don't get swept away by their ideas or their moods, and you can actually become a source of stability in their lives as well.
So keep this in mind when, say, in the middle of an afternoon, things don't seem to be going so well.
Get up and walk around a bit.
Clean out the tool shed.
Hike up the mountain.
Anything that works.
One of my students, a monk in Thailand, once said that he'd get restless sometimes when he was staying alone in the wilderness, so he'd hike over a few mountains, just to get rid of the restlessness.
Anything that works in getting you out of an unskillful mood and into a more skillful one — one that's ready to settle down — is an important part of the meditation.
Back when Ajaan Mun was alive, scholarly monks would say of meditating monks, “What can they know?
They sit with their eyes closed.
What can they see?” They're still asking that question today: “What can meditators see with their eyes closed?” Of course the answer is that they see their own minds.
Scholarly monks would say, “Here we spend years looking through the books, and we still don't fully understand them.
How can you understand them by sitting there with your eyes closed?” The answer is that the real problems in life don't lie in books.
Books contain only the names of the problems.
The real problems lie in the mind, which is why we sit here focusing the mind on the breath as a way of bringing the mind into the present moment, where we can watch it.
We turn our gaze inward, instead of outward.
What do you see when you look outward?
You see aging, illness, and death.
You see other people's issues: their good points, their bad points.
You see the world around you: its good points, its bad points.
But those aren't the things that make a real difference in your life.
The things that make a real difference are your decisions, the way you manage your own mind.
This is why contentment is such an important principle in the practice: contentment in terms of where you are, the situation in which you find yourself; contentment in terms of your various physical comforts and discomforts.
However, in terms of the people around you, you need to find a group of admirable friends.
Even if you find just one admirable friend, you've got a lot right there.
That's important.
Don't practice contentment with your friends.
If they're not people who live by the Dhamma or who speak the Dhamma, if they're people who engage in lying and stealing and divisive speech, abusive speech, and idle chatter, then you don't want to hang around with them.
As the Buddha said, “If those are the only people you can find, it's better to go alone.” But once you've found a good admirable friend, a good community in which to practice, you should be willing to put up with a lot of hardships.
Think again of the time of Ajaan Mun.
He was way out in the forest.
People who wanted to study with him had to go walking on foot, many times not even sure they were going to find him, because he was frequently on the move.
When someone showed up to practice with him, he was sure that that person really wanted to practice with him because that person had already put up with a lot of hardships, not only in finding him but also in staying with him.
Ajaan Fuang once expressed a similar idea.
Back in the very earliest days of Wat Dhammasathit, it was very difficult to get there.
The trip from Bangkok to Rayong took almost a full day, and it wasn't an easy ride.
From the highway you had to go further on, six kilometers along a dirt road, muddy and potholed.
He said that by the time people came out to see him, having gone through all that, he was convinced that they were really serious about listening to what he had to teach, so he'd be happy to teach them.
He said that it was a lot better than the days when he lived at Wat Asokaram, on the outskirts of Bangkok.
Anybody with time to kill could come out and try to kill his time, too.
Who knew how serious they were, because it was so easy to get there.
A willingness to put up with hardships is an important part of the practice, but it's not just a matter of gritting your teeth and bearing with them.
The hardships are essential in helping you gain understanding.
When things aren't going well outside, where are you going to focus your attention?
Well, you could focus outside and just get upset about things outside, but that doesn't accomplish anything.
If you're wise, you learn from the hardships the lesson that you've got to focus your attention more and more inwardly.
If you're going to find happiness, you've got to find it inside.
This is why the great ajaans were able to find the Dhamma out in the forest: They had to.
We tend to have a romantic idea of the forest — peaceful, green, beautiful forest — because our idea of forest life has become awfully sanitized.
Actually, there are a lot of difficulties there.
There are dangerous animals — not just the tigers that seem romantic and exciting, but also the day-to-day things: the bugs and snakes and other animals that carry diseases.
When you're surrounded by things like that, where will you turn?
Our natural tendency is to want to look for happiness in terms of sounds, sights, smells, tastes, and tactile sensations, but when these things aren't all that pleasant, where do you turn?
When you get sick and there's no doctor or medicine around, where do you turn?
You have to turn within.
Being able to keep the mind centered becomes a life-and-death matter.
If you can find that sense of wellbeing within, if you can stir up those resources of goodwill and discernment that you're going to need in order to live in the forest, in spite of the fact that things seem to be weighing in on you from all directions, that's where you really learn the strength of the Dhamma, the importance of the Dhamma as a refuge.
This forces you to choose your priorities: What's really important in your life?
Physical comfort or the comfort of the Dhamma?
Pleasant people who do things the way you like, or people who teach you the Dhamma, people who exemplify the Dhamma?
A happiness that's based on things outside, or a happiness that comes from within?
Difficulties on the outside really force these issues in a way that pleasant surroundings don't.
Your realization of this, and your willingness to act on that realization: That's what really makes a Dhamma practitioner out of you — when you finally decide that you're not going to hold anything back, that this really is what's most important in life, and you're going to go at it without reservations.
The Buddha gives the image of an elephant going into battle.
The elephant fights with his front feet, fights with his back feet, fights with his front quarters and back quarters, but he protects his trunk all the time.
He isn't willing to use his trunk because his trunk is his most sensitive part.
The elephant trainer sees that and realizes that this elephant hasn't really given himself to the king.
It's the same when you balk at discomfort: It's a sign you really haven't given yourself to the practice.
The willingness to put up with discomforts, to thrive on them: That's the mark of a true practitioner, someone who really has what they call dhamma-chanda, desire for the Dhamma, and dhamma-rati, love for the Dhamma.
This is what makes all the difference in your practice.
If you hold back from the practice, it's going to hold things back in terms of the results you're going to receive.
We miss out on these results because our minds keep flowing out.
The Buddha talks about asavas, which can be translated as “effluents,” both in the sense that they flow out, and in the sense that they're not especially clean.
The force of these currents that come flowing out of the mind can drive us all over the place.
Sensual desire, views, ignorance: These currents come flowing out of the mind, and we tend to ride with them.
You don't really realize how strong they are because you don't try to withstand them.
As a result, they can push you all over the place.
Only when you decide to turn around and look at them as the main issue will you be able to work free from them.
The problem is that they keep pointing outward and saying, “Look.
See that over there,” and that thing over there is something you want or something you hate.
They keep deflecting attention away from themselves.
They're like politicians.
Politicians do their dirty work and then they say, “See that person over there?
He's doing something horrible.” They get you all excited about the other person so you don't notice what they're doing.
This is the way the mind operates.
These asavas keep flowing out, flowing out, pushing you in all kinds of directions.
To withstand them, as the Buddha says, you have to create an island where that flood doesn't overwhelm you.
Even if you can't yet find the ultimate island of the transcendent, you build a temporary island with mindfulness and concentration, so that you're not pushed around all the time.
That means taking a stance where you are.
Sometimes, taking a stance where you are requires making some sacrifices.
But that's where you make your choice: whether you want to make that sacrifice or just continue going with the flow.
Going with the flow seems easy because it's more habitual, but actually there's an awful lot of suffering in going with the effluent flow.
You never know where it's going to push you.
Like a flooding river, it sometimes hits you with logs and debris, or throws you up against a stone wall.
But as you take your stance on your island of right here, right now, even though it may seem more difficult, you begin to get used to it and you realize that you wouldn't want to live any other way.
You begin to appreciate the force of the effluents.
You begin to see how they push you around, and you see the suffering that comes as a result.
That's when you realize that you made the right choice not to continue with your old ways, sloshing around in the world, but actually taking a stance and keeping it solid.
So, it requires powers of resistance.
We usually use our powers of resistance to resist things, people, situations, outside.
What we've got to do is learn to resist the push that comes from within, the push that makes us want to focus on things outside, that distracts our attention from the real issues bubbling up in the mind.
That's the other translation for asava, “fermentation.” These things come bubbling up, and who knows where they're going to take you if you give in to them?
As you begin to take your stance, you come to see the value of not following through with those fermentations — and you see the value of contentment.
You see that once you make your choice, you're going to maintain your stance here as a person who loves the Dhamma more than you love comfort or whatever the defilements are clamoring for.
That's when the Dhamma really shows what an excellent thing it is, what a worthwhile thing it is, why it's the sort of thing you can give your whole life to.
Ultimately the teaching asks nothing less than that: that you give yourself totally to the practice.
But what it gives in return is more than a life, far more than worth the effort you give it.
The Buddha once said that if you could make a deal that someone would spear you with a hundred spears three times a day — morning, noon, and night — for a hundred years, with the guarantee that at the end of the hundred years you would gain Awakening, that would be a deal worth taking.
Otherwise, think of all the eons of endless sufferings involved in repeatedly coming back again and again.
He said that when you attained Awakening as a result of that deal, you wouldn't even think that you had attained it with pain and suffering.
It would have come with joy.
So, when you run into hardships in your daily life, compare them to the three hundred spears a day.
Put things into perspective.
That'll help keep you on course.
When you meditate during the Dhamma talk, % of your attention should be with your breath.
Let the talk be in the background — because the Dhamma is found inside the mind.
The Dhamma in words is just pointers.
As you listen to the talk, remind yourself that the words are pointing inside your mind.
If you're inside your mind paying attention to what you're doing, you're already at the right place.
You don't need the talk.
If you find yourself wandering outside, you'll run up against the talk and it'll point you back in, to where the real problem is: ignorance.
Real ignorance is not ignorance of words or principles.
It's ignorance of what's going on in the mind.
In particular, it's ignorance of how you're causing yourself suffering.
In a broader sense, it's ignorance of four noble truths: ignorance of where there's suffering right now and of what you're doing to cause the suffering; ignorance of what you could be doing to put an end to the suffering and of what the end of suffering would be like.
Those are the four things you could be paying attention to.
They're things that are happening right inside.
They're not happening in the words.
The words simply point to these things, and especially to your experience of suffering, something that nobody else is experiencing.
That suffering is as close as you get to really purely personal experience.
There's no way you can take it out and show it to us.
Scientists studying your brain can see all sorts of indicators that you might be in pain, but they can't actually see your suffering.
And there's no way you can compare your suffering to anyone else's, to see who's suffering more, exactly what it tastes like, or what it feels like.
But it is something you can know for yourself.
So you should pay attention to it.
What this means is that the four noble truths are not some abstract teaching whose truth is peculiar to India, years ago.
They're things happening right here, right now, and they're happening very directly in your awareness.
To chip away at that ignorance, you start by focusing on something more obviously happening right here, right now: the breath.
In the Buddha's analysis of suffering, ignorance conditions fabrication.
Bodily fabrication is the breath.
If you breathe with ignorance, it can be a condition for suffering.
If you breathe with knowledge and awareness, it can help cut through suffering.
It can help you see your ignorance more clearly.
As you see your ignorance more clearly, you're replacing it with knowledge.
So when you're focused on the breath, learning to breathe comfortably, allowing the mind to relate in a comfortable way with the breath, you're taking a stand against ignorance.
And all the ignorant thought processes that go on through the day: You're putting up a resistance to them so that you can understand them.
It's through understanding them that you can go beyond them, transcend them.
These principles are universal.
That's why the Buddha called them ariya-sacca, which we translate as noble truths.
But the word ariya, in addition to meaning noble, also means standard, in the sense of a universal standard.
So these truths are not only noble, they're also universal standards.
They apply to all of us, with no exceptions.
They're something we all have in common.
We each experience suffering and the cause of suffering for ourselves alone, but the pattern of our suffering is something we have in common, which is why the path to the end of suffering is universal.
It doesn't matter what country you come from, what your background, what your language.
The path works across the board if you apply it in all fairness, if you realize that this is something that applies to you as much as it does to anyone else.
Most of us like to think of ourselves as exceptions to the rule.
We like to think that it's going to be different for us somehow, especially when you hear of all the effort that the various ajaans put into the practice.
We'd rather not have to do all that work.
We think that maybe things should be easier for us because we're better educated, or maybe we know more in our culture.
Well, no, we don't.
Our problems are just the same as theirs.
They may be dressed up a little bit differently in each case, but at their root they're all the same.
Ajaan Fuang once quoted Ajaan Mun saying that people are all alike, but then if you look a little deeper you see that they're really not, but then when you look deeper still, you see that they really are.
Ajaan Fuang's comment on that was: Take that and think about it for a while.
There are some differences, but what we have in common is what's really important.
Like the chant we had just now.
Aging, illness, death, and separation: These are things we all have in common.
The chant is a little bit lacking in that it simply reminds you that you are subject to aging, subject to illness, subject to death.
Or as in the Thai translation, these things are normal for you.
You're subject to being separated from things that you love.
Life starts out, you're always learning new things, gaining new things, but then it reaches a point where they all start going away.
What you do have left is your actions.
You will fall heir to what you do, say, and think.
And the results depend on whether what you do, say, and think is skillful or not.
As the Buddha said, thinking about these truths as they apply to yourself keeps you from doing unskillful things.
You realize, “My gosh, if I allow myself to think a lot of unskillful stuff today, the results are going to seep out into my words; they're going to seep out into my actions.
Then I'll start not just thinking unskillful things, but also doing and saying unskillful things.
That all begins to pile up.” Do you want that?
No.
So these reflections are meant to keep you in line, to keep you from doing harmful things to yourself, harmful things to other people.
They teach you restraint.
But the original sutta in which this chant is found doesn't stop just there.
It goes on to recommend that you remind yourself that these things don't just apply to you, they apply to everybody, to all levels of being.
No matter where you go — this lifetime, the next lifetime, whatever the realm, all beings that have been, all beings that will be, whether they're living, whether they're dying, whether they're being reborn: These principles apply to all of them.
And, as the Buddha said, when you think about that, it not only prevents you from doing unskillful things, but it gets you on the path.
You finally realize that there's no other escape from these principles of suffering and its cause.
And the path has to be the same for everybody, so that the cessation would be the same for everybody.
You are not an exception.
No matter where you go, whether you would like to be reborn as a brahma, or to come back as a human being who's maybe a little bit more wealthy — maybe a lot more wealthy, better looking, more powerful: You would still be subject to these same truths, no matter what.
That's meant to give rise not just to restraint, but also to a sense of samvega, something that goes deeper: a realization that the way you've been living your life really is going nowhere.
The way most people live their lives goes nowhere.
The only “somewhere” you can go is out.
Even that's not a place, but still it's a direction.
Otherwise life has no direction at all.
It just wanders around, looking at this for a while, looking at that for a while — like the map charting the way a dog wanders around the neighborhood, sniffing at this, sniffing at that, wandering over here, rolling in this, rolling in that.
It really goes nowhere in particular at all.
But if you accept that these truths are universal, then the Buddha's ready to show you the universal way out.
He doesn't teach just good or bad karma, or skillful or unskillful karma.
He says that there are gradations of skillful karma.
In particular, there's the plain old skillful karma that keeps you in the cycle, and then there's the karma that puts an end to karma, that gets you out of the cycle.
That's the path — the path that cuts through the ignorance, the path that cuts through the craving that causes suffering.
That's the way out.
So it's up to us to decide whether we still want to dabble around, to roll around in a few dead squirrels, or whether we've had enough and want out.
If we want out, then the path is all laid out, from right view on through right concentration, which means that you try to endow your concentration with all the factors of the path.
Virtue, concentration, discernment: All these things should come together in your practice.
So as you focus on the breath, try to do it in a virtuous way.
In other words, do it with restraint.
Remind yourself, you can't go wandering off, dabbling in this, dabbling in that.
You've really got to be true to the theme of your concentration.
And your concentration should be discerning: Which ways of focusing on the breath make the mind uncomfortable?
Which make the breath uncomfortable?
Which ways of focusing, which ways of thinking about the breath, which ways of labeling and understanding the breath help make it more comfortable, easier to stay here so that it does become your home?
— so that no matter where you go, you have this home inside, this nourishment on the path.
That's how your discernment works.
You want to bring all of these qualities together.
If you leave any of them out, then the path is incomplete.
When it's not complete, it can't do its work.
So you give it all of your mind.
The word for “mind” in Pali — citta — also means the quality of really being intent on what you are doing.
And citta in this second sense is one of the elements of right effort, one of the bases for success.
So give this practice your whole mind, your whole heart, your full intent, so that the results will be full and complete as well.
When it comes to the issue of pleasure, we prefer both/and.
We don't like either/or.
The more ways we can find pleasure, the more types of pleasure we can find, the better.
After all, that's a lot of what pleasure is about: the variety.
We don't like the idea of having to be stuck with one particular type of pleasure, or of having to abandon some of the things we already like for the sake of something else we also like.
We want to have it all.
As the Buddha once said, even if it rained gold coins we wouldn't have enough to satisfy people's desire for sensual pleasures.
We always want more and more.
That's why we tend to be pretty stupid about the issue of pleasure.
Psychologists have shown that even when people know the drawbacks of a certain activity they like, they still go back to it again and again and again.
Even when they know they have better things to do — more lasting, more solid forms of pleasure they can work toward — there are still some fleeting pleasures they can't let go of.
So it's not the case that when you find a better pleasure, your attachments to your old, lesser pleasures simply fall away like leaves off a tree.
The tendency in the mind is to keep trying to gather more and more: adding new pleasures to the stock of old pleasures we want to keep in store.
You can see this even among some of the least advanced of the noble ones: the stream-enterers.
The Buddha had to counsel them to be heedful.
That was his last instruction.
Of all the monks gathered at the Buddha's passing away, the least advanced were stream-enterers.
And yet the Buddha had to counsel them to be heedful.
There are other places in the Canon where he explicitly states that even a stream-enterer can be heedless.
After all, when you've reached that level you know for sure that there's a deathless, that you're destined for nibbana.
You'll have at most only seven more lifetimes and they're all going to be human lifetimes at the very least.
And a sense of security can develop around that thought.
Because of that sense of security, it's possible for a stream-enterer to become complacent — to say nothing of people who've simply experienced jhana, or right concentration.
Just the fact that you've encountered the really refined pleasures of right concentration doesn't mean that you automatically let go of your attachments to other forms of pleasure.
The principle of both/and applies here as well.
People want to enjoy their concentration along with all the other pleasures they've managed to gather up in the course of their lives.
This is why we also need discernment to remind us that there are a lot of important areas where things are either/or.
In particular, discernment is needed to see the drawbacks of many of the old pleasures we've been wallowing in.
This is a lesson we resist.
One, we don't like to be told that we've been engaging in harmful or unskillful behavior.
And two, the mind has an incredible tendency to put up walls to screen out the negative sides of our pleasures.
Because we like our pleasures so much, we resist acknowledging their drawbacks.
I was talking recently to a monk who had been to the police morgue in Bangkok, where they allow monks to come and observe autopsies.
He saw the doctors working in the morgue very efficiently, going through bodies, opening them up, opening them up, with all the guts and stuff spilling out.
And he wondered: How do they still manage to go home and sleep with their wives and enjoy their old sensual pleasures?
Then he walked into their office and saw girlie calendars all over the walls.
That's when he understood.
They were determined to maintain the perception of the beauty of the body in spite of what they were seeing every day.
The side of the human mind that wants to maintain its old attachments: It doesn't give them up easily.
It does everything it can to hold on.
You give things up only when you really see that there's a direct connection between suffering and the pleasures you've been enjoying — and that there's a better alternative.
Only then will the mind begin to let go.
This is the duty of discernment: to see the drawbacks of these things.
This is why right concentration on its own, or jhana on its own, is not enough to cut through your other attachments.
Simply because you can sit here and be very blissful, very equanimous, doesn't mean that you're going to see the connections between unskillful pleasures and their negative consequences.
That insight requires an act of determination.
You really have to be heedful to remind yourself that these issues are either/or.
You have to work at developing the strength and determination of discernment that can see this clearly.
Ajaan Chah, in one of his talks, refers to the knowledge of the three characteristics not as a truth, not as a form of discernment, but as a strength.
That's what it is: a strength.
It gives you a solid place where you can stand outside your attachments and really look at them.
For the most part, we just jump into our attachments, jump into our pleasures, and totally lose perspective.
When they slosh around, we get sloshed around as well.
But being able to step back from these things gives us a solid place to stand.
And that solid place to stand is a strength in the mind.
It helps us to resist the temptation to go jumping back in.
So this is a theme you have to contemplate over and over again: the theme of either/or, together with the theme of the connections between the pleasures you enjoy and the drawbacks they carry in their wake.
This is why the path has right view right at the very beginning, and why the Buddha said that of all the various strengths in the mind, the strength of discernment is what holds the others together.
The image he gives is of building a house.
You're putting up the beams to form the roof, but only when the ridgepole is in place are the other beams secure.
Up to that point they can still sway back and forth.
They're still not quite solid.
But when you finally get that ridgepole up across the top, everything fits together properly and stays solid.
The ridgepole is discernment.
Until discernment is strong, everything else — your conviction, your persistence, your mindfulness, your concentration — can sway back and forth.
You may like your concentration, but you can also like whatever else life has to offer.
You treat your life like a big flower garden or a vast buffet where you can choose all the things you want.
That's your preferred attitude.
You come to your senses only when you clearly see that things are either/or.
The more you let your mind go wandering around in sensual desires, the harder it is to get back, the harder it is to turn the concentration into something transcendent.
Even when you've hit the transcendent for the first time, you're still not totally safe.
There can still be the complacent thought that this is good enough.
You've reached the point of being a noble one for sure, guaranteed against falling into the lower realms, guaranteed that nibbana will be attained within seven lifetimes.
So it's possible to be complacent even on that level.
Your work on discernment still isn't complete.
So while we practice, we need to develop this added strength, the strength of discernment.
It helps us see connections between our pleasures and their consequences — and it also helps us to see where there's a disconnect: where you have to choose one form of pleasure over another.
There's a passage in the Dhammapada: “When you see a greater form of happiness that comes from abandoning a lesser form of happiness, the wise person abandons the lesser form for the sake of the greater.” Note that not everybody does that.
It's only the wise person who does.
Someone who once translated this verse said that this couldn't possibly be the meaning of the verse because it's so obvious.
Everyone knows enough to abandon the lesser pleasure in favor of the greater.
But that's not really the case.
Very few people do this.
Very few people see that it's an either/or.
They want the both/and/and/and/and/and.
This is because we're so stupid around pleasure.
Sometimes we intentionally make ourselves stupid.
We don't want to see the connection between our pleasures and their drawbacks.
We don't want to see the way one pleasure fights with another, is inconsistent with another.
Even when it's right before our eyes, we refuse to see.
So while it's important that we develop concentration, we also need to develop the discernment that makes it right concentration, that keeps it on track, that helps you to appreciate it for what it is.
The pleasure of concentration is one of those rare pleasures that has no drawbacks.
It may be shaky in the beginning, and that's probably one of the reasons why when we start out we don't want to place all our hopes on it, because we know how difficult it is to attain.
But later on, when it becomes easier and more consistent, we can get complacent about that, too, thinking that we can tap into it whenever we want.
So you have to develop the discernment, the strength in the mind that can help overcome both forms of complacency, both reasons for wanting everything to be both/and.
As long as you're still on the path, the either/or has to be kept in mind.
Only the wisdom of either/or can get you beyond.
In India they have an interesting theory about why people enjoy art.
It's based on a distinction between an actual emotion and the taste of the emotion.
They say that people enjoy art — this includes drama, music, literature, all the fine arts — because in looking at the depiction of a particular emotion they don't actually experience the emotion.
They taste it.
The taste is always pleasant even when the emotion being depicted is very unpleasant: fear, anguish, or sorrow.
If it's well portrayed, the audience likes the depiction because they like the taste.
They taste, for example, the taste of grief, which is not grief itself, but compassion.
The taste of fear is not fear, but excitement.
So we enjoy art not because we're actually experiencing the emotion being depicted, but because we like the taste.
This distinction is useful to keep in mind when you contemplate your thoughts, especially when you're sitting here meditating.
Sometimes focusing on the breath starts to lose its appeal.
You lose interest.
Even when you get nice long periods of bliss and wellbeing, part of the mind gets bored.
It wants some action; it wants to taste some emotions.
So you start thinking about all kinds of other things.
But you have to remember that no matter how attractive and tasty those alternatives — all the different worlds that you can create in your mind — may seem, actually living in them would be pretty miserable.
So don't get beguiled by the taste.
We had an incident of this in my own family.
A relative of mine was a novelist, and her novels were pretty melodramatic.
She liked stories filled with scandalous surprises: murder, incest, intrigue, infidelity.
They made for very interesting stories.
But when in her own life she encountered some marital infidelity, it was the end of her.
The sorrow caused her death.
So it's one thing to imagine these things, but it's another thing to live them.
Always keep that in mind.
Even the stories, the narratives we like to make about our own practice, about the progress we expect, about how we'll attain concentration, and from concentration we'll quickly move on to insight, and there it will be — liberation: We like those stories because of the taste.
We like to read the stories of the ajaans, because the stories are contrived in ways to make them very compelling.
They're designed to make you want to practice.
What you miss in the stories, though, are the long days where nothing happens at all, or the long fallow periods in the meditation: meditations that may have been perfectly pleasant but with no ups and downs, or meditations that were actually unpleasant because the mind was unwilling to settle down.
Those are the parts not depicted in the books, but when you actually meditate, everyone's bound to experience those things.
So you've got to keep a perspective on your thoughts, on the stories you like to tell even about your own practice.
We're here to train the mind, and part of training the mind involves doing things over and over and over again: pulling the mind away from distraction over and over again, keeping the mind with its object over and over again, taking a skill that you develop while you're meditating and learning to apply it in daily life over and over again.
That may not be exciting or compelling, and the mind will have a tendency to rebel sometimes, but you have to ask yourself when you're rebelling, “Where are you going?” If you think of dream worlds or pleasant worlds where you could be right now, ask yourself, “What would it actually be like to be there?
There's a great story in Ajaan Lee's autobiography where he tires of being a monk and starts thinking about disrobing.
So one night he decides to think seriously about disrobing: what's actually going to happen, what it's really going to be like.
He starts out with a story that sounds pretty good.
He gets a job and then a raise in pay.
He's doing pretty well — so well that he decides he wants the daughter of a nobleman for his wife.
That, in reality, would have been pretty unlikely.
Ajaan Lee was the son of a peasant in the northeast.
It's very unlikely that he would have gotten anywhere near the daughter of a nobleman.
But he was able to contrive a story whereby he actually meets one, and she gets attracted to him, and they end up getting married.
That's when reality sets in.
The daughter of a nobleman is probably very delicately brought up, yet for the family to survive she would have to work.
So she gets a job, and she has a child, but with the stresses of work and pregnancy she dies soon after childbirth.
He's left with the kid, and her parents want nothing to do with him.
So he hires a woman to be the wet nurse.
At first, she's good with the kid, and after a while she works herself into his affections.
They eventually get married.
But then she has her own child and she starts playing favorites.
That's when it gets really bad.
He comes home from work at night and the mother has one version of the day's events, the first child has another version, and the second child has still another version of the story.
They're all fighting.
Ajaan Lee feels like he's being pulled in three different directions.
He thinks to himself, “Boy, I wish I were back as a monk.” Then he realizes, “Of course, I'm still a monk.” That puts the issue of disrobing in a different light.
In other words, he talked himself out of doing something foolish by allowing his dreams of disrobing to get real.
So this is one way of dealing with the allure of distracting thoughts.
Ask yourself, “If I really lived in that situation, what would it be like?
What would the constraints of that situation be?” When you think of the different worlds you could be going to, the worlds of lay life, the worlds of being a monk in the forest in Thailand: While you're thinking of those worlds, they seem like open opportunities.
But you have to realize that each of those worlds has its constraints, its constrictions.
And the taste of the thought is very different from the actual emotion of being there.
So if a particular thought is really beguiling, ask yourself what it would really be like to go to that particular state of being.
You'd probably find yourself wishing you had some quiet time to be by yourself.
But here you already have quiet time to be by yourself, so make the most of it.
If thoughts of boredom come up, question those thoughts.
This desire for playing around: There's a sutta in which the Buddha says that this is why beings fall from the bliss of the higher realms.
They start getting wanton and reckless.
They see some of the lower realms.
They say to themselves, “What does that taste like?” It's through their carelessness and wantonness — wanting to play around a little bit, wanting to sample new tastes, wanting a change of scenery — that they fall and then just keep on falling.
The universe evolves not because of a divine plan, but because of recklessness and irresponsibility.
So these irresponsible thoughts: Watch out for them.
Remind yourself that when suffering comes, it's real.
After all, it's a noble truth, and it really is painful, it really does hurt.
And as for the anguish of the mind that's stuck in a particular situation, you're outside of those situations right now, so don't let yourself slip back in.
This is why the Buddha says we should reflect day after day after day on the reflections we chanted just now.
We're subject to aging, subject to illness, subject to death, subject to separation.
These things are real, and the suffering they entail is real.
In the original sutta, the Buddha advises reflecting not only on that, but also on the fact that all living beings are subject to these things.
No matter where we go — in the deva realms, the brahma realms, whatever — we're all subject to death.
That should give you a strong sense of samvega and a desire to be heedful.
Samvega means a sense of dismay, a sense of urgency in trying to get out of being trapped in a situation.
And heedful means watching over your actions very carefully, realizing that your actions do have ramifications.
They've been making a big deal recently about the fact that psychologists are now studying happiness.
Well, Buddhism has been studying happiness for, years.
And it focuses on the most important thing that most psychologists tend to ignore, which is that the way you look for happiness is going to have strong ramifications.
The actions you do, the things you do and say and think in order to attain happiness: If you're not careful, they can lead to some very unhappy results.
They can turn around and devour you.
No intention is free from ramifications.
In other words, anything you do with a dishonest intention is likely to lead to an experience of suffering.
Even though it may yield happiness in the short term, there are long-term ramifications.
You can't get away from that fact.
The way most people live nowadays is based on the premise that it doesn't matter what happens down along the road.
“That's in the future.
I want happiness right now.
I want it fast.” So people like to be told that the only thing that matters is the present moment, where that's all there is: just the present moment.
But your intentions in the present moment act as a cause for things further down the line, on into the future.
You want to make sure that those things coming in the future will be good to experience.
This sometimes means doing things you don't like to do right now, but you realize that they'll lead to a long-term happiness.
Or you may have to stop yourself from doing things you'd like to do right now because they would lead to long-term pain — not just a tangy taste of pain, but the anguish of the actual thing.
Your skill in talking yourself into doing what would lead to long-term happiness and into avoiding things that would lead to long-term pain: That's one of the most important skills you can develop, not only in meditation, but in life as a whole.
So remember the difference between the taste and the actual emotion.
The taste of the emotion is always pleasant, which is why we enjoy art, why we enjoy works of the imagination, why we enjoy our dreams and fantasies.
But the emotion itself often entails pain.
So you do your best not to be heedless.
Don't fall for the taste.
What is attachment?
It's basically a kind of addiction, trying to find happiness in things that have never given a true happiness, in things that aren't worth the effort.
And we do it again and again and again.
Partly, this is from a lack of imagination.
We can't imagine other ways of finding happiness.
Partly, it's from a lack of skill.
We haven't mastered other ways, other approaches for finding happiness.
And partly, it's simply a lack of knowledge.
We're not paying careful attention to what's going on.
So in the practice we try to develop more imagination, more skills, more knowledge.
Let's start with the knowledge.
When you find yourself addicted to a particular pleasure and yet you know it has its drawbacks, look to see when the felt need for that pleasure arises.
What sort of dis-ease is there in the body, what sort of dis-ease is there in the mind, that incites you with a sudden urge to try to alleviate that sense of dis-ease in the same old way you've tried before?
Exactly what are the triggers, what are the feelings?
Watch them arise; watch them pass away.
You'll begin to realize that the need you have, say, for a particular kind of food or particular kind of pleasure, a particular kind of object, a particular kind of relationship is not permanent.
In other words, if you don't give in to that old impulse, the need is not going to stay there.
It goes away.
If it's a basic hunger, you may need to feed the body, but you don't necessarily have to feed it with something that's going to cause trouble later on.
But so many of our other “needs” last for just a little while.
If you have enough endurance to watch them from a different vantage point, you can watch them go away and you're done with them for the time being.
A whispering voice in your mind might say that the impulse may be gone for now, but it's going to return, so why don't you just go ahead and give in now.
But you don't have to be intimidated by that whispering voice.
You can tell it, “We'll deal with its return when it returns.
Right now I want to get over this one hurdle.” If you get good at watching the need arise and pass away, you develop a greater sense of detachment from it.
The Buddha also says to look for the actual gratification you get out of trying to fill that need in the old way.
After all, if there wasn't any gratification at all, you wouldn't go for it.
And you won't understand it enough to really let go of it if you keep trying to deny that the gratification is there.
At the same time, look for the drawbacks.
Learn to compare the two.
Is the gratification really worth the price?
If you can't think of any other way of alleviating that need or desire, that's where you need to develop skill and imagination.
A lot of the training is aimed at expanding your range of imagination.
It's possible to find happiness in life without giving in to your old attachments.
The more you see the drawbacks of the attachments, the more willing you'll be to listen to the Dhamma to expand your imagination of what's possible.
The Buddha himself said that as he was practicing, the idea of having to give up his sensual pleasures didn't appeal to him.
But then he allowed himself to imagine that a higher type of pleasure was possible.
And he realized that to find that higher level of happiness, that more gratifying and more rewarding level of happiness, he'd have to give up his sensual pleasures.
So, for the time being, that's what he did.
He didn't totally undercut sensual passions at first, but for the time being he told himself to put them aside.
That's how he was able to get the mind into states of concentration that provided an even deeper and more gratifying pleasure than sensual passion could provide.
You'll notice this as you work with the breath.
There come times when just the process of breathing can feel really gratifying.
There's a very strong, intense feeling of pleasure that feels almost sensual.
But as the Buddha says, it's not sensual.
It has to do with the form of the body, as opposed to sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and outside tactile sensations.
But it can feel really good in a very visceral way.
That's important.
Once you see that there's this possibility, it's easier to let go of your other desires as they arise.
You've got something better.
There's a passage where the Buddha says that the reason we get so stuck on sensual desires, sensual pleasures, is because we don't see any other alternative to pain.
But when you see that there is the alternative and, as you reflect on it, you see that it has fewer drawbacks, greater rewards, and that you can learn how to tap into it when you need it, then it can be your new attachment — a much better one.
If you want to call it an addiction, it's a healthy addiction, as opposed to the unhealthy ones you've pursued in the past.
So in the beginning it's a matter of learning to imagine yourself accessing the pleasure of concentration, realizing that there is that possibility, and then developing the skill.
That way, having developed the skill, your knowledge gets more precise.
After a while you begin to see that the level of concentration you've obtained is not as gratifying as you might like.
So you can ask yourself: Are there deeper, more gratifying levels of concentration?
Well, the Buddha says there are.
Again, open your imagination to that idea and see what's there in your present state of concentration that's still a burden, still stressful, still unsatisfactory.
Learn to let go of that.
In many cases, this will involve abandoning some of the factors that got you into concentration to begin with — such as directed thought and evaluation — so there may be a resistance to letting them go.
Other times there's not.
You see clearly that you don't need these things and you simply let them drop.
Either way, the process of imagining that you can let them drop will open the way for you to go through more and more refined levels of concentration, deeper, more pervasive levels of pleasure and wellbeing, all the way to a strong state of equanimity.
Even the equanimity that comes when you let go of pleasure has a very strong sense of wellbeing.
You feel perfectly satisfied.
You can stay there with the stillness, and it feels deep down good.
In this way you find that there are alternative ways for finding happiness in life, finding pleasure in life.
You look back at your old addictions, and they seem not to make much sense any more.
From your new perspective, you wonder why you would have felt so addicted to them in the first place.
In this way the Buddha doesn't ask you just to go cold turkey, with no gratification, nothing to replace your old addiction.
He gives you something new and viscerally pleasing to hold on to.
In so doing, you expand your imagination to other levels as well.
You begin to see your old ways of doing things as not so fixed or necessary as you once thought they were.
You begin to loosen up your sense of who you are and where you find your happiness, and that alerts you to the fact that you can change even further.
You feel more inclined to try out new things in the meditation, even though they seem to go beyond your old ideas of what you thought was possible.
This is why the Buddha talks about nibbana primarily in metaphorical terms: to excite your imagination.
He's not totally silent on the topic, and he's not — contrary to what most people say — willing only to discuss it in negative terms.
He has some very positive things to say about it, calling it “shelter,” “harbor,” “the beyond.” This is to expand your imagination to encompass the possibility that there's something even beyond the pleasure, the wellbeing, that comes from getting the mind into good states of concentration.
This encourages you to start questioning some of your other addictions, such as your sense of self.
Our sense of self is basically our strategy for happiness.
In the course of the practice we learn how to develop new strategies.
That means we develop different senses of ourselves as we go through the practice, as we expand our repertoire.
A lot of people feel threatened by the Buddha's teachings on not-self precisely for this reason.
Your sense of self is your strategy for happiness.
When you hear the idea of not-self, it sounds as if the Buddha is asking you to abandon everything you know about how to find happiness.
No self would leave you with no means for happiness at all.
That's the fear.
But what he's actually doing is teaching you how to refine your strategies for happiness, developing new strategies that are more effective, ultimately coming up with a strategy that's actually a not-self strategy.
It's not that radically different from what he's been teaching you on the more elementary levels, because on those levels he's been teaching you to abandon your unskillful strategies, the addictions that are obviously harmful.
But there comes a point in the practice where you have to learn to abandon some of the strategies that were skillful in the beginning but now are beginning to get in the way of something even more refined.
Sometimes you hear people treating your sense of self as an obvious fallacy that causes nothing but harm and stress.
If that were the case, it wouldn't take much to let go of it, seeing how obviously harmful it is.
But hey, it's part of your strategy for happiness.
It has its gratifications.
You've got to admit its good side.
Still, there comes a point where you have to look at its drawbacks, its limitations.
Even your most skillful strategies for happiness at some point have to get dropped.
So the Buddha gives you the positive teachings on nibbana to encourage you to let go of those things, even those skillful strategies, when the time comes.
At the same time, he refuses to say whether there's going to be a you in there, or no you in there.
He wants you to develop the attitude that, at this stage, your sense of self is irrelevant to whether you're going to be happy.
But he's not saying that you don't exist.
When asked point blank if there was a self or there was no self, he refused to answer, saying that if you hold to the idea that there is a self you get stuck in eternalism, which blocks the practice: You hold on to certain things as being the eternal you and you'll never be able to let them go.
If you develop the idea that there is no self, that's annihilationism, which blocks the practice as well: Either you fear being annihilated or you have a neurotic desire to want to be annihilated, neither of which is helpful.
So there comes a point where you have to put issues of self and not-self aside, and just look at where there's stress, and what activities are causing the stress, and how to stop them.
That's why the teachings on the four noble truths trump every other teaching.
It's how the teachings on developing a skillful self are strategies, and the teachings on not-self are strategies as well.
The teachings on nibbana are strategies, too.
Nibbana won't get you to nibbana, but the desire to get there will.
So learn to use these strategies to overcome your most blatant and harmful addictions, and then your more subtle ones, until you finally reach what the Buddha called the ultimate happiness — nibbanam paramam sukham — where you can put all your addictions, all your strategies, aside.
There are some places in the Pali Canon where the Buddha says that the five aggregates are stressful, and others where he says the five clinging-aggregates are stressful.
It's important to notice here that he's talking about two different kinds of stress.
The sense in which the five aggregates are stressful is related to stress in terms of the three characteristics.
They're inconstant and so they're stressful.
That's simply the way they are, whether you hold on to them or not.
But if you don't grab on to these things, your mind doesn't suffer.
It's when you grab on, it's when you cling, that stress comes into the mind.
You create a clinging-aggregate.
You create a connection.
This is stress in terms of the four noble truths.
Wherever there's craving, there can be clinging, and the clinging to the aggregates is the stress that really weighs on the mind.
When we practice, our main focus is on the stress in the four noble truths, the stress that weighs on the mind.
If you don't cling to the things that are stressful, then they can be as stressful as they want, but the stress doesn't come in and weigh you down.
It's like picking up a heavy object.
If you just leave it there on the ground, it doesn't weigh you down.
It weighs the same whether you're picking it up or not.
When you pick it up it's fifty pounds; when you leave it on the ground it's fifty pounds.
The difference is that the fifty pounds is suddenly on top of you when you pick it up, and that's when you suffer.
That's precisely the stress the Buddha is focusing on.
That's the important one to notice.
Always try to be clear about this distinction.
The real problem isn't the aggregates, it's the clinging.
And the word clinging has a double meaning.
It can also mean the act of feeding on something.
Where we cling is where we look to feed for happiness.
We look to the five aggregates for food.
We munch them down, and then they munch us down.
We feed on the form of the body, we feed on feelings, perceptions, thought constructs, and sensory consciousness.
When these things are pleasant, they're not too heavy.
But they can turn around and turn unpleasant very quickly.
They gobble us up, for we've opened the way for them to get to us.
Once you start clinging to the good ones, you start clinging to the bad ones as well, because that's where you're looking for food.
So it's important to understand clinging so that you can put an end to it.
As the Buddha said, there are four kinds.
There's sensual clinging, clinging to views, clinging to habits and practices, and then clinging to doctrines of the self.
All of these hover around the five aggregates.
They're different ways of clinging to the five aggregates.
And the Buddha has a different cure for each.
Sometimes you hear that the deepest, most underlying form of clinging is the sense of self identity that you build around things.
If you learn how not to have any sense of self identity, there you are: You've taken care of all the other forms of clinging.
Sometimes you hear that clinging to views is the basic form of clinging.
If you can deconstruct all your views, you'll be done with all the other forms of clinging as well.
So you reason your way to seeing how you can't say that things exist, you can't say that things don't exist, or both, or neither.
They're empty.
That means that your sensual desire is empty, your habits and practices are empty, your doctrines of the self are empty.
With everything empty like that, there's nothing to cling to.
But that doesn't work either.
After letting things go in this way, you'll find that your sensual desires weren't touched.
You just turn around and pick them back up.
So you have to realize that each kind of clinging has its own antidote.
For example, clinging to sensuality: When the Buddha talks about sensuality, he doesn't say that you're attached to sights or sounds.
The word kama, or sensuality, here doesn't mean beautiful or desirable sights, sounds, smells, tastes, or tactile sensations.
It means the plans and intentions you have around these things.
That's what we're really focused on.
We're all attached to the ideas we have of the things we want, wanting them to be a certain way to give us pleasure.
In other words, we're more attached to our dreams and plans about sensual pleasures than we are to the sensual pleasures themselves.
This is simple enough to see.
If you find your sensual desire thwarted in one area, you turn around and you focus it on something else.
The desire is what we cling to.
We cling to the plans that we make for sensual pleasure.
And what are these plans like?
For the most part, they're pretty one-sided and sketchy.
Say you have designs on somebody else's body.
When you think about that person's body, there are only certain details that you think about.
A lot of details you don't want to think about at all.
Or when you think about a particular relationship, you think about only certain aspects of the relationship and not about others.
So the antidote here is to broaden your view, to see that your pursuit of pleasure in this way carries a lot of pain along with it.
When the Buddha talks about the drawbacks of sensuality, he starts with the fact that in order to lead a sensual lifestyle, you've got to work.
The work in and of itself is painful and wearisome.
You work and work and work to build up wealth.
Sometimes you gain it; sometimes you don't.
Even when you do gain it, there's the fear that, as he says, thieves and kings will steal it — I like the way the Buddha always mentions kings and thieves in the same breath — water might wash it away, fire might burn it, hateful heirs could take off with it.
That can easily happen to your wealth.
And as the Buddha points out, it's over sensuality that people fight.
Parents fight with their children; children fight with their parents; brothers with sisters, sisters with brothers; husband with wife, wife with husband.
And not just in the family: There are wars over sensual pleasures as well because we need to take wealth to pay for our passions, which are far greater than all the wealth in the world.
That's how we end up going to war.
The Buddha goes down a long list of all the pains and sufferings tied up with this pursuit of our dreams of sensuality.
So as you look at the pursuit of sensuality in its entirety, you realize how much pain and suffering it involves.
You don't have to look too far.
This contemplation we have of the requisites every day, thinking about food, clothing, shelter, and medicine: Just the fact that we have a body makes us a burden on other people.
So think about that.
Every time your mind starts spinning a web of sensual desire, tell yourself: “If you're going to spin a web, spin the full web.
Try to encompass the whole picture.
Like that daydream that Ajaan Lee reports in his autobiography, from the time he was planning to disrobe: At first it starts out really nice; he even gets a nobleman's daughter for his wife.
But then the reality principle starts kicking in.
Eventually, because she's a nobleman's daughter, she's not up to the hard work that's required in marrying a peasant's son.
She dies and leaves him with a child to raise.
He gets a second wife.
The second wife has a kid of her own and starts playing favorites, abusing the first kid.
And so on down the line.
When we bring in reality like this, it helps cut through a lot of our delusions around sensuality, a lot of our attachment to sensual designs, sensual plans, sensual dreams.
Or you can contemplate the body, in all its parts.
You can think of a beautiful body, but when you think of the parts inside, you say wuuh.
Just a few micrometers below the skin there's all this other stuff, and it's inextricably connected with the things you like.
Suppose you lust for somebody.
You don't like the idea of their intestines, but if you took their intestines out, would you like that person without any intestines?
It's not worth taking either way — with or without a liver, with or without a stomach.
So when you think in these ways, you begin to realize that your sensual plans and desires are really unrealistic, really misleading.
They make you half blind so that they can take you down a path to suffering.
Realizing this helps cut through the sensuality.
You see how arbitrary all these dreams are, that you can't rely on them.
That's what helps you let them go.
As for clinging to views, the Buddha has you follow a similar process, but with different details.
The process is that he has you look at the drawbacks that come from clinging to a view, one of the major drawbacks being that you inevitably get into arguments with other people.
But more than that, the Buddha has you look carefully at the things you have views about.
This is where the details differ, and the analysis goes into more technical terms.
Your views come down to the question of what exists and what doesn't exist, he says, but when you actually look at your sensory experience, you just see things arising and passing away.
As you focus on the arising, the idea of non-existence doesn't occur to you.
As you focus on the passing away, the idea of existence doesn't occur to you.
You realize that the basic building blocks of experience, when you look at them just on the level of arising and passing away, don't provide a foundation for the very basic polarities of existing and not-existing.
On top of that, any views you build are sketches based on not looking at things very carefully.
So the Buddha has you look very carefully at the process of what it's like to experience things.
When you see that views really can't express the truth about things, and that holding onto them is going to cause you to suffer, you can cut through your attachment to them.
As for habits and practices, he first has you look at the actual habits or precepts and practices you're attached to.
The attachment here is to the idea that if you follow certain rules and you're a good little boy, a good little girl, that's all you have to do.
God will be happy with you or the universe will approve of you or whatever.
So the Buddha has people look directly at their habits and practices together with their results, some of which are actively harmful.
Back in his days, sacrifices were believed to be a way to find true happiness.
So he talked about looking at the misery that comes through the sacrifices, not only for the animals sacrificed but also for the people forced to labor in getting the animals killed.
Self-torture as a form of austerity was also a popular practice in some circles.
So he had you look at the pain that comes from it, to see that it doesn't really lead anywhere.
It doesn't really help cleanse the mind.
So in this way he'd get people to abandon harmful habits and practices, and replace them with good habits and good practices: the habits we adopt as part of our virtue, the practices we follow in the practice of meditation.
But eventually he says to watch out: If you're not careful, you're going to create a sense of conceit around these things, the pride that comes sometimes when “I follow the precepts and you don't,” or “My jhana's better than yours.” The way to get beyond that attachment is not to break the precepts or drop your practice of jhana.
It's simply to continue with those practices while learning how not to develop a sense of conceit around them.
Realize that you're doing these things not to make yourself better than other people, but simply because they work in cleansing the mind.
Finally there's clinging to doctrines of self.
This doesn't mean just the view that “I have a self,” whatever your sense of self might be.
It also means clinging to the view that “I have no self.” Thinking in either way, the Buddha said, leads you into a thicket of views that will get you entangled.
So, as with the cure for clinging to views, the Buddha has you take the polarity of existence or nonexistence and put it aside.
When the issue of existing or not-existing is a non-issue, the idea of a self existing or not existing is a non-issue as well.
Instead, the Buddha has you look at things simply in terms of the four noble truths.
Where is stress arising?
What is the cause of that stress?
What's the path to the end of that stress?
As you divide up your experience in those terms, the whole issue of “who you are” or “who you're not” just gets put aside.
You're more focused on what you're doing that's causing stress, learning how to comprehend the stress, learning how to abandon the cause through developing the path, so that ultimately you can realize the end of stress, the end of suffering.
That's the way out of that type of clinging.
So when you find the mind clinging, weighing itself down with its attachment to the aggregates, try to be clear about exactly which kind of clinging you're suffering from and what the antidote is, what the medicine that the Buddha prescribed, because it's different in each case.
There's no one blanket cure to cover every form of clinging.
You've got to develop your discernment from many angles, develop discernment with many facets.
Essentially every approach involves seeing things in terms of being inconstant, stressful, and not-self, but those principles get applied in different ways for each type of clinging.
So try to keep this list of medicines in mind and apply them as appropriate.
That way you put yourself in a position where you're living in a world that's stressful but you're not pulling the stress inside.
You can live surrounded by inconstancy, stress, and not-self, but not suffer from it.
The Buddha's decision to go off into the forest started with his realization that he was subject to aging, illness, and death, and yet these were the things in which he had been searching for happiness.
We, too, are subject to aging, illness, and death, and we tend to search for our happiness in things that age, grow ill, and die as well.
He, however, wanted a happiness that was better than that, something that was more reliable.
This desire was what underlay all of his efforts: to find a happiness that would not age, would not grow ill, and would not die.
Of course, all of his friends and his family told him that that was impossible.
But he decided that life would not be worth living unless he gave it a try.
So he worked hard for six years, going down some dead-end paths, finding himself in blind alleys, but finally he found the path that led to a happiness that did not grow ill, did not age, and did not die.
That's what he taught for the rest of his life.
That path — the noble eightfold path — was his first teaching, and it was one of his last teachings as well.
Prominent in the path is right effort, the kind of effort that leads to the type of happiness that he had been looking for.
It starts with desire: generating desire, upholding your intent to let go of unskillful qualities that have arisen, to prevent unskillful qualities that have not arisen from arising, to give rise to skillful qualities, and to maintain them and bring them to their culminations.
Desire is what animates those activities.
Notice that these efforts are internal activities.
These qualities are qualities of the mind.
They will manifest themselves outside — in your thoughts, words, and deeds — but they come from within, so that's where the main effort is focused.
This is why the section of the noble eightfold path that deals with concentration starts with right effort: the effort to give rise to skillful qualities, like mindfulness, alertness, discernment.
These are the things that are really going to help you.
Even if you don't make it all the way to nibbana, these qualities will stand by you as the body ages, as it grows ill, as it dies.
One of the discoveries the Buddha made on the night of his Awakening was that things don't end with death.
There is a carryover.
But it's not the body that carries over.
It's qualities of the mind.
He called these qualities noble treasures — things like conviction in the principle of action, the belief that all of your intentional actions will bear fruit in line with the quality of the intention; virtue; a sense of shame at the idea of doing evil things; a sense of compunction or fear of the consequences of doing evil things; a desire for learning; the ability to relinquish what gets in the way of your path; and discernment.
These seven qualities are called noble treasures because, as the Buddha said, fire can't burn them, thieves and kings can't steal them, death can't kill them, water can't wash them away.
So death is not the end.
Some things carry over, but you have to focus your energies on the mind if you want to have good things to carry over.
Otherwise the things you carry over are bad.
This is why our effort here is aimed in two directions.
One, if you can gain total release, this is the path to total release.
Two, if you don't gain total release within this lifetime, you've got things to carry over as you continue your quest in your next lifetime.
But you have to desire those qualities.
Otherwise it's hard to gain them, for they do require work.
We may be attracted to the idea of a path that doesn't require any action or effort at all, but it doesn't work that way.
The path of inaction just goes in the general way that water goes — downhill — developing bad qualities to carry over, whereas the path that goes uphill requires effort.
Right effort doesn't require that you kill yourself or exhaust yourself, but it does require an appropriate effort, whatever is required to get past unskillful qualities and give rise to skillful ones.
There are times when it requires a lot of concerted effort.
Other times, it requires just the ability to sit and watch.
But it's always a focused effort, an appropriate effort, whatever the situation demands.
It's built on the desire to find something that goes beyond aging, illness, and death, something you can really rely on.
To help generate that desire, the Buddha has us look long and hard at aging, illness, and death — and at our fear of these things.
He says that our fear of death is based on four things.
Either we're attached to the body, we're attached to sensual pleasures, we realize that we've done cruel and harmful things to other people, or we haven't yet seen the true Dhamma, that there really is a deathless.
A lot of our meditation is aimed at overcoming those four reasons for fear.
For example, the realization that we've done cruel things in the past: The Buddha doesn't have us get tied up in remorse.
The principle of kamma, which sometimes sounds deterministic, is actually a very fluid and complex process, one with room for making changes in the present moment.
One of the things you can do to counteract the harmful effects from unskillful things you've done in the past is to develop an attitude of goodwill for all beings without limit.
The Buddha calls it an expansive mind state.
When painful things happen in an expansive mind state, the impact is much different from things happening in a narrow and confined mind state.
The image he gives is of a lump of salt placed in water.
If you put the lump of salt in a glass of water, the water becomes unfit to drink.
If you put it in a broad, clean river, the water in the river is still fit to drink because there's so much more water compared to the salt.
So the Buddha recommends that you develop an attitude of goodwill for all beings, both because it counteracts the effects of bad actions in the past, and because it prevents you from acting on unskillful intentions now and into the future.
If you really feel goodwill for all, there's no way you can intentionally harm them.
You don't have to like all beings; you simply decide that you don't want to cause them suffering.
You don't want to take pleasure in their suffering.
As you think about it, what good do you get out of other people's suffering?
You don't gain anything at all.
There may be a sense of schadenfreude, but that's pretty miserable food for the mind.
It's better to realize that if all the cruel and heartless people in the world had a true sense of happiness, they wouldn't do cruel and heartless things anymore.
So the desire for goodwill sets your attitude straight on how the world would actually become a better place for everyone: You're wishing that people would understand how to be truly happy, so that they'd stop doing cruel and heartless things.
Goodwill also puts you in a position where your true happiness doesn't have to conflict with the true happiness of other people.
So this is one way of counteracting that particular reason for fear.
As for attachment to the body and to sensual pleasures, the Buddha has a double-pronged attack.
One prong is to see the drawbacks of being attached to these things.
If you're attached to the body, where is it going to take you?
It's going to take you to aging, illness, and death, for sure, no matter how much you exercise or beautify the body.
It may take you to other places in the meantime, but the ultimate end is something we all share, and we all know for sure that it's going to happen.
The same holds true for sensual pleasures.
Where are the sensual pleasures you were enjoying last week?
Right now all you have is a memory of them.
Sometimes that memory is tainted by the realization that you did unskillful things in order to gain those pleasures or to keep them.
Not only do they tend to slip away on their own, there are also times when other people want what you've got and they're going to fight you for it.
So you have to fight them off.
The Buddha illustrates this point with the image of a hawk that has found a little lump of meat.
As soon as it tries to carry it off, other birds are going to come and attack it.
Then there's the image of a man sitting up in a fruit tree, enjoying the fruit in the tree, but another man comes along with a hatchet.
Instead of climbing the tree to get the fruit, he uses the hatchet to cut the tree down.
If the man in the tree doesn't come down right away, he's going to get hurt.
That's what looking for happiness in sensual pleasures does to you.
It leaves you exposed on all sides to danger.
This is why the Buddha recommends right concentration as the second prong in his attack, to provide you with an alternative source for happiness so that you're not so hungry for sensual pleasures.
You can sit here and bathe the body in a sense of ease, in a sense of rapture, simply by focusing on the breath, adjusting the breath so that it's comfortable, and no one is going to try to steal it from you.
Once it really feels good, you can just settle in, letting the breath bathe you on all sides, coming in and out all of the pores of the skin, allowing that sense of ease and rapture to suffuse the whole body.
As you get really adept at this, your attachment to sensual pleasures begins to loosen, for you see that this is a much better pleasure.
It's more intense, more pervasive, more reliable, less blameworthy, and a lot less dangerous.
So right concentration, in a very direct way, is one of the ways of overcoming fear of death, because you realize that you have an alternative source of pleasure.
But the ultimate step in overcoming fear of death lies in seeing the true Dhamma.
This means realizing that there is something deathless that can be touched by the mind right where you've been experiencing the body.
It comes not just through concentration, but also through working on the opportunities for insight that the concentration provides.
As the mind gets more and more still, you begin to see the mind's attachments.
You can see them as activities.
Even its sense of itself, or your sense of yourself, is just a series of strategies you've devised.
The Buddha calls these strategies the process of “I-making” and “my-making.” Whatever way you form a sense of self around form, feelings, perceptions, thought constructs, or consciousness, it's all just fabrication.
In the process of fabrication there's stress.
If that's all there were in life, you'd be willing to put up with the stress, for without your self-strategies there would be no way to find happiness.
But the Buddha says that there's more.
If you can learn how to deconstruct all those fabrications, all the stories and ideas, the things you build around your sense of who you are and who other people are and what the world is: If you can learn to deconstruct those things, you find a greater happiness, one that doesn't die.
That's what right mindfulness and right concentration are for: to provide you with a framework in which you can do the deconstruction.
The deconstruction is the four noble truths, just looking at things in terms of stress, the cause of stress, what you're doing to put an end to that cause.
And the actual end of stress comes as you get more and more precise, more and more skillful at following the path.
Your precision and skill lead you to detect even more and more subtle levels of fabrication going on in the mind.
When you see the stress that comes with even the subtlest fabrication, and see that you also have the choice not to fabricate — that whatever gratification you got from the fabrication just can't compare with the sense of ease that comes from dropping that particular level of fabrication — the mind will be willing to let go, willing to stop.
In this way it peels these levels of fabrication away in the same way as you'd peel away the layers of an onion.
When all intention finally ends, that's when you realize that there is something deathless.
The Buddha was right.
There is something that can be touched in the mind that doesn't require fabrication — in fact it's totally unfabricated.
It has nothing to do with time or space or anything that can age, grow ill, or die at all.
It's just there.
It can't be touched by the vagaries of time, but it can be touched by undoing the patterns of intention and fabrication in the mind.
Once you've touched that, you realize that there is something that doesn't die.
It has nothing to do with you, although it was through your activities and intentions — skillful intentions that took apart your other intentions — that you got to the point where you could realize this.
Because there's no need to strategize in there, there's no self that comes with the felt need to strategize, or the felt need to partake of the happiness.
The happiness is just there.
You don't need a “you” to create it or to partake of it.
Once you've seen that, that's what really gets you beyond fear of death, for the part that doesn't die is much more worthwhile than the things that do.
Right now these are all just ideas, possibilities, for people who are still struggling to get on the path.
But it's important to have a sense of what's possible, because that expands your imagination.
As your imagination gets expanded, your desires change as well.
If you think the deathless is impossible, your desires are going to focus on things that can die.
But if you open up to the possibility that there is a deathless that can be attained through human effort, it's a challenge.
Hopefully, it stirs some desire to follow the path, to test if what the Buddha said is really true.
So keep this possibility in mind, because this is what gives energy to the desire to stick with right effort, to stick with the path, so that the deathless is not just an idea or news of somebody else's claims.
Ultimately it becomes an actual experience based on your actual efforts.
It's not just news about what somebody else did in the past.
It's your news.
Of course, nobody else has to know.
As the chant says, it's paccattam, something that each person can experience only for him or herself.
But when it becomes a reality in your mind, it makes a huge change.
Aging, illness, and death don't hold any fear.
As one of the texts says, you attain something that allows you to live in peace, ease, and bliss, even when you're old, even when you're sick, even when you die.
And that's a possibility really worth exploring.
When you start out meditating, you have to think — but in a skillful way.
In other words, directed thought and evaluation are factors of right concentration on the level of first jhana.
Even if you can get into concentration really quickly, it requires some thinking to get you there.
And if you get into concentration slowly, you've got to learn how to think your way into the concentration.
So think about the breath; visualize the breath in the body.
Think about how to make the breath more comfortable.
Once it's comfortable, think about how to spread it around in different parts of your body.
Think about the way you understand the breath.
There are various levels to the breath, you know.
There's the in-and-out breath.
There's the breath energy flowing along your blood vessels, flowing along your nerves.
There's a still breath in the body.
There are lots of breaths you can think about.
And these thoughts, if you use them properly, are all meant to help the mind get settled down.
The Buddha once said that after all his years of false starts and dead-end alleys, he finally got onto the path when he realized that he should divide his thoughts into two types: skillful and unskillful.
This meant that he judged his thoughts by the results they gave.
He didn't say that all thinking was bad.
He did say that if you thought skillful thoughts for hours, the drawback would be that the body and mind would get tired, so you want the mind to learn how to rest from the thinking.
But he never said that the conceptual mind is bad.
It's simply a matter of learning how to use your concepts properly.
That's the path.
It's part of right view and right resolve.
These factors of the path involve thoughts.
So we can't condemn thoughts entirely.
We just need to learn how to think in new ways, in ways that are actually skillful, that help free the mind.
Ultimately you do get to a place that's beyond concepts, that goes beyond words, but you need concepts and words to help get you there.
This is a point that a lot of people misunderstand.
They think that in order to get beyond concepts, you just drop concepts immediately.
It's like the old simile of the raft.
The version in the Buddha's teachings is that you take the raft across the river.
Then, once you get across the river, you don't need the raft anymore.
You can put it aside.
Thoughts of right view and thoughts of right resolve are part of the raft.
You hold onto them while you're crossing the river, and only then do you put them aside.
However, in the Diamond Sutra's version of the simile, you get across the river by dropping the raft to begin with.
But that version of the simile just doesn't work.
If you drop the raft before you've reached the other shore, you get washed away.
So learn how to use the raft.
This issue goes way back to the time of the Buddha.
There's a story in the Canon about Anathapindika, who was out walking in the morning.
He said to himself, “It's too early to go visit the monks; why don't I go visit the members of other sects?” So he went to a place where the other sectarians were having their debates.
They were debating whether the world is eternal or not; whether it's finite or infinite; whether the soul is the same thing as the body or something different from the body; whether an enlightened being exists after death, or doesn't exist, or both, or neither.
Those were the hot issues of the day.
The sectarians saw Anathapindika coming and said, “Hey, let's be quiet for a while.
This person is a follower of the Buddha.
The Buddha's followers like quiet people.
Maybe if we're quiet, he'll come over and talk to us.” So they fell quiet.
When Anathapindika came, they asked him: “So.
This Buddha you're a student of: What are his views?” And Anathapindika said, “I really don't know the total extent of his views.” “What about the monks?
What are their views?” And he responded, “I don't know totally what their views are, either.” “Then what about you?” they asked him.
“What are your views?” And he responded, “Well, I'll be happy to tell you my views, but I'd like to hear your views first.
So they told him their views.
One man said, “The world is eternal.
Only this is true; everything else is false and worthless.” Someone else said, “No, the world is not eternal.
Only this is true; everything else is false and worthless.” And so on down the line.
Anathapindika's response was: “Those who hold to any of these views suffer because they're clinging to the view.
The view is conditioned, and whenever there's clinging to anything conditioned, there's bound to be suffering.
So they're clinging to stress.” The sectarians then said, “Well, what about your view?” And he said, essentially, “All views are conditioned.
Whatever is conditioned, you have to let go of.” They said, “Well, then, by your logic, your view too is a cause for suffering, for you're clinging to something conditioned.” And he said, “No, this is the view that leads beyond suffering, because it teaches you ultimately how to let go of everything conditioned, including views.
According to the story, this left them abashed.
They just sat there with their heads drooping, at a loss for words.
So he got up and left.
When he told the Buddha what had happened, the Buddha said, “This is a good way to deal with those people.
So this is the Buddha's approach.
Not all views are a cause of suffering.
Right view leads you away from suffering because it allows you to do two things.
First, you can use it as a tool to uproot your clinging to everything else.
Then, because it teaches you to recognize all your attachments wherever they are, it teaches you how to turn around and let go of right view itself.
People often come to the Dhamma thinking that we're here to get beyond concepts.
But they run into concepts in the Buddha's teachings, and therefore they feel that the Buddha's being inconsistent.
What's inconsistent, though, is their misunderstanding.
The Buddha never says that we have to drop concepts from the very beginning.
He says you use concepts to get beyond concepts.
Many people in the modern world come to Buddhism suffering from their conceptual framework.
They're raised in a materialist worldview whose basic concepts — that life comes from nothing and returns to nothing, with a brief chance to pursue pleasure in the interim — are pretty dismal.
They believe that if they could free their minds from these concepts and simply dwell in the present with no thought of what happens at the end, they'd be happy.
They'd be able to squeeze as much pleasure out of the present as they could before the inevitable hits.
So they look for a way to be free of all concepts.
When they come here, though, they run into concepts.
They see the Buddha's teachings on kamma and rebirth, and they say, “This is invalid; you can't make presuppositions about these things.
Nobody knows anything about what happens before we're born.
Nobody knows anything about what happens after we die.
Doesn't the Buddha say that you have to prove things before you can accept them?
All we know is that you can blot these issues out of the mind and be in the present moment without any concepts, and that's happiness.” So that's what they want the Buddha's teachings to be.
They don't realize that they're judging the Buddha's teachings by the very concepts that are making them miserable.
The idea that we can't know beyond our immediate sensory experience, so therefore we just try to heighten our immediate sensory experience: That's a concept itself, and although it may aim at going beyond concepts, it doesn't really get you there.
The Buddha's concepts, though, actually give results.
They're very open about the fact that you have to use concepts to get beyond concepts, and their idea of what's there when the path has freed you from concepts is more than just a pleasant oblivion in the present.
It's another dimension entirely.
That's what right view is all about.
It's there for you to judge the concepts you're bringing to the path, to see which ones fit into the strategy of the path to that dimension — nibbana — and which ones don't.
The Buddha never says that he can offer an empirical proof of the teachings on kamma, rebirth, or nibbana.
But he says that if you do adopt these ideas, they're very helpful in taking you beyond suffering.
In other words, he offers a pragmatic proof: He has you look at these concepts in terms of what they do, where they lead.
If you find that they lead you to wanting to train the mind so you can get rid of the craving that leads on to future rebirth, they've performed their function.
Then as you sit down here to meditate, you can put the concepts that are not immediately relevant to your meditation aside.
If you find that you're having trouble sticking with the meditation, you can call up those concepts again to remind yourself of why you're here, to induce a feeling of samvega, a dismay over the pointlessness of life as it's normally lived; and a feeling of pasada, or confidence that if there's any way out, this has got to be it: training the mind, learning how to watch the mind so you can see where its misunderstandings lead it to suffer, where its misunderstandings lead it to crave things that are going to cause problems on down the line.
And as for the teaching on nibbana, it reminds you that freedom from suffering isn't just a total blackout.
It's the highest happiness there is.
In this way, you can use the Buddha's insights on these topics to give more impetus to practice.
After all, we're doing something important here.
We're not just trying to hang out in the present moment and squeeze as much intensity out of it as we can.
The Buddha says that our intentions, if they're unskillful, stand in the way of the ultimate happiness.
So we're here to watch our intentions.
This is where the teaching of kamma is always and immediately relevant to your meditation, and why the Buddha stresses the issue of kamma over and over again.
The early Buddhists often made the point that their teachings on kamma were what set them apart from all the other teachings available at the time.
For instance, the Buddhist take on kamma isn't the deterministic view that some people held to at that time.
And it's not a view of total chaos, either.
It's a nonlinear pattern.
And the important element in that non-linear pattern is that part of your experience is shaped by past intentions and part of it's shaped by your present intentions.
You can't do anything about past intentions, but you can change your present ones.
So you focus there.
That's why we're focused on the present moment: to look at our intentions.
When you have right view, you realize that that's why we're here.
This helps give focus to your meditation.
Once the mind is still, you intend to keep it still.
That's a skillful intention.
Then you can start looking at the process of intention in a deeper way, to see exactly how intention happens, how much it shapes your present experience, how you fabricate your breath, how you fabricate thoughts, how you fabricate feelings and perceptions.
You want to look into that.
That's how discernment is developed.
You're not going to maintain this kind of focus unless you have a real appreciation that, yes, your actions really are important in this issue of creating suffering — not only now but on into the future.
This is how the proper use of concepts gives focus to your meditation.
A while back, I was giving a talk to a group of people on kamma.
They'd been meditating for quite a while, so I tried to make the point that an understanding of kamma really focuses your meditation in an important way.
It helps focus you on the issue of what you're doing that's skillful and what you're doing that's not skillful, and realizing how much your “doing” does shape your experience.
They all gave me a blank look.
Then I realized that they'd been taught that there is no such thing as skillful or unskillful, good or bad in the meditation.
It's simply a question of hanging out in the present moment, squeezing as much non-conceptual intensity out of the present moment as you can — which is an idea the Buddha never advocated.
That's not what we're here for.
I mean, there will be times when you notice that being very mindful in the present makes experiences more intense.
You're less caught up in your thought worlds, and the pleasure in the breath grows stronger.
Everything becomes more immediately felt.
But that's not why we're here.
You want to look deeper: What is it about intention that makes the difference in the present moment?
Always look for that, because that's where freedom is going to be found — in being sensitive to your intentions.
When you're totally sensitive to them and totally understand how they cause stress, you can let them go.
This is what the Buddha calls the kamma that leads to the end of kamma.
This is why an understanding of causality is so essential.
If everything were deterministic, your experience would have been totally decided by some outside being or some impersonal fate a long time ago.
There would be no point in practicing.
There would be nothing the practice could accomplish.
If, on the other hand, everything were chaotic, you couldn't be sure that the lessons you learned yesterday would give any guidance in knowing what to do skillfully today.
But the fact that things are nonlinear and not totally determined by the past — that part of your experience is being determined by what you're choosing to focus on, what you're choosing to do and say and think right now: That leaves an opening for the practice, because you can change what you intend right now.
And the fact that things follow a pattern allows your knowledge of what's skillful to grow over time.
When you believe that, you act on it.
You try to make your intentions more and more skillful.
So when we come to the practice, we learn to adopt new concepts that have a good impact on the mind.
That's the test — a pragmatic test.
In the beginning, you begin to see that this belief does help here, it does help there, so you pursue it more and more persistently.
Then ultimately you discover that it's a big help in putting an end to suffering.
That's your real proof that the concepts work — and only then do you get beyond concepts.
Even when you're in concentration, once you drop directed thought and evaluation, you still have perceptions.
In fact all the states of concentration up to the dimension of nothingness are based on a perception — the label you hold in mind that keeps you in that state of stillness.
Even though there's no discursive thought, there's still a concept there.
So the practice is a matter of learning how to use your concepts wisely, picking and choosing which ones are helpful and which ones are not.
Knowing when you need to think discursively, when you can drop discursive thought and just be with one perception: That's a skill based on right view.
If you learn how to make your views right and then apply those right views to understanding how the mind creates suffering, that's how views ultimately take you beyond views.
Your right view will show you how to let go of right view when you need to.
But don't be too quick to drop it.
Don't be the sort of person who leaves the raft on the near shore and tries to float through the air over the river.
Use the raft when it's helpful.
That's why the Buddha left it behind for us.
That's what it's for.
We're born into this world without an instruction booklet.
There's nothing to explain which issues in life are important, which are the important things to know.
We do know when we feel suffering and we know when we feel relative ease, but that's about as much as we know.
As we grow up, there are people to explain things to us.
This is where human beings have an advantage over animals.
There's nobody to explain anything to a dog or a cat about how to live.
There's that wonderful story by Mark Twain where the mother dog explains the human world to her puppy.
Of course that's fantasy.
What's interesting about that story is the mother has her information all garbled up.
“Presbyterian” is the name of a dog breed; “heroism” means “agriculture” — that sort of thing.
Actually, getting garbled information can be one of the dangers of the human world, too.
Our parents have taught us things from childhood and they may have gotten things all mixed up as well.
So there are a lot of things we don't know, and we have to make a lot of decisions based on uncertain information.
What are the important issues in life?
And what is this life, anyhow?
Is it part of a longer story or is it just this story, the whole story right here, right now: birth, aging, death?
And how about our actions?
We seem to decide what to do.
We seem to make choices, those choices seem to have results, and there seems to be some sort of pattern to the results.
Some actions seem to lead to good results, other actions to bad results.
But are things as they seem?
We don't really know.
So we find ourselves acting on assumptions as to what leads to happiness and what leads to pain, those two things that we do know when we experience them.
But the question is, is the quest for happiness really worthwhile or should we be looking for something else?
There's really no hard proof for any of these issues, so we act on assumptions.
When you come to meditate you're already acting on certain assumptions.
One is that the training of the mind is worthwhile.
That means you believe that your actions are important and that knowledge and training will make a difference in how you act.
Those are big assumptions right there, but when you look at your life, you've seen that acting on those assumptions has brought you at least some happiness.
That's called a pragmatic proof.
It's not an empirical proof.
An empirical proof would be able to trace the energy that goes from our decision to act to the actual action, and from the action to the results that we experience.
You'd have to run experiments with controls and actually be able to measure happiness in a very precise way.
But you can't do that.
All those tests that they say they've run about measuring the happiness in different countries or measuring the happiness of people in different social groups, with different levels of income: When you ask people to rate their happiness on a scale from to, what kind of science is that?
What's your compared to somebody else's on a scale of to?
So there's really no empirical proof for any of these things.
But there is a personal pragmatic proof.
You find that when you act on certain assumptions, things seem to turn out in a particular way, and some assumptions lead to better results than others.
That's the kind of proof that the Buddha has you act on.
He teaches about the principle of action, that action is real, and that your intention is what determines the result of the action.
There were people in the Buddha's time who said that action was unreal, that it only seemed to exist.
But the Buddha said to look at how those people lived.
Did they live as if action didn't exist?
They chose different courses of action and preferred some to others.
This shows that on a pragmatic level they still believed that action was important and that some actions were preferable to others, some were more skillful than others.
They really would have an impact on your happiness.
There were also people who said that your actions didn't really lead to happiness or pain.
Happiness and pain were self-caused and very arbitrary.
And yet those people had a theory all worked out as to why this was so, and why it was important to believe this, and how to live in response to that belief.
In other words, they still believed that knowledge was important, actions were important, and one way of action was preferable to another.
This is how the Buddha recommended that you look at the issue of action.
What series of beliefs about action lead you to act in a skillful way and give good results?
There's a sense of greater or lesser happiness that you can know only for yourself.
You can't compare your happiness with somebody else's.
But you can look inside.
So the Buddha never tried to offer an empirical proof for his teaching on kamma or the teaching on rebirth.
The people who claim that science has proven either of these, or that they have proven these principles to themselves in an empirical way, are not doing the Buddha's teachings any favor.
You can't really prove these things empirically, and people who really understand empirical proofs will look down on Buddhism for making that sort of claim.
The Buddha himself didn't try to give an empirical proof.
He did say, though, that if you act in certain ways you will find a greater sense of ease, a greater sense of wellbeing in life.
And these actions will depend on certain assumptions.
For instance, the question of rebirth: If you believe that this life is all we've got and the end of life is uncertain, would you be sitting here meditating?
Maybe, maybe not.
It's all pretty arbitrary.
Would you be kind to other people?
Maybe, maybe not.
But if you did go on the assumption that this is part of a longer story shaped by your actions, and that your actions are shaped by your mind, you'd be sure to put more effort into training the mind to be meticulous and careful.
You'd take whatever time and effort is needed to get the mind in good shape.
This is one of the reasons why the Buddha recommended that we take his teachings on kamma and rebirth as a working hypothesis.
He said that he learned in the course of his Awakening that this life is actually part of a longer story of many lifetimes that have been going on for a very long time and could potentially continue going on for a very long time to come.
In other words, the principle of rebirth is true.
And it's also true that one of the reasons for training the mind is ultimately to be able to put an end to that story, because there's a greater happiness that comes when there's no more rebirth.
But he also stated that even if this were not the case, you'd live a happier, better life by assuming that it is.
So when you wonder about the Buddha's teachings on these topics, remember that we're all acting on assumptions.
The problem for many of us is that our assumptions are not articulated or we haven't worked out the consequences of the assumptions we have articulated.
This means that when we encounter a fully articulated assumption, it may seem strange.
We have to reflect back on ourselves: What are our assumptions about action, about life, about happiness, about how the principle of causality works in our lives?
And then which assumptions really lead to the greatest happiness if we act on them, if we keep our actions consistent with what we believe?
That's the role of faith in the Buddhist teachings.
For many of us in the West, faith has gotten a bad name.
We've had it pushed on us as a virtue from some circles: The less a particular proposition or idea makes sense, then the more faith you have in it, the better — which is a real insult to the human mind.
It's an insult to be told that we have to take irrational and inconsistent doctrines on faith and that we have to believe them more strongly than we believe the evidence appearing right before our eyes or in our very own hearts.
Fortunately that's not how the Buddha teaches faith.
For him, even taking things on reason is a type of faith.
Just because something is reasonable doesn't guarantee that it's going to be true.
But when something is reasonable, it's a lot easier to act on it and not feel torn up inside.
He also asks that when you take something on faith, you have to remind yourself of how little you really do know.
The assumptions you act on may seem the most reasonable, and so far in your experience they may have given the best results when you act on them, but the more clearly you realize that this doesn't constitute real knowledge, the more you're spurred to continue practicing until you really do know.
The Buddha gives the example of an elephant hunter in the forest.
The elephant hunter wants a big bull elephant to do the work he needs done.
So he goes into the forest and he sees big footprints.
Now, because he's an experienced elephant hunter, he doesn't immediately jump to the conclusion that these must be the footprints of a bull elephant.
After all, there are dwarf females with big feet.
They can't do the work he wants done.
But he sees that the footprints may indicate a bull elephant, so he follows them.
Notice that.
He does follow them.
He doesn't say, “Well, I don't really know, so I might as well give up.
I'll follow something only if I know it'll lead to a bull elephant.” He wants the elephant but he doesn't know for sure where it is.
These seem to be the most likely footprints, so he follows them.
Then he sees scratch marks high up in the trees.
Again, he doesn't jump to the conclusion that those must be the marks of a big bull elephant, because there are tall females with tusks.
They could have made those marks.
But he keeps following the tracks.
And finally he comes to a clearing where he actually sees a big bull elephant.
That's when he knows that he's got the elephant he wants.
The same holds true with the practice.
When you experience the pleasure of jhana, when you attain psychic powers: Those are just footprints and scratch marks.
The real thing is when you've had an experience of the deathless.
You realize that these assumptions that you acted on — the power of your actions, the truth of causality — are principles that have held good from the time of the Buddha until now.
Your assumption that if you act in certain ways, the results tend to follow a pattern; your assumption that it's worth your while in this short and uncertain life to devote as much time as you can to the training of the mind: You've found that those assumptions worked.
They've led you to a genuine happiness you know for sure.
You know that this happiness doesn't depend on the aggregates, doesn't depend on space or time.
It's not going to be touched by the death of the body.
That's when you know you've found the bull elephant.
That's when you really know that the Buddha's teachings are true.
So the realization that you're taking certain things on faith, but you don't really know them: That's meant to be a spur to continue with the practice.
Whatever doubts you might have are not considered a vice or something to be denied, for that would create lots of dishonesty in the mind.
Instead, you acknowledge them and take them as an incentive to practice further until you get to the point someday when you really know for yourself.
For sure.
It's in this way that the Buddha's teachings on kamma and rebirth are not an insult to your intelligence.
Instead they're a spur to use your intelligence even further so that you can get yourself out of the ignorance into which we are born and into the knowledge of a happiness that doesn't die.
Human life, when you think about it, can be pretty miserable.
Think of how few people actually get what they want out of life, and yet how much they're driven by their desires.
Sometimes their inability to get what they want can be blamed on laziness, but often it's because of factors totally beyond their control.
A wave comes up out of the ocean, washing thousands of people away, and all their plans, their hopes, their desires get washed away as well.
What we're left with is thousands of corpses, wrecked buildings — and that's just one day's events.
The days add up to years, and the years to centuries: centuries of frustrated desires.
So what we need is a way of dealing with frustrated desire, and that's one of the gifts the Buddha offers us.
He talks about the emotions that come from desire.
There's grief, there's joy, and there's equanimity.
He divides each of these into two types: householder grief and renunciate grief; householder joy and renunciate joy; householder equanimity and renunciate equanimity.
He uses these different emotions as a way of mapping out the path.
Most of us live in householder grief, householder joy, and householder equanimity.
Householder grief is the type that comes when you don't get the sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and tactile sensations you want.
You don't get the ideas you want.
Householder joy is when you finally do get what you want in terms of sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas.
Householder equanimity is when you stay equanimous in the midst of these things, whether they're good or bad.
Most of us muck around in these three types of emotions.
We suffer grief and so we look for joy in terms of sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas.
When we don't get what we want, that brings more grief, but we turn around to look for joy in the same places.
What the Buddha wants us to do is to turn our attention to what he calls renunciate grief, renunciate joy, renunciate equanimity.
Renunciate grief is when you reflect on how you haven't attained what you want in terms of freeing the mind from suffering.
You haven't reached the goal of the path.
Renunciate joy is the joy that comes when you have reached the goal.
And then renunciate equanimity is the peace and equanimity that come when you know the path is completed.
One of the Buddha's most interesting tactics is that when we suffer from householder grief, the way to get ourselves above and beyond that is to try to transform it, not into householder joy, but into renunciate grief.
Householder grief and joy, he says, don't provide us with much hope, whereas renunciate grief at least gives us some hope.
It points to the way out.
One way to foster renunciate grief is to reflect on the limitations of human life.
That chant we had just now, “I am subject to aging, subject to illness, subject to death, subject to separation from all that I love,” followed by the reflection on kamma: In the full text of the sutta, the Buddha doesn't stop there, with just the fact that you are subject to these things.
He says to reflect on the fact that all people, all beings — man, woman, child, ordained or not, whatever level of being you're on — are subject to these things.
This is one of the ways the Buddha repeatedly has us approach all our grief and dissatisfaction.
He says, “Open your eyes.
Are you the only person suffering these things?” This is his solution for the question, “Why me?” The answer, of course, is that it's not just you.
It happens to everybody with no exceptions.
It's amazing what opening your eyes like this will do for you.
And it's ironic, how realizing the huge amount of suffering in every life can make your suffering seem less.
But it works.
It changes your whole perspective.
You start seeing the futility of looking for your happiness in sights, sounds, smells, tastes, tactile sensations, and ideas.
In other words, the Buddha basically wants you to transform your grief into samvega, an overwhelming sense of dismay, not at your own personal problems, but at the nature of human existence as a whole.
And the reason for this is that samvega motivates you to look for a way out.
Of course, samvega on its own is not a very comfortable emotion to have.
But it provides the impetus to pasada, the sense of confidence that there must be a way out.
The way to work with renunciate grief is not to go looking for sights, sounds, and so forth.
You work with it by focusing your efforts on following the path.
This is why this kind of grief is a useful grief.
It keeps you on the path of practice.
Often you hear people saying, “Don't try to push too hard in the practice; don't have any sense of goal, because you'll get frustrated over the fact that you haven't reached your goal.” But that closes all the doors.
What you want is the attitude that “I'm not where I want to be, but there is a way to get where I want to be.” That gives you the right sense of direction.
You're not going back to householder joy, with all its uncertainties.
You're aiming at renunciate joy.
So whenever you find yourself asking, “Why me?” the answer is always, “Well, why not you?
It happens to everybody.” And what are you going to do about it?
You can't just stew around in your own personal problems.
You can deal with them, but the only way to do that is to open up to the larger perspective that enables you to get something out of the grief, to get something out of the disappointment.
This is why Ajaan Lee focuses so much on what are called the eight worldly dhammas: gain, loss, status, loss of status, praise, criticism, pleasure, and pain.
He says all eight of them have their uses.
We don't like the negative ones, but they have their uses for developing a sense of direction.
When loss hits you, if you can realize, “Oh, this is what happens to human beings everywhere,” then you can take it as a lesson so that you don't get carried away by gain when gain comes back.
The same with loss of status: This is what happens to people when they lose status.
After all, whose was it?
Status is something the world gives you.
You may feel that you've earned it, but if the world gives it, the world can take it away.
Instead of taking these things personally, you use the gains, you use the status, for whatever purposes you find skillful.
When you lose these things, you can learn lessons.
You can turn loss to a useful purpose as well.
At the very least, you learn who your true friends are, both inside and out.
If you got complacent when you were wealthy and powerful, you can now see if complacency is really your friend.
This way you can reflect on the nature of the human condition and not get carried away by the good things when they come back again.
This is how the Buddha has you deal with disappointment.
Don't try to assuage it by looking for more pleasure in worldly things, for that, he says, is why most people get entangled in sensuality.
They don't see any other escape from pain, disappointment, and grief, aside from scrambling after sensual pleasures, worldly things.
He tells you to set your sights in a different direction.
Renunciate grief, even though it's still a kind of grief, is better than getting lost in householder grief and joy, because renunciate grief can lead to renunciate joy, the kind of joy that's not affected by any change at all.
That's why we're working on the sense of ease and wellbeing that comes from having the mind in concentration.
That's part of the path toward renunciate joy.
We don't have to wait until the very end of the path to gain some of this joy, you know.
It comes with the sense of wellbeing you gain when you center the mind.
That, in and of itself, reminds you that there are alternatives to running after sensual pleasures.
There's the pleasure of a well-centered mind, a mind that's not affected by things, that has its own internal sense of wellbeing.
It doesn't need to depend on anything else outside.
So when you find yourself wallowing in grief, remember the Buddha's instructions on where to take that grief, what to do with it, how to find a way out, so that you don't stay stuck in that vicious cycle of going from grief to joy, to grief, to joy, to grief, to grief, to grief based on the ups and downs of things you experience through the senses.
Take that grief and point it in another direction.
My English teacher, during my senior year in high school, once made a remark that the sign of a great person is that he or she can reflect on his or her own personal problems but then, from that standpoint, can generalize, universalize them to the human condition as a whole.
She was talking about great poets, but it's also the nature of any wise mind not to wallow in its own personal issues, but to generalize from them, to see how this is the way it is for human beings everywhere.
This was what the Buddha did on the night of his Awakening.
He remembered his past lives over many eons — if you think you're carrying around a lot of narratives, imagine what he saw — but then he broadened his gaze to encompass the cosmos as a whole.
He wasn't the only one suffering rebirth after rebirth.
Everybody has been doing this.
But only after seeing this as a universal story was he able to see the underlying pattern: People are reborn in line with the quality of their intentional actions based on right or wrong views.
That universal insight was what enabled him to turn and look at the present moment, and to look at the right place in the present moment: his own views, his own intentions.
Only after looking at the universal picture was he able to depersonalize the issue of suffering and its causes.
When he had depersonalized it, he could look at it simply as a process.
When he viewed it as a process, he was able to find the way out.
You're not the first person to suffer and you're not going to be the last.
If you don't set your sights in the direction of renunciate grief and joy and equanimity, you'll never find a way out.
But if you learn to broaden your gaze to encompass the whole human condition, that's the beginning of the road to freedom.
So broaden your gaze.
Don't just look inside.
Look around yourself as well, for there are lessons to be learned there, too.
When the Buddha taught the practice as a path, one of the implications is that the path goes somewhere.
You follow the path because it takes you where you want to go.
That would seem obvious, yet you read so many times that the path is the goal or that it's a path without a goal.
What kind of path is that?
It's not really a path.
You wonder what's going on.
Think about the story of the Buddha in his quest for Awakening: It was nothing but a story of paths and goals.
First he mastered some very high levels of concentration that his early teachers taught as the goal.
One was the dimension of nothingness; the other was the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
Yet the Buddha realized that neither of these attainments was the goal for which he was looking.
So he left those teachers and went off to try to find another path of practice that would take him to his goal: the deathless, a happiness that was free from change, free from aging, illness, and death.
So he tried the path of austerities for a while and that didn't work, either — tried them for six whole years.
Imagine the amount of investment he had in hoping they'd work.
You don't put yourself through that kind of torment unless you think there's going to be a reward, or without developing a certain amount of pride around your powers of endurance.
Yet after six years he realized that that path led nowhere, offered no reward.
So he was willing to drop that investment, drop that pride, for the sake of something better.
That's when he remembered the time when he was young and, while his father was plowing, he sat under a tree and entered the first jhana.
The question came to his mind: Could this be the path?
And his mind gave an intuitive response: Yes.
So he followed that path and he found that it involved more than just the practice of jhana, which is just one of the factors of the path.
When he finally reached the deathless, he realized that the path leading him there had seven other factors.
And he knew this because these factors, acting together, brought him to the deathless.
It really did go where he wanted to go.
So the first thing he taught was the path, and that was his central teaching for the rest of his life.
At one point in his later years he compared himself to a man who had gone through the jungle and found an old path.
It was all overgrown, but he followed it and found that it led to an old capital city that had once been prosperous.
The buildings were somewhat fallen down, but they were still livable.
It was still a glorious city.
So he went out of the jungle and told the king: Get your men to clear this path and it will take you to this wonderful, glorious city.
So the imagery throughout the Buddha's teachings is that if you follow this path, it goes someplace.
And the place where it goes is really special: free from aging, illness, and death; a happiness totally unconditioned.
But some people have raised the question: What about the Buddha's earlier attainments, the dimension of nothingness, the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception?
After all, the Buddha does point out in some of his other suttas that you can use these attainments as the path as well.
Based on these attainments, you can develop the discernment that leads to release.
What's the proper attitude to have toward the Buddha's earlier attainments?
First, remember that the Buddha's early teachers had viewed these attainments as the goal.
Once you got there, you just stopped.
That was it.
You continued practicing these things but that was it.
You didn't take them anywhere else.
The Buddha, however, regarded them as a path to something further.
In other words, he used them as a basis for further insight.
Instead of seeing them as goals, he saw them as a path.
He didn't equate goals with path.
He made a clear distinction.
It's like somebody scrambling through a forest and finally arriving at a good road.
But instead of following the road to a good place, he just lies down in the road.
That's what the Buddha's earlier teachers were doing.
You know what happens when you lie down in roads.
You get run over.
Aging, illness, and death can come barreling down the road at any time.
So when you get to the road, you follow it.
You develop your concentration together with all the other elements of the path, and then you find that it really does lead to something special.
So whatever you hear about goal-less paths or paths that are goals… Just recently I read about a meditator who has been meditating for years.
He calls himself an experienced meditator and he says that he hasn't gotten anywhere but that's perfectly fine with him because that's the whole point of meditation: realizing there's nowhere to go.
I don't know which is more disheartening, the fact that he's been such a lousy meditator for so long or that he feels so good about being a lousy meditator.
You can't take people like that seriously.
You can't take them as guides.
The Buddha taught skills that get results.
That, he said, is the test for any kind of practice: the results it leads to.
When he taught the Kalamas, he told them that when you see for yourself that following a certain practice leads to a blameless happiness, follow that practice.
If you see that a practice is praised by the wise, follow that practice.
If a practice leads to unskillful behavior rooted in greed, anger, and delusion; unskillful behavior in taking life, breaking any of the precepts, having wrong views, having greed, ill will, any of these things: Realize that that path of practice leads you to a bad place, so don't go there.
Follow the path that actually gives good results.
This whole pattern of cause and effect, action and result, is our guideline.
It's our test for what's a good path and what's not.
So when someone is bragging that they have a path that doesn't lead to results, you know that they've been following a bad path.
You look for the path that does give results and doesn't scoff at people who want results.
It's very sad when you hear about people saying, “Do you want happiness?
An unconditioned happiness?
Poor you.” What's wrong with wanting a happiness that's totally blameless, a happiness that doesn't take anything away from anyone else?
If you don't have that kind of happiness, the only kind of happiness you're going to find in life is the type that does take things from others.
I was reading a while back about a teacher who said he wouldn't want to live in a world without suffering because he wouldn't then be able to exercise his compassion — which is a very selfish wish: You want there to be people who are suffering so that you can enjoy being compassionate to them?
Your sense of wellbeing needs to feed off other people's pain?
What kind of ideal is that?
The best possible ideal is to follow a path leading to a happiness that doesn't depend on other people's suffering in any way, shape, or form.
Then you can show that path to other people.
